Systemic ethics and inclusive governance: two key prerequisites for sustainability transitions of agri-food systems^JUN 2019^AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN VALUES^Food retailers are powerful actors of the agro-industrial food system. They exert strong lock-in effects that hinder transitions towards more sustainable agri-food systems. Indeed, their marketing practices generally result in excluding the most sustainable food products, such as local, low-input, small-scale farmers' products. Recently in Belgium, several initiatives have been created to enable the introduction of local products on supermarket shelves. In this article, we study three of those initiatives to analyse if the development of local sourcing in supermarkets opens up an opportunity for a transition towards more sustainable agri-food systems. We conceptualise transitions as a shift in governance and ethical values and adopt a pragmatist approach of ethics combined with the systemic perspective of transition studies, to evaluate the impact of these initiatives. Our analysis shows that they mainly contribute to the reproduction of the incumbent agri-food system. It also highlights that first, to be a driver for sustainability transitions, food ethics need to be systemic i.e. relate to a systemic understanding of problems and perspective of sustainability, including social justice. And second, it highlights that governance arrangements involving not only representative organisations of the various agri-food and non-agricultural actors, but also actors upholding ethical values that are currently missing in conventional supply chains and representing excluded and marginalised interests, favour the uptake of such systemic ethics by incumbent actors. Hence, systemic ethics and inclusive governance are key features for initiatives to contribute to a sustainability transition.
Inclusive businesses in agriculture: Defining the concept and its complex an evolving partnership structures in the field^APR 2019^LAND USE POLICY^Inclusive Businesses (IBs), signifying sustainable and equitable commercial operations linking low-income communities and smallholder farmers with agri-businesses in order to facilitate the former's market integration, are considered to comprise an essential tool for raising smallholders, across the developing world, out of poverty and for stimulating overall rural development. Although often promoted based on anecdotal evidence, IBs are little analysed and understood from a conceptual perspective, nor are they scrutinised when implemented in the field. This paper aims to provide a more precise insight into IBs, from a conceptual perspective and from a more practical one when implemented. Based on extensive fieldwork and assessments of 14 IBs, this paper proposes a new, flexible typology for the institutional set-ups of IBs, which accommodates the complex structures observed in the field. These innovative and hybrid arrangements, explained by a holistic framework that combines aspects of Resource Dependence Theory, Transaction Costs Economics and Agency Theory, are presented as unique combinations of the standard instruments of collective organisation, equity, lease/management contracts, mentorships, and supply contracts. Results show that whereas multiple-instrument IBs do obtain improved in-clusiveness of low-income communities and smallholder farmers in commercial value chains, issues related to corporate control over resources, lack of knowledge transfer and marginal benefits remain. The assessed IBs are dynamic in their set-up, however, and allow for adaptations to overcome these issues. The State, which plays an important role through establishing a stimulating policy framework and financial contributions, together with third party engagement, can counter the potential corporatisation under IBs - emphasising that IBs alone cannot constitute the expected panacea for agricultural transformation and rural development.
Inclusive Innovation: Product Innovation in Technology Supply Chains^SPR 2019^M&amp;SOM-MANUFACTURING &amp; SERVICE OPERATIONS MANAGEMENT^Problem definition: Managers introducing new innovative technological products frequently face the dual task of managing both revenues and profits. This task is made challenging in part because of the tendency of new technologies to traverse a sequentially downward path of gradually lowering costs and prices, which limits their initial availability and affordability, crimping market coverage and revenues. Academiclpractical relevance: We focus on the product management challenge of juggling revenues and profits, show how it is amplified in a supply chain, and propose a new degree of freedom in a supply chain, namely innovation investment anchoring, that offers product managers and their firms the ability to expand market coverage and improve both revenues and profits. Methodology: We adopt a sequential game theory approach to analyze the investment anchor decision for various objectives from investments in innovation to market coverage to profit. Results: We find that the investment anchoring approach can lead to greater investments in innovation, revenues, and profits. We also compare the investment anchoring for two types of innovation, product quality improvement and cost reduction, and show that the investment anchoring is more effective for product quality improvement. Managerial implications: Our findings have subtle but important implications for firms launching innovative products and aspiring to expand product sales and profits. Specifically, innovating firms in a supply chain by broadening the quest for an investment anchor and offering them incentives to invest as well as fine tuning the level of innovation investment with the market context can make innovation more inclusive, alleviate supply chain distortions, and streamline revenues and profits.
Is 3D printing an inclusive innovation?: An examination of 3D printing in Brazil^FEB-MAR 2019^TECHNOVATION^3D printing is an emerging technology that many believe will revolutionize manufacturing, supply chains and global product consumption. This study uses a new framework, the ladder of inclusive innovation, to analyze whether 3D printing is an inclusive innovation. The interviews with 3D printer users and innovators in Brazil show that 3D printers are not being used or purchased by marginalized communities because the technology is expensive, and it requires a steep learning curve. However, the technology is changing the process, structure, and post-structural discussions surrounding innovation for marginalized communities. Overall, there are aspects of 3D printing develop that are inclusive innovation, but there are significant barriers that prevent the technology from having a broad impact on society. The results of the study will help make innovations more inclusive for marginalized groups around the world.
Events of the Ceibal Plan. A complex web of mediations supporting the inclusive defy^JAN-APR 2019^REVISTA IBEROAMERICANA DE EDUCACION^None
Main street plot scale in urban design for inclusive economies: Stockholm case studies^DEC 2018^PROCEEDINGS OF THE INSTITUTION OF CIVIL ENGINEERS-URBAN DESIGN AND PLANNING^This paper explores evidence that entrepreneurial opportunities for migrants and other lower-income populations can be expanded in part through increasing the presence of fine-grained scales of plots and plates along main streets, as part of a systematic urban design strategy. It describes that systematic strategy herein. The paper encompasses the study of three main streets with varying plot sizes in the inner city of Stockholm, Sweden, and examines the outcomes for different types and scales of businesses. After presenting the findings, analysis and conclusions, larger questions of urban design for more inclusive economies are discussed.
An empirical evaluation of policy options for inclusive dairy value chain development in Nicaragua: A system dynamics approach^JUL 2018^AGRICULTURAL SYSTEMS^Achieving inclusive value chain development is a challenging task due to the complex and dynamic nature of interconnected value chains and their social, economic, and ecological dimensions. While many policies and intervention options exist to upgrade value chains, there are fewer methods that can be used to understand and quantify the multidimensional impacts that value chain policies and interventions may have throughout the value chain. This paper addresses this methodological gap by employing a system dynamics (SD) modeling approach. SD models allow us to model and quantify the processes and relationships inherent in the value chain through simulations, serving as a policy laboratory for the empirical assessment of intervention options. An SD model of the Matiguas dairy value chain in Nicaragua was developed and tested through a participatory modeling process. Our research tested and evaluated the short-, medium-, and long-term impacts of specific interventions and policies in the Matiguas daily value chain with the goal of strengthening the competitiveness and inclusion of small- and medium-scale producers. These interventions centered on improving the feeding system, which was identified by stakeholders as the critical constraint to competitiveness. The policy analysis reveals that both improved pastures and increased use of concentrates raise producer milk productivity by 5% and 11%, respectively in the long run, but are also expensive strategies for smallholder producers, leading to a reduction in profits relative to the baseline by 1% and 3%, respectively. Consequently, policymakers should identify strategies that help to reduce concentrate costs and support producers with investments in improved pasture, while also promoting training in pasture management skills. Indeed, in the long-run, model results reveal that investment and training in pasture management results in a 30% and 35% increase in milk production during the wet and dry season, respectively. Simulation results further highlighted that intensifying the feeding system to improve cow milk yields is mainly profitable in the long term, and thus requires a longer-term perspective by policymakers. The model provides a deeper understanding of the complex and dynamic nature of the Matiguas dairy value chain and the interactions between markets, coordination aspects, biophysical phenomena, and income. The system dynamics approach to value chain analysis further addresses a major analytical shortcoming in value chain analysis and provides decision makers with an improved platform for planning and policy formulation.
Projecting the Arena of Inclusion: The Case of South Korea in Pursuing a Phased Inclusive Growth Process^JUL 2018^REVIEW OF POLICY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.864  </td>  <td>2.333</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Socially-Inclusive Development and Value Creation: How a Composting Project in Galicia (Spain) "Hit the Rocks'^JUN 2018^SUSTAINABILITY^This paper introduces the concept of commoning in circular economies, and explores how commons reproduce over time. The starting point is that commoning can have an important role in fostering circular economies and sustainable and socially-inclusive development. By commoning, we refer to local stakeholders working collectively to preserve or restore their natural resource base to generate benefits that are locally shared. Through the analysis of a specific case of a group of commoners' associations in Galicia (Spain), the paper describes and discusses the development, and ultimate unravelling, of an innovative and decentralized waste management project to convert waste biomass from the monte (often-neglected upland green spaces, largely consisting of brush and trees) into compost. In order to make this composting project economically viable the possibility of collecting and processing urban green waste was also explored. While the project's application of the principles of a circular economy had the potential to bring locally-shared economic and ecological benefits, and foster territorial prosperity and resilience, it was ultimately frustrated by questions of scale, administrative and regulatory barriers, competing and conflicting land-use claims and financial cutbacks in the public sector.
Validating the City Region Food System Approach: Enacting Inclusive, Transformational City Region Food Systems^MAY 2018^SUSTAINABILITY^This paper offers a critical assessment of the value and utility of the evolving City Region Food Systems (CRFS) approach to improve our insights into flows of resources-food, waste, people, and knowledge-from rural to peri-urban to urban and back again, and the policies and process needed to enable sustainability. This paper reflects on (1) CRFS merits compared to other approaches; (2) the operational potential of applying the CRFS approach to existing projects through case analysis; (3) how to make the CRFS approach more robust and ways to further operationalize the approach; and (4) the potential for the CRFS approach to address complex challenges including integrated governance, territorial development, metabolic flows, and climate change. The paper begins with the rationale for CRFS as both a conceptual framework and an integrative operational approach, as it helps to build increasingly coherent transformational food systems. CRFS is differentiated from existing approaches to understand the context and gaps in theory and practice. We then explore the strength of CRFS through the conceptual building blocks of 'food systems' and 'city-regions' as appropriate, or not, to address pressing complex challenges. As both a multi-stakeholder, sustainability-building approach and process, CRFS provides a collective voice for food actors across scales and could provide coherence across jurisdictions, policies, and scales, including the Milan Urban Food Policy Pact, the Sustainable Development Goals, the Habitat III New Urban Agenda, and the Conference of the Parties (COP) 21. CRFS responds directly to calls in the literature to provide a conceptual and practical framing for policy through wide engagement across sectors that enables the co-construction of a relevant policy frame that can be enacted through sufficiently integrated policies and programs that achieve increasingly sustainable food systems.
Inclusive Businesses and Land Reform: Corporatization or Transformation?^MAR 2018^LAND^Inclusive businesses (IBs), embodying partnerships between commercial agribusinesses and smallholder farmers/low-income communities, are considered to contribute towards rural development and agricultural sector transformation. Structured as complex organizational set-ups consisting of, and overcoming the limitations of, standard inclusive instruments (collective organization, mentorship, supply contract, lease/management contract and equity), they allow for the inclusion of smallholders and low-income communities into commercial agricultural value chains. IBs are a way for governments to engage private agribusinesses in agricultural and rural policies. However, will the commercial sector, through IB partnerships, contribute towards the government's transformation and developmental objectives? Based on case studies in South Africa-a country engaged in land and agrarian reforms-the effects of IBs at the project level appear positive, illustrated by an increase in production and growth in agricultural assets. However, individual beneficiaries experience only a marginal change in income and livelihoods. Whereas land reform, project development and market integration are generally achieved, the transformation and beneficiary development objectives are compromised. Although commercial agribusinesses contribute to investment needs in the sector and smallholder exposure to commercial markets, IB partnerships allow commercial entities control over the smallholders' assets. Ownership and secure rights, especially of land, and support of external parties to capacitate beneficiaries and adjust power asymmetries, are essential starting points. Without these aspects, IBs will not lead to effective transformation and development.
Biotechnology and the bioeconomy Towards inclusive and sustainable industrial development^JAN 25 2018^NEW BIOTECHNOLOGY^To transform developing and least developing countries into industrialised ones, biotechnology could be deployed along the value chain, to provide support to the development of the bio-based industries in such a way to ensure sustainability of the sector and to reduce negative environmental impacts that might otherwise occur. In agribusiness development, for instance, interventions could start from inputs and agricultural mechanization, modern processing technologies, packaging of perishable products, the promotion of food safety in the processing and regulatory environment; and interventions to improve competitiveness and productivity. Worth over USD 300 billion in revenue, the role of the biotechnology goes beyond industrial growth, since it provides opportunities for progress towards many of the UN sustainable development goals (SDGs). This paper reviews the status of industrial biotechnology as it relates to inclusive and sustainable industrial development. (C) 2017 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Research on the Application of Financial Science and Technology in the Field of Personal Credit Investigation -Based on the Perspective of Digital Inclusive Finance^2018^INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM 2018 - SOCIAL SCIENCE MANAGEMENT AND INNOVATION^With the development of digital inclusive finance, the deficiency of traditional personal credit system is becoming more and more obvious. In order to make up for its defects, financial science and technology are applied in the field of personal credit investigation, but the credit information sharing is insufficient. The problem of weak protection of personal credit information still exists and needs to be solved urgently. Starting with the necessity of constructing personal credit system based on financial science and technology, this paper reveals the current situation and existing problems of Internet credit investigation and big data credit investigation. Then, the block chain technology is introduced into the personal credit system. The block chain technology with both sharing and security will promote the construction of the new personal credit investigation system. And from the aspects of necessity, solution and significance to inclusive finance, this paper expounds that block chain credit investigation solves the problem of insufficient sharing of credit information and weak protection of personal credit information. Then, on the basis of the positive significance of the application of block chain technology in the field of personal credit, the paper points out the technical bottleneck and potential risks of the application of block chain technology in personal credit system. Finally, the conclusion of this paper and the suggestion of developing personal credit system based on financial science and technology under the perspective of digital inclusive finance are put forward.
Inclusive environmental disclosure practices and firm performance: The role of green supply chain management^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF OPERATIONS &amp; PRODUCTION MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.111  </td>  <td>5.604</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Can Tourism Promote Inclusive Growth? Supply Chains, Ownership and Employment in Ha Long Bay, Vietnam^2018^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^Inclusive growth is contested yet adopted by the World Bank to reduce poverty and inequality through rapid economic growth. Research has tested inclusive growth in sectors including agriculture, but few studies apply it to tourism which is significant for many developing countries. The paper interrogates tourism-led inclusive growth: supply chains, economic linkages/leakage, ownership, employment and expenditure. It draws from fieldwork in Vietnam where tourism has rapidly developed with partial economic benefits for local communities, but does not appear to fall within the inclusive growth paradigm. It is unclear if tourism-led growth will become any more inclusive in the short-to-medium term.
Linkages between tourism and agriculture for inclusive development in Tanzania A value chain perspective^2018^JOURNAL OF HOSPITALITY AND TOURISM INSIGHTS^None
Agricultural innovation and inclusive value-chain development: a review^2018^JOURNAL OF AGRIBUSINESS IN DEVELOPING AND EMERGING ECONOMIES^None
Inclusive business model in tapioca starch industry in Lake Toba area: a case study^2018^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON INDUSTRIAL AND SYSTEMS ENGINEERING (ICONISE) 2017^The notion of inclusive business calls for additional focus and innovation in the way companies do business which seeks to contribute to poverty alleviation by including Bottom of the Pyramids (BoP) communities within its value chain while not losing sight of the ultimate goal of business. Lake Toba Area has potentials in providing chances for doing businesses. On the other hand, the growth of market size is rather slow and demographically still dominated by BoP. This is a case study which seeks to investigate to what extent the Inclusive Business Model (IBM) is adopted in the strategic planning and applied in the operational management of companies that operate in Lake Toba Area. The study was conducted in qualitative basis. The observation was conducted by gathering data and information through a series of interviews with the top management and desk study of the business plan in a tapioca starch industry in Toba Samosir Regency. The collected data and information were then analyzed qualitatively by comparing them with criteria and parameters of IBM suggested in a vast body of literature. The reference by which the IBM is referred in this study is a series of criteria which is synthesized from a literature review on a vast body of literature about IBM. From data analysis, it is evident that IBM has been incorporated in the strategic plan and applied in the operational activities of the object of this study. However, we also found some rooms for improvement such as expanding the involvement of BoP in their value chain as consumers, by which some innovation in the product diversification is required.
Making Markets More Inclusive: Lessons from Care and the Future of Sustainability in Agricultural Value Chain Development^OCT 2017^MILLENNIAL ASIA^None
Is contract farming an inclusive alternative to land grabbing? The case of potato contract farming in Maharashtra, India^OCT 2017^GEOFORUM^In the recent explosion of attention given to the land grabbing phenomenon, contract farming has been identified as a potentially inclusive alternative for smallholders to outright acquisition of farm land by agri-business capital. This paper responds to these claims by resituating contract farming as an equally important form of land control. The focus of the paper is a case study of potato contract farming in Maharashtra, India. While there is 'nothing new' about contract farming as a mode of agriculture production in India, its influence on patterns of agrarian change is poorly understood. Adopting an agrarian political economy-informed livelihoods approach, the paper argues that rather than an inclusive alternative to land grabbing, contract farming in the study site represents another way that capital is coming to control land in rural India, with just as important implications for agrarian livelihoods. While some individual households have improved their livelihoods through participation, the contract scheme acts to reinforce already existing patterns of inequality. In particular, the unequal power relations between firm and farmer skew the capture of benefits towards the firm, and render participating households vulnerable to indebtedness and loss of autonomy over land and livelihood decisions.
Collective action in a smallholder oil palm production system in Indonesia: The key to sustainable and inclusive smallholder palm oil?^AUG 2017^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Indonesian smallholder oil palm generally yield much less than corporate plantations.. We analysed a smallholder oil palm production system in West Sumatra which outperformed its nucleus estate plantation, consistently producing yields far above the national average for over 25 years. Its institutional setup allowed farmers to combine the advantages of smallholder and plantation agriculture by capitalizing on collective action. Collective action design principles (Ostrom, 1990; Cox, 2010) are used to assess the institutional setup of a smallholder production system. This case study demonstrates that with a strong institutional arrangement, smallholder oil palm farmers can participate in supply chains on advantageous conditions and substantially increase productivity, thereby contributing to both rural development and land sparing. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Introduction: Challenges to Africa's Agricultural Transformation^JUN 2017^AFRICAN DEVELOPMENT REVIEW-REVUE AFRICAINE DE DEVELOPPEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.054  </td>  <td>1.195</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Making extractive industries-led growth inclusive: An introduction^APR 2017^EXTRACTIVE INDUSTRIES AND SOCIETY-AN INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL^The extractive industries are often perceived as extremely lucrative, with civil society, international agencies, governments, and NGOs commonly arguing for greater levels of local return. Unfortunately, it is also common for foreign-owned extractive company community engagement/development activities in poorer host nations to be 'ad-hoc' and overlap with basic government services and responsibilities. We present six papers that represent examples of development opportunities in the supply chains of the extractive industries capable of facilitating inclusive engagement while simultaneously reducing poverty and diversifying economies, and which align with government social responsibilities. Staying within the supply chain enables the companies to benefit directly from their investments, enhance their operational security, and prevent others from 'free-loading'. These six papers show a diversity of opportunities that can benefit foreign extractive engagement, improve the potential of inclusive growth to local communities, enhance the capacity of local governments, and avoid common pitfalls by maintaining communication between important stakeholders. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Growth and Impacts of All-Inclusive Holiday Packages: Echoes from the Industry^2017^TOURISM PLANNING &amp; DEVELOPMENT^All-inclusive (AI) holiday packages have become a popular travel choice, particularly in the sun-soaked destinations of the Mediterranean and the Caribbean. Despite the benefits the AI is assumed to offer to key stakeholders, caution has been urged over the increase in AI offerings due to the negative impacts they impair on destinations. This paper aims to investigate supply-side perceptions of the growth and impacts of the AI on Cyprus' tourism development. Drawing from semi-structured interviews with industry stakeholders, findings reveal that the AI is determined by an interplay of demand and supply conditions while its growth is moderated by contextual factors pertaining to coastal destinations' development stage. With a range of negative impacts being identified as detrimental to the tourism development of Mediterranean destinations, the study proposes a conceptual framework outlining the determinants, influencers and outcomes of the AI trend.
Governing the transformation towards 'nature-inclusive' agriculture: insights from the Netherlands^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL SUSTAINABILITY^It is becoming increasingly difficult to combine nature conservation by farmers with intensive and large-scale farming. The Dutch government recently adopted the new policy concept of 'nature-inclusive' farming, which aims at promoting more sustainable agricultural practices that minimizes negative ecological impacts, maximizes positive ones and at the same time benefits from natural processes. A transformation towards 'nature-inclusive' farming faces three key governance challenges that are elaborated upon in this paper. First, agri-environment schemes and other conservation arrangements need to become more effective. At the same time, nature conservation should be mainstreamed in agricultural policies and in agri-food chains. Second, we need shared meanings about nature-inclusive farming. Third, other forms of knowledge production for nature-inclusive farming are required that focus more on farmers' knowledge needs.
Contract Farming as Part of a Multi-Instrument Inclusive Business Structure: A Theoretical Analysis^2017^AGREKON^Contract farming (CF) agreements are presently being restructured to form part of more complex Inclusive Business (IB) set-ups. Additional instruments, alongside CF, are implemented to overcome the challenges of CF and to adapt to the policy environment in which the different stakeholders operate. This paper develops a theoretical framework that gives insight into how these complex entities are structured and operate in a developing country context. This theoretical analysis takes a holistic approach by adopting elements of existing theories to form a new critical research paradigm: (i) Resource Dependence Theory to incorporate the wider operating environment in which the two cases operate, (ii) Transaction Cost Economics to explain the internal efficiency of the different models, and (iii) Agency Theory to account for the safeguard mechanisms. This new framework is then tested on two complex IBs that aim to integrate smallholder farmers into the commercial value chain, but which have each implemented a different institutional set-up developed around CF arrangements. It finds that a high dependence by the offtaker in the first case study stimulates a higher level of commitment and investment by this stakeholder in the contract arrangement. In turn, this increases the asset specificity aspect, which then requires safeguards to ensure the smallholders adhere to the contractual agreement. A higher dependency in this particular study also resulted in a higher number of smallholders being engaged in the contract, requiring mechanisms to efficiently monitor and coordinate them.
The Enabling Environment for Inclusive Agribusiness in Southeast Asia^DEC 2016^ASIAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURE AND DEVELOPMENT^Smallholder farmers constitute a sizable subset of the population in the ASEAN region and therefore are important stakeholders to consider in realizing the broader goals of inclusive development and poverty reduction. Linking them to various agriculture-related activities across the value chain paves the pathway of opportunities to expand their access to markets and build capacities. As such, determining policy and institutional conditions that enable inclusive agribusiness development as well as key barriers to their engagement would provide greater leverage for smaller agribusiness players to move up the value chain. By reviewing the extant literature on agribusiness models, we provided a survey of the inclusive agribusiness structure most prevalent in the ASEAN region. The study draws from the "Hierarchy of Enabling Needs" model and socio-organizational structure model to offer an integrated conceptual framework that maps out the environment that facilitates stronger linkages and deeper inclusion of small-scale players in the agribusiness structure. To better situate the conditions of inclusive agribusiness, the sets of enablers are further assessed across varying country contexts. The paper suggests that there is no single model that could encapsulate deeper linkages in the sector. Notwithstanding ASEAN's fundamental diversity, the region is bound by its outward looking and market-oriented policy frameworks that serve to enable pathways and corridors toward greater inclusiveness in the agribusiness sector.
Fodder inclusive value chain analysis of milk in organized sector of Karnataka^DEC 2016^RANGE MANAGEMENT AND AGROFORESTRY^In India, 80 per cent of the milk collection is handled through unorganized sector. But it is essential to shift the farmers towards organized sector to ensure fair practices. This is possible by improving the backward linkages through extension advisory services. So a study was taken up with the objectives of analyzing marketing efficiency of milk types of Karnataka milk federation and to map the present backward and forward services rendered to producers and processors. Value chain analysis method was used where in range of actors involved in the business were interviewed to collect data. Marketing efficiency was arrived at using secondary data. Among 4 types of milk, 'Shubham' milk expressed highest marketing efficiency due to its high fat percentage. Al services (100%), obtaining feed at discounted price (88.33%) and availing veterinary services (75.84%) were the backward services availed by majority of producers. More than half of the dealers (58.34%) received advisory services on storage of products and sweet preparation. Six predictors-total milk production, milk retained for family, annual income from livestock, backward services availed, herd size and price of the milk explained 99.8 per cent variation (r(2)=0.998) in the amount of milk sent to cooperative societies by the producers.
Applying inclusive business approaches to nature-based tourism in Namibia and South Africa^DEC 2016^TOURISM^Inclusive business is described as private sector-led business initiatives that aim to profitably engage low-income populations across productive value chains. This paper aims to quantify the impact of businesses implementing inclusive business strategies to determine the value to local communities as well as the tourism business. The research reviews the direct impact of the business on communities, determines the value proposition to the businesses as well as comparing the partnership structures between the operators and communities. Practical examples from Namibia and South Africa are provided of how different strategies may, or may not, generate a tangible impact for both parties. The research contributes to the limited literature about inclusive business models in the tourism sector.
Inclusive governance of aquaculture value-chains: Co-producing sustainability standards for Bangladeshi shrimp and prawns^NOV 2016^OCEAN &amp; COASTAL MANAGEMENT^The rapid global growth in aquaculture, described as a 'blue revolution', has demanded new modes of market governance along long international value-chains. In large part this governance has been built on an expanding framework of voluntary industry-led standards, though latterly these standards have drawn some criticism. Such criticism has largely centred on (i) a crisis of trust, related to (ii) the closed development of these standards by a powerful few, and (iii) a relatively narrow framing of sustainability according to techno-scientific, best-practice criteria. This article introduces the SEAT research project, which sought to address these criticisms by co-producing indices of sustainable aquaculture indicators according to 'top-down' inputs from scientific, government and industry experts, and 'bottom-up' inputs from aquaculture stakeholders along the value-chains. It particularly focuses on how the project elicited these 'bottom-up' indicators through inclusive workshops with aquaculture stakeholders, drawing on concepts and approaches from practical ethics. It describes and evaluates the approach in one particular workshop with Bangladeshi shrimp and prawn stakeholders, and in so doing seeks to make methodological contributions to on-going debates on how to affect participatory aquaculture governance. The experience highlighted the potential difficulty in assembling a truly diverse group of stakeholders, but did demonstrate the potential of value-ranking and scenario exercises for mobilising a rich store of knowledge for the bottom-up construction of standards, as an important compliment to expert-led top down initiatives. Workshop participants themselves emphasised the workshops as a unique opportunity for learning about the different framings of sustainability along the value-chain, and urged facilitators to emulate the workshops more widely, from the farm-scale to the global scale. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Making Markets More Inclusive: Lessons from CARE and the Future of Sustainability in Agricultural Value Chain Development^SEP 2016^RURAL SOCIOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.87  </td>  <td>2.858</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Moving Towards Inclusive Development? Recent Views on Inequalities, Frugal Innovations, Urban Geo-Technologies, Gender and Hybrid Governance^APR 2016^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT RESEARCH^This article contributes to the discussion within European Association of Development Research and Training Institutes on how development studies are changing, by setting out recent views on new and changing research topics, and drawing out implications for current discussions on inclusive development. The contributions are written by authors working at the cutting edge of development studies, in terms of their perspectives on development pathways and engagement with other disciplines. They centre on three concerns: (i) poverty and inequalities, (ii) economic development through innovations in local production and international value chains, and global innovations impacting people and policies everywhere, and (iii) hybrid governance arrangements, emerging as non-state actors take on governing activities. Analysing their contributions shows that authors link several dimensions of inclusive development. The conclusion is that thinking about inclusive development must engage with disciplines that are non-traditional for development studies scholars in framing what areas of concern are relevant and strategic.
Embedded Simultaneous Prompting Procedure to Teach STEM Content to High School Students with Moderate Disabilities in an Inclusive Setting^MAR 2016^EDUCATION AND TRAINING IN AUTISM AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^Effects of an embedded simultaneous prompting procedure to teach STEM (science, technology, engineering, math) content to three secondary students with moderate intellectual disabilities in an inclusive general education classroom were evaluated in the current study. Students learned discrete (i.e., geometric figures, science vocabulary, or use of technology to publish) and chained tasks (i.e., linear equation, Punnett square, or Internet research) from a peer tutor and paraprofessionals. Using a multiple probe across participants design, results showed students reached criterion in two to eight sessions and maintained the skills for one month following intervention. Generalization was also at higher levels than in the baseline condition. In addition, general education students who attended class with the participants expressed positive comments based on the intervention.
Supporting Inclusive Innovation: Developing Improved Analytical Methods and STI Policy Instruments to Operationalise Inclusive Innovation^2016^PORTLAND INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON MANAGEMENT OF ENGINEERING AND TECHNOLOGY (PICMET 2016): TECHNOLOGY MANAGEMENT FOR SOCIAL INNOVATION^None
Inclusive Businesses as a Source of Quality Work for Small Entrepreneurs in Poverty Conditions: An Exploratory Study in the Municipality of Apartado, Colombia^JAN-JUN 2016^EQUIDAD &amp; DESARROLLO^This paper develops a prefeasibility study for the implementation of inclusive businesses in the municipality of Apartado (Colombia), being understood as business plans that link the vulnerable population to the value chain of companies in order to generate economic and social value. Thus, the purpose was to analyze, together with the key stakeholders in the area, the business planning potential in the territory in an inclusive and sustainable manner, and the possibility of consolidating new quality work alternatives for small female entrepreneurs in poverty conditions. After exploring the theoretical framework of inclusive business, the paper presents the results of interviews and focus groups, as well as the main conclusions and suggestions for future research.
A tale of five cities: Using recycling frameworks to analyse inclusive recycling performance^NOV 2015^WASTE MANAGEMENT &amp; RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.015  </td>  <td>2.283</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Landscapes of Social Inclusion: Inclusive Value-Chain Collaboration Through the Lenses of Food Sovereignty and Landscape Governance^SEP 2015^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT RESEARCH^Value-chain collaboration (VCC) aims to increase smallholder productivity and market integration. Higher productivity, better incomes and innovations have been documented, but also exclusionary trends and loss of biological and dietary diversity. New forms of VCC 'beyond the chain' hope to tackle this through collaboration with non-chain actors. Drawing on territorially embedded VCC, food sovereignty and landscape governance theories, this article presents a conceptual framework to analyse whether and how inclusive VCC, greater farmer autonomy and sustainable landscapes can be achieved. Key elements of our approach are knowledge of smallholders' various livelihood trajectories and selective value-chain engagement; multi-stakeholder definition of the sustainability choice space; and smallholder inclusion in adaptive learning and empowerment processes that bring together and integrate different and oft-competing knowledge systems and governance levels. This approach will support further action research in learning platforms in Ghana and South Africa. The article discusses the link with the broader inclusive development debate.
Small Farmers in High-Value Chains: Binding or Relaxing Constraints to Inclusive Growth?^AUG 2015^WORLD DEVELOPMENT^Considerable empirical work relates participation in contract farming with farm profitability. However causation is far from settled as few studies control for endogeneity of participation. Moreover the link between contract farming and equity is ambiguous as the association between contract farming and farmer endowments is mixed. This case study of smallholders in the tobacco industry addresses these issues, and seems to be the first such econometric application in the Philippines. Based on a treatment effects regression, contract farming increases profitability, with participation biased toward smaller farm sizes, supporting the positive role of contract farming toward inclusive growth in rural areas. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Inclusive public participation in health: Policy, practice and theoretical contributions to promote the involvement of marginalised groups in healthcare^JUN 2015^SOCIAL SCIENCE &amp; MEDICINE^Migrants and ethnic minorities are under-represented in spaces created to give citizens voice in healthcare governance. Excluding minority groups from the health participatory sphere may weaken the transformative potential of public participation, (re)producing health inequities. Yet few studies have focused on what enables involvement of marginalised groups in participatory spaces. This paper addresses this issue, using the Participation Chain Model (PCM) as a conceptual framework, and drawing on a case study of user participation in a Dutch mental health advocacy project involving Cape Verdean migrants. Data collection entailed observation, documentary evidence and interviews with Cape Verdeans affected by psychosocial problems (n = 20) and institutional stakeholders (n = 30). We offer practice, policy and theoretical contributions. Practically, we highlight the importance of a proactive approach providing minorities and other marginalised groups with opportunities and incentives that attract, retain and enable them to build and release capacity through involvement. In policy terms, we suggest that both health authorities and civil society organisations have a role in creating 'hybrid' spaces that promote the substantive inclusion of marginalised groups in healthcare decision-making. Theoretically, we highlight shortcomings of PCM and its conceptualisation of users' resources, suggesting adaptations to improve its conceptual and practical utility. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Procedural Justice in Procurement Management and Inclusive Interorganizational Relations: An Institutional Perspective^APR 2015^BRITISH JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT^This paper applies the concept of procedural justice to one of the most important focal points of interorganizational relations: the purchaser-supplier relationship. The few extant studies of the concept in the purchaser-supplier domain have overlooked an important aspect of this key relationship: that is, inclusiveness in procurement. This is despite the fact that interest in the specific empirical context of supply chain links between large purchasing organizations (LPOs) and ethnic minority suppliers (EMSs) from disadvantaged communities proceeds apace on both sides of the Atlantic. Institutional theory is used to examine the form that procedural justice takes in eight case studies of LPOs from the private and public sectors, which actively engage with inclusive procurement management initiatives in England. The guiding question is twofold: What may LPO approaches to installing procedural justice in procurement management entail?' and How are these approaches shaped?' This paper identifies specific approaches to installing procedural justice for inclusive procurement and submits theoretical propositions about how these are shaped. The study contributes to a macro-level assessment of procedural justice, i.e. interorganizational procedural justice, as a significant aspect of inclusive interorganizational relationships, which is a domain in need of theoretical development.
Innovations in financing of agri-food value chains in China and India Lessons and policies for inclusive financing^2015^CHINA AGRICULTURAL ECONOMIC REVIEW^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.05  </td>  <td>1.209</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A molecular genetic lab to generate inclusive and exclusive forensic evidence: Two suspects, a victim, and a bloodstained T-shirt^MAY 2014^BIOCHEMISTRY AND MOLECULAR BIOLOGY EDUCATION^Molecular genetic laboratory exercises can be ineffective due the student's lack of connection to the complex and sequential protocols. In this inquiry-based molecular genetic laboratory exercise, we harness students' fascination with human forensics and provide a real-life scenario using biomolecular techniques to identify "whose blood is on the t-shirt." We use fish blood to create realistic blood stains on clothing and challenge the students to use DNA analyses to clear or implicate suspects. Safety concerns are minimized through the use of fish blood, while maximizing both realism and the likelihood of student success due to fishes' nucleated red blood cells. The goal in designing this laboratory exercise was to create a feasible protocol for large (over 300 students) second year university courses. During two 3 hour laboratory sessions, students learn and apply clean/sterile technique, DNA extraction, polymerase chain reaction, restriction fragment length polymorphisms, and agarose gel electrophoresis. The students also learn to interpret the resulting gel bands in terms of inclusive or exclusive evidence. Students have consistently ranked this lab as their favorite of five taken as part of a second year Genetics course. (c) 2013 by The International Union of Biochemistry and Molecular Biology, 42(3):XXXXX-XXXXX, 2014.
Inclusive Agribusiness Models for Africa: The Case of an Innovative Initiative by TechnoServe in Zimbabwe^2014^INTERNATIONAL FOOD AND AGRIBUSINESS MANAGEMENT REVIEW^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.937  </td>  <td>1.028</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Towards an Inclusive Virtual Dressing Room for Wheelchair-Bound Customers^2014^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2014 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COLLABORATION TECHNOLOGIES AND SYSTEMS (CTS)^This manuscript reports on a work-in-progress project evolving aside from a main undertaking; that of making a commercial 'Internet of Things' style product called " The Virtual Dressing Room (VDR)". The project targets the process chain from designer and clothing manufacturer to retailer and end-user customers. The VDR has been subject of other publications, thus is introduced only briefly in this manuscript. VDR is a 'non-groupware-based' project funded under the Danish National Advanced Technology Foundation. A main goal at conception was reducing returns of online purchased apparel, which, at a reported approximately 40%, is crippling the clothing industry. Results from public response surveys (including at The Scandinavian Health &amp; Rehab Messe) to a VDR simulation system clearly indicated how the wheelchair-bound community perceived benefits from the system. This was unexpected and aside from the original VDR project design requisite. Interviews highlighted problems of high street fitting rooms not being sized to accommodate wheelchairs, and often so minimally sized as to not enable a second helping person to be present to support the involved undressing and dressing procedures. Existing online purchasing systems were also considered problematic including a need to improve social networking to enable others Online to view clothes considered for purchase to assist decision making. The production suffered problematic cooperation, coordination, communication, and collaboration that prevented early product. This resulted in additional surveys and the evolution of this additional work-in-progress. Following introducing the VDR, key issues such as interface design, body measurement, and cloth representation in the VDR is discussed. The finding of wheelchair-bound-need is envisioned as a next-generation iteration and is thus the focus of this contribution to position the work-in-progress and invite like-minded interested parties to collaborate towards optimization of a system to realize potentials.
Sustainable Food Lab Learning Systems for Inclusive Business Models Worldwide^2013^INTERNATIONAL FOOD AND AGRIBUSINESS MANAGEMENT REVIEW^The Sustainable Food Lab (SFL) is a consortium of business, non-profit and public organizations working together to accelerate the shift toward sustainability in the mainstream food system. In this brief case study, I introduce the approach that this multi-stakeholder initiative has developed to tackle this wicked problem. The Food Lab is not revolutionary. Its mission is to accelerate progress, and its primary point of leverage is to build on the needs of food companies to demonstrate sustainable production of ingredients. To achieve this end, the Food Lab creates a pre-competitive space for member organizations to pilot innovations through business driven supply chain projects and provides opportunities for diverse stakeholders working on sustainability to meet, learn, and support each other in becoming better leaders for change in their organizations and in the larger system. This article highlights some of the outcomes that have been achieved by members as a result of participation in the Food Lab. While we are proud of the results, our guiding hypothesis is that the leadership capabilities that the Lab nurtures are as important as the tangible outcomes of projects.
Entrepreneurship and Innovation at the Base of the Pyramid: A Recipe for Inclusive Growth or Social Exclusion?^JUN 2012^JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT STUDIES^Policy makers often see entrepreneurship as a panacea for inclusive growth in underdeveloped Base of the Pyramid (BOP) regions, but it may also lead to unanticipated negative outcomes such as crime and social exclusion. Our objective is to improve the understanding of how entrepreneurship policies can lead to socially inclusive growth at the BOP. Drawing on data collected from Brazilian tourism destinations with varying entrepreneurship, innovation, and social inclusion policies, we argue that weak institutions coupled with alert entrepreneurs encourage destructive outcomes, especially if entrepreneurship policies are based solely on economic indicators. Policies addressing both economic and social perspectives may foster more productive entrepreneurial outcomes, albeit at a more constrained economic pace. The study extends the related BOP, entrepreneurship, global value chain, and sustainable tourism literatures by examining the poor as entrepreneurs, the role of local innovation, and how entrepreneurship policies generate different social impacts within poor communities.
Inclusive business, human rights and the dignity of the poor: a glance beyond economic impacts of adapted business models^JAN 2012^BUSINESS ETHICS-A EUROPEAN REVIEW^In recent years, a considerable amount of research on adapted business for developing countries focused on the impact such endeavours have on the respective companies as well as on the affected people. However, the main emphasis within management sciences was on the economic outcomes or (even more distinct and often) on the question of how to integrate the poor into business models and value chains. Until now, further aspects of a dignified human existence were merely covered as a side note. The article focuses on the influence of inclusive business approaches on various aspects of human dignity and provides explorative insights as a basis for future theory building. The aim is to uncover how human dignity is affected by different business approaches for the poor including and beyond economic outcomes. After giving an insight into the essence and meaning of human dignity in connection to various human rights, the articles refers to a number of illustrative cases of inclusive business. The analysis culminates in the insight that dignity can be (and sometimes already is) assured and promoted by deliberately including the poor into relevant value-added business processes. If this is the case, an enhanced dignity is not merely the result of increased incomes but stems from a variety of effects. However, such positive effects are not an inevitable outcome of any inclusive business initiative.
The impact of inclusive and fragmented operations strategy processes on operational performance^2010^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PRODUCTION RESEARCH^The links between strategy and performance remains an elusive 'holy grail' for researchers and practitioners alike. We do not seek to provide a prescriptive panacea in this paper but we find links between particular types of strategic formulation and operations performance in a range of key parameters. Our research focuses on the personal computer industry where there are high demands placed on the capabilities of the operations function. We suggest that such capabilities do not happen by accident but are developed by specific strategies whereby in-house operations and business mainstream strategies, including supply, become closely linked in both planning and implementation.
Agroindustry: Fertil ground for inclusive business^2009^ACADEMIA-REVISTA LATINOAMERICANA DE ADMINISTRACION^Agribusiness offers the promise of stimulating agricultural growth and the reduction of rural poverty through the inclusion of individuals and groups belonging to the low income sector, LIS, in the agribusiness value chain. In this article the authors examine five case studies using the agroindustrial chain framework, which apart from their economic motivation, have incorporated the LIS in the activities of the value chain to simultaneously improve income and quality of life for LIS members and their families.
An inclusive and extensible architecture for electronic brokerage^DEC 2000^DECISION SUPPORT SYSTEMS^The output and experience of a large European project iii Electronic Brokerage called "Generic Architecture for Information Availability" (GAIA) is presented. The paper describes a reference model and functional architecture for value-added mediation in Electronic Commerce. The customers are provided with a uniform way of accessing heterogeneous suppliers without changes in the supplier software. A way of employing distributed objects for large-scale service integration and multi-enterprise transactions is shown. The issues encountered during the implementation of the Common Brokerage Architecture (CORBA)-based pilot prototype and the application of the architecture in three diverse domains are presented. (C) 2000 Elsevier Science B.V. All rights reserved.
Media Visibility and Inclusion of Radical Right Populism in Hungary and Romania A Discursive Opportunity Approach^JAN 2 2019^PROBLEMS OF POST-COMMUNISM^This article investigates the discursive opportunities for radical-right populist politics in Hungary and Romania. We argue that it is important to assess whether the discursive activities of radical-right media are reflected and included in the chains of discussion in the public sphere. The involvement and visibility of radical-right media in news coverage is considered a cue for their acceptance as legitimate actors in the wider media ecosystem, even when other media may not accept their interpretations. Our findings tell two different stories in the compared countries. In Hungary, we note that radical-right media are to a certain degree incorporated into the wider media networks, while in Romania, radical-right media are observed to be in isolated positions in both of the media networks we examined.
SILENT AND PENETRATING: THE PROCESS OF FINANCIALIZATION FROM THE INSTITUTIONS THAT PROMOTE FINANCIAL INCLUSION^JUL-DEC 2018^CONTEMPORANEA-REVISTA DE SOCIOLOGIA DA UFSCAR^This article aims to present the network of organizations that today acts to implement the so-called financial inclusion. This chain is structured internationally and establish ad hoc relations with several countries of the globe. It stimulates and supports the creation and circulation of financial products and services to the poor on the grounds of promoting their welfare and protection. The analysis is based on documental research and is dedicated to the Brazilian case. It features the branch of activity and institutions involved in the dissemination of this ideology and offers insights for thinking about its social effects.
THE INCLUSION OF PEOPLE WITH DOWN SYNDROME IN A SUPERMARKET NETWORK^2018^REVISTA GEDECON REVISTA GESTAO E DESENVOLVIMENTO EM CONTEXTO^Taking into consideration the fact that inclusion is becoming more and more relevant to organizations, the main objective of this study is to analyze how the inclusion of people with down syndrome in the labor market occurs. The methodology is exploratory, using a qualitative approach and a single case study, having as a research site a supermarket chain located in the northwest region of Rio Grande do Sul. After the interview with semi-structured script and analysis of the content, it was concluded that some limitations are observed in the accomplishment of some tasks, however this does not diminish their capacity, it was also possible to verify that the family support is of extreme importance for the insertion of the person with down syndrome, they can stand out in the organization and add value to it.
Inclusion of wheat and triticale silage in the diet of lactating dairy cows^AUG 2017^JOURNAL OF DAIRY SCIENCE^The objective of this experiment was to partially replace corn silage with 2 alternative forages, wheat (Triticum aestivum) or triticale (X Triticosecale) silages at 10% of the diet dry matter (DM), and investigate the effects on dairy cow productivity, nutrient utilization, enteric CH4 emissions, and farm income over feed costs. Wheat and triticale were planted in the fall as cover crops and harvested in the spring at the boot stage. Neutral- and acid-detergent fiber and lignin concentrations were higher in the wheat and triticale silages compared with corn silage. The forages had similar ruminal in situ effective degradability of DM. Both alternative forages had 1% starch or less compared with the approximately 35% starch in corn silage. Diets with the alternative forages were fed in a replicated 3 x 3 Latin square design experiment with three 28-d periods and 12 Holstein cows. The control diet contained 44% (DM basis) corn silage. In the other 2 diets, wheat or triticale silages were included at 10% of dietary DM, replacing corn silage. Dry matter intake was not affected by diet, but both wheat and triticale silage decreased yield of milk (41.4 and 41.2 vs. 42.7 +/- 5.18 kg/d) and milk components, compared with corn silage. Milk fat from cows fed the alternative forage diets contained higher concentrations of 4:0, 6:0, and 18:0 and tended to have lower concentrations of total trans fatty acids. Apparent total-tract digestibility of DM and organic matter was decreased in the wheat silage diet, and digestibility of neutral-and acid-detergent fiber was increased in the triticale silage diet. The wheat and triticale silage diets resulted in higher excretion of urinary urea, higher milk urea N, and lower milk N efficiency compared with the corn silage diet. Enteric CH4 emission per kilogram of energy-corrected milk was highest in the triticale silage diet, whereas CO2 emission was decreased by both wheat and triticale silage. This study showed that, at milk production of around 42 kg/d, wheat silage and triticale silage can partially replace corn silage DM and not affect DM intake, but milk yield may decrease slightly. For dairy farms in need of more forage, triticale or wheat double cropped with corn silage may be an appropriate cropping strategy.
A Drosophila model of dominant inclusion body myopathy type 3 shows diminished myosin kinetics that reduce muscle power and yield myofibrillar defects^JUN 1 2017^DISEASE MODELS &amp; MECHANISMS^Individuals with inclusion body myopathy type 3 (IBM3) display congenital joint contractures with early-onset muscle weakness that becomes more severe in adulthood. The disease arises from an autosomal dominant point mutation causing an E706K substitution in myosin heavy chain type IIa. We have previously expressed the corresponding myosin mutation (E701K) in homozygous Drosophila indirect flight muscles and recapitulated the myofibrillar degeneration and inclusion bodies observed in the human disease. We have also found that purified E701K myosin has dramatically reduced actinsliding velocity and ATPase levels. Since IBM3is a dominant condition, we now examine the disease state in heterozygote Drosophila in order to gain a mechanistic understanding of E701K pathogenicity. Myosin ATPase activities in heterozygotes suggest that approximately equimolar levels of myosin accumulate from each allele. In vitro actin sliding velocity rates for myosin isolated from the heterozygotes were lower than the control, but higher than for the pure mutant isoform. Although sarcomeric ultrastructure was nearly wild type in young adults, mechanical analysis of skinned indirect flight muscle fibers revealed a 59% decrease in maximum oscillatory power generation and an approximately 20% reduction in the frequency at which maximum power was produced. Rate constant analyses suggest a decrease in the rate of myosin attachment to actin, with myosin spending decreased time in the strongly bound state. These mechanical alterations result in a one-third decrease in wing beat frequency and marginal flight ability. With aging, muscle ultrastructure and function progressively declined. Aged myofibrils showed Z-line streaming, consistent with the human heterozygote phenotype. Based upon the mechanical studies, we hypothesize that the mutation decreases the probability of the power stroke occurring and/or alters the degree of movement of the myosin leverarm, resulting in decreased in vitro motility, reduced muscle power output and focal myofibrillar disorganization similar to that seen in individuals with IBM3.
Alkyl chain length dependent Cr(VI) transport by polymer inclusion membrane using room temperature ionic liquids as carrier and PVDF-co-HFP as polymer matrix^MAR 24 2017^SEPARATION AND PURIFICATION TECHNOLOGY^In this study, the relationship between transport performance of Cr(VI) through PVDF-co-HFP based ionic polymer inclusion membranes (IPIM), alkyl chain length of symmetric imidazolium bromide based room temperature ionic liquids (RTILs) and morphological changes of these IPIMs has been comprehensively described. Butyl, hexyl, octyl, and decyl substituted RTILs containing IPIMs were prepared in different compositions and their effectiveness on Cr(VI) transport was experimentally optimised. In optimum conditions, the initial mass transfer coefficient (J(o)) value of Cr(VI) was found as 5.0 x 10(-6) mols(-1) m(-2), and also, we found that the optimised process is significantly selective for chromium in existence the other heavy metal ions. Morphological and structural characterizations of IPIMs have been performed before and after Cr(VI) transport to illuminate the morphological and the structural changes. Also, the additional plasticizing effect of RTILs as an unusual morphological phenomenon have come forward. In today's industrialised world, the demand for environmentally friendly processes for removal or recycle of toxic substances by simpler and cheaper ways have been increasing day by day. As a result, our developed and optimised membrane-based process seems to be overcome some Cr(VI) dependent environmental and industrial difficulties. (C) 2016 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Thermal and other analytical studies on bifenthrin urea co-inclusion complex A human-guarded insecticide formulation^FEB 2017^JOURNAL OF THERMAL ANALYSIS AND CALORIMETRY^In current study, thermal and other analytical techniques have been successfully utilized in characterization of bifenthrin urea co-inclusion complex (BNUCIC)-a human-guarded insecticide formulation. Bifenthrin (BN)-a widely used pyrethroid insecticide was successfully engulfed in the cavities of hexagonal urea lattice in the presence of a suitable rapidly complexing agent (RCA). Resulting formulation shields human beings from insecticides through direct inhalation, ingestion or dermal contact. Insects will be exposed to insecticide only after BNUCIC comes in contact with water in soil/crops following switching on of water sprinkling/distribution system in the fields. Formation of BNUCIC was characterized by DSC, FTIR, XRD and H-1-NMR studies. Thermal analysis played a key role in characterization, in estimation of the minimum proportion of RCA needed for complexation and to study the influence of relative proportion of RCA on heat of decomposition of complexes. Thermal analysis depicted gradual increase in heat of decomposition of BNUCIC and excellent r (2) value with increasing molar fraction of linear chain RCA. Increased heat of decomposition ensures improved physical stability of complexes. Overlay of DSC curves of BNUCIC complexes revealed absence of melting endotherm of insecticide indicating amorphous nature of BN. FTIR spectrum and XRD diffractogram depicted characteristic peaks and interplanar spacings of hexagonal urea. H-1-NMR spectrum revealed presence of exposed protons of guest moieties in hexagonal urea. BNUCIC exhibited uniform formulation composition and improved dissolution profile. Studies reveal insecticide-fertilizer amalgamation to be a useful technique for formulation of an effective human-guarded insecticide formulation with improved characteristics.
System dynamics applied to closed loop supply chains of desktops and laptops in Brazil: A perspective for social inclusion of waste pickers^FEB 2017^WASTE MANAGEMENT^The structure of reverse logistics for waste electrical and electronic equipment (WEEE) is essential to minimize the impacts of their improper disposal. In this context, the Brazilian Solid Waste Policy (BSWP) was a regulatory milestone in Brazil, submitting WEEE to the mandatory implementation of reverse logistics systems, involving the integration of waste pickers on the shared responsibility for the life cycle of products. This article aims to measure the impact of such legal incentives and the bargaining power obtained by the volume of collected waste on the effective formalization of waste pickers. The proposed model evaluates the sustainability of supply chains in terms of the use of raw materials due to disposal fees, collection, recycling and return of some materials from desktops and laptops using system dynamics methodology. The results show that even in the absence of bargaining power, the formalization of waste pickers occurs due to legal incentives. It is important to ensure the waste pickers cooperatives access to a minimum amount, which requires a level of protection against unfair competition with companies. Regarding the optimal level of environmental policies, even though the formalization time is long, it is still not enough to guarantee the formalization of waste picker cooperatives, which is dependent on their bargaining power. Steel is the material with the largest decrease in acquisition rate of raw material. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Zhonghua yi xue yi chuan xue za zhi = Zhonghua yixue yichuanxue zazhi = Chinese journal of medical genetics^2016-Dec-10^Zhonghua yi xue yi chuan xue za zhi = Zhonghua yixue yichuanxue zazhi = Chinese journal of medical genetics^None
Detection and prevalence of boid inclusion body disease in collections of boas and pythons using immunological assays^DEC 2016^VETERINARY JOURNAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.919  </td>  <td>2.174</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Circular economy: To be or not to be in a closed product loop? A Life Cycle Assessment of aluminium cans with inclusion of alloying elements^NOV 2016^RESOURCES CONSERVATION AND RECYCLING^Packaging, representing the second largest source of aluminium scrap at global level, deserves a key role in the transition towards the circular economy. Life Cycle Assessment (LCA) of aluminium products has been typically based on one life cycle considering pure aluminium flows and neglecting the presence of alloying elements and impurities. However, this simplification undermines the potentials of using LCA to quantify the environmental performances of products in multiple loops, as required in the circular economy. This study aims to investigate the effects of including the actual alloy composition in the LCA of aluminium can production and recycling, in order to understand whether a can-to-can (i.e. closed product loop) recycling should be promoted or not. Mass balance of the main alloying elements (Mn, Si, Cu, Fe) was carried out at increasing levels of recycling rate, corresponding to a temporal interval of five years. Different aluminium packaging scrap sources were considered: mixed packaging aluminium scrap and used beverage can scrap. The outcomes of the mass balance were used to quantify the amount of Mn and primary Al that needs to be reintegrated in each scenario according to the recycling rate and this information was further used to perform an LCA of 30 loops of aluminium can production and recycling, based on the actual alloy composition. The LCA revealed that the closed product loop option (considering used beverage can scrap) has lower climate change impacts over the other recycling scenario using mixed Al packaging scrap. The main recommendation from an LCA methodological point of view is to include the idea of multiple co-functions in the functional unit definition. To further improve the environmental performances of the aluminium beverage can sector towards circular economy implementation the key actions are: to reduce the weight of the lid, to develop methods to separate the body and lid at the point of collection, and to investigate the potentials of a closed supply chain loop for aluminium cans in terms of combined environmental and economic value creation. (C) 2016 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Different Approaches to Covariate Inclusion in the Mixture Rasch Model^OCT 2016^EDUCATIONAL AND PSYCHOLOGICAL MEASUREMENT^The present study investigates different approaches to adding covariates and the impact in fitting mixture item response theory models. Mixture item response theory models serve as an important methodology for tackling several psychometric issues in test development, including the detection of latent differential item functioning. A Monte Carlo simulation study is conducted in which data generated according to a two-class mixture Rasch model with both dichotomous and continuous covariates are fitted to several mixture Rasch models with misspecified covariates to examine the effects of covariate inclusion on model parameter estimation. In addition, both complete response data and incomplete response data with different types of missingness are considered in the present study in order to simulate practical assessment settings. Parameter estimation is carried out within a Bayesian framework vis-a-vis Markov chain Monte Carlo algorithms.
Pro-poor? Inclusion and exclusion in native potato value chains in the central highlands of Peru^AUG 2016^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Including smallholding farmers in high value markets has emerged as a pro-poor development strategy. Through a case study of a project that intended to incorporate native potato growers in the central Peruvian highlands into corporate potato chip value chains, this study investigates social differentiation among participants and nonparticipants, as well as reasons for households' inclusion or exclusion. Household surveys and semi-structured interviews in one of the communities where the project was implemented provided the data. Results suggest that value chain participants generally have higher economic status and actively exclude lower-resource households in the community. However, non participation is not necessarily viewed negatively by all non-participating households. Some deliberately choose not to participate to pursue other livelihood strategies or because of risks involved in participating. These findings indicate that participation in value chains is not necessarily beneficial. For such programs to have broad social benefits, policies and other institutional arrangements are needed to minimize risks of participation in such value chains and to provide support for other market outlets. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
INCLUSION OF MARGINALIZED GROUPS INTO CRISIS MANAGEMENT PROCESSES. MODELS, CASE STUDIES, AND HOLISTIC PERSPECTIVES^2016^IDIMT-2016- INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY, SOCIETY AND ECONOMY STRATEGIC CROSS-INFLUENCES^None
Economic Evaluation of Immunisation Programme of 23-Valent Pneumococcal Polysaccharide Vaccine and the Inclusion of 13-Valent Pneumococcal Conjugate Vaccine in the List for Single-Dose Subsidy to the Elderly in Japan^OCT 7 2015^PLOS ONE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.776  </td>  <td>3.337</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A methodological framework for the inclusion of modern additive manufacturing into the production portfolio of a focused factory^OCT 2015^JOURNAL OF MANUFACTURING SYSTEMS^Additive manufacturing (AM) is an advanced technology where products are manufactured by building up thin layers of materials from digitized three-dimensional (3D) designs virtually constructed using advanced computer-aided design software. This freeform fabrication enhances dramatically the potential of design, pushing the boundaries of manufacturability. The aim of this paper was to provide a decision-making framework for the selection of an effective portfolio of production strategies, including alternative AM and traditional manufacturing technologies. To that end, a methodological framework is proposed which combines multi-criteria decision aid (MCDA) and data envelopment analysis (DEA) for the determination of the optimal production strategy within the concept of "focused" factory. In this light, modern AM technologies are assessed for a number of selected criteria (e.g. production cost, lead time, quality) together with existing production strategies that involve conventional production methods, such as injection molding, CNC machining, etc. The adopted framework is applied on a real-world case regarding the production of security keyboard polymer housings. According to the findings, modern AM technologies provide efficient manufacturing solutions for small production volumes, thus enhancing supply chain responsiveness through make-to-order strategy and customization possibilities. Furthermore, AM seems capable to contribute also to traditional mass production systems, by improving significantly the productivity of injection molds. The proposed framework could not only assist decision-makers in the selection of the optimal production strategy, but it could also provide crucial benchmarks for different production alternatives. (C) 2014 The Society of Manufacturing Engineers. Published by Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Chains of Persuasion in the Deliberative System: Addressing the Pragmatics of Religious Inclusion^OCT 2015^JOURNAL OF POLITICS^If one accepts that religious arguments ought to be included in democratic deliberations, three problems immediately arise. First, religious arguments will not persuade those who do not accept the religious premises, so religious arguments do not seem to contribute to deliberative opinion and will formation. Second, democratic arguments will not persuade religious citizens who prioritize their religious commitments ("integralists"), who seem to be excluded from deliberative opinion and will formation. Third, if an integralist makes a religious argument intending to persuade, then she seems to be appealing to an invidious double standard: she expects her fellows to be potentially persuaded by her religious argument when she is not reciprocally open to persuasion on the basis of their comprehensive views. I argue that approaching deliberation from a deliberative systems view provides a powerful approach to each of these three problems unavailable to more traditional understandings of deliberative democracy.
Peasant inclusion in global value chains: economic upgrading but social downgrading in labour processes?^SEP 3 2015^JOURNAL OF PEASANT STUDIES^This paper identifies impacts of value chain inclusion on labour from a social sustainability perspective. It focusses on the tasks, livelihoods and subjectivities of Amazonian flood plain peasants (ribeirinhos) who collect acai for sale to an expanding market. The logic' of ribeirinho chain inclusion is explored using a combination of labour process and human security indicators. While household income benefits can be significant, gains may be threatened by monoculture trends and local power structures. Human security indicators suggest further caution. Whilst ribeirinhos remain very flexible' workers, chain engagement entails insecurities, as highlighted by their variable views of collectivity and contradictory positions with respect to sustainability. Sustainable chain prognoses require a deeper understanding of agents' means and of the preferred choices and voice of those working at the beginning of chains.
Inclusion of women on banana production^JUN 2015^CIENCIA UNEMI^The present work focused on the proposal for a solution to a key problem, derived from their culture, suffering today banana producers Canton El Carmen, Manabi, Ecuador, the discrimination against women. This scheme is the result of a methodology based on the document review, interviews with several producers in the area and also, the field visits. The main aim was to get information and thus understand both issues holistically and consequently. To develop a coherent solution its shortcomings. It raised a proposed labor inclusion under a public political figure, led and implemented by the inclusion of women, by the competent authority, who shall train and technical advice to farmers in the sector. All this in order to promote equity in economic development and include women as a fundamental part of the production chain, for the common welfare of agricultural canton.
Use of reasoning maps in evaluation of transport alternatives: inclusion of uncertainty and "I Don't Know": demonstration of a method^MAR 2015^TRANSPORTATION^Selection of a transport alternative is usually a messy process. The traditional approaches consider the relationships as either deterministic or probabilistic, neither of which incorporates the degree of ignorance (i.e., "I don't know" opinion). Further, different stakeholders seek to justify their preferences with reasoning that suits their agenda. This paper proposes and demonstrates a method that evaluates the validity of the reasoning process and derives the degrees of belief that stated goals are achieved. The paper demonstrates a 'reasoning map' method for evaluating transport alternatives, where the analysts accept and employ the notion of "I don't know" about an issue. The reasoning map depicts the relational chains from the attributes of an action to the stated goals, and recognizes the notion of "I don't know". This paper uses the theory of evidence to account for ignorance; it calculates the propagation of uncertainties along the reasoning chains. The context chosen for this demonstration is the selection of a public transit mode, personal rapid transit, over Bus, in a commercial complex in Washington DC. The paper has a limited objective and is not a comprehensive evaluation of alternatives. It merely explains how to compute a numerical value for the strength of reasoning, how to deal with analyst's notion of "I don't know," how to interpret the overall reliability of the reasoning process, how to measure the goal achievement of an alternative, and how to find the critical paths linking the planning options to goals. For use in planning practice, consultation of experts and affected citizens and aggregation of their views is needed to develop the reasoning maps.
Inclusion of strategic management theories to project management^2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF MANAGING PROJECTS IN BUSINESS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.6  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Effects of different amounts of konjac flour inclusion in gestation diets on physio-chemical properties of diets, postprandial satiety in pregnant sows, lactation feed intake of sows and piglet performance^JAN 2015^ANIMAL REPRODUCTION SCIENCE^This study was conducted to investigate the effects of different amounts of konjac flour (KF) inclusion in the gestation diet on the physio-chemical properties of diets, postprandial satiety in pregnant sows, lactation feed intake of sows and piglet performance during two successive reproductive cycles. Multiparous Landrace sows (n=140) were assigned randomly to one of four experimental diets, and four gestation diets were formulated to contain varying amounts of KF at 0%, 0.6%, 1.2% or 2.2%, respectively. The water binding capacity (WBC) (P &lt; 0.01), swelling capacity (P &lt; 0.01) of gestation diets, the concentration of total short chain fatty acids (P &lt; 0.05) after in vitro fermentation of gestation diets increased linearly with increasing inclusion amounts of KF. During the second reproductive cycle, increasing dietary KF linearly increased plasma concentrations of short chain fatty acids (SCFA) 4h postprandial (P &lt; 0.05) and glucagon-like peptide (GLP-1) 2h post-prandial (P &lt; 0.05), but decreased the plasma concentration of cortisol (linearly, P &lt; 0.05) 1 h postprandial. In addition, there was a linear decrease of the non-feeding oral behavior of gestating sows (P &lt; 0.01) when dietary KF increased. There were linear increases in lactation feed intake of sows during entire lactation period (P &lt; 0.01) with increasing amounts of KF in the gestation diet. In addition, the number of piglets weaned (linearly, P &lt; 0.01; quadratic, P = 0.01), average piglet weights and litter weights on day 21 of lactation (linearly, P &lt; 0.01) increased with increasing inclusion amounts of KF. In conclusion, inclusion of dietary fiber with great WBC, swelling capacity and fermentation capacity in the gestation diet was beneficial for enhancing postprandial satiety in pregnant sows, increasing lactation feed intake and improved number of piglets weaned per litter through greater pre-weaning survival. (C) 2014 Published by Elsevier B.V.
Points to Consider in the Clinical Use of NGS Panels for Mitochondrial Disease: An Analysis of Gene Inclusion and Consent Forms^AUG 2014^JOURNAL OF GENETIC COUNSELING^Mitochondrial next generation sequencing (NGS) panels offer single-step analysis of the numerous nuclear genes involved in the structure, function, and maintenance of mitochondria. However, the complexities of mitochondrial biology and genetics raise points for consideration in clinical use of these tests. To understand the current status of mitochondrial genetic testing, we assessed the gene offerings and consent forms of mitochondrial NGS panels available from seven US-based clinical laboratories. The NGS panels varied markedly in number of genes (101-1204 genes), and the proportion of genes causing "classic" mitochondrial diseases and their phenocopies ranged widely between labs (18 %-94 % of panel contents). All panels included genes not associated with classic mitochondrial diseases (6 %-28 % of panel contents), including genes causing adult-onset neurodegenerative disorders, cancer predisposition, and other genetic syndromes or inborn errors of metabolism. Five of the panels included genes that are not listed in OMIM to be associated with a disease phenotype (5 %-49 % of panel contents). None of the consent documents reviewed had options for patient preference regarding receipt of incidental findings. These findings raise points of discussion applicable to mitochondrial diagnostics, but also to the larger arenas of exome and genome sequencing, including the need to consider the boundaries between clinical and research testing, the necessity of appropriate informed consent, and the responsibilities of clinical laboratories and clinicians. Based on these findings, we recommend careful evaluation by laboratories of the genes offered on NGS panels, clear communication of the predicted phenotypes, and revised consent forms to allow patients to make choices about receiving incidental findings. We hope that our analysis and recommendations will help to maximize the considerable clinical utility of NGS panels for the diagnosis of mitochondrial disease.
B-cell lymphoma with plasmacytoid differentiation, atypical cytoplasmic inclusions, and secondary leukemia in a dog^MAR 2013^VETERINARY CLINICAL PATHOLOGY^A 7-year-old male castrated Jack Russell Terrier was presented to the oncology service at the University of CaliforniaDavis Veterinary Medical Teaching Hospital for evaluation of suspected lymphoma. The dog had several enlarged lymph nodes and moderate lymphocytosis. Aspirates of an enlarged inguinal lymph node contained a bimorphic population of large immature lymphocytes and smaller cells with plasmacytoid features. Both cell types often contained a single large cytoplasmic inclusion that varied from clear to pale pink to sky blue. Cytologic changes were interpreted as most consistent with lymphoid neoplasia. Based on the predominantly mature cell morphology and some morphologic heterogeneity, the peripheral lymphocytosis was interpreted as most likely reactive in nature. However, the immunophenotype of the cells (CD20+, CD21+, CD79a+, MUM-1+, and MHCII+) and clonality assays showed that tissue and blood lymphocytes were neoplastic B cells with clonal identity despite their different morphologic appearances. The cytoplasmic inclusions were positive with periodic acid-Schiff and were immunoreactive for IgM and IgG. By transmission electron microscopy, inclusions consisted of aberrant rough endoplasmic reticulum; a few small Russell bodies were also noted. A final diagnosis of high-grade B-cell lymphoma with plasmacytoid differentiation, atypical cytoplasmic inclusions, and secondary leukemia was made. Chemotherapy was initiated, but the dog was euthanized due to severe and uncontrolled seizures 9months after the initial diagnosis. This case extends the morphologic repertoire of canine plasmacytoid neoplasms and emphasizes their continuum with multicentric lymphoma. This case also demonstrates the need for advanced diagnostic techniques in establishing blood involvement in lymphoma in some instances.
EFFICIENT CALCULATION OF BOUNDARY SOLUTIONS OF LINEAR INTERVAL DIFFERENTIAL INCLUSIONS^2013^SOR'13 PROCEEDINGS: THE 12TH INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM ON OPERATIONAL RESEARCH IN SLOVENIA^We propose a powerful new method for numerical estimation of the boundary solutions of linear differential inclusions. It combines a classical uniform grid method, which is generally computationally very expensive, with a much more efficient adaptive grid method. We provide an algorithm and demonstrate the method on a numerical example.
Markov chains with discontinuous drifts have differential inclusion limits^DEC 2012^PERFORMANCE EVALUATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.689  </td>  <td>1.782</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A nonlinear inclusion problem involving (alpha, lambda)-NODM set-valued mappings in ordered Hilbert space^OCT 2012^APPLIED MATHEMATICS LETTERS^The purpose of this work is as follows: First, a class of nonlinear inclusion problems involving (alpha, lambda)-NODM set-valued mappings in an ordered Hilbert space is introduced, and then, applying the resolvent operator associated with (alpha, lambda)-NODM set-valued mappings, an existence theorem on the solvability of this class of nonlinear inclusion problems is established. Furthermore, on the basis of the existence theorem and the new (alpha, lambda)-NODM model, a general algorithm is introduced and applied to the approximation solvability of the nonlinear inclusion problem at hand. The results obtained seem to be general in nature. (c) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Using online pickup site inclusion policies to manage demand in retail/E-tail organizations^MAY 2012^COMPUTERS &amp; OPERATIONS RESEARCH^A major development in online retailing is the significant increase in the number of traditional "offline" retailers extending their brands online. Many of these retail/e-tail firms are attempting to leverage channel synergies by allowing customers to purchase products over the internet and then pick their orders up at one of the firm's local stores. This paper proposes that the firm presents only a subset of its stores to online customers as available pickup locations, rather than simply listing all local stores with inventory. By doing so, the firm can protect stores with critically low inventory levels and thereby reduce backorder costs. Specifically, we develop and evaluate a dynamic pickup site inclusion policy that incorporates real-time information to specify which of the firm's e-fulfillment locations should be presented at online checkout. Computational results indicate that managing in-store demand via such policies can decrease total cost (holding, backorder, and lost or redirected pickup sale costs) by as much as 18% over allowing customers to pick online orders up from any site with available inventory. The percentage of pickup sales and customers' sensitivity to travel are critical in determining the magnitude of the benefit. (C) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Quality and Inclusion of Producers in Value Chains: A Theoretical Note^FEB 2012^REVIEW OF DEVELOPMENT ECONOMICS^This paper develops a formal theory of the endogenous process of the introduction of high quality production in developing countries. Initial differences in income and capital and transaction costs are shown to affect the emergence of and the size of the high quality economy. Initial differences in the production structure and the nature of transaction costsas well as the possibility of contracting between producers and processorsare shown to determine which producers are included in the high quality economy, and which not.
Supported Liquid (SLM) and Polymer Inclusion (PIM) Membranes Pertraction of Copper(II) from Aqueous Nitrate Solutions by 1-Hexyl-2-Methylimidazole^2012^SEPARATION SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^The facilitated transport of Cu(II) ions from different aqueous nitrate source phases (c(Me) = 0.001 M, pH = 6.0) across supported (SLMs) and polymer inclusion membranes (PIMs) doped with 1-hexyl-2-methylimidazole as ion carrier was reported. The membrane is characterized by means of atomic force microscopy (AFM). The results show that Cu2+ can be separated very effectively from other transition metal cations as Zn2+, Co2+, and Ni2+ from different equimolar mixtures of these ions. The highest initial fluxes of Cu(II) were found for PIM, while lower values were observed for SLM. However, after taking into account the morphology of the membranes (porosity, tortuosity), the values of the initial flux of Cu(II) transport across PIM is less than that across SLM. The recovery factor of Cu2+ ions during transport across PIM from different mixtures of cations is above 91% after 24 hrs and above 76% during transport across SLM. Also, the stability of PIM and SLM doped with 1-hexyl-2-methylimidazole was confirmed in replicate experiments.
Criteria for recognition of localization and timing of multiple events of hydrothermal alteration in sandstones illustrated by petrographic, fluid inclusion, and isotopic analysis of the Tera Group, Northern Spain^NOV 2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EARTH SCIENCES^Stratigraphic relations, detailed petrography, microthermometry of fluid inclusions, and fine-scale isotopic analysis of diagenetic phases indicate a complex thermal history in Tithonian fluvial sandstones and lacustrine limestones of the Tera Group (North Spain). Two different thermal events have been recognized and characterized, which are likely associated with hydrothermal events that affected the Cameros Basin during the mid-Cretaceous and the Eocene. Multiple stages of quartz cementation were identified using scanning electron microscope cathodoluminescence on sandstones and fracture fills. Primary fluid inclusions reveal homogenization temperatures (Th) from 195 to 350 degrees C in the quartz cements of extensional fracture fillings. The high variability of Th data in each particular fluid inclusion assemblage is related to natural reequilibration of the fluid inclusions, probably due to Cretaceous hydrothermal metamorphism. Some secondary fluid inclusion assemblages show very consistent data (Th = 281-305 degrees C) and are considered not to have reequilibrated. They are likely related to an Eocene hydrothermal event or to a retrograde stage of the Cretaceous hydrothermalism. This approach shows how multiple thermal events can be discriminated. A very steep thermal gradient of 97-214 degrees C/km can be deduced from delta(18)O values of ferroan calcites (delta(18)O -14.2/-11.8 parts per thousand V-PDB) that postdate quartz cements in fracture fillings. Furthermore, illite crystallinity data (anchizone-epizone boundary) are out of equilibrium with high fluid inclusion Th. These observations are consistent with heat-flux related to short-lived events of hydrothermal alteration focused by permeability contrasts, rather than to regional heat-flux associated with dynamo-thermal metamorphism. These results illustrate how thermal data from fracture systems can yield thermal histories markedly different from host-rock values, a finding indicative of hydrothermal fluid flow.
KINEMATIC AND KINETIC ANALYSIS OF MAXIMAL VELOCITY DEADLIFTS PERFORMED WITH AND WITHOUT THE INCLUSION OF CHAIN RESISTANCE^NOV 2011^JOURNAL OF STRENGTH AND CONDITIONING RESEARCH^Swinton, PA, Stewart, AD, Keogh, JWL, Agouris, I, and Lloyd, R. Kinematic and kinetic analysis of maximal velocity deadlifts performed with and without the inclusion of chain resistance. J Strength Cond Res 25(11): 3163-3174, 2011-The purpose of this study was to investigate whether the deadlift could be effectively incorporated with explosive resistance training (ERT) and to investigate whether the inclusion of chains enhanced the suitability of the deadlift for ERT. Twenty-three resistance trained athletes performed the deadlift with 30, 50, and 70% 1-repetition maximum (1RM) loads at submaximal velocity, maximal velocity (MAX), and MAX with the inclusion of 2 chain loads equal to 20 or 40% of the subjects' 1RM. All trials were performed on force platforms with markers attached to the barbell to calculate velocity and acceleration using a motion capture system. Significant increases in force, velocity, power, rate of force development, and length of the acceleration phase (p &lt; 0.05) were obtained when repetition velocity increased from submaximal to maximal. During MAX repetitions with a constant resistance, the mean length of the acceleration phase ranged from 73.2 (+/- 7.2%) to 84.9 (+/- 12.2%) of the overall movement. Compared to using a constant resistance, the inclusion of chains enabled greater force to be maintained to the end of the concentric action and significantly increased peak force and impulse (p, 0.05), while concurrently decreasing velocity, power, and rate of force development (p, 0.05). The effects of chains were influenced by the magnitude of the chain and barbell resistance, with greater increases and decreases in mechanical variables obtained when heavier chain and barbell loads were used. The results of the investigation suggest that the deadlift can be incorporated effectively in ERT programs. Coaches and athletes should be aware that the inclusion of heavy chains may have both positive and negative effects on kinematics and kinetics of an exercise.
Prenatal diagnosis of microvillus inclusion disease^SEP 2011^TAIWANESE JOURNAL OF OBSTETRICS &amp; GYNECOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.2  </td>  <td>1.166</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
alpha B-Crystallin negative astrocytic inclusions^APR 2011^BRAIN &amp; DEVELOPMENT^We report on an unusual pathological finding of astrocytes, observed in the brain of a 16-year-old African American male with severe intellectual disability and spastic quadriplegia. The brain showed bilateral pericentral, perisylvian polymicrogyria and pachygyria, in conjunction with a large number of hypertrophic astrocytes with eosinophilic granular cytoplasmic inclusions. The astrocytic abnormality was more severe in the dysgenetic area but present throughout the cerebral cortex. Astrocytic inclusions stained with acid fuchsin, azocarmine and Holzer's stain, and were immunoreactive for GEAP, S-100, and ubiquitin, but not for alpha B-crystallin, filamin, vimentin, nestin, tau or alpha-synuclein. Based on the case and a review of the literature, the authors postulate that these astrocytic inclusions in the cerebral cortex reflect abnormalities in radial glial developmental processes, such as migration, differentiation, or glial neuronal interaction function during neuronal migration. (C) 2010 The Japanese Society of Child Neurology. Published by Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Neutrophilic Inclusions in a Hunter^NOV 1 2010^CLINICAL INFECTIOUS DISEASES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  9.055  </td>  <td>8.835</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
High Incidence of Glomerulonephritis Associated with Inclusion Body Hepatitis in Broiler Chickens: Routine Histopathology and Histomorphometric Studies^SEP 2010^AVIAN DISEASES^During the routine histologic evaluation of an outbreak of inclusion body hepatitis (IBH) in Mississippi broilers, a high incidence of renal enlargement and glomerulonephropathy was observed in the birds presenting classic hepatic pathology. Characteristic intranuclear adenoviral inclusion bodies were demonstrated in the livers of these birds, and fowl adenovirus was identified by viral isolation and by PCR. The glomerular lesions were consistent with proliferative or membranoproliferative forms of glomerulonephritis. Histomorphometric evaluations were performed to generate a more quantitative analysis of altered glomerular size and cellularity, to detect statistically significant borderline changes, and to get a clearer insight into the incidence of the glomerular alterations. Marked increases in both the average glomerular size (area) and the total glomerular cellularity were observed for the affected glomeruli relative to normal controls. The average glomerular area values for normal glomeruli in the peripheral subcapsular cortical and central cortical kidney regions were 1791 mu m(2) and 5302 mu m(2), respectively. In contrast, glomerular measurements for kidneys exhibiting glomerulonephritis by routine histopathology, had average values for the two regions of 4429 mu m(2) and 11,063 mu m(2). The average glomerular cell counts for the two regions in controls were 44 and 107 cells/glomeruli, while averages for birds with glomerulonephritis were 85 and 193 cells/glomeruli. The proportion of IBH-associated glomeruli greater than two standard deviations above the mean glomerular size of the normal controls was 52% for the central region and 62% for the peripheral region.
Sialidosis type I carrying V217M/G243R mutations in lysosomal sialidase: an autopsy study demonstrating terminal sialic acid in lysosomal lamellar inclusions and cerebellar dysplasia^JAN 2010^ACTA NEUROPATHOLOGICA^Autopsy findings of a patient, with sialidosis type I phenotype carrying V217M/G243R mutations in the lysosomal sialidase gene and biochemically defined isolated sialidase deficiency, who died of intractable lymphoma at the age of 32 years, are described. Perikaryal expansion of cytoplasm was evident, mostly in motor neurons (in the anterior horn and the brain stem), dorsal root ganglia, cerebellar dentate neurons and some neurons in the thalamus and nucleus basalis of Meynert. The stored material was lamellar in lysosomes and exhibited a specific affinity to wheat germ agglutinin at light and electron microscopy, which indicates the accumulation of terminal sialic acid at the non-reducing end of the sugar chain in this pathological structure. Neuronal loss in these nuclei, however, was not frequent in spite of frequent and massive cytoplasmic expansion. Neocortex exhibited a mild spongiosis with some swelling of neurons, which contained lipofuscin-like granules and small amount of lamellar structures in lysosomes. This contrast suggests a discrepancy between the storage process and vulnerability of neurons, both variable according to areas examined. In the cerebellar vermis, dysplastic features, such as abnormal layering of Purkinje cells, thinning and rarefaction of the granule cell layer, incomplete formation of synapse and disordered proliferation of Bergmann's glia, were focally accentuated, suggesting some developmental abnormality not secondary to the storage process. This is the first autopsy demonstration of sialic acid in the lamellar materials and of a developmental abnormality in isolated sialidase deficiency. Additional studies are needed to clarify how this molecular abnormality leads to these morphological and clinical manifestations.
Inclusion of Low Income Sectors in Latin American Agribusiness^2010^INTERNATIONAL FOOD AND AGRIBUSINESS MANAGEMENT REVIEW^We examine three case studies on agribusiness ventures that have included low income sectors (LIS) into value creation activities to reduce poverty in Latin America. While the goal for each agribusiness is economic profit, we find that this goal is not inconsistent with wealth creation among LIS. We use the agribusiness chain analytical framework to identify the roles played by LIS in the ventures studied, and we explore the ways in which LIS inclusion has influenced the performance of the agribusiness chains and contributed to their competitiveness.
Fair inclusion of men and women in Australian clinical research: views from ethics committee chairs^JUN 2 2008^MEDICAL JOURNAL OF AUSTRALIA^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.332  </td>  <td>4.479</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Microcalcification detection based on wavelet domain hidden Markov tree model: Study for inclusion to computer aided diagnostic prompting system^JUN 2007^MEDICAL PHYSICS^In this paper we investigate the performance of statistical modeling of digital mammograms by means of wavelet domain hidden Markov trees for its inclusion to a computer-aided diagnostic prompting system. The system is designed for detecting clusters of microcalcifications. Their further discrimination as benign or malignant is to be done by radiologists. The model is used for segmenting images based on the maximum likelihood classifier enhanced by the weighting technique. Further classification incorporates spatial filtering for a single microcalcification (MC) and microcalcification cluster (MCC) detection. Contrast filtering applied for the digital database for screening mammography (DDSM) dataset prior to spatial filtering greatly improves the classification accuracy. For all MC clusters of 40 mammograms from the mini-MIAS database of Mammographic Image Analysis Society, 92.5%-100% of true positive cases can be detected under 2-3 false positives per image. For 150 cases of DDSM cases, the designed system is capable to detect up to 98% of true positives under 3.3% of false positive cases. (c) 2007 American Association of Physicists in Medicine.
Intracytoplasmic inclusions in circulating leukocytes from an eastern box turtle (Terrapene carolina carolina) with iridoviral infection^JUL 2006^JOURNAL OF WILDLIFE DISEASES^A free-ranging adult female eastern box turtle (Terrapene carolina carolina) was presented to the University of Tennessee in October 2003 because of suspected trauma and blindness. Physical examination revealed lethargy, clear ocular and nasal discharges, and white oral and laryngeal plaques. Intracytoplasmic inclusions within heterophils and large mononuclear leukocytes were observed on routine blood smear examination. Postmortem findings included necrosis of epithelial and parenchymal cells with intracytoplasmic inclusions. Ultrastructurally, the leukocyte inclusions consisted of variably electron-dense granular material and viral particles consistent with the Iridoviridae family of viruses. The virus shared 100% sequence identity to a 420-base pair sequence of frog virus 3 (family Iridoviridae, genus Ranavirus) as determined by polymerase chain reaction and gene sequencing targeting a portion of the Ranavirus major capsid protein gene.
Strontium isotopes in melt inclusions from Samoan basalts: Implications for heterogeneity in the Samoan plume^MAY 15 2006^EARTH AND PLANETARY SCIENCE LETTERS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.637  </td>  <td>5.164</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The refinement of design for manufacture: inclusion of process design^2006^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF OPERATIONS &amp; PRODUCTION MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.111  </td>  <td>5.604</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Pb isotopic variability in melt inclusions from the EMI-EMII-HIMU mantle end-members and the role of the oceanic lithosphere^DEC 15 2005^EARTH AND PLANETARY SCIENCE LETTERS^Melt inclusions from four individual lava samples representing the HIMU (Mangaia Island), EMI (Pitcairn Island) and EMII (Tahaa Island) end member components, have heterogeneous Pb isotopic composition larger than that defined by the erupted lavas in each island. The broad linear trend in Pb-207/Pb-206-Pb-208/Pb-206 space produced by the melt inclusions from Mangaia, Tahaa and Pitcairn samples reproduces the entire trend defined by the Austral chain, the Society islands and the Pitcairn island and seamount groups. The inclusions preserve a record of melt composition of far greater isotopic diversity than that sampled in whole rock basalts. These results can be explained by mixing of a common depleted component with the HIMU, EMI and EMII lavas, respectively. We favor a model that considers the oceanic lithosphere to be that common component. We suggest that the Pb isotopic compositions of the melt inclusions reflect wall rock reaction of HIMU, EMI and EMII melts during their percolation through the oceanic lithosphere. Under these conditions, the localized rapid crystallization of olivine from primitive basalt near the reaction zone would allow the entrapment of melt inclusions with different isotopic composition. (C) 2005 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Tau and alpha-synuclein inclusions in a case of familial frontotemporal dementia and progressive aphasia^MAR 2005^JOURNAL OF NEUROPATHOLOGY AND EXPERIMENTAL NEUROLOGY^Recent studies have shown that neurofibrillary tangles are frequently accompanied by a-synuclein inclusions in sporadic and familial Alzheimer disease, in Down syndrome, in progressive supranuclear palsy, and Parkinsonism dementia complex of Guam. Here we report the cases of 2 brothers with familial progressive aphasia who developed features of frontotemporal dementia with predominant tau pathology but also alpha-synuclein pathology. The 2 patients' brains revealed abundant tau pathology in the hippocampus and basal ganglia, whereas tau and alpha-synuclein aggregates coexisted only in the nucleus basalis of Meynert, the only region where alpha-synuclein was present. In this brain region, abundant Lewy bodies, Lewy neurites, and tau inclusions were found; the pathology was more abundant in the older than in the younger brother. Sarkosylin-soluble tau extracted from brains of the 2 patients showed the presence of tau filaments that contained 3 major tau bands of 60, 64, and 68 kDa on Western blot analysis. These bands contained mainly tau with 3 and 4 repeats and no amino-terminal inserts and tau with 4 repeats and one amino-terminal insert. No mutations were identified in the tau, a-synuclein, P-synuclein, or parkin genes. We think that this is the first report showing a specific colocalization of neurofibrillary tangles and Lewy bodies in a family with progressive aphasia.
Associations with autoimmune disorders and HLA class I and II antigens in inclusion body myositis^DEC 28 2004^NEUROLOGY^Whether autoimmune mechanisms play a role in the pathogenesis of inclusion body myositis (IBM) is unknown. Human leukocyte antigen (HLA) analysis in 52 patients, including 17 with autoimmune disorders (AIDs), showed that patients were more likely to have antigens from the autoimmune-prone HLA-B8-DR3 ancestral haplotype than healthy control subjects, irrespective of the presence of AIDs. Patients lacked the apparently protective HLA-DR53 antigen. The results provide further support for an autoimmune basis in IBM.
A new complication of stem cell transplantation: Measles inclusion body encephalitis^NOV 2004^PEDIATRICS^Measles inclusion body encephalitis (MIBE) is a disease of the immunocompromised host and typically occurs within 1 year of acute measles infection or vaccination. We report a 13-year-old boy who had chronic granulomatous disease and presented 38 days after stem cell transplantation with afebrile focal seizures that progressed despite multiple anticonvulsants. After an extensive diagnostic evaluation, brain biopsy was performed, revealing numerous intranuclear inclusion bodies consistent with paramyxovirus nucleocapsids. Measles studies including reverse transcriptase polymerase chain reaction and viral growth confirmed measles virus, genotype D3. Immunohistochemistry was positive for measles nucleoprotein. Despite intravenous ribavirin therapy, the patient died. MIBE has not been described in stem cell recipients but is a disease of immunocompromised hosts and typically occurs within 1 year of measles infection, exposure, or vaccination. Our case is unusual as neither the patient nor the stem cell donor had apparent recent measles exposure or vaccination, and neither had recent travel to measles-endemic regions. The patient had an erythematous rash several weeks before the neurologic symptoms; however, skin biopsy was consistent with graft-versus-host disease, and immunohistochemistry studies for measles nucleoprotein were negative. As measles genotype D3 has not been seen in areas where the child lived since his early childhood, the possibility of an unusually long latency period between initial measles infection and MIBE is raised. In addition, this case demonstrates the utility of brain biopsy in the diagnosis of encephalitis of unknown cause in the immunocompromised host.
Attenuation of free radical production and paracrystalline inclusions by creatine supplementation in a patient with a novel cytochrome b mutation^APR 2004^MUSCLE &amp; NERVE^Mitochondrial cytopathies are associated with increased free radical generation and paracrystalline inclusions. Paracrystalline inclusions were serendipitously found in a young male athlete with a very high respiratory exchange ratio during steady-state exercise; he also had an unusually low aerobic capacity. Direct sequencing of the mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA) coding regions revealed a novel missense mutation (G15497A) resulting in a glycine--&gt;serine conversion at a highly conserved site in the cytochrome b gene in the subject, his mother, and sister. Cybrids, prepared by fusion of the subject's platelets with either U87MG rhodegrees or SH-SY5Y rhodegrees cells, generated higher basal levels of reactive oxygen species (ROS), had a lower adenosine triphosphate (ATP) content, and were more sensitive to oxygen and glucose deprivation and peroxynitrite generation compared to control cybrids with wild-type mtDNA. Cell survival was significantly enhanced with 50 mmol/L creatine monohydrate (CM) administration. The subject was also treated with CM (10 g/d) for a period of 5 weeks and a repeat muscle biopsy showed no paracrystalline inclusions. The results suggest that the development of exercise-induced paracrystalline inclusions may be influenced by the G15497A mtDNA mutation, and that CM mitigates against the pathological consequences of this mutation.
17q-linked frontotemporal dementia-amyotrophic lateral sclerosis without tau mutations with tau and alpha-synuclein inclusions^MAR 2004^ARCHIVES OF NEUROLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  7.419  </td>  <td>7.249</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2014  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Neurofilament inclusion body disease: a new proteinopathy?^OCT 2003^BRAIN^We describe four cases of a new clinicopathological entity presenting with either a frontotemporal dementia or corticobasal degeneration syndrome with a mean age of onset of 45 years (range 41-50) characterized pathologically by deposition of neurofilament proteins. All four patients had a rapidly progressive course and have become mute and non-ambulatory, and three have died after mean illness duration of only 3 years (range 21/2-4). Both structural (MRI) and functional (PET and SPECT) imaging demonstrated frontal and temporal lobe and basal ganglia involvement. Gross neuropathological examination in the three deceased patients (the fourth patient, still alive, was diagnosed by brain biopsy) revealed changes affecting predominantly the frontal and temporal cortices, basal ganglia and brainstem. There was superficial linear spongiosis affecting the frontal lobes in all three autopsied patients, and severe caudate atrophy was noted in two of them and demonstrated on MRI in the living patient. On routine staining, there were numerous intracytoplasmic inclusions, which ranged from eosinophilic to basophilic. Some had a clearly defined basophilic margin, while others were granular with a hyaline core. With modified Bielschowsky silver technique, a small number of the inclusions were intensely stained. Inclusions were not labelled with other silver stains. Immuno histochemistry revealed that the inclusions were immunoreactive with antibodies to neurofilament heavy and light chain subunits and to ubiquitin, but not with antibodies to tau and alpha-synuclein. These neurofilament- and ubiquitin-positive inclusions were widespread, specific to neurons and occasionally intranuclear. The frequency and distribution of the inclusions and the silver and immunohistochemical profiles in these four cases is novel and has not been described in detail before. We propose the term neurofilament inclusion body disease for this entity.
Inclusion chain using ICT^MAY-JUN 2003^ANNALES DES TELECOMMUNICATIONS-ANNALS OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS^To design enterprises for all, individual inclusion processes must be detailed to assess precisely special needs for people to be employed. To construct an Inclusion Chain based on Information and Communication Technologies, we tried to apply classical tools used in industrial context, like GRAI-nets. Supported by several European projects, our initiative has managed to build a new type of enterprise: Inter@ctifs.Services which employs thirty handicapped or disadvantaged persons.
Chlorine-potassium variations in melt inclusions from Raivavae and Rapa, Austral Islands: constraints on chlorine recycling in the mantle and evidence for brine-induced melting of oceanic crust^SEP 30 2002^EARTH AND PLANETARY SCIENCE LETTERS^Chlorine abundance variations in oceanic basalts can provide insights into the degassing and volatile recycling history of the mantle as well as shallow melt/hydrosphere interaction. We have examined major, trace and volatile element abundances in olivine-hosted melt inclusions from the islands of Raivavae and Rapa in the Austral Island chain. The island, of Raivavae sits atop a pre-existing fracture zone and thus provides the opportunity to examine the relationship between melt/hydrosphere interaction and local lithospheric structure. The majority of inclusions from both Raivavae and Rapa have well correlated chlorine and potassium concentrations consistent with a source Cl/K2O ratio of similar to0.04, similar to that of uncontaminated mid-ocean ridge and ocean island basalts. The similarity of chlorine/potassium ratios in mid-ocean ridge basalts, Austral Islands basalts, and basalts from many other ocean islands suggests that chlorine/potassium does not significantly vary in the mantle. Because the plume sources of many ocean island chains contain varying types and quantities of recycled oceanic crust and sediments, this indicates that most of the chlorine added to oceanic crust during seafloor alteration is removed during subduction and is not recycled into the deep mantle. High chlorine contents (up to 0.14 wt%) and chlorine/potassium ratios in melt inclusions from an early-erupted Raivavae lava derive from assimilation of Cl-rich brines or brine-impregnated oceanic crust. A small subset of inclusions from the same lava show more extreme chlorine enrichment (up to 2.5 wt%), are depleted in incompatible trace elements relative to normal inclusions, and show extreme fractionation of high-field-strength elements (HFSEs) relative to large-ion-lithophile or rare-earth elements. These latter inclusions derive from partial melting of the pre-existing oceanic crust under brine-saturated conditions. HFSE depletions in these inclusions reflect the stabilization of a HFSE-bearing phase in the lower crust, probably due to high chlorine fugacity. HFSE anomalies are also associated with high chlorine content in mid-ocean ridge basalts. We suggest that these anomalies are also generated by the stabilization of HFSE-bearing phases in high-chlorine-activity melts or fluids. This process may also provide a means of stabilizing rutile in the sub-arc mantle wedge. (C) 2002 Elsevier Science B.V. All rights reserved.
Evidence of starch inclusion complexation with lactones^MAR 2001^JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL AND FOOD CHEMISTRY^Starch, in particular the linear amylose, is able to form inclusion complexes with a wide spectrum of ligand molecules, among them flavor compounds. The complexing ability of a homologous series of gamma- and delta -lactones with potato starch was followed by amperometric iodine titration, differential scanning calorimetry, and wide-angle X-ray diffraction measurements. Lactones with a Linear chain of a size greater than or equal to C-5 form inclusion complexes with starch, whereas lactones with a short linear chain, such as gamma -heptalactone, show poor complexing ability. The thermal stability of starch-lactone complexes increases with increasing chain length of the lactone. In general, lactones induce tl;e formation of V-h helices. Only delta -decalactone complexes with starch were not definitely identified as V-h amylose helices. Complexation of starch dispersions with lactones induce turbidity and gelation or phase separation, both phenomena being the result of microphase separation.
Familiar amyotrophic lateral sclerosis with a two base pair deletion in superoxide dismutase 1 gene: Multisystem degeneration with intracytoplasmic hyaline inclusions in astrocytes^OCT 1996^JOURNAL OF NEUROPATHOLOGY AND EXPERIMENTAL NEUROLOGY^We performed a comparative neuropathological study on two siblings with familial amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (FALS). The clinical course of the sister who died at age 46 was 18 months, and that of the brother who died at age 65, 11 years. The neuropathological findings of the female were compatible with FALS with posterior column involvement. Her brother had multisystem degeneration in addition to the motor neuron disturbance; Lewy body-like hyaline inclusions (LBHIs) were present in the affected neurons of the degenerative lesions. Eosinophilic inclusions were seen in many astrocytes of the affected areas of the male FALS patient. Immunohistochemical assays revealed that most astrocytic inclusions reacted with the antibodies against Cu/Zn-superoxide dismutase 1 (SOD1) and ubiquitin; immunoreactivity was essentially the same as that of the neuronal LBHIs. Ultrastructurally the astrocytic inclusions were composed mainly of 15- to 25-nm granule-coated fibrils and granular material, resembling LBHIs of the neurons. Despite the dissimilar neuropathological features, both patients had the same two base pair deletion in exon 5 of the SOD1 gene. These findings suggest that FALS due to an SOD1 gene mutation is potentially a multisystem degenerative disorder, affecting not only neurons, but also astrocytes.
Expression of porin from Rhadopseudomonas blastica in Escherichia coli inclusion bodies and folding into exact native structure^FEB 26 1996^FEBS LETTERS^The homotrimeric membrane channel porin from Rhodopseudomonas blastica was expressed without signal sequence in Escherichia coli. The protein assembled in inclusion bodies in the cytosol, from which it could be recovered using urea and detergents, After purification by anion-exchange chromatography, the protein crystallized under wild-type conditions, The X-ray structure was determined at 2.2 Angstrom resolution, and a comparison with the known wild-type structure showed that the recombinant porin is identical at the atomic level, The method yields porin and designed mutants thereof in 100 mg amounts, allowing for detailed functional and mechanistic studies.
Scaling Up Agricultural Innovation for Inclusive Livelihood and Productivity Outcomes in Sub-Saharan Africa: The Case of Nigeria^JUN 2017^AFRICAN DEVELOPMENT REVIEW-REVUE AFRICAINE DE DEVELOPPEMENT^Agricultural research programmes driven by agricultural innovation system concepts usually aim to change the way in which low income rural agrarian households in a nation like Nigeria communicate with the market and the decision-making strategies pertaining to development of their agri-business and the scarce resources which are at their disposal. We assess the extent to which the use of these innovative agricultural research interventions impact upon the livelihood and productivity outcomes of rural smallholder farmers in sub-Saharan African using a case study of Nigeria. Using propensity score matching as a means of establishing a valid counterfactual and single differencing to measure impact, the study establishes that rural incomes and output are significantly impacted by agricultural research interventions that are driven by agricultural innovation systems concepts. The study finds that participating households had better livelihood, productivity and more diversified income portfolios during the implementation of innovative research intervention as a result of greater linkages to markets and capacity building opportunities; phasing out of the research programme reduced the diversity of income portfolios and led to the erosion of livelihoods. Therefore, agricultural innovation system concepts should be mainstreamed in all public agricultural extension and research programmes.
Sustainable and Inclusive Food Systems through the Lenses of a Complex System Thinking ApproachA Bibliometric Review^SEP 2016^AGRICULTURE-BASEL^The multidimensionality and complexity of assuring food security in a sustainable and inclusive way requires us to think in systems. Yet, sector specific models or agricultural productivity models are not able by construction to represent the non-linearity and time-dependent nature of the relations underpinning the agri-food system. Two alternative modelling approaches, i.e., System Dynamics (SD) and Agent Based Models (ABM), gained increasing attention in particular after the food commodities prices spikes in 2007 thanks to the conceptual and structural advantages that they provide to the study of food system complexity. In this paper, we develop a first, rigorous bibliometric analysis based on pattern recognition analysis reviewing the peer review journal publications focused on agri-food systems. Using the ISIWeb of Science dataset provided by Thomson Reuters, we apply citation/co-citation semantic metrics to analyse publications from 1970 to 2016 in the field of agricultural models divided in two categories that we define as: (i) agricultural complex systems modelling (ACSM) that includes SD and ABM modelling exercised; and (ii) agricultural modelling (AM) that includes traditional approaches to agri-food systems modelling rooted on the neoclassical approach (e.g., Computable General Equilibrium Models and Partial Equilibrium Models). The publications are identified by applying a filter of specific keywords to the search. We then compare how both approaches appear in the literature looking at the number of publications and citations by scientific journals, identifying key authors and journals, their frequency, the impact factor and citations, and looking at their trend through time. Results show the prevalence of AM approaches for the analysis of the agri-food sector on one side, and the smaller but growing contribution of the ACSM community and literature on the other. We conclude by remarking the need for more systematic analyses on the contribution of the two approaches to the analysis of the complex dynamics and behaviour of agri-food systems to inform evidence-based policies for sustainable and inclusive agriculture.
Inclusion of the Sustainable Development Goals in the Curriculum of Primary and Secondary Education in rural Schools of Zaragoza^JUN 2019^REVISTA INTERNACIONAL DE EDUCACION PARA LA JUSTICIA SOCIAL^Education cannot be kept out of social and political reality. It is a fact that the current world scenario is having a considerable impact on the redefinition of the concept of Education. Global Citizenship Education (GCED) implies adapting the elements of the curriculum to promote the development of values of equity and justice in the teaching-learning processes. This article analyzes, the incorporation of the GCED and the Sustainable Development Goals (SDG) in the academic curriculum, as well as the dynamics and actions that are carried out in the centers and in the classrooms. A quantitative methodology has been used, developing a non-experimental descriptive study through a social survey. The results show how educational centers, are committed to introducing actions related to the GCED and/or the SDGS into their center projects. The study shows the lack of experiences involving cross-cutting and global projects and the introduction of the SDGS in a more explicit manner.
Social networks and informal financial inclusion in China^JUN 2019^ASIA PACIFIC JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT^Using the 2011 China Household Finance Survey (CHFS) database, we explore the heterogeneous impacts of social networks on informal financial inclusion for Chinese urban and rural households. We find that social networks significantly increase the probability of households' participation in the informal financial market, augment the size of informal financial transaction, and raise the ratio of informal lending over the total household assets. We also identify the mechanisms through which the social networks affect households' participation in the informal financial market. By reducing information cost, perceived risk and precautionary saving, social networks play a larger role for urban households than rural households. Notably, the effects of social networks on informal finance are strengthened with the development of formal financial market.
The importance of systems thinking, context, and inclusion when studying the feasibility of expanding the FoodShare (SNAP) outreach program to rural communities of Northern Wisconsin^JUN 2019^EVALUATION AND PROGRAM PLANNING^Evaluators often neglect to question whether a program has been appropriately designed for a new context prior to a feasibility study's commencement. In this paper, we document the results of a case study that closely examined context when determining the feasibility of implementing a FoodShare outreach program in rural northern Wisconsin. Using community-based participatory mixed methods, we examine how stakeholder engagement led to both study refinement and a more comprehensive understanding of community food security based on contextual factors and systems thinking. Lessons learned when conducting feasibility studies from this perspective are provided to improve evaluation practice.
Financial inclusion as a pathway to welfare enhancement and income equality: Micro-level evidence from Nigeria^MAY 4 2019^DEVELOPMENT SOUTHERN AFRICA^While the importance of financial inclusion as a means of poverty and income inequality reduction has long been recognised, the paths to welfare enhancement and income equality through financial inclusion remain partially acknowledged. Using micro-level data on 1 750 rural Nigerian households, this study examines the finance-welfare nexus by constructing a multi-variable financial inclusion index. The results first show that financial inclusion exerts a strong positive influence on household welfare. However, the decomposition analysis shows that middle- and high-income households gain more from financial inclusion in comparison to the targeted low-income households. Second, informal livelihood strategies, such as environmental resource extraction, crops, and livestock production, revealed reduced welfare disparities across income distributions. Therefore, for financial inclusion to alleviate welfare inequality and ensure income convergence, rural financial markets must be redesigned to allow wider access to credit, specifically for low-income and vulnerable households.
Factors that influence elementary school teachers' attitudes towards inclusion of visually impaired children in Turkey^APR 21 2019^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^There is a scarcity of research on inclusion of visually impaired children in Turkey. Specifically, a gap exists concerning the attitudes of elementary school teachers towards the inclusion of visually impaired children in mainstream schools. This article uses data from two questionnaires, leveraging the responses of 253 teachers from rural and urban areas. The results demonstrate that elementary school teachers commonly hold positive attitudes towards the inclusion of visually impaired children and that teachers' initial and in-service training about inclusion positively influenced their attitudes. Our findings are in contrast with earlier research which argues that teachers do not hold positive attitudes to inclusion, and highlights that a key barrier to inclusion stems from elementary school teachers feeling unprepared to teach visually impaired children. We conclude that greater post-qualification training is required to enable teachers to operationalise different approaches that facilitate the inclusion of visually impaired children.
ICT development from the perspective of connectivity and inclusion - the operation of a local digital agenda in Sweden^MAR 15 2019^NORSK GEOGRAFISK TIDSSKRIFT-NORWEGIAN JOURNAL OF GEOGRAPHY^The aim of the article is to determine what a local Digital Agenda (DA) implies for ICT development at the local level and how such a policy can be realised in practice. The topic is discussed in relation to the EU and Swedish Digital Agendas, which have motivated the definition of a local DA for the examined Swedish municipality of Linkoping. An analytical model is used both to examine the balance of supply-side and demand-side policies of the local DA, and in an attempt to determine what a local DA implies for local ICT development. The empirical material shows that local policy focused on supply-side strategies towards households and businesses, while demand-side policy was present to a greater extent in the management of the municipality's own operations. The local authority has provided a major expansion in broadband infrastructure to rural areas of the municipality. This complies with mandates from local authorities to manage local infrastructure development and services to the local population. The authors conclude that the policy implications of the results suggest that although operations through the local DA are substantial, complementary measures to support increasing demands across households and businesses are important when dealing with challenges of uneven access and underutilisation of the large investments for ICT infrastructure.
Institutional analysis of rules governing trade in African Leafy Vegetables and implications for smallholder inclusion: Case of schools and restaurants in rural Kenya^APR 2019^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.301  </td>  <td>3.883</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The Transferability of Financial Inclusion Models: A Process-Based Approach^APR 2019^BUSINESS &amp; SOCIETY^Although a number of microfinance initiatives have improved financial inclusion in various regions of developing countries, the transferability of their foundations from one context to another is still a challenge. This study proposes an innovative process-based model targeting the initial stages of the transfer process that links three interconnected categories: local contextual conditions, transferring practices, and initial developmental consequences. The results were produced through a longitudinal study of the implementation of three community development banks on the periphery of Sao Paulo based on a highly successful Brazilian model known as Banco Palmas. In addition to the process-based model, our findings contribute to the microfinance and bottom of the pyramid (BOP) literatures, showing a cross-fertilization that has been insufficiently explored.
Measuring impact of financial inclusion on rural development through cooperatives^MAR 4 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^Purpose The purpose of this paper is to measure the impact of financial inclusion on rural development through cooperatives. Design/methodology/approach The primary data were collected from 540 beneficiaries of Cooperatives banks operating in three northern states of India, i.e., J&amp;K, Himachal Pradesh and Punjab using purposive sampling during January to June 2016. Exploratory factor analysis, confirmatory factor analysis, ANOVA, t-test and structural equation modelling were used for scale purification and data analysis. Findings The findings of the study revealed that financial inclusion through cooperatives has direct and significant impact on rural development. Further, the results support the notion that financial inclusion is a strategy of inclusive growth, but inclusive growth itself is a subset of a larger set of inclusive development which means that the benefit must reach the all, particularly the women and the children, minority groups, the extremely poor and those pushed below the poverty line by natural and human-made disasters.
Strengthening child inclusion in the classroom in rural schools of Pakistan and Afghanistan: What did we learn by testing the system dynamics protocol for community engagement?^MAR 2019^RESEARCH IN COMPARATIVE AND INTERNATIONAL EDUCATION^Access to education has been the central tenet of the Millennium Development Goal 2, which focused strongly on increasing enrolment yet failed to promote education quality and equity and address contextual complexities that sustain exclusion. As a consequence, many children are not learning. There is growing recognition that effective, efficient and equitable education for all will not be achieved without better accountability. The present paper details innovative methods for strengthening the learning process through better social accountability. The paper defines and tests in rural schools of Afghanistan and Pakistan a community-based system dynamics protocol using participatory group model building (GMB) techniques. We tested the protocol with two groups of teachers and one group of children, with the three produced causal loop diagrams highlighting factors that influence learning in the classroom from the perspectives of the participants. The sessions showed interest, engagement, quick mastery of how GMB methods work and clear understanding of how the current classroom system hinders learning for many students. Researchers found that large autonomy and initiative could be left to the workshop participants, keeping the facilitator's role to one of explaining the method and asking clarification about causal relations.
Towards a new public sphere for political inclusion: Mobile media and the reshaping of local governance landscapes in Sierra Leone^JAN 2019^INFORMATION DEVELOPMENT^Political marginalization in local governance systems in Sierra Leone results in the struggle for citizens to fully participate in deliberative democracy and amplify their voices in decision-making processes. This article draws on Habermas' theory of the public sphere to critically examine the extent to which mobile phone use alters political relations between marginalized citizens and power holders in Sierra Leone's local governance systems. By using ethnographic data from rural and urban communities in Sierra Leone, this article shows that the mobile phone provides a useful mediated public sphere for the marginalized to negotiate political relations, inform deliberative democratic processes and remove political middlemen in local governance. The mobile phone empowers the marginalized to organize themselves and amplify their voices in local political decision-making. The article concludes by arguing that the introduction of mobile phones into the local governance systems in Sierra Leone results in the emergence of new formations of participatory public discussion and radical alterations in local political processes. However, the sustainability of these practices depends on the integration of mobile phones into a larger network of political arrangements in the country.
Intersections between connectivity and digital inclusion in rural communities^2019^COMMUNICATION RESEARCH AND PRACTICE^As societies become more connected and digitalised, evidence shows that differences in infrastructure quality are growing between urban and rural areas. The constant catch-up of infrastructure and existing social exclusion factors create a double jeopardy in rural areas. Furthermore, as digital technologies are increasingly embedded into economic, political, social, and personal lives, the disadvantages that occur from disconnection manifest differently depending on the social context of an individual, organisation or community. There is a need to improve our understanding of specific contexts of digitally excluded groups and develop targeted policies and programmes. Drawing from fieldwork in rural communities in Australia, this article examines the relationship between limited connectivity, the local context and socio-economic outcomes in rural areas. We suggest a customised policy framework that is responsive to the diversity and uniqueness of local contexts in connectivity and digital inclusion.
Grounding participatory action research in rural Colombia: a demonstration study on youth financial inclusion^2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF LIFELONG EDUCATION^Since the new millennium, the issue of financial inclusion of young people has increasingly gained recognition, especially in relation to those living in deprived circumstances. Financial inclusion can be promoted through education that specifically aims for the strengthening of young persons' financial capabilities. In 2013, a participatory action research project was started in a rural region of Colombia to improve the research capacity of a local university through the development and implementation of a demonstration project on the financial inclusion of young people. University teachers, students and employees of a financial cooperative were trained in conducting qualitative methods with a specific aim of being responsive to the life stories of their interviewees. This paper shares the experiences from an international team of educational scholars who aim for the democratisation of research capacity and the dissemination of localised knowledge. This is done by working closely together with stakeholders and ultimately giving a voice to youth employed in the informal economy as they are usually the ones being most deprived from access to financial services.
Digital inclusion in a rural school: movements triggered from introducing a public policy in the 1:1 model^JAN-APR 2019^REVISTA IBEROAMERICANA DE EDUCACION^This paper presents the movements triggered by the introduction of an educational public policy -Programa Nacional de Educacao no Campo (Pronacampo)- at a school community. It is an exploratory qualitative study which started since laptops were distributed in the 1:1 model at a rural school, with a mixed grade system - from Kindergarten to 5th grade, located in the countryside of Rio Grande do Sul (Brazil). Cartography, as described by Kastrup (2008), is the inspiration for the research method aiming to identify and analyze changes caused in practices inside and outside the classrooms after laptops arrived. A few significant movements of change were noticed in the actions carried out by teachers, students and their families. A few constructivist concepts and concepts related to digital literacy support the analysis. The long period without Internet connection did not stop this school community, who counted with mutual effort and families' engagement and participation, to find creative solutions to explore resources available as an opportunity to build knowledge in and out of school.
Daily life and rural women: Inclusion, equity, and development as transformation tools^2019^EQUIDAD &amp; DESARROLLO^This article reflects on a topic that has been forgotten for years, but which takes on importance in the current context of a country like Colombia: rural women. In this sense, the paper moves back and forth between two categories: daily life and rural women to demonstrate how the resignification of rural women is possible in Colombia as long as their experiences in daily life are recognized as possibilities of emancipation and transformation. The research was developed with a qualitative approach, using the oral history method. The participants were rural women between 45 and 74 years of age. The paper concludes that the participants' life experience in the Rural Agro-Ecological School (Escuela Campesina Agroecologica) has a positive impact on their lives, since it allows them to think about and project themselves as social, autonomous, and empowered subjects. In this sense, it is possible to speak of two subjects: one before and one after going through the training experience.
Descriptive analysis of School Inclusion through Index for Inclusion^2019^PSYCHOLOGY SOCIETY &amp; EDUCATION^Aligning the paradigm of inclusive education, the main objective that promoted this study presented below was to evaluate the approach and inclusive measures implemented to 430 education professionals from different centres educational primary school in Spain. The questionnaire assesses the three dimensions that Booth &amp; Ainscow define inclusive education (Cultures, Policies and Practices). In this study, it is performed a descriptive analysis of the questionnaire to analyse the barriers and facilitators to the implementation of inclusive educational approaches. The type of school (public, rural or private), schools are learning communities, number of teachers, results that analyse the content of the items of the instrument and turn relate the degree of inclusion as contributing variables support, number of pupils with special educational needs, type of school grouping, family involvement, coexistence and expectations.
Beyond the reach of FIFA: football and community "development' in rural South Africa, towards a politics of inclusion and sustainability^2019^SOCCER &amp; SOCIETY^The real legacy of the 2010 World Cup is that people in the focus areas of Cape Town, Durban and Johannesburg-Tshwane may have received some benefit from infrastructural development while much of the rest of South Africa has fallen further behind those globally projecting conurbations. Though the literature on sport and community development is growing rapidly as is work on legacy and mega events, there are few studies that examine initiatives generated within local communities, particularly those located well away from the activities of international sport development agencies. In this paper, we examine a village football team in rural Mpondoland in the far reaches of the Eastern Cape located well away from the impact of World Cup football-related initiatives. We also explore activities of international sport development agencies. We examine the motivations of the players, the community role that football plays and how community-generated initiatives might be supported and nurtured with full involvement and democratic decision-making practices embedded into the operation of local sporting groups. Understanding the hurdles faced in resource-strapped communities will enhance discussion of the ways in which sporting development can be supported rather than imposed and become sustainable in the future.
Financial inclusion through a public works programme: Does left-wing extremism make a difference?^JAN 2019^DEVELOPMENT POLICY REVIEW^Using district-level household data, the study investigates the impact of left wing extremism (LWE) violence on financial inclusion in India. Exploiting the staggered roll-out of a major public works programme, we find that the programme has the potency to improve financial inclusion, notwithstanding the deleterious effects of higher LWE violence. These findings are, however, different in the post-Pradhan Mantri Jan Dhan Yojana (Prime Minister's People Money Scheme) phase, especially in the short run wherein there is an increase in both access to and use of finance. The findings are consistent with the citizen support model and suggest that demonstrable government commitment in the form of spending on public works has the capacity to raise financial inclusion, even if the programme occurs in LWE-affected districts.
Has expansion of mobile phone and internet use spurred financial inclusion in the SAARC countries?^DEC 2018^FINANCIAL INNOVATION^Exclusion from the mainstream financial world is a burden on the poor of many countries. The proliferation of new mobile and online financial services, such as e-banking, money transfers, and payment processing has the potential to provide access to basic financial products and services to financially excluded people. The purpose of this study was to investigate the effects of the growth of mobile phone and Internet use on financial inclusion in the South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC) countries from 2004 to 2014. We applied principal component analysis to construct a financial inclusion index that served as a proxy variable for the accessibility of financial services in the SAARC countries. Using three different models-the fixed effect, random effect, and panel correction standard errors modelsthis study discovered a positive and significant relationship between the growth of financial inclusion and expansion of both mobile phone and Internet services. Moreover, an empirical study of the control variables showed that the levels of income and education were positively associated with financial inclusion, whereas the size of the rural population and unemployment were negatively related to financial inclusion. In addition, the empirical estimates posit a unidirectional causal flow from the growth of mobile and Internet services to expanded financial inclusion in the SAARC countries.
An evaluation of the Fondo de Inclusion Social Energetico program to promote access to liquefied petroleum gas in Peru^OCT 2018^ENERGY FOR SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.307  </td>  <td>3.691</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A framework for optimal techno-economic assessment of broadband access solutions and digital inclusion of rural population in global information society^AUG 2018^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN THE INFORMATION SOCIETY^Broadband solutions, i.e., broadband technologies and services, offer users numerous benefits. However, inequalities related to the levels of broadband solutions' deployment and adoption between rural and urban areas, i.e., the digital divide, remain a consequential problem worldwide. To reduce the digital divide, the issues related to the deployment and usage of broadband solutions in rural areas are analysed in this paper. To define optimal strategies for the deployment and adoption of rural broadband solutions, the application of an extended techno-economic assessment process is considered. Therefore, an additional framework that extends the structure of standard techno-economic models is proposed, and its detailed overview is given. Within the framework, the regression analyses of factors relevant to broadband solutions deployment and adoption in rural areas are defined. The results of conducted analyses are used in the standard techno-economic modelling process. Finally, the efficiency of framework usage in techno-economic assessment process and in finding optimal broadband solutions is demonstrated for a case study rural scenario.
The inclusion of family farms. Discussion of its use in rural development programs in Argentina^AUG 2018^MUNDO AGRARIO^The notion of inclusion originated in the early 1970s, gained prominence during the 1990s and since 2010 has been incorporated into speeches and documents related to public policies. The objective in this article is to deepen the meaning of inclusion, what it expresses, what conceals and what is proposed from the public policy of rural development for family farming in Argentina. For this, aspects about the origin and incorporation of the term in the political discourse and its use in the rural development programs in force during 2017 in the Unit for Rural Change (UCAR) are described. We conclude that specifying and clarifying the definition of inclusion that is promoted would allow the advancement of the structural causes that expel family farmers from their areas of residence and ways of life.
Assessing the inclusion of primary school children in vision screening for refractive error program of India^JUL 2018^INDIAN JOURNAL OF OPHTHALMOLOGY^Purpose: In India, teachers screen middle school children using the 6/9 Snellen's optotype. Recently, the National Program for Control of Blindness included primary school students also. The present cross-sectional study was planned to assess the inclusion of primary school students. Compliance to spectacles was ascertained after 6 months follow-up. Methods: Randomly selected 23 Government primary schools. A total of 30 teachers were nominated and given hands-on training in vision screening and recording formats. Teachers conducted vision screening of primary school students of their respective schools using the 6/12 Snellen's chart and referred students with subnormal vision to optometrist. Optometrist also validated the screening done by teachers. Optometrist screened the vision of 5% randomly selected children screened by teachers as having normal vision. Descriptive statistics used STATA version 13.0. Results: A total of 6056 students screened by the teachers. Sensitivity and specificity of teacher screening were 92.3% (confidence interval [CI] 88.6-95.0) and 72.6% (CI 68.2-76.6)), respectively. About 277 students underwent refraction and 186 prescribed spectacles. The prevalence of myopia, hypermetropia, and astigmatism is 2.5% (2.1-2.9), 0.6% (0.4-0.8), and 1.3% (1.0-1.6), respectively. Compliance to spectacles usage is 36%. Conclusion: Burden of refractive error in primary school is very low. Trained teachers can identify children with subnormal vision, but the false-positive rate is very high. Compliance to spectacle use among primary school children is also less. Vision screening by teachers prioritized in secondary schools and preschool screening should be done by more skilled eye care workers preferably optometrist.
IMPACT OF DIGITAL INCLUSION POLICIES IN THE USE OF SOCIAL NETWORKS OF RURAL WOMEN^JUN 2018^PRISMA SOCIAL^This paper aims to assess the impact of the Action Plan For Equality between Women and Men in the Information Society in the access and use of social networks of rural Andalusian women. We conducted a descriptive study based on surveys of 361 women between the ages of 26 and 65 and of rural areas of Andalusia. Scales are designed and applied to measure the access and use that women make of social networks, and it is studied according to the training received in technologies. To deepen in some aspects a study of multiple cases to 8 women older than 45 years through autobiographical interviews. The results suggest that the actions proposed in the Plan have had a positive effect on access and basic uses, but not so much on routinization and autonomy. These results serve to guide digital inclusion policies aimed at increasing the participation and exercise of full citizenship of women in the Information and Knowledge Society. We conclude the need to diversify the training actions contemplated as a measure of action to respond to the variety of profiles and motivations that women show.
Digital competencies among student populations in Kosovo: the impact of inclusion, socioeconomic status, ethnicity and type of residence^MAY 2018^EDUCATION AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES^Present research studies the impact of variables such as inclusion, exclusion, residence, socioeconomic status, gender and parental education on digital competences among student populations in Kosovo (N = 303). The findings reveal that in accordance with international literature inclusion and exclusion in academic settings predict levels of digital competences reported by participants. To that end students who reported being included in academic settings also reported the highest levels of digital competences. Participants who reported feeling excluded were the ones to report the lowest levels of digital competences. Socioeconomic standing was also a powerful influential variable with participants reporting low digital competences when they reported financial hardship. Similarly, participants who reported a higher socioeconomic standing reported the highest levels of digital competences. Residence was also an influential variable with participants residing in urban areas reporting the highest levels of digital competences while participants living in rural areas reported the lowest levels of skills. Finally, along with providing data from a country that is not present in international research, present study is a first one to offer information on digital competences in Kosovo and as such is important for policy building in the future.
Strategy for the orientation to the family of the rural context to favor the social inclusion of their children with mild mental retardation^MAY 2018^DILEMAS CONTEMPORANEOS-EDUCACION POLITICA Y VALORES^In this article is shown a pedagogic strategy that is addressed to the family orientation of the rural context, to favor the social inclusion of its children with mild mental retardation. It is structured in stages and phases, in which actions are conceived to achieve the general objective of the strategy. Requirements are also shown for their instrumentation. The social inclusion in Cuba is the purpose of the Special Education; from here, there is the value to develop actions that guarantee and enhance the full social equality among children with and without special educational necessities.
The struggle for digital inclusion: Phones, healthcare, and marginalisation in rural India^APR 2018^WORLD DEVELOPMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.905  </td>  <td>4.611</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A potential Human Rights Act in Queensland and inclusion of the right to health^APR 2018^AUSTRALIAN AND NEW ZEALAND JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^Objective: To identify the level of public support for a Human Rights Act for Queensland (HRAQ) and for inclusion of the right to health by participants in a public inquiry process. Methods: We reviewed the 492 written submissions to the Legal Affairs and Community Safety Committee's Inquiry into a potential HRAQ and the transcripts documenting the public hearings held by the Committee in 2016. Results: A total of 465 written submissions were analysed; 419 (90%) were for a HRAQ. More than 80% of the for' submissions advocated the right to health's inclusion. At the seven public hearings, 72 persons made verbal submissions and most supported a HRAQ. Five major themes were identified in our synthesis of the public hearing transcripts. Three related specifically to health and human rights: 1) the need to consider the holistic health and human rights of Indigenous Queenslanders and Indigenous Queensland communities; 2) instilling a human rights culture in Queensland; and 3) access to health care and the underlying determinants of health. The other two themes related to the conduct of the Inquiry: 4) the importance of community participation in developing a HRAQ; and 5) concerns about the public consultation processes. Conclusion: This study found strong support in the majority of submissions for the Queensland Parliament to draft and enact a HRAQ, and for the inclusion of the right to health in such legislation. Implications for public health: The Queensland Parliament's enactment of a HRAQ that expressly included the right to health would increase the accountability and transparency of government health (and related) decision making and resource allocation, and would better identify and address health inequities across the state. This Act is imperative for improving the health and wellbeing of all Queenslanders, particularly rural and remote and Aboriginal and Torres Strait Islander Queenslanders.
From education segregation to inclusion: The policy ramifications on Chinese internal migrant children^APR 2018^POLICY FUTURES IN EDUCATION^The aim of this paper is to analyze a specific array of publicly accessible policy papers and literature necessary to provide a contextualized interpretation of segregation policies and their implications for the educational outcomes of migrant children in China. By teasing out its ramifications for education equity, this paper reveals the unanticipated current challenges resulting from educational inclusion for migrant children in urban China. The paper argues that although China's new migration reform policies are well-intentioned and appear rationally apposite at the macro level, migrant children are presently experiencing institutional forms of acute marginality and discrimination in inclusive schools. It is to be hoped that the information provided will serve to advance governmental and institutional understanding of the subtleties of inequity that have arisen from the current policy of Chinese urbanization. Given the insights evinced in our paper, it should be evident that achieving equity for migrant children under the present policy reforms governing their admission into integrated public schools requires more philosophical reflection than has yet been given.
INCLUSION OF THE PUBLIC IN THE NATURAL CAPITAL, ECOSYSTEM SERVICES AND GREEN INFRASTRUCTURE ASSESSMENTS (RESULTS OF STRUCTURED INTERVIEWS WITH STAKEHOLDERS OF COMMUNE LIPTOVSKA TEPLICKA)^MAR 2018^Ekologia (Bratislava)^Nowadays, topics like natural capital assessment, ecosystem services and green infrastructure have become frequent subjects of a number of national and international projects accomplished on local, regional, national and cross-frontier levels. These projects respond to the deterioration of biotopes due to their fragmentation and degradation as a result of constructions and tourism/recreation. This situation requires an economic assessment of ecosystems from the view point of their capacities to satisfy human necessities with simultaneous conservation of the environmental quality, and the optimal status of landscape diversity both in rural and urban areas. The aim of the Green Infrastructure initiative is to stop the loss of land as an irreplaceable natural resource and to contribute to the inclusion of ecological and sustainability aspects into the spatial planning and regional development in rural and urban areas. Green Infrastructure is the tool that may reduce the loss of ecosystem services connected with future occupation of land and improve functions of land. It may support ecological measures aimed at conservation of agricultural landscape and adoption of measures in the sphere of forest and water economies. Important role in the assessment of ecosystems is played not only by the scientists but also by experts and the public at large. This is the reason why ever more stakeholders possessing knowledge of local territory and personal life experience participate in these projects. Their judgments and views, often bearing information important for the above-mentioned assessment, are applied to proposed measures aimed at the improvement of environmental quality and quality of life in terms of sustainability. This article brings the possible example of how to include a selected sample of stakeholders into the assessment of natural capital and ecosystem services on local level in the frame of Green Infrastructure. The aim of this paper is to analyse attitudes of the involved for the evaluation of natural capital and ecosystem services at a local level by means of structured interviews. Obtained views will be applied for the assessment of ecosystem services and proposals aimed at protection and conservation of natural capital and building of green infrastructure. The research was carried out in the model territory of the rural commune Liptovska Teplicka.
Why do financial inclusion policies fail in mobilizing savings from the poor? Lessons from rural south India^MAR 2018^DEVELOPMENT POLICY REVIEW^Combining multivariate and qualitative analyses, this micro-level study suggests an explanation for the persistence of informal savings in rural south India despite publicly run large-scale programmes to promote bank savings. Gold, in particular, but also Rotating Saving and Credit Associations (ROSCAs) and private lending, remain the dominant forms of savings. We argue that cultural norms and social institutions, such as social class and caste, shape the nature of savings, and also the propensity and opportunities to save. Gold serves multiple purposes, financial, economic, socio-cultural and political. Furthermore, we find that the preference of Dalits (the lowest caste) for gold illustrates a relative emancipation, which contrasts with the persistence of caste-related prohibitions preventing them investing in other assets, such as land.
Better educational inclusion of migrant children in urban schools? Exploring the influences of the population control policy in large Chinese cities^FEB 2018^ASIAN SOCIAL WORK AND POLICY REVIEW^The educational inclusion of rural-urban migrant children in Chinese urban schools has been promoted in the past decades. This paper provides a contextualized interpretation of recent policy developments governing large Chinese cities and evaluates its impact upon the status of migrant children's education. Drawing on data collected from 1,331 migrant children in urban inclusive schools, this study compared current migrant children's family backgrounds and psychological sense of belonging at school in relation to educational outcomes at the primary education level. Results showed that migrant children's socioeconomic status (SES) levels were slightly higher than their counterparts in inclusive schools and a salient SES stratification of migrant students was found. This correlates with students' reports of fewer incidences of discrimination than hypothesized. Furthermore, capital in migrant families was positively associated with the psychological sense of belonging and academic achievement. These results reveal a significant change to migrant students' SES as a result of the recent population control policy pertaining to China's large cities since 2014. Implications for research and educational practice, especially with at-risk migrant students of low-SES, are discussed.
Analyzing the relationship between institutional framework and financial inclusion in rural Uganda: A social network perspective^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EMERGING MARKETS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.067  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  </tr> </table> 
INNOVATION DETERMINANTS OF FINANCIAL INCLUSION IN TOP TEN AFRICAN COUNTRIES: A SYSTEM GMM APPROACH^2018^MARKETING AND MANAGEMENT OF INNOVATIONS^Financial inclusion has been acclaimed to play a significant role in combating the three evils of poverty, unemployment and poverty, which have been a serious hindrance to the growth path of developing countries like Africa. It was against this that, this paper examined the drivers of financial inclusion in the top ten African economies in terms of gross domestic product growth rate. These include Angola, Algeria, Egypt, Kenya, Libya, Nigeria, Morocco, South Africa, Sudan and Tunisia. Covering a period of 2000 to 2015, using System generalized method of moment, which is considered superior to other panel data models due to its ability to address the problem of omission bias, endogeneity and autocorrelation. The data were obtained from World Development Indicators and Worldwide Governance Indicators which are being considered the most efficient sources of data, especially in developing countries. The study reveal that mobile banking, bank branches, political stability, interest rate, and inflation positively drive financial inclusion while income, access to Automated Teller Machine, and government expenditure have the negative impact on financial inclusion. On the bases of the above findings, it was concluded that mobile banking, bank branches, political stability, interest and inflation rate are the major determinants of financial inclusion in Africa. Based on the conclusion, the study recommends that appropriate financial sector policies and measures should be designed by the stakeholders in the financial system in form of low monetary policy rate to encourage access to financial services by all segment of the society. In addition to strict legislation, the can stop banks exploiting their customers through unnecessary bank charges and ensure the penetration of financial institutions into the rural areas. Fiscal and monetary policies should target an increase in the welfare of the masses especially the low-income earners in the society who are mostly excluded in Africa.
Nexus between financial literacy and financial inclusion Examining the moderating role of cognition from a developing country perspective^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF BANK MARKETING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.196  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Financial inclusion and socioeconomic development: gaps and solution^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
Passion and vision for inclusion: A case study of China's rural pre-service teachers training program^2018^JOURNAL FOR MULTICULTURAL EDUCATION^None
A discourse analysis of financial inclusion: post-liberalization mapping in rural and urban India^2018^JOURNAL OF FINANCIAL ECONOMIC POLICY^None
Social inclusion in the context of Czech rural development policy^2018^AGRICULTURAL ECONOMICS-ZEMEDELSKA EKONOMIKA^The paper addresses social inclusion. It aims to investigate how social inclusion was conceptualized in the main Czech policy documents related to the EU. The text argues that one of the tools of social inclusion - social economy represented by social entrepreneurship and social farming - is a sort of innovative practice. The findings suggest that the understanding of social inclusion evolves within policy documents towards highlighting social economy through matching its theoretical concept with political measures. However, social economy is still not considered by the documents as an innovative approach. If analysing projects funded under Czech Rural Development Programs, social inclusion in rural areas is not the main theme, especially in regions exposed to the risk of social exclusion. In addition, the main actors (NGOs or social entrepreneurs) who are said to support social economy or social farming are not active in submitting projects in rural areas under the Rural Development Program 2007-2013. These actors have not yet used their potential towards developing social economy.
Improving inclusion in rural health services for marginalised community members: Developing a process for change^2018^JOURNAL OF SOCIAL INCLUSION^Australia's mainstream health services located in rural contexts are mandated to provide health care to the entire local population. However, complex power relations embedded and reflected within the cultures of mainstream generalist health services are excluding the most marginalised residents from health care. This paper argues that unless inclusion in rural, generalist mainstream health services is improved, the health experiences of these residents will not substantially change and Australia will continue to report significant health differentials within its population. The concept of culturally inclusive health care is difficult for Australian mainstream generalist health practitioners to engage with because there is limited understanding of what culture is and how it operates within diverse communities. This makes it challenging for many in mainstream health institutions to begin deconstructing how it is that exclusion occurs. Frequently, 'culture' is assigned to 'Others', and there is little recognition that all people, including White, mainstream Australians, are cultural beings, and that health disciplines, services and systems have particular cultures that make assumptions about how to be in the world. Consequently, current approaches to the provision of culturally inclusive health care are not shifting the power relations that (re) produce exclusion. In this paper, we outline a new interdisciplinary methodology that operationalises Foucault's concepts of power, resistance and discourse within a Participatory Action Research (PAR) design and utilises Continuous Quality Improvement (CQI) processes to respond to these power relations and provide health institutions with a process to improve their inclusivity, specifically for Australia's most marginalised residents. It is suggested that employing this new methodology will promote a different way of thinking and acting in health institutions, producing a deconstructed process for health services to adapt to improve their inclusivity.
Social network: Testing the predictive power of its dimensions in explaining financial inclusion of the poor in rural Uganda^2018^AFRICAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMIC AND MANAGEMENT STUDIES^None
Financial intermediation and financial inclusion of the poor: Testing the moderating role of institutional pillars in rural Uganda^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF ETHICS AND SYSTEMS^None
Institutions and Financial Inclusion in Rural Uganda: the Mediating Role of Social Capital^2018^JOURNAL OF AFRICAN BUSINESS^The study examined the mediating role of social capital in the relationship between institutions and financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda. Cross-sectional design was adopted and data were collected and analyzed using SPSS/20, MedGraph and Sobel-z test. The findings indicated that social capital partially mediates the relationship between institutions and financial inclusion. Besides, institutions and financial inclusion are significantly related. Thus, managers of financial institutions, financial inclusion working groups, and policy makers should pay more attention to the role of social capital in promoting cooperative behavior among the poor in accessing scarce resources such as financial services.
Mobile Money and Financial Inclusion in Sub-Saharan Africa: the Moderating Role of Social Networks^2018^JOURNAL OF AFRICAN BUSINESS^The purpose of this article is to test the moderating effect of social networks in the relationship between mobile money usage and financial inclusion in rural Uganda. The results revealed that there is a significant and positive moderating effect of social networks in the relationship between mobile money usage and financial inclusion in rural Uganda. Besides, mobile money usage and social networks have direct and significant effects on financial inclusion in rural Uganda. Thus, the findings suggest that existence of social networks of strong and weak ties among mobile money users promote financial inclusion in rural Uganda. Previous studies have concentrated only on investigating the impact of mobile money in promoting financial inclusion in developing economies, especially in Sub-Saharan Africa. However, this particular study introduces the moderating effect of social networks in the relationship between mobile money usage and financial inclusion in rural Uganda, which seems to be sparse and lacking in literature.
Primary school playgrounds as spaces of inclusion/exclusion in New South Wales, Australia^2018^EDUCATION 3-13^The purpose of this study was to determine how the design and organisation of primary school playground spaces may result in the inclusion or exclusion of some groups of children. Two primary school playgrounds in rural New South Wales, Australia, were selected for this investigation. Data were collected through observations and unstructured interactional interviews. Data analysis revealed the design and organisation of primary school play spaces may lead to segregation among school children. Gender, safety concerns and school rules were also established as factors restricting full use of the playground space. The identification of these factors is vital in guiding future school reform programmes and policies aimed at enhancing participation in play and a sense of belonging for all children. The results suggest that there is need to promote schools' understandings of the significance of playground spaces in children's social lives so children can fully benefit from the time they spend in school playgrounds.
Inclusions and Exclusions in Rural Tanzanian Primary Schools: Material Barriers, Teacher Agency and Disability Equality^2018^SOCIAL INCLUSION^This article begins with the assumption that the argument for the inclusion of children with disabilities in mainstream schools, championed by Sustainable Development Goal 4 and Article 24 of the UN Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities, has largely been accepted nationally and internationally by policy makers, and is increasingly being accepted by teachers. In interrogating the complex craft of developing inclusive and equal learning environments for children with disabilities, this article draws upon Kershner's 'core aspects of teachers' knowledge and knowing', and in particular, 'the school as a site for the development of teaching expertise and the creation of knowledge'. Data is presented from in-depth interviews following videoed lesson observations with experienced teachers in 15 rural, urban and coastal primary schools in four districts in Tanzania. Findings indicate that the teachers' practice is moving unevenly towards disability equality, and involves processes of inclusions and exclusions. This involves teacher autonomy, agency and reflective practice in the context of material, attitudinal, structural, pedagogic and curricular barriers. The teachers' expertise has potential to inform national and international policy developments, and so reduce the evident rhetoric-reality gap. In conclusion, it is argued that inclusive education needs to grapple with disability as a social construct, and lessons are drawn for the further fulfilment of the rights of children with disabilities to equal participation in education.
Utilisation of the natural potential of rural areas for social inclusion^2018^AGRICULTURAL ECONOMICS-ZEMEDELSKA EKONOMIKA^The paper presents selected results of the sociological research focused on social inclusive activities that use and are located in the natural environment of rural areas. The paper is based on the contemporary form of the concept of a fully integrated modern society, and deals with the implementation of this concept within the strategy of social inclusion in both the European and Czech context. The authors have created, based on secondary research, a typology of social inclusive activities within Czech rural areas. Primary research, consisting of a questionnaire survey, was used to study the awareness of these issues among the rural population. Based on the selected results of both the primary and secondary research, the authors conclude that a possible path to social inclusion, is, alongside specific social services, social farming, which harmonizes the potential of the rural natural environment with the attitudes of the rural population (the actors and observers of social inclusive activities within their locality). The ongoing research is focused on monitoring barriers to the development of this business sector, which are crucial for the rural actors.
Impact of financial inclusion on poverty alleviation through cooperative banks^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
Exploring the mediating role of social capital in the relationship between financial intermediation and financial inclusion in rural Uganda^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
Aspects of Inclusion and Peoples' Empowerment Related to National Rural Employment Guarantee Scheme in India^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION^The National Rural Employment Guarantee Scheme, launched in the year 2006, is dubbed as one of the major flagship strategies of the Government of India, in coherence with the objective of removing poverty and unemployment. While scope of employment in rural asset creation protects environment, the earning opportunities address the issue of financial and social inclusion. Principal Component Analysis has been applied to calculate Financial, Social, Environmental, and finally Overall Inclusion Index as well as Empowerment Index. The results reveal significant association between Overall Inclusion and Empowerment index. Using multiple regression, Overall Inclusion is explained by certain significant variables.
The challenge of rural financial inclusion - evidence from microfinance^2018^APPLIED ECONOMICS^Financial inclusion is said to foster development and growth. However, progress in financial inclusion has been slow in rural areas where poverty is most pronounced. This is often attributed to higher transaction costs, higher risks and a more unfavourable contracting environment which makes it more difficult for financial institutions to achieve and maintain sustainability in rural compared to urban areas. Based on data covering 772 microfinance institutions (MFIs) over the period 2008-2013, we test whether rural financial inclusion, notably lending to rural borrowers, is hampered by stronger sustainability challenges than inclusion in urban markets. Our results suggest that a higher share of rural borrowers has no direct effect on MFI sustainability. However, we find that MFIs with a higher share of rural borrowers are less able to exploit economies of scale and productivity effects. Thus, our results provide support for the view that sustainability challenges make it more difficult to achieve progress in financial inclusion in rural than in urban areas.
Fuelling Social Inclusion? Neo-extractivism, State-Society Relations and Biofuel Policies in Latin America's Southern Cone^JAN 2018^DEVELOPMENT AND CHANGE^Scholarship on neo-extractivism agrees that this post-neoliberal' model of development is founded on an inherent contradiction between the commitment to continue natural resource extraction and the need to legitimize these activities by using their revenues for poverty reduction. Using the cases of the national biofuel policies of the post-neoliberal' governments of Argentina, Brazil and Uruguay, this article enquires why and how these policies emerged, how they were implemented, and how the resulting national experiences exemplify the inherent contradictions embedded in neo-extractivist policies. Adopting a strategic-relational approach to analyse state-society interaction, it is argued that the scope of progressive policies is conditioned to a large extent by pre-existing social structures, institutions and state-society interactions. The article shows how progressive reforms intersect with the prevailing interests of agribusiness and state actors and are recast and used for different ends as these interact with powerful actors such as the multinational soybean complex and agrarian movements. It is suggested that the prevailing over-emphasis in the neo-extractivist literature on the politics of domination and contestation overlooks the multiple and complex rural responses of the different progressive governments. It also obscures the possibilities to explore the ruptures and continuities of these countries' governments with previous models, and therefore fails to recognize state advances.
Financial Inclusion in China: Use of Credit^DEC 2017^JOURNAL OF FAMILY AND ECONOMIC ISSUES^Limited access to credit can cause financial vulnerability for a household and economic loss for a country. Previous studies have shown that only small portions of the population in developing countries had access to formal credit, and few of them focused on Chinese populations. Using data from 2011 China Household Financial Studies, this study explores Chinese households' credit use. We found that over half of the sample (53.21%) used credit, and only 19.77% used formal credit. Use of formal credit was associated with socioeconomic characteristics of household heads (e.g., employment, education) and households (e.g., income, net worth). The findings suggest that promoting financial inclusion in China involves expanding access to formal credit among the socially and economically disadvantaged households.
Coercive Inclusion in the Mexican War on Drugs: A Field Study of Human Rights and the State in Michoacan^SEP 2017^LATIN AMERICAN PERSPECTIVES^Qualitative ethnographic study of the human rights violations committed in the course of the militarized combat against drug trafficking organizations in rural Michoacan unmasks state practices of coercive inclusion. The violation of human rights and the subsequent processing of human rights claims paradoxically bind the marginalized population to the formal state and foster its subordination. The practical configuration of the current arena of human rights is not the lever for a democratic, inclusive Mexico but a curtain that conceals the repressive practices that it makes possible. In the processing of human rights complaints, the legal rights of physical integrity and private property become moral rights with no effect of legal justice.
Financial intermediation and financial inclusion of poor households: Mediating role of social networks in rural Uganda^AUG 29 2017^COGENT ECONOMICS &amp; FINANCE^The paper examined the mediating role of social networks in the relationship between financial intermediation and financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda. The paper used SPSS (statistical package for social scientist) and applied MedGraph program (Excel version 13), Sobel test, and Kenny &amp; Baron guideline to test for the mediating role of social networks in the relationship between financial intermediation and financial inclusion. Quantitative data were collected from a total sample of 400 poor households living in rural Uganda who were randomly selected for this study. The findings revealed that social networks partially mediate in the relationship between financial intermediation and financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda. Besides, social networks and financial intermediation have significant and positive impacts on financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda. This implies that some effects of financial intermediation on financial inclusion go through social networks to cause an impact on financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda. Therefore, financial institutions such as banks and microfinance institutions should develop financial products and services that promote social networking among poor households in rural Uganda. In addition, they should advocate for participation by poor households in existing village associations and social organizations so as to develop wide social networks. This will help them to gain access to scarce and vital information about available financial services like credit.
A REFLECTIVE ANALYSIS OF TELECENTROS AS SPACES OF INCLUSION AND SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT^JUL-DEC 2017^TEXTO LIVRE-LINGUAGEM E TECNOLOGIA^Beginning with agreement no. 01.0182.00/2008 between the Ministry of Science and Technology and the Municipal Government of Manaus, whose objective is the implementation of 219 telecentros in municipal public schools in urban and rural areas, the Secretaria Municipal de Educacao - SEMED intends to promote the democratization of access to information to the school community and the society in general. Thus, this article discusses the political and social dimensions of community telecentros in Manaus from the analysis of public policies of digital inclusion, pointing out critical points of this tool, thus seeking to contribute to the understanding of the dynamics of digital inclusion and social development in Amazonas. In order to obtain such a response, a fundamentally deductive methodology, based on a bibliographical research with authors such as Darelli (2003), Becker (2009) and Silveira (2001), will be used. It is proposed since the telecentro could be a space of political and cultural empowerment of the populations that will make use of it.
Extent of Financial Inclusion and Exclusion among Rural Households in Fazilka District of Punjab^JUL-SEP 2017^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^Financial inclusion is a process of ensuring access to appropriate financial products and services needed by all sections of the society in general and vulnerable groups such as economically weaker sections and low income groups in particular, at an affordable cost in a fair and transparent manner by regulated mainstream institutional players (CRISIL, 2013). The study brought out that an average number of bank accounts came out 2.06 per household which is higher in banking village(2.80). The extent of bank account holders was highest among large famers (4.40) and lowest among labourers. Out of the total bank accounts, the public banks occupied the highest share (41.74 per cent), followed by private banks (24.76 per cent). Out of the total number of bank accounts, 50.47and 54.39 per cent accounts were not functional in banking and non-banking village respectively. The awareness level about Jan Dhan Yojna was exceptionally low in non-banking village as compared to banking village. Besides, crop loan (32.67 per cent), majority of the sampled households used bank accounts for availing bank loan (38 per cent) only.
Financial Inclusion through Pradhan Mantri Jan Dhan Yojana: A Study of Rural Punjab^JUL-SEP 2017^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^Pradhan Mantri Jan DhanYojana (PMJDY) is a national mission for financial inclusion. The present study was undertaken to examine the extent of financial inclusion through PMJDY. The study revealed that about 55.46 per cent of the respondents had bank account under PMJDY while about 44.54 per cent of them were financially excluded under the scheme in the study area. Most of the PMJDY account holders were male, labourer, illiterate and married. More than half of the PMJDY account holders' bank accounts under the scheme were found dormant. Majority of the PMJDY account holders had bank account in the public sector banks and were in the other than their native village. All the account holders had saving bank account. Majority, (68.62 per cent) of the account holders opened their account for Direct Benefit Transfer (DBT) schemes purpose. None of the account holders received over draft facility of '5000 in Punjab. About 39.36 per cent account holders had RuPay Card, 8.51 per cent had life insurance and 10.11 per cent had accident insurance under the scheme.
The Department of Posts in Financial Inclusion of the Unorganized Sector: A Case Study of SSP Disbursements in Visakhapatnam^JUL 2017^IIM KOZHIKODE SOCIETY &amp; MANAGEMENT REVIEW^None
Regional development, protection of the environment and social inclusion in semiarid: contributions of the solidarity economy^JUL-DEC 2017^REVISTA BRASILEIRA DE ESTUDOS POLITICOS^The solidary economy (EcoSol) proposes free mobilization for the job and income generation from the strengthening economic, social and environmental performance of the communities. In this sense, this paper chose as important to examine to what extent the solidarity economy can contribute to the achievement of a regional development that reconciles the protection of environmental goods and at the same time, generate social inclusion. To this end, we start from the assumption that the current brazilian context, ECOSOL proposes means of development in vulnerable areas from a transversal perspective as there are experiences that practice their logic in urban and rural areas in semi-arid and coastal in the north and south of the country, which means that you can believe, from various existing experiences in their positive effects in various situations. By conducting a survey of direct observation methods, combined with bibliographical studies, exploratory and documentary research developed, carried out under the Xique Xique Network of Partnership Marketing, located in Rio Grande do Norte semi-arid. In place of conclusion, it is observed that, despite the public policies of solidarity economy does not occupy a central role in Brazil, there are experiences which show that ECOSOL by proposing regional development via non exploratory and cooperative work, has the capacity to generate social inclusion, the time in respect of resilience and productive limitations of the environment.
Digital inclusion in rural areas: A qualitative exploration of challenges faced by people from isolated communities (vol 21, pg 247, 2016)^MAY 2017^JOURNAL OF COMPUTER-MEDIATED COMMUNICATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.896  </td>  <td>7.04</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Financial inclusion, financial education, and e-commerce in rural china^SPR 2017^AGRIBUSINESS^This letter examines the state of financial inclusion in rural China. It shows that despite China's efforts at being financially inclusive there is substantial variability across and within provinces. With strong reliance on electronic technologies, China's rural and farm communities use internet technologies only half as much as all users, and less than 2% access credit through the internet. From a policy perspective, China should address problems of financial education and rural credit access.
Financial self-efficacy: a mediator in advancing financial inclusion^2017^EQUALITY DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION^None
Co-producing Narratives on Access to Care in Rural Communities: Using Digital Storytelling to Foster Social Inclusion of Young People Experiencing Psychosis^2017^STUDIES IN SOCIAL JUSTICE^None
Design of Financial Inclusion System for Rural India^2017^2017 IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTING, COMMUNICATION AND AUTOMATION (ICCCA)^Nearly, 70% of India's population lives in rural areas. According to the latest census the growth rate of rural parts has sharply declined. The major reasons of low growth rates include lack of financial services. Hence, one of the possible solutions to the decreasing growth rates is providing financial inclusion services at affordable costs to segments of low income sections of society. In this paper we have proposed a financial inclusion system (FIS) which aims to provide banking services to people in villages. The application of FIS runs on a portable device and therefore, people in villages can now open their bank accounts, make transactions, deposit cash, withdraw cash and take advantage of other banking services as well.
POLITICAL INCLUSION THROUGH THE LENS OF COCALERO UNION CORPORATISM: TROPIC OF COCHABAMBA, BOLIVIA^2017^CAHIERS DES AMERIQUES LATINES^This article addresses the modalities of political inclusion in the Tropic of Cochabamba, a Bolivian rural coca-growing region, with a pacified social climate since Evo Morales took office in 2006. Nowadays, political inclusion depends on one economic activity, coca production, which is strictly controlled by unions. This economic corporativism is the product of the legacy of Agrarian Reform of 1953 and the politicization process of social organizations during the 1990s. This allowed unions to collect a number of symbolic, institutional and political resources and build a quasi-hegemonic political power in the Tropic. However, this territorial base generates significant political borders to inclusion. It also reveals some social tensions between the State and unions, usually invisible due to the persistent controversy surrounding coca production.
Employment Guarantee Scheme Through the Lens of Financial Inclusion^2017^2017 1ST IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON DATA MANAGEMENT, ANALYTICS AND INNOVATION (ICDMAI)^Financial Inclusion is one of the stated objectives of National Rural Employment Guarantee Act (NREGA) - world's largest Employment Guarantee Scheme. Even though financial inclusion efforts began in India in 2005, large sections of rural India still remain financially excluded. At the time of this work, possessing a bank/post office account has not been mandated by the Government of India for gaining NREGA employment - our work, therefore focuses on the role of access to formal banking on the breadth and depth of participation in Employment Guarantee Schemes. We find evidences of positive impact of access to formal banking on demand for NREGA jobs as well as extent of participation. We also find interesting contrasts between individual and joint bank account holders in demand for labor as well as participation.
Developing a Financial Inclusion Index for India^2017^5TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY AND QUANTITATIVE MANAGEMENT, ITQM 2017^Finance has always been considered as one of the important parameter of the growth for any economic activity. The economic growth of a country can be enlarged by using financial inclusion as a bridge that would facilitate fuller participation by weaker sections of the country. Financial inclusion is a system through which a developing country like India can attain inclusive growth by connecting the contribution of weaker or rural population of the country with the main stream. If there is an easy access of weaker section to the financial system of the country, country can move towards higher economic growth. In the available literature, it has been found that one or the other indicator is absent for different reasons. However, since each of the indicator is important for calculating the more comprehensive financial inclusion index. The main objective of this paper is to introduce an index that allows for a general overview of India in terms of financial inclusion. The index is calculated using three dimensions related to the measurement of the levels of access and usage of financial services. (C) 2017 The Authors. Published by Elsevier B.V.
Alternatives to land grabbing: exploring conditions for smallholder inclusion in agricultural commodity chains in Southeast Asia^2017^JOURNAL OF PEASANT STUDIES^Smallholder engagement with export commodities in Southeast Asia potentially offers a more inclusive development pathway than large-scale plantation production, which has been associated with the phenomenon of land grabs. This raises three questions which we explore in this paper: What are the agro-economic factors favouring or obstructing smallholders relative to plantations? What are the incentives for agribusiness firms to contribute to smallholder production other than by direct control of land? Can smallholder production be broadly inclusive in the face of internal differentiation and encroachment by external investors? We compare smallholder involvement with four cash crops which have experienced strong market demand - rubber, oil palm, cassava and teak - based on fieldwork in six Southeast Asian countries. We conclude that smallholder production can be a viable and inclusive strategy, contingent on the case-by-case confluence of a number of key factors which we enumerate.
Financial literacy in emerging economies Do all components matter for financial inclusion of poor households in rural Uganda?^2017^MANAGERIAL FINANCE^None
Institutional framing and financial inclusion Testing the mediating effect of financial literacy using SEM bootstrap approach^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
CHALLENGES TEACHERS ENCOUNTER IN IMPLEMENTING INCLUSION OF LEARNERS WITH SPECIAL EDUCATION NEEDS IN SELECTED FORT BEAUFORT EDUCATION DISTRICT PRIMARY SCHOOLS, EASTERN CAPE, SOUTH AFRICA^2017^INTED2017: 11TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^The paper explores the pockets of good practice found in the challenges teachers encounter in implementing inclusion of learners with special education needs (SEN). The study adopted a qualitative research approach and employed a case study design. Eight teachers, ten principals, one provincial and four district officials were purposively sampled from ten schools. Data were collected using semi-structured interviews and were analysed thematically. The findings established that teachers encountered a plethora of challenges relating to resources, training, workload, multi-grades, and parents' nonchalant attitudes. It also revealed that the teachers proffered coping strategies such as creating special classes for learners with SEN after school hours to assist them, playing the role of a social worker and manager to support learners with SEN and assisting learners with SEN to take advantage of the multi-grade classes as learners gain from the lessons of other grades as the teacher teaches. It can be concluded that there are pockets of good practice of inclusion policy in some of the selected schools even in the midst of difficult working conditions especially in the rural context of this study. The paper recommends strong collaborations among the stakeholders and adequate training for teachers by the Department of Education for the implementation of inclusion policy for learners with SEN.
Financial inclusion in Colombia: A scoping literature review^2017^INTANGIBLE CAPITAL^None
Legitimating exclusion and inclusion: "culture', education and entitlement to local urban citizenship in Tianjin and Lanzhou^2017^CITIZENSHIP STUDIES^The paradigmatic migrant' in China is a worker of rural origin, but more than 30% of the one-fifth of the population living and working away from their place of hukou registration are inter-urban migrants, a group mostly neglected by scholars. Based on ethnographic observation and interviews from two Chinese cities - one on the coast, one in the impoverished interior - this article examines how a range of types of migrants deal with citizenship and mobility. It shows that a key criterion for being able to settle in a new place and gain access to local social citizenship is migrants' level of culture,' expressed primarily through formal education. Linking access to local citizenship for migrants to their cultural quality' goes largely unquestioned, as it is connected to the legitimacy of education as a means of differentiating among citizens more generally. This logic shapes family migration strategies as parents seek to ensure that their children will receive an education that enables access to the kinds of good jobs and benefits that enable full citizenship wherever they live.
Understanding the rise of the far right from a local perspective: Structural and cultural conditions of ethno-traditionalist inclusion and racial exclusion in rural Hungary^2017^IDENTITIES-GLOBAL STUDIES IN CULTURE AND POWER^This paper analyses the reconfiguration of social relations in rural Hungary after the collapse of socialism as well as the cultural idioms in which these changes were interpreted in order to unearth the connection between structural transformation, the re-articulation of ethnic and peasant traditions and the discourse on Roma as a threat to communal harmony. The locality in the focus of our case study is a village that played a major role in the rise of the far-right Jobbik party. By applying an ethnographic approach, we seek to uncover structural forces, discourses and agencies that help explain the success of the anti-Roma mobilization campaign that ended with Jobbik's electoral victory.
Financial self-efficacy: a determinant of financial inclusion^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF BANK MARKETING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.196  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Financial inclusion in rural Uganda: The role of social capital and generational values^2017^COGENT BUSINESS &amp; MANAGEMENT^The purpose of this paper was to examine how variations in social capital across generations promote financial inclusion among the poor in rural Uganda. Data were collected from a sample of 200 poor households located in Mukono district and processed using ordinary least square regression and ANOVA to examine how variations in social capital across generations promote financial inclusion of the poor in rural Uganda. The results generated indicate that variations in social capital components across generations significantly and positively affect financial inclusion of the poor in rural Uganda. The paper makes a significant contribution to existing body of literature by showing that variations in social capital across generations can cause an effect in financial inclusion of the poor, especially in rural Uganda. Managers of financial institutions should consider generational values in promoting financial inclusion. Specifically, they should design social financial products and services that can boost collective action in order to promote financial inclusion of the poor, especially in rural Uganda.
Inclusive Business Proposal: Towards a Social Inclusion Model of Sacha Inchi in the Bajo Cauca of Antioquia^JAN-JUN 2017^EQUIDAD &amp; DESARROLLO^The article was created as a result of the project of technical and social research of the promising oleaginous plants Higuerilla and Sacha Inchi, looking to agroindustrial development, the central axis of which is the establishment of an inclusive market model that ensures the necessary conditions to turn this initiative into a real transformer of conditions of life in the populations where the project is being developed. In addition, this article is also intended to study how the State, private enterprises, schools and civil society organizations can work hand in hand to deal assertively with the realities of the context, and thus achieve the formation of committed, strengthened and trained communities for the implementation of ideas arising from the process of joint creation.
Effective Deliberative Inclusion of Women in Contexts of Traditional Political Authority^WIN 2016^DEMOCRATIC THEORY-AN INTERDISCIPLINARY JOURNAL^This article examines several obstacles to the deliberative inclusion of women where traditional cultural-political authority exist alongside national democratic institutions. Drawing on the example of land reform in post-apartheid South Africa, the article argues that introducing deliberative democratic procedures to local cultural-political institutions may fail to achieve the inclusion and/or empowerment of subordinated members, such as rural women. I discuss three ways that deliberative interventions might be made more inclusive in such contexts: first, by using strategic exclusion to amplify the voices of disenfranchised community members and/or to make possible parallel deliberation by them; second, by legitimizing and supporting the informal political practices of more disempowered group members (e.g., informal protests, political activism); and third, by fostering the political capacities of disempowered citizens in both formal and informal political life.
Working for Inclusion? Conditional Cash Transfers, Rural Women, and the Reproduction of Inequality^NOV 2016^ANTIPODE^Throughout the global South, conditional cash transfer programmes (CCTs) are used to promote socially inclusive development. CCTs are widely evaluated for their capacity to build children's human capital. In contrast, this paper aims to hold social inclusion to account by elucidating the impacts of Peru's CCT Juntos on the poor, rural mothers who are expected to meet programme conditions. Grounded in extensive ethnographic research in households, clinics, schools, and village halls, the paper interrogates the work of social inclusion in spaces where uneven development manifests itself in privation. Considered in light of critical feminist theories of performativity and social reproduction, the findings shed light on a far less optimistic reality for the work of social inclusion. This paper contributes a rich empirical account to critical literature on cash transfers and the discourses that drive them, and suggests that the circumstances under which women are required to fulfil programme conditions challenge the substance of contemporary inclusive development.
Towards Financial Inclusion in India: Progress so far, Issues and Challenges^OCT-DEC 2016^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^Financial Inclusion is one of the yardsticks to measure the growth of an economy as well as human well-being. Financial sector inclusion helps in eliminating poverty, reducing inequality and eliminating unequal access to opportunities etc. The major findings of this study shows that financial inclusion indicators such as: Geographic branch penetration (Number of Schedule Commercial Banks branches per 1000 km(2) demographic branch penetration (Number of Schedule Commercial Banks branches per 100000 population), and demographic ATM penetration (Number of Schedule Commercial Banks ATMs per 100000 population) has been increasing in different census period (1991, 2001 and 2011) of India. The performance of Urban Cooperative Banks in case of deposits and advances are also increasing from 2001 to 2011. It is also revealed that the number of accounts of Public Sector Banks, Private Banks and Regional Rural Banks are more in rural area comparison to urban area in 2015. Overall the result of this study justifying progress of financial inclusion and some recent initiatives taken by the government of India.
FINANCIAL INCLUSION &amp; SOCIAL CAPITAL: A CASE STUDY OF SGSY BENEFICIARIES IN KASHMIR VALLEY^OCT-DEC 2016^INDEPENDENT JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT &amp; PRODUCTION^None
Pro-poor agricultural growth - Inclusion or differentiation? Village level perspectives from Zambia^OCT 2016^GEOFORUM^Over the past decade pro-poor agricultural growth strategies intended to raise smallholder productivity and increase commercialization among smallholders have been put forth as the key method for addressing poverty in rural Africa. By contrast perspectives that challenge this model question the market optimism and presumptions of higher smallholder efficiency that underpin the pro-poor agricultural growth model. Little longitudinal data exists that can shed light on questions related to sustainability of growth patterns and their distributional consequences at the village level, however. This paper uses a mixed methods approach to trace growth dynamics as well as the distributional aspects of such growth in terms of access to agrarian resources and local level labour relations. Quantitative data was used to select three villages in Zambia that had experienced pro-poor agricultural growth between 2002 and 2008. These villages were re-surveyed in 2013 and supplementary qualitative data was collected. Two of the three villages showed 'sustainable growth patterns. While the sources of such growth as well their distributional outcomes were different in the two villages, the reasons for such differences are related to Zambian agricultural policy as well as geography. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
A Contingent Embrace: Divergent Realities of Inclusion at a Rural School^SEP 2016^ANTHROPOLOGY &amp; EDUCATION QUARTERLY^This article examines a rural public school with an increasingly racially diverse and working-class student body as a site where inclusion and exclusion were negotiated based on popular beliefs about culture. I look at how the interpretation of particular behaviors as indicative of a cultural regard for the value of formal education created divergent understandings of the school as welcoming or exclusive. Although the school's mission statement explicitly positioned the school as inclusive, many Latinos understood the acceptance of their presence and their culture in the institution as conditional on their assimilation.
Supporting participation: Facilitating inclusion of rural Australians aging with intellectual disabilities in research using validated survey tools^JUL-AUG 2016^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.941  </td>  <td>2.637</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Early Childhood Inclusion in Croatia^JUL-SEP 2016^INFANTS &amp; YOUNG CHILDREN^This article explains early childhood inclusion in Croatia from its beginnings up to challenges in current policy and practice. The first preschool education for children with disabilities dates back to the 1980s and was provided in special institutions. In the last 10 years, mainstream kindergartens have been enrolling children with disabilities but unevenly in different Croatian regions and also with a different quality of support. The lower economic potential of the rural and smaller local communities adversely influence the possibility of organizing support for children with disabilities in general, especially in an inclusive setting. The great challenge in analyzing the quality of early childhood inclusion in educational settings is the lack of reliable sources of data and evaluation research. Main challenges in early childhood inclusion and future directions are discussed.
The foundations of financial inclusion: Understanding ownership and use of formal accounts^JUL 2016^JOURNAL OF FINANCIAL INTERMEDIATION^Financial inclusion-defined as the use of formal accounts-can bring many benefits to individuals. Yet, we know very little about the factors underpinning it. This paper explores the individual and country characteristics associated with financial inclusion and the policies that are effective among those most likely to be excluded: poor, rural, female or young individuals. Overall, we find that greater financial inclusion is associated with lower account costs, greater proximity to financial intermediaries, stronger legal rights, and more politically stable environments. However, the effectiveness of policies to promote inclusion varies depending on the characteristics of the individuals considered. (C) 2016 Published by Elsevier Inc.
Parents' Perception towards Inclusion of Agriculture in School Curriculum in Rural India^JUN 2016^JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL EDUCATION &amp; EXTENSION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.388  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Empowerment and social inclusion of Muslim women: Towards a new conceptual model^JUN 2016^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^We developed a conceptual model of empowerment induced social inclusion. This model postulates that women's empowerment in social, economic, psychological and political spheres improve social inclusion and access to justice institutions. Using multi-stage cluster sampling procedure, we recruited 300 rural Muslim women. Standardized scales were used to measure the key concepts of the model. We used descriptive analyses alongside with structural equation modelling to test the data-model-fit. The women's personal autonomy (beta = .221; p &lt; 0.001), political empowerment (beta = .169; p &lt; 0.01) and household decision-making (beta = .211; p &lt; 0.001) have showed significant partial effect on social inclusion. The domestic consultation (beta = .152; p &lt; 0.05) and political empowerment (beta = .303; p &lt; 0.001) have showed significant partial effect on access to justice institutions. Model fit indexes showed excellent overall model fits on GFI = 0.999; AGFI = 0.996 and RMSEA = 0.000. The study concludes that women's empowerment in personal, familial, social and political spheres significantly improved their social inclusion and access to justice institutions. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Digital Inclusion in Rural Areas: A Qualitative Exploration of Challenges Faced by People From Isolated Communities^MAY 2016^JOURNAL OF COMPUTER-MEDIATED COMMUNICATION^This study explored the interplay between contextual and individual factors related to Internet adoption in isolated rural communities. By investigating 10 remote villages throughout Chile that received Internet access infrastructure in 2010-2011, we identified 3 areas in which contextual and individual factors are intertwined. First, the geographical isolation shaped people's personality and attitudes towards new experiences, including digital technologies. Second, the communities' aging population also represented a strong challenge because they lack young people, a relevant technology socialization agent. Finally, jobs and economic activities are related to people's (lack of) motivations and needs towards digital technologies. When the Internet has reached the vast majority of the population, isolated communities confront specific challenges that we need to consider in policy-making decisions.
Narrative citizenship, resilience and inclusion with dementia: On the inside or on the outside of physical and social places^MAY 2016^DEMENTIA-INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL RESEARCH AND PRACTICE^There has been little research that addresses the importance of place in enabling resilience and citizenship - most to date focussing on these as a characteristic of the individual. This paper reports on findings from a qualitative study that aimed to explore the everyday experiences of living with dementia within rural and semi-urban communities. Data collection included a sequence of four research diaries and interviews with 13 families living at home with dementia and interviews with service providers and commissioners (a total of 57 diaries, 69 interviews with people living with dementia and 6 interviews with service providers and commissioners). Key themes identified included: Others Knowing and Responding; Socially Withdrawing and Feeling Excluded; Sustaining and Changing Activities; Belonging and Estrangement from Place; Engaging Services and Supports. The study found that familiarity with people and place can be supportive, and these factors support a narrative citizenship in which people can tell a story of inclusion and feeling on the inside. However, this familiarity with place may also create a social barrier and a sense of estrangement, or being on the outside. Narrative citizenship allows us to explore how people with dementia position themselves in relation to others and in so doing, negotiate their own and other's understandings of dementia. It also allows for people to tell stories about themselves in relation to their sense of belonging in a social and physical place, which augment the personal and political approaches to citizenship and thus offers an approach that enhances individualised yet collective understandings of living with dementia.
The inclusion of stakeholders and cultural ecosystem services in land management trade-off decisions using an ecosystem services approach^MAR 2016^LANDSCAPE ECOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.349  </td>  <td>4.992</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Pradhan Mantri Jan Dhan Yojana: A Step Towards Financial Inclusion^MAR 2016^PACIFIC BUSINESS REVIEW INTERNATIONAL^The present study seeks to investigate the current status of the PMJDY in India. The results showed that the contribution of rural sector in terms of accounts opened under PMJDY was relatively higher than the urban sector in all the banking sectors namely, public sector banks, regional rural banks and private banks. The results further revealed that 60 percent (1106.52 lakh) accounts were opened in PMJDY, mobilized the deposit of Rs. 24939.22 crores and rest 40 percent (747.71 lakh) accounts under PMJDY were opened with zero balance as on September 30, 2015. From the public sector banks and RRBs, the State Bank of India played an important and leading role in the opening accounts under PMJDY. The state-wise scenario of PMJDY showed that the highest number of accounts were opened in Uttar Pradesh both in rural and urban sectors due to its highest population rate.
Social capital: mediator of financial literacy and financial inclusion in rural Uganda^2016^REVIEW OF INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS AND STRATEGY^None
Financial Inclusion: A Panacea for Balanced Economic Development^2016^VISION 2020: INNOVATION MANAGEMENT, DEVELOPMENT SUSTAINABILITY, AND COMPETITIVE ECONOMIC GROWTH, 2016, VOLS I - VII^The major objective of this paper was to determine the effect of financial inclusion on economic growth and development in Nigeria using historical data on selected variables over the period 1986-2015. Ordinary Least Squares regression technique was adopted. Financial inclusion was measured in the study using loan to deposit ratio (LDR), financial deepening indicators (FDI), loan to rural areas (LRA), and branch network (Bbranch). Measures of financial deepening adopted in the study are ratios of private sector credit to GDP and broad money supply to GDP. Economic growth was proxied as growth in gross domestic product (GDP) over successive periods while per capita income (PCI) was adopted as a measure of poverty and hence an index of development. The main findings are (i) credit delivery to the private sector (an index of financial inclusion) has not significantly supported economic growth in Nigeria (ii) financial inclusion has promoted poverty alleviation in Nigeria through rural credit delivery. The study recommends that the monetary authorities should not only deepen financial inclusion efforts through enhanced credit delivery to the private sector but should also strengthen the regulatory framework in order to ensure efficient and effective resource allocation and utilization.
Agent Banking and Financial Inclusion: The Nigerian Experience^2016^VISION 2020: INNOVATION MANAGEMENT, DEVELOPMENT SUSTAINABILITY, AND COMPETITIVE ECONOMIC GROWTH, 2016, VOLS I - VII^Financial inclusion is aimed at ensuring that all adults have unhindered access to tailor-made products that meets their financial needs at affordable cost within their vicinity. This study investigated the extent to which bank agents have contributed in driving the inclusive growth agenda of the Federal Government of Nigeria. A maximum of 275 questionnaires were administered on bank officials across the 6 geopolitical zones of Nigeria using a random sampling technique. The 182 returned questionnaires were analyzed using multivariate regression approach employing SPSS. The study found among others that geographical spread of bank agents and the development of tailor-made financial products will engender financial growth among the active poor in the rural communities. it therefore recommended among others, the need for the Central Bank of Nigeria to deepen inclusive growth by licensing more agent banks especially in the rural areas across the six geo-political zones of the country.
Undercapitalization and Loan Delinquency: Implications on Financial Inclusion in Nigeria^2016^VISION 2020: INNOVATION MANAGEMENT, DEVELOPMENT SUSTAINABILITY, AND COMPETITIVE ECONOMIC GROWTH, 2016, VOLS I - VII^Financial Inclusion involves ensuring that the poor have access to financial services that are relevant to their needs especially in the rural communities. This study investigated the extent to which undercapitalization of money deposit banks and frequent loan delinquency on the part of the active poor influence the ability of deposit money banks to drive the inclusive growth agenda of the Central Bank of Nigeria. Out of the 250 questionnaires distributed, 179 were returned and analyzed. Being a categorical data, the study employed optimal scaling regression to measure the relationship between the dependent and independent variables. ANOVA and other statistical tests were also conducted. The study found that loan delinquency, undercapitalization and payment of utility bills were significant in measuring the inclusive growth initiative of the Central Bank of Nigeria. It therefore recommends among others that government should make policies that will increase the credit worthiness of the rural dwellers as well as encourage banks to support investment in the rural communities so as to equip the rural dwellers with the financial muscle to drive inclusive growth in Nigeria.
'Sitting on embers': a phenomenological exploration of the embodied experiences of inclusion of newly arrived students in Sweden^2016^GENDER AND EDUCATION^What can we learn from and with the body in order to understand more about the (lived) experiences of newly arrived students in schools? This question has hitherto been given little attention in relation to the field of migration and education. Using the perspective of Ahmed's critical feminist phenomenology, this article aims to explore the embodied experiences of the different contexts that newly arrived students encounter in a rural monolingual school in Sweden. The empirical data are based on participant observation conducted in introductory and mainstream classrooms, as well as interviews undertaken with newly arrived students during a year of fieldwork. The findings of our study show how close attention to newly arrived students' embodied experiences can help to dispel prevailing myths surrounding inclusion, bringing to light thereby how the current lived conditions of inclusion in fact carry with them lines of exclusion.
"Kioscos Vive Digital": A digital strategy to promote the connectivity and social inclusion in rural communities in Colombia^2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PSYCHOLOGICAL RESEARCH^This article explores the scope of CIT in the recovery of the social background and the development of rural and isolate communities, with little access to computing resources and internet in Colombia. This model has been implemented successfully in South America, contributing to the development of processes of social inclusion for access to digital communities, virtual education and social networks, as mechanisms of connectivity which favor concerning a social identity and provide social development with equity. For this, the "kiosk lives Digital", constitute a strategy for access to connectivity based on the recovery of communities through interaction in a virtual scenario tested purposefully by social psychology and neuroscience which benefit the consolidation of social networks and the entrance to the information as a central axis for balance and social inclusion.
Determinants of Saving-Borrowing Decisions and Financial Inclusion in a High Middle Income Country: The Turkish Case^2016^EMERGING MARKETS FINANCE AND TRADE^We use a representative survey of the Turkish household sector and investigate factors impinging on saving-borrowing behavior. We run four probit regressions to elucidate (i) the saving decision, (ii) asset choice or portfolio composition for those who save, (iii) the bank loan decision and lastly (iv) the formal versus informal borrowing decision. We find income, education, marital status and region within country strongly correlate with those decisions. We offer some insights regarding the influence of variables like rural to urban migrant status and religious belief on saving and borrowing decisions. We discuss the long-term implications of our findings on the Turkish household savings performance.
Institutional frames for financial inclusion of poor households in Sub-Saharan Africa Evidence from rural Uganda^2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
Microfinance a New Approach for Social and Financial Inclusion^2016^INNOVATION MANAGEMENT AND EDUCATION EXCELLENCE VISION 2020: FROM REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT SUSTAINABILITY TO GLOBAL ECONOMIC GROWTH, VOLS I - VI^Each of us have had or go through the situation of being unable to access the credit necessary to meet unexpected expenses or trying to develop small businesses. The impossibility of accessing microfinance pushes people into poverty, increasing the number of social assistance. What makes the situation can be different, how do we prevent increasing poverty? The answer is found in the current microfinance policy directed especially to those who are financially excluded. But the access to credit as they are too expensive could also contribute to indebtedness and impoverishment of individual levels. They have serious macroeconomic consequences, as the crisis in 2007 proves. Therefore, poverty and social exclusion can be fueled by the inability to access credit and access to inappropriate forms of financing. Such difficulties are undermining economic growth and social cohesion. Instead, poverty and financial difficulties are supporting social exclusion.
Financial inclusion: A case study of perambra regional co-operative bank perambra^JAN 2016^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^None
Financial Inclusion in Rural Uganda: Testing Interaction Effect of Financial Literacy and Networks^2016^JOURNAL OF AFRICAN BUSINESS^Based on the premise that financial literacy take place in networks to influence the level of financial inclusion, the study examined whether networks moderate in the relationship between financial literacy and financial inclusion among poor households in rural Uganda. Studies have revealed that financial literacy affects the level of financial inclusion. However, these studies have failed to incorporate the moderating role of networks in the relationship between financial literacy and financial inclusion. The results showed that networks positively and significantly moderates in the relationship between financial literacy and financial inclusion with both financial literacy and networks having direct and significant effects.
Inclusion of populations at risk of advanced melanoma in an opportunistic targeted screening project involving general practitioners^2016^SCANDINAVIAN JOURNAL OF PRIMARY HEALTH CARE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.095  </td>  <td>2.336</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effects of personal and professional factors on teachers' attitudes towards inclusion in preschool^2016^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SPECIAL NEEDS EDUCATION^Attitudes towards inclusive education have a crucial place in the effective implementation of inclusion practices. The aim of this study was to explore teachers' attitudes towards inclusive education in preschool education in Portugal and to identify teachers' personal and professional variables that influence these attitudes. The data were collected from a sample composed of 68 preschool teachers working in mainstream schools located in urban and rural areas. The results indicated overall positive attitudes towards inclusion. Having previous personal contact with a person with special educational needs predicted more positive affective attitudes, whereas having previous experience teaching classes that included students with and without special educational needs predicted less positive behavioural intentions. From these results, we infer an emergent need for continuous training and for the promotion of positive attitudes among preschool teachers to achieve the successful implementation of inclusion at this educational level.
Social and economic inclusion of people with disabilities: practical lessons from Bangladesh^NOV 17 2015^DEVELOPMENT IN PRACTICE^People with disabilities remain one of the most excluded minorities, often deprived of the benefits of mainstream development programmes. This practical note reports on lessons learnt in delivering a programme combining a community based rehabilitation (CBR) and self-help group approach with disabled persons in rural Bangladesh. Our findings demonstrate how targeted programmes can bring about the social and economic inclusion of disabled persons. We also highlight the greater effectiveness of CBR programmes when targeting a more diverse client base, when not based on debt recovery, and how targeted programmes can even benefit the wider community. Les personnes handicapees constituent encore l'une des minorites les plus exclues, souvent privees des avantages des programmes de developpement dominants. Cette note pratique presente les enseignements tires de la mise en oeuvre d'un programme conjuguant la rehabilitation communautaire (community based rehabilitation CBR) et l'approche par groupes d'entraide avec des personnes handicapees dans le Bangladesh rural. Nos conclusions montrent que des programmes cibles peuvent donner lieu a l'inclusion sociale et economique des personnes handicapees. Nous mettons aussi l'accent sur l'efficacite accrue des programmes de CBR lorsqu'ils ciblent une base de clients plus diverse, lorsqu'ils ne se basent pas sur le recouvrement de dettes, et la maniere dont des programmes cibles peuvent profiter a la communaute dans son ensemble. Las personas con discapacidades siguen siendo una de las minorias mas excluidas, ya que a menudo se las priva de los beneficios aportados por los principales programas de desarrollo. La presente nota practica da cuenta de los aprendizajes logrados a partir de la implementacion de un programa que combina un enfoque de rehabilitacion basada en la comunidad (cbr por sus siglas en ingles) con un enfoque de autoapoyo grupal entre personas discapacitadas del sector rural de Bangladesh. Los hallazgos de los autores muestran como programas disenados con el objetivo de abordar problemas especificos pueden conseguir que las personas con discapacidad sean incluidas en terminos sociales y economicos. Asimismo, el articulo destaca el hecho de que los programas de cbr pueden ser mas eficaces cuando son dirigidos a una poblacion mas diversa y no estan condicionados a la recuperacion de deudas, examinando como dichos programas pueden beneficiar incluso a la comunidad mas amplia.
THE PRODUCTION OF ECOLOGICAL RICE IN THE METROPOLITAN REGION OF PORTO ALEGRE/RS: SOCIO ECONOMIC INCLUSION AND TERRITORIAL TRANSFORMATIONS^NOV 2015^GEOSABERES^The ecological rice production in rural settlements in the Porto Alegre Metropolitan Region (RMPA) constitutes an innovative experience as much in technological terms as in socio economic, cultural and environmental dimensions. This is due to the fact that by joining this new productive practice, the settled families break up with an agricultural production system dependant of external inputs; in addiction to that, they construct new socio spatial relations. Thus, this analyses the process of socio territorial transformation in the RMPA, its origins, as well as the impact of those transformations on the settled families, actors of this evolution.
Inclusion of Children With Disabilities as Reflected in Educational Concepts of Daycare Facilities^OCT 2015^FRUHE BILDUNG^This study aims at describing the current state of concept development at daycare facilities in the city and the rural district of Osnabruck with respect to inclusive education. A qualitative analysis of the pedagogical concepts of 112 daycare facilities was conducted. Results show that an inclusive approach was delineated in only 9.8 % of the concepts analyzed. The special needs of and support for children with disabilities were mentioned in 48.2 % of the concepts. Less than half of the concepts (43.8 %) refer to interprofessional teamworking in daycare facilities, whereas almost all facilities quote external cooperation partners. Measures of personnel and organizational development in the field of inclusion were rarely mentioned. In the course of implementing inclusive education, there is a need to further develop the pedagogical concepts of daycare facilities.
Towards financial inclusion: The post office of India as a financial institution, 1880-2010^OCT-DEC 2015^INDIAN ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL HISTORY REVIEW^The Post Office of India has evolved tremendously from an institution of communication' to an important financial' institution of the early twenty-first century. This article traces the evolution of two key mass financial services offered by the Post Office over the past 130 yearsmoney orders that have primarily served as a mechanism for internal and international migrants' remittances and the small savings system that has mobilised deposits from millions of rural and urban citizens. It assesses the contribution of the Post Office in enhancing financial inclusion' in the twentieth century and argues that the financial history of modern India remains incomplete without integrating the Post Officecurrently the largest bank in India in terms of network, accounts and personal depositsas a key institutional actor in the narrative.
Urban teachers' perceptions of inclusion of migrant children in the Chinese educational institution: a comparative study^SEP 2 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Recently China has been undergoing an unprecedented urbanisation process which has resulted in millions of rural families living in urban areas. As part of a study of Chinese migrant children's educational experiences, surveys and interviews were conducted with primary school teachers in a metropolitan city in East China. The objectives of this study were to describe teachers' perceptions of migrant children's education in both migrant schools and in public schools, and to investigate differences in their beliefs between school types. Results found that urban teachers' perceptions of educational inclusion of migrant students were slightly negative in general. However, teachers in public schools showed significantly more positive attitudes to inclusion of migrant students than migrant school teachers. In the light of these findings, the paper concludes with implications for practice and policy for education of migrant children in China.
Leading-for-inclusion: transforming action through teacher talk^AUG 3 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^In Australia, recent policies for educational development have emphasised the importance of stakeholder involvement and advocacy in the promotion of student outcomes. There is robust support for the promotion and development of inclusive educational communities able to respond to the various educational needs of students, communities and staff. This paper advocates a practice perspective and establishes a direct correlation between leading practices and the formation of more inclusive school communities. It provides a consideration of the practice architectures which co-construct the ways in which six educational leaders draw on the potential of teacher talk as a vehicle for practice modification. Teacher talk, as a characteristic of leading practice, responds to the increasing dynamism in the profile of schools, students and teachers in rural New South Wales (NSW), socially, cognitively, economically, linguistically and culturally. This paper uses the medium of teacher talk to: explore the relationship between leading and inclusion - leading-for-inclusion - and interrogate socially just (inclusive) practices in the domain of the professional advocacy of the community. The paper reflects upon the practices of leading-for-inclusion (in the context of change management) and the development of more inclusive school cultures.
'Make My Day, Shoot a Teacher': tactics of inclusion and exclusion, and the contestation of community in a rural school-community conflict^JUL 3 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Far from being the harmonious and homogenous communities of popular imagination, rural communities often are characterised by stark differences in class-situated values over education philosophy and financing. These differences can produce contentious political environments, vastly complexifying local decision-making, including school district policy-making, budgeting, and teacher contract negotiations. Through an exemplar case study, we examine one such conflict and how a hegemonic narrative was constructed by local actors to consolidate political power using crafted constructions of 'other' and competing narratives of community and community membership. This paper explores 'insider-outsider' identity constructions arising out of community-school conflict, and the ways in which rural teachers, working from the position of 'outsider', navigated these constructions.
Enablers for Inclusion: The Perspectives of Parents of Children With Autism Spectrum Disorder^JUL 2015^AUSTRALASIAN JOURNAL OF SPECIAL EDUCATION^Although home-school collaborations are important for inclusive education, most studies have identified the problems experienced by parents whose children have additional special needs. The aim of this study was to present the views of Australian parents, with children diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder, regarding what they considered to be the enablers for inclusion, within the context of their experiences of a program of support in inclusive schools (a Victorian State Government initiative called the Inclusion Support Program). Four focus group interviews were conducted, within a phenomenological, qualitative paradigm, with 14 mothers, in rural and urban primary and secondary public schools. Parents identified various innovations including the provision of a safe space, structured school and free time, flexibility around timetable, curriculum and staffing and the provision of socially attractive activities. Another theme was the potential for schools to be a 'catalyst point' to bring together parents, teachers and community agencies. The importance of eliciting parental expertise is highlighted here.
Scoping review of the exclusion and inclusion of rural newcomers in community participation^JUN 2015^AUSTRALIAN JOURNAL OF RURAL HEALTH^Few studies have considered the impact of rural migration on rural community engagement. The objective of this research was to undertake a scoping review about the inclusion and exclusion of newcomers in rural community participation to inform design of inclusive participation processes. The scoping review used the six stages of Arksey and O'Malley's methodological framework. Narrative analysis of the articles was structured using three themes of inclusion and exclusion derived from the literature: interpersonal, socio-cultural norms, and structural and organisational processes. Inclusion and exclusion at the interpersonal level is intricate and often represents broader social rules and tensions that newcomers must navigate in order to become involved. Social norms, such as fear of outsiders and difference, can exclude newcomers from participating in a rural community. Newcomer's awareness of these issues means they are mindful of how they contribute and give respect to the social position of existing residents. Despite this, resistance to change is experienced by newcomers when contributing in organisational contexts. Formal participation processes can harness the practice and value of rural hospitality that newcomers experience as inclusionary. Deliberately designing group processes and operational norms for inclusion can reduce tensions when change occurs and prevent group loss due to exclusionary practices.
The Dynamics of Liberal Indifference and Inclusion in a Global Era^JUN 2015^SOCIETY^Growing ethnic and economic diversity exacerbates a longstanding tendency for members of a modern, liberal democracy to disassociate from each other. On the other hand, a wide range of organizations and communities actively bring together members across societal cleavages. The dynamic of inclusion is exemplified among communities that expect a high degree of obedience to a set of beliefs and practices, but allow such authority to be limited and contested by different persons. Inclusion is also more likely among new or outsider organizations less associated with societal divides. To the extent that authoritative communities nurture diverse social networks, they contribute to bridging social capital and inclusive political attitudes. The essay draws on studies of various organizations and polities that articulate shared, moral goods (e.g., army, churches, martial arts schools, rural towns).
Factors that matter for financial inclusion: evidence from Peru^JUN 2015^AESTIMATIO-THE IEB INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF FINANCE^This study comprises a quantitative approach to the determinants of financial inclusion in Peru based on micro-data from surveys. Significant correlations are used to identify those socioeconomic characteristics that may affect financial inclusion (or exclusion) of households and enterprises. We incorporate four levels of information: individuals, households, towns, and regions. The results show that the traditionally more vulnerable groups (women, individuals living in rural areas, and young people) are less likely to use the formal financial system. Loans and mortgages appear to be better drivers for financial inclusion than saving products. For enterprises, formality and education stand out as significant factors for financial inclusion. Access to the formal financial system seems to be a problem for households but not for enterprises, and households are also more affected by regional differences.
Inclusions and exclusions in law: experiences of women with disability in rural and war-affected areas in Sri Lanka^MAY 28 2015^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^Broad and inter-disciplinary inquiry into disability is at a nascent stage in Sri Lanka. This paper looks at the intersectionality of disability and gender in the specific contexts of the rural' and the armed conflict-affected areas of the country, particularly the interaction with the law. In-depth interviews and focus group discussions were conducted among rural women with disabilities in the North Central and Eastern provinces, including women who acquired disabilities resulting from the internal conflict. Legal literacy, administrative discretion in disability-related welfare programmes, and transitional justice and reconciliation emerged as the most prominent themes in the interviews. We analyse these issues using a rights framework in an attempt to highlight some of the vulnerabilities of women with disability in the rural and war-affected contexts. The paper also reflects on a few instances where those vulnerabilities have been overcome through collective action.
Understanding Family Migration in Rural South Africa: Exploring Children's Inclusion in the Destination Households of Migrant Parents^MAY 2015^POPULATION SPACE AND PLACE^Despite the removal of restrictions on movement and increasing female participation in migration, only a minority of migrant parents in South Africa include their children in their destination household. Quantitative analyses of the circumstances in which children accompany a migrant parent have been limited by the lack of available data that document family arrangements from the perspective of more than one household. This paper uses data about members of rural households in a demographic surveillance population in KwaZulu-Natal and a linked sample survey of adult migrants to examine factors associated with children's inclusion in the destination household of migrant parents, analyse the timing and sequence of children's moves to parental destination households, and describe the composition of parental origin and destination households. The findings confirm that in contemporary South Africa, only a small percentage (14%) of migrants' children who are members of the parental origin household are also members of the parental destination household. Membership of the parental destination household is associated with parental characteristics and the child's age, but not measures of socio-economic status, and children most commonly migrate several years after their migrant parent. Children included in the destination household of migrant fathers frequently live in small households, which also include their mother, whereas children included in the destination household of migrant mothers live in larger households. This study contributes to understanding the contexts of children's inclusion in parental destination households in South Africa and demonstrates the potential of data collected in migrants' origin and destination households. (C) 2014 The Authors. Population, Space and Place published by John Wiley &amp; Sons Ltd.
Under the banyan tree - exclusion and inclusion of people with mental disorders in rural North India^MAY 1 2015^BMC PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.567  </td>  <td>3.275</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of traditional birth attendants in the public health care system in Brazil: reflecting on challenges^APR-MAY 2015^REVISTA PANAMERICANA DE SALUD PUBLICA-PAN AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^The present article describes an experience with traditional birth attendants carried out in the state of Tocantins, Brazil, between 2010 and 2014. The experience was part of a diagnostic project to survey home deliveries in the state of Tocantins and set up a registry of traditional birth attendants for the Health Ministry's Working with Traditional Birth Attendants Program (PTPT). The project aimed to articulate the home deliveries performed by traditional birth attendants to the local health care systems (SUS). Sixty-seven active traditional birth attendants were identified in the state of Tocantins, and 41 (39 indigenous) participated in workshops. During these workshops, they discussed their realities, difficulties, and solutions in the context of daily adversities. Birth attendants were also trained in the use of biomedical tools and neonatal resuscitation. Based on these experiences, the question came up regarding the true effectiveness of the strategy to include traditional birth attendants in the SUS. The present article discusses this theme with support from the relevant literature. The dearth of systematic studies focusing on the impact of PTPT actions on the routine of traditional birth attendants, including perinatal outcomes and remodeling of health practices in rural, riverfront, former slave, forest, and indigenous communities, translates into a major gap in terms of the knowledge regarding the effectiveness of such initiatives.
PRADHAN MANTRI JAN DHAN YOJANA: A VEHICLE FOR FINANCIAL INCLUSION^APR-JUN 2015^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^The present study seeks to investigate the current status of the PMJDY in India. The results revealed that the contribution of rural sector in terms of accounts opened under PMJDY was relatively higher than the urban sector in all the banking sectors namely, public sector banks, regional rural banks and private banks. The results further revealed that more than 70 percent of the accounts opened under PMJDY were opened with zero balance (626.34 lakh) depicting the weakness in the implementation strategy of the plan regarding easy access to banking system. From the public sector banks and RRBs, the State Bank of India plays an important and leading role in the opening accounts under PMJDY. The state-wise scenario of PMJDY shows that the highest number of accounts was opened in Uttar Pradesh including both rural and urban sectors due to its highest population rate. Whereas, Punjab has become the third state after Kerala and Madhya Pradesh where all households have at least one bank account.
Banking Awareness of The Residents in The Present Financial Inclusion ERA in Nagapattinam District, Tamil Nadu^APR 2015^PACIFIC BUSINESS REVIEW INTERNATIONAL^Reduction of poverty has been an essential objective of development policy since the inception of planning in India. Poverty Eradication, Employment Generation Programmes have been in operation since the post-independence of India, even though poverty and social exclusion continue to dominate socio-economic and political discourse in India. Financial Inclusion and Banking reforms attach vast significance to eradicate the poverty across states and the rural-urban areas. Despite being one of the ten fastest growing economies of the world, India is still home to one-third of the world's poor. In developing economies like India, the banks have been playing a major role as mobilisers of savings and allocators of credit for production and investment. In case of population who are being poor and illiterate, their banking awareness is supposed to be low due to their lack of knowledge of the financial services offered by the banks and financial exclusion. Henceforth, this paper attempts to identify the banking awareness of the residents in the present financial inclusion era in Nagapattinam district, Tamil Nadu.
The Status of Financial Inclusion in Nepal^FEB 2015^PACIFIC BUSINESS REVIEW INTERNATIONAL^The objective of the paper is to examine the status of financial inclusion in Nepal. The study is based on secondary data to analyse the financial inclusion led by banks and financial institutions and 'D class' micro-finance institutions. The status of financial inclusion in Nepal is not satisfactory and majority of people have still no bank accounts at the formal financial institutions. The financial inclusion led by banks and financial institutions as well as 'D class' MFIs shows that farwestern and mid-western development region has poor penetration of formal financial services as compared to other development region due to complex geographical location and lack of basic infrastructure. MF industry is necessary to develop as a tool of inclusive financial market through the wider expansion of its services in remote rural and hilly areas of Nepal. The government should provide enough supports to develop financial infrastructure, sound MF policies, strengthening regulatory authority, and inclusive economic growth that will help to build-up inclusive financial environment in the nation.
Family-school cooperation in the context of inclusion of children with special educational needs^2015^5th ICEEPSY International Conference on Education &amp; Educational Psychology^Although current legislative measures recognize parents participation in school life, several difficulties remain and many barriers need to be broken down as there are still uncomfortable situations to be dealt with between school and parents. In this context, the aim of this study is to identify and to interpret parents, teachers and students' opinions concerning parental involvement and participation in their children's school life. This study was carried out in an interpretative and descriptive paradigm which involves children with Special Educational Needs (SEN), their families and the relationship between them and the schools their children are attending. It is a exploratory, cross-sectional study, with convenience sample of 119 parents, 22 kindergarten teachers and teachers and 168 students attending a school situated in a rural area in the interior centre of Portugal. The four instruments used were adapted from Zenhas, A. (2006) and Dias, J. (1999). The results were analyzed through a descriptive statistics program, SPSS 19.0, which allowed us to discover that parents' participation in their children's school life is still very incipient. The conclusion that it is up to school to assume a relevant role in coordinating with the families, to outline the objectives of the intervention and which strategies should be adopted to enable the increasing level of participation of families and implement policy measures where all stakeholders (parents, students with special educational needs and teachers) feel more included. (C) 2015 The Authors. Published by lsevier Ltd.
The Research of Problems About Social Inclusion of the New Generation of Peasant Workers in Tai'an, Shandong Province^2015^2015 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON SOCIAL SCIENCE AND ENVIRONMENT (ICSSM 2015)^Since the policy of reform and opening up was adopted in China, more and more rural surplus labor forces came into the city for seeking a better chance of survival, resulting in a special population group with unique "Chinese characteristics of peasant workers". In 2013, the new generation peasant workers after 80s and 90s accounted for more than 60% of them. They have made important contribution to the development of cities, but their problems of integration into city encountered obstacles, affecting the harmonious development of Chinese society. Through the investigation of survival condition of them in Tai'an, Shandong Province, the living situation and integration problems have been revealed and analyzed, and based on which, measures from all aspects and levels were also analyzed and discussed, therefore policies and suggestions could be put forward to make up the problems.
IMPLEMENTATION OF ICT LEARNING CONTENT TO PROMOTE CRITICAL DISCOURSES WITHIN CLASSROOM FOR SOCIAL INCLUSION AND PEACE PROMOTION^2015^ICERI2015: 8TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^None
JOB ATTITUDES OF SPECIAL EDUCATORS RELATED TO INCLUSION OF STUDENTS WITH SIGNIFICANT DISABILITIES^2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SPECIAL EDUCATION^This study measured the attitudes of teachers of students with significant disabilities using the Attitudes of Teachers of Students with Significant Disabilities about Aspects of Their Jobs survey. Teachers who worked with at least one student with significant disabilities were contacted via e-mail and other on-line means across four geographical areas in the United States. The survey results were compared with the teacher's reported rates of student inclusion and geographical areas. The post - hoc analysis produced significant results, displaying that teachers whose students were included in general education were more likely to display positive overall attitudes related to their jobs. Teachers in suburban and rural areas with students included more fully were more likely to display positive attitudes towards their job design. These results expand the field of inclusion research from having positive impact on students, to demonstrating a significant relationship between increased rates of inclusion and positive teacher attitudes toward aspects of their job
An Analysis of Digital Inclusion Projects: Three Crucial Factors and Four Key Components^2015^JOURNAL OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION-RESEARCH^This paper provides an in-depth analysis into two case studies aimed at addressing the digital divide in two developing countries. A detailed description is provided for each case study along with an analysis of how successful the two projects were at addressing the digital divide in Siyabuswa, South Africa and Ennis, Ireland. The two case studies were both community-based ICT projects in rural areas of their respective countries. However, citizens in Siyabuswa had to continuously work hard to obtain new resources for a central hub which serviced the entire community, while citizens in Ennis were awarded a grant with an abundance of ICT technology including an Internet connection in every home. A conceptual framework for analyzing the success of digital inclusion projects was developed through a comprehensive literature review. This paper will identify the three factors (value, sustainability, and scalability) and four key components (digital equity, excellence, opportunity, and empowerment) that make up the framework, analyze each of the two case studies based on the framework, and explore future implications for addressing gaps in ICT access through the implementation of digital inclusion projects.
EXPLORATION OF NEW PERSPECTIVES IN PROJECTS OF DIGITAL INCLUSION IN RURAL COMMUNITIES^JAN 2015^INTERCIENCIA^The emergence of digital convergence and the explosive growth of wireless communication, together with experiences gained in providing Internet services in different parts of the world, make it necessary to reassess the strategies and methods employed by governments, development agencies and private enterprises to spark off socio-economic development through the use of Information and Communication Technologies in rural communities. This paper stems from the authors' experience in diverse projects of social inclusion in various rural settlements in Latin America and more recently in the town of San Miguel Tlacotepec, Oaxaca, Mexico, and from the analysis of reported results indicating that the availability of wideband infrastructure and of convergent devices for access to Internet and their associated contents, although necessary, is not sufficient to achieve sustainable socio-economic development in rural communities. We thus suggest exploring new approaches that integrate, together with the cyber-infrastructure, two complementary programs: a social action program that incorporates community participation, technological adoption and usability, and capacity building strategies; accompanied by another social innovation program to stimulate entrepreneurship and learning by the actors in the rural context. Our proposal considers that the cyber-infrastructure and the proposed associated programs defines a socio-technical system that acts upon the rural context, which in turn can be characterized as a socio-environmental system.
An exploratory analysis of community-based disability workers' potential to alleviate poverty and promote social inclusion of people with disabilities in three Southern African countries^NOV 26 2014^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^This article draws on accounts by community-based disability workers (CDWs) of their life and work experiences in resource-limited rural communities in Botswana, Malawi and South Africa. Using the World Health Organisation's community-based rehabilitation (CBR) matrix and the United Nations' Millennium Development Goals as analytic frameworks, the article explores CDWs' potential to contribute to improving the lives and increasing the levels of social, economic and political inclusion of people with disabilities, their families and communities. The article argues that CDWs' knowledge, experience and understanding of disability in resource-limited communities may constitute an important local resource for helping to address the inter-related effects of poverty and disability in developing countries.
Inclusion and Exclusion-Rural Teachers and Learners' Experiences: Cases in the Free-State Province^NOV 2014^ANTHROPOLOGIST^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.195  </td>  <td>0.198</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2015  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Building Social Inclusion for Rural Older People Using Information and Communication Technologies: Perspectives of Rural Practitioners^OCT 2 2014^AUSTRALIAN SOCIAL WORK^The literature identifies rural, older people as at risk of social exclusion, as a result of rural disadvantage. In this context, improved access to information and communication technologies (ICTs) has potential to build social inclusion, yet current evidence shows that rural, older people are the lowest current users of technology. This paper draws on the practice and local knowledge of rural practitioners from one Victorian region in order to explore: (a) the practice issues associated with ICT use among rural, older people; and (b) the characteristics of effective practice models in the rural, social work context. An analysis of findings highlights the need to respond to the diverse skills, needs, and learning styles of older people, to demonstrate the benefits of ICTs, involve users, and build confidence. Major barriers include poor ICT usage by many rural agencies and low practitioner capacity, as well as access and resources.
Local governance responses to social inclusion for older rural Victorians: Building resources, opportunities and capabilities^SEP 2014^AUSTRALASIAN JOURNAL ON AGEING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.206  </td>  <td>1.422</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
SOCIAL SUPPORT DURING DELIVERY IN RURAL CENTRAL GHANA: A MIXED METHODS STUDY OF WOMEN'S PREFERENCES FOR AND AGAINST INCLUSION OF A LAY COMPANION IN THE DELIVERY ROOM^SEP 2014^JOURNAL OF BIOSOCIAL SCIENCE^This study aimed to explore pregnant women's attitudes towards the inclusion of a lay companion as a source of social support during labour and delivery in rural central Ghana. Quantitative demographic and pregnancy-related data were collected from 50 pregnant women presenting for antenatal care at a rural district hospital and analysed using STATA/IC 11.1. Qualitative attitudinal questions were collected from the same women through semi-structured interviews; data were analysed using NVivo 9.0. Twenty-nine out of 50 women (58%) preferred to have a lay companion during facility-based labour and delivery, whereas 21 (42%) preferred to deliver alone with the nurses in a facility. Women desiring a companion were younger, had more antenatal care visits, had greater educational attainment and were likely to be experiencing their first delivery. Women varied in the type of companion they prefer (male partner vs female relative). What was expected in terms of social support differed based upon the type of companion. Male companions were expected to provide emotional support and to 'witness her pain'. Female companions were expected to provide emotional support as well as instrumental, informational and appraisal support. Three qualitative themes were identified that run counter to the inclusion of a lay helper: fear of an evil-spirited companion, a companion not being necessary or helpful, and being 'too shy' of a companion. This research challenges the assumption of a unilateral desire for social support during labour and delivery, and suggests that women differ in the type of companion and type of support they prefer during facility deliveries. Future research is needed to determine the direction of the relationship - whether women desire certain types of support and thus choose companions they believe can meet those needs, or whether women desire a certain companion and adjust their expectations accordingly.
Families, well-being, and inclusion: Rethinking priorities for children with cognitive disabilities in Ladakh, India^AUG 2014^CHILDHOOD-A GLOBAL JOURNAL OF CHILD RESEARCH^Current policies aimed at children with disabilities in Ladakh, India, focus on the delivery of educational services to the individual child. Ethnographic research conducted with children with cognitive disabilities and their families in this rural Himalayan region reveals why this approach is problematic, given the local cultural context. Critique centers on the mismatch between inclusive education's emphasis on the individual child and the cultural context in which the family is crucial to a child's well-being and inclusion. In Ladakh, families - not children alone - experience and navigate the social, biological, and financial repercussions of disability and should thus be the focus of inclusive interventions.
Perceived Social Support as a Factor of Rural Women's Digital Inclusion in Online Social Networks^JUL 1 2014^COMUNICAR^This article presents the results of a study on the digital inclusion of rural women in social networks. Its main objective is to under stand the social support perceived by these women within online social networks and its relation to digital inclusion, considering also whether there are differences in the degree of support depending on age, family status and employment status. To do this, we applied two scales measuring perceived social support and digital inclusion to 478 women from rural areas of Andalusia aged 18 to 65. The results showed a medium level of support, with significant differences found in the social support perceived by women depending on their age, family status and employment status. Women, who were young, students, single, with no children and who use Tuenti and Facebook perceived a higher level of social support in social networks. We also observed a strong relation between perceived social support and the digital inclusion of women in social networks, with similarities appearing in studies carried out in different contexts and social groups. The discussion looks at implications for the formation of an active and participatory citizenship of women in social networks.
Exclusion and inclusion of women in Norwegian agriculture: Exploring different outcomes of the 'tractor gene'^APR 2014^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Forty years after the Norwegian Allodial Law was amended to give firstborn girls and boys equal rights to succeed their parents as farmers, only 14 percent of Norwegian farmers are women. Gender relations on farms are still shaped by adherence to patriarchal inheritance practices and the masculine designation of the occupation 'farmer'. This article draws on in-depth interviews to explore how Norwegian farmers' assumptions of gendered competence and the notion of a 'good farmer' can have different outcomes. Many farmers both male and female ascribe an innate interest in machinery, a metaphorical 'tractor gene', to boys and see girls as better at caring for animals. This set of gendered notions has complex consequences. It can be used as a rationale to exclude daughters from agriculture, as has often been observed. At the same time, farmers who hold these ideas apply and reinterpret them in ways that allow the inclusion of women. In order to question hegemonic gender power that is based on a devaluation of qualities that are constructed as feminine and the belief that specific abilities are innate, they must see competence as something that can be learned and/or value competencies regarded as feminine as useful for agriculture. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Remittances and Financial Inclusion: Evidence from El Salvador^FEB 2014^WORLD DEVELOPMENT^This paper investigates the impact of remittances on financial inclusion. Using household-level survey data for El Salvador, we examine whether remittances affect households' use of savings and credit instruments from formal financial institutions. We find that although remittances have a positive impact on financial inclusion by promoting the use of deposit accounts, they do not have a significant and robust effect on the demand for and use of credit from formal institutions. If anything, by relaxing credit constraints, remittances might reduce the need for external financing from financial institutions, while at the same time increasing the demand for savings instruments. (C) 2013 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
A Rural Transformation E-Inclusion Value Chain Framework^2014^PROCEEDING OF KNOWLEDGE MANAGEMENT INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE (KMICE) 2014, VOLS 1 AND 2^The absence of systematic rural informatics leads to a mismatch of capabilities and needs of specific target community. These ultimately resort to the issue of sustainability and under-utilization of IT due to the technology and requirement mismatch. This research attempts to overcome these issues by proposing a conceptual framework of Rural Transformation E-Inclusion Value Chain Framework. As part of the empirical study, this study also reports the preliminary investigation conducted at a case study Kampung Tengah. Melaka, Malaysia as to provide input for the rural transformation value chain framework. A survey was distributed to 150 villagers of Kampung Tengah, Melaka, Malaysia. The relevant stakeholder (input) and the capabilities of villagers are identified in this study. The result will be used in future work of analyzing the requirement, strategize and design the e-inclusion value chain framework for the targeted village. Thus, this research attempts to perform systematic requirements engineering, which targets to extend the outreach potential with the design of the e-inclusion value chain framework that may support the creation of digital economy at rural area and meeting the demand and challenges towards the creation of knowledge-based society.
Perspective of Technology in Achieving Financial Inclusion in Rural India^2014^SHAPING THE FUTURE OF BUSINESS AND SOCIETY - SYMBIOSIS INSTITUTE OF MANAGEMENT STUDIES (SIMS)^The economic welfare and growth of a nation depends upon the accessibility of people to financial product and services. Efficiently mobilizing their household saving and allocating them effectively to the growing credit requirement of the economy helps in sustainable development of the country. Govt., RBI and banking sectors are making tremendous effort to bring every section of the country into the mainstream financial system. Still there exists a significant gap between the growth expectations and the ground realities in context of 'mobilization and utilization of funds' that support inclusive growth of the country. There is also a significant disparity among the people of rural and urban area in availing the services of the financial system. There is a need of effective tools to bridge the gap and bring in every section of people from all parts whether rural or urban to take part in the mainstream financial activities. Modern Information and communication technology (ICT) can act as a tool to develop a platform which helps us to extend the financial services in remote areas. Technology intervention helps banks to reduce their cost, to increase customer reachability and in better management of business risk. This paper is an attempt to study the contribution of ICT towards financial inclusion in the country and analyse different application of ICT which banks are adopting. This would directly or indirectly reflect the effectiveness of the financial institutions efforts to bring-in underprivileged people to the mainstream financial system, especially in rural area and support in achieving Govt. objective of inclusive growth. (C) 2014 Elsevier B.V.
Community resilience and social inclusion of people living in rural areas. Development of a win win strategy^2014^SECOND WORLD CONGRESS ON RESILIENCE: FROM PERSON TO SOCIETY^None
Financial inclusion - Building a success model in the Indian context^2014^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON TRADE, MARKETS AND SUSTAINABILITY (ICTMS-2013)^Financial Inclusion is the delivery of financial services at an affordable cost to hitherto unbanked environments, especially the low-income and under-privileged. The Government of India and Reserve bank of India have taken initiatives to spread banking services such as expanding the number of rural bank branches, allowing the banking correspondent model and adoption of CBS technology. While it is a daunting challenge in size and scope, financial inclusion is also a great social and business opportunity. An attempt has been made in this paper to study the various financial inclusion models used in India - the challenges and a way out. (c) 2014 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd.
Expanding Social Inclusion in Community Sports Organizations: Evidence from Rural Australian Football Clubs^NOV 2013^JOURNAL OF SPORT MANAGEMENT^Australian Football clubs have traditionally been seen as contributing social benefits to the rural communities in which they are embedded. Declining numbers of participants, both players and volunteers, suggest that this role may not be as strong today. Critical explorations of the extent to which football has driven social inclusion and exclusion in such environments emphasizes a historic masculine culture of drinking and violence that segregates and marginalizes women and children. Less is known about the contemporary strategic efforts of clubs to use social capital to support their activities, and whether the resources they generate have positive impacts on social inclusion in the wider community. We use evidence from the Parliament of Victoria's Inquiry into Country Football (2004) to explore the current focus of rural Australian Football clubs regarding social inclusion, in light of changes occurring in society and rural towns in the 21st century.
Inclusion of pupils with intellectual disabilities: primary school teachers' attitudes and willingness in a rural area in Uganda^SEP 1 2013^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Teachers in regular schools have a responsibility to accommodate the needs and interests of all learners. The attitudes and willingness of teachers to include learners with intellectual disabilities in their classes in regular schools in a district with a semi-nomadic pastoral population in north-eastern Uganda was investigated. A survey of 125 school teachers was conducted, using an attitude scale and a willingness sub-scale. The results showed slightly more positive than negative attitudes, and more willingness than unwillingness to teach learners with intellectual disabilities. Attendance of workshops and seminars had a positive impact on teacher attitudes and willingness towards inclusive education. The findings are discussed with reference to historical-cultural characteristics of the district, as well as pupil and teacher characteristics.
Small Town China: Rural Labour and Social Inclusion^JUN 2013^CHINA QUARTERLY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.236  </td>  <td>3.443</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The inclusion of inclusive education in international development: Lessons from Papua New Guinea^MAR 2013^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^A new 'inclusive' curriculum has been introduced in Papua New Guinea, with significant levels of support from a bilateral development agency. The curriculum is inclusive in the sense that it is designed to meet the diverse, complex, and ever-changing needs of students. Research indicates the curriculum has been shaped by various influences, most particularly Western educational ideology. Research in remote rural schools revealed that stakeholders were unable and unwilling to adopt many of the precepts of the new curriculum. Broader analysis indicates that this is likely to be the case elsewhere in PNG. In the light of these findings, it is proposed that international development agencies (IDAs), if they wish to effectively promote inclusive education, should become more 'inclusive' organisations - in the sense that they should adopt more responsive and participatory approaches in low income countries. (C) 2012 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Which Sami? Sami inclusion criteria in population-based studies of Sami health and living conditions in Norway - an exploratory study exemplified with data from the SAMINOR study^2013^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF CIRCUMPOLAR HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.18  </td>  <td>1.256</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Vulnerable groups inclusion and local socio-economic development. case study on Roma population in rural area in Romania^2013^FOURTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE PSYCHO-SOCIAL PERSPECTIVES IN THE QUASI-COERCIVE TREATMENT OF OFFENDERS: SOCIAL CONTROL AND VULNERABLE GROUPS (SPECTO 2013)^The paper addresses the issue of vulnerability of Roma population living in rural areas. Europe and Romanian statistics related to discrimination are analyzed in the first part. Second part if focus on main characteristics and challenges of Roma's vulnerability in Romania with a special look at the ones living in rural areas.
The question of inclusion and representation in rural South Africa: challenging the concept of water user associations as a vehicle for transformation^2013^WATER POLICY^The promotion of local governance and the transfer of water management responsibilities to water user associations (WUAs) have been central in water reform processes throughout the world, including in the reforms that took place in post-apartheid South Africa. This paper reflects on the notions of inclusion and representation as put forward by the various actors involved in the establishment of a WUA in a tertiary catchment in the Thukela River Basin. The paper describes how the WUA in the study catchment came to be dominated by commercial farmers, despite the South African government's aim to redress the inequities of the past by the inclusion and representation of historically disadvantaged individuals. The authors argue that the notions of inclusion and representation as embedded in the concept of the WUA are highly contested and more aligned with the institutional settings familiar to the commercial farmers. The paper concludes that, unless the inherently political nature of the participatory process is recognized and the different institutional settings become part of the negotiation process of the 'why' and the 'how' of progressive collaboration at catchment level, the establishment of the WUA in the study catchment will not contribute to achieving the envisioned transformation.
Local Initiatives for Rural Vitality and Social Inclusion: Some Experiences from Serbia^2013^EASTERN EUROPEAN COUNTRYSIDE^The purpose of this paper is to identify the main problems related to the sustainable development of rural communities, as well as the possible solutions to overcome them. This paper uses an analytical and synthetic approach, method of comparison and analogy, and descriptive analysis. The starting point of the research is actually a brief overview of the current situation in rural Serbia, while the central part of the paper presents an analysis concerning the development of the rural economy in the representative villages of Grabovica and Ribare in the Republic of Serbia. Research results are given in the form of specific guidelines for a new approach to local rural development and strengthening the role and responsibilities of local government in the development process. The main conclusion that follows from the results of the research is that continued and constant work is needed in order to empower local communities to take responsibility for their own development, as well as to support local initiatives to this end.
STRENGTHS CULTURAL ETHNOLINGUISTIC COMMUNITIES OF THE MIXTECA PRO DIGITAL INCLUSION PROCESS^2013^EDULEARN13: 5TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^Boltvink [1] mentions that in the year of 2010 the poverty in Mexico stood at over 93 million poor, of which the population in extreme poverty affects 60.4 million people, with 42% located mainly in localities rural and 26% in metropolitan areas. Likewise, factors like debt, ignorance, diseases, globalization, among others, those prevent that the developing countries are to the forefront in the use of the technology in order to be taken advantage for the socio-economic development in marginalized localities. This fact is confirmed by the study released by the OCDE [2], where one alludes that the benefits of the technology are not being reflected in poorer societies. Under this scene of poverty and inequality that lives Mexico, they survive 47 ethnic groups of the Pre-Columbian Mexico, of which 16 are registered in the state of Oaxaca. The present study was carried out in the region Mixteca low of Oaxaca State, in the people "Nuu Savi" (People of the Rain), a community ethnolinguistic considered of high marginalization where the native language is Mixteco. Currently the Mixteco people struggling to maintain their identity and preserve their transcendental legacy of their culture, in a world where globalization is responsible for in making ubiquitous new technologies of information and communication technology (ICT), and in particular the existence of Internet. Accordingly, and in this context, the research question is: are there factors in the culture of the groups of minority ethnolinguistic that contribute to strengthening the process of digital inclusion?
DIGITAL INCLUSION: FUNDAMENTALS OF ECENTRE MANAGEMENT TRAINING PROGRAMME (2012) A WRITTEN ANALYSIS ON COMMUNITY NEEDS; AND EXPERIENCES OF eCENTRE MANAGERS (WESTERN CAPE)^2013^EDULEARN13: 5TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^None
In Pursuit of Dignity and Social Justice: Changing Lives Through 100 % Inclusion-How Gram Vikas Fosters Sustainable Rural Development^DEC 2012^JOURNAL OF BUSINESS ETHICS^This case study investigates Gram Vikas' innovative social entrepreneurial approach to sustainable rural development through its 'Water and Sanitation Programme'. We explore its key innovation of 100 % inclusion and the process of creating democratic, self-governing management systems. This allows us to demonstrate how a social enterprise tries to realize its vision of "an equitable and sustainable society where people live in peace with dignity", and ultimately, how it contributes to the United Nations Millennium Goals of improving health, empowering women and breaking the vicious circle of poverty. We also discuss the management challenges that the organisation faces in the area of finance, personnel management and scaling up.
Consumer Vulnerability and Marketplace Inclusion: A Case of Chinese Rural Migrants^DEC 2012^JOURNAL OF MACROMARKETING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.517  </td>  <td>2.368</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Older people and poverty in rural Britain: Material hardships, cultural denials and social inclusions^OCT 2012^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^This paper explores the relations between older people, poverty and place in rural Britain. It develops previous work on rural poverty that has pointed both to the significance of older people within the rural poor population and to their denials of poverty. The paper also connects with recent discussions on the complexity of relations between poverty and social exclusion in later life, as well as key themes emerging from studies of older people in disadvantaged urban neighbourhoods. Drawing on findings from a survey of 4000 households in rural Wales and interviews with older people in poverty in three rural places, the paper provides a detailed examination of the materialities and experiences of poverty among older people in rural places. In particular, it highlights how older poor groups construct their lives in complex terms with references made to both social inclusions and exclusions. The research also points to the significance of the socio-cultural contexts of place in shaping older people's understandings of poverty in rural areas. (C) 2012 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Effects of job-embedded professional development on inclusion of students with disabilities in content area classrooms: results of a three-year study^2012^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^During the mid-1990s, members of the global education community issued the Salamanca Statement that described inclusive schools as effective educational environments that also combat discrimination. Since that time, considerable progress has been made in moving students with disabilities from separate placements to inclusive settings. In the USA, nearly 10% of the school-aged population needs special education services and of that group, 96% are educated in general education classrooms 80% of the time. Placement of such large numbers of students with disabilities has increased the diversity of the student body and the complexity of teaching of core curriculum. For teachers and students to be successful, teachers need on-going professional development. This paper explores the efficacy of a Job-Embedded Professional Development (JEPD) model in six schools (urban, suburban and rural) that had made a commitment towards including all students with significant disabilities in general education core curriculum. Results are discussed for the six schools as well as for students identified as displaying behaviour disorders, autism or intellectual disabilities.
Financial Inclusion: Lessons from Rural South India^JAN 2012^JOURNAL OF SOCIAL POLICY^Financial inclusion/exclusion has recently been emphasised as an important policy option aimed at alleviating poverty, minimising social exclusion and enhancing economic growth. In this article, we review the growing interest in financial exclusion and inclusion, define them and demonstrate their existence in developing and developed countries. Our empirical focus is on whether financial inclusion has been successfully implemented in four sites in rural South India where banks claimed that financial inclusion is complete. Although many rural people in South India are financially included, the concept of financial inclusion is more complex than usually portrayed. Our findings show that social and personal deprivation contributes to financial exclusion and should be viewed as key barriers to financial inclusion. We also suggest that financial inclusion is not a monolithic phenomenon and should be studied in a multilayered fashion, ranging from having a bank account to making full use of modern financial instruments.
Inclusion and Exclusion in Local Governance: Field Studies from Rural India^OCT 2011^JOURNAL OF SOUTH ASIAN DEVELOPMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.231  </td>  <td>0.368</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of the female condom in a male condom-only intervention in the sex industry in China: A cross-sectional analysis of pre- and post-intervention surveys in three study sites^MAY 2011^PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.696  </td>  <td>1.952</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
INCLUSION AND EXCLUSION IN LOCAL GOVERNANCE: Field Studies from Rural India.^MAR 2011^PACIFIC AFFAIRS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.861  </td>  <td>1.048</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Promoting social inclusion? The impact of village services on the lives of older people living in rural England^FEB 2011^AGEING &amp; SOCIETY^Drawing on data from a qualitative study, this paper explores the impact of 'village services' on the lives of people aged 70 or more years living in rural England. Throughout the paper, the phrase 'village services' refers to six community-based services and activities provided to help meet the needs of older rural residents, namely lunch clubs, welfare rights information and advice services, befriending schemes and community warden support, in rural areas in three regions of England. It is argued that, in various ways, village services promote social inclusion by enhancing older rural residents' access to the resources, rights, goods and services that encourage social interaction and meaningful participation in community life. It is clear, however, that the overwhelming majority of users of village services are female, that older men are often reluctant to engage with the services on offer, and that the providers of village services need to find new and innovative ways of engaging with older men in rural areas. It is concluded that restricted revenue and capital resources means that the expansion of village services so that they may better meet the requirements of older rural men is unlikely.
A New Approach to Achieve e-Inclusion with ICT Education in Rural Taiwan^2011^EDUCATION AND MANAGEMENT^With regards to the applied education of ICT tools in rural Taiwan, past studies on digital opportunity and digital divide have somewhat overlooked the purpose and requirements of e-learning, as well as suitable teaching materials and teaching methods. This study analyzes the case of Pun Car Action, and employs participant observation and in-depth interviews to explore key factors that affect information application learning in rural communities, namely how communities learn to apply ICT tools. Research results show that Pun Car Action's "flexible teaching materials with an emphasis on communication" and "localized teaching methods" are the key to its successful ICT education in rural Taiwan.
Rural Inclusion: Designing a Training Session for Public Authorities^2011^EFITA/WCCA '11^None
Evidence on inclusion and support for learners with disabilities in mainstream schools in South Africa: off the policy radar?^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Since the move towards inclusion in line with international trends and South Africa's attempts to address issues of marginalisation and discrimination amongst all learners, including those with special needs and disabilities, it has become evident on perusal of various research studies and reviews that there is an obsession with how far we have come since the introduction of an inclusive education policy in 2001 which formalises a strategy to ensure increased access and support for all learners within the system, including those with special needs and disabilities. There is an inherent assumption that we have not arrived as yet, and research suggests a continuing scepticism and lack of confidence amongst educators in mainstream settings to support children with disabilities in their schools and classrooms. This article focuses on research which shows that learners with disabilities are in fact being successfully included within one of these mainstream schools, by default and with a range of available support, despite not being designated as a 'full-service school'. The study is based on interviews with students with physical disabilities in a Black rural secondary school, as well as observations and interviews with staff and non-disabled students. Findings reveal an existence of teacher, peer and community support, including from a neighbouring special school, suggesting a notion of inclusion which was about naturally putting values into action. Such practice, I argue, remains obscure and off the policy radar in South Africa.
Low coverage but few inclusion errors in Burkina Faso: a community-based targeting approach to exempt the indigent from user fees^OCT 21 2010^BMC PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.567  </td>  <td>3.275</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Social Inclusion or Market Competitiveness? A Comparison of Rural Development Policies in the European Union and the United States^OCT 2010^SOCIAL POLICY &amp; ADMINISTRATION^The language of EU rural development policy appears more interested in social inclusion and that of US policy more interested in market competitiveness. We seek to determine why policies directed at rural development in the EU and the USA differ. In both contexts new rural development policies emphasize partnership and participation but we find local participation is used to promote social inclusion in the EU and market competitiveness in the USA. An examination of these dimensions illustrates important transcontinental differences and similarities in rural development policies. We explore the socio-historical reasons for differences in the commitment to social inclusion, while also noting similarities in the priority of market competitiveness.
Lifelong Learning for Inclusion - between Theory and Practice^2010^EASTERN EUROPEAN COUNTRYSIDE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.391  </td>  <td>0.56</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Developing a Tool for Systematic Inclusion of Non-Academic Factors in Dental School Admissions: Towards Building Diversity in the Dental Workforce^DEC 2009^JOURNAL OF DENTAL EDUCATION^This retrospective study aimed to determine the ability of a self-designed evaluation instrument to identify applicants who should be invited for an interview and to assess applications including non-academic factors in a consistent and systematic manner. The instrument was constructed using information culled from the American Dental Education Association Associated American Dental Schools Application Service (ADEA AADSAS) applications including academic (DAT, GPA) and non-academic qualifications (work experience, volunteer and extracurricular activities, rural and ethnic background, essays). Weights were assigned to each item assessed. Using applications received during the 2006 and 2007 admissions cycles, the instrument identified who should have been invited for interview. Descriptive statistics and specificity and sensitivity tests were conducted. The instrument allowed for a systematic quantitative assessment of non-academic factors that was part of the overall evaluation of applicants. Results show differences in non-academic scores of minority compared to non-minority applicants, males compared to females, and those who were offered interviews compared to those not interviewed. It is possible that some applicants who were not offered interviews could have gained a chance to be looked at more closely on a second round of review if non-academic factors were considered.
Digital inclusion in Chile: Internet in rural schools^NOV 2009^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^This paper analyzes the teacher's contribution to improving digital inclusion in Chilean rural schools, using a multidimensional definition of the digital divide. Data was obtained from interviews and surveys applied to teachers and students from 145 rural schools. Results show that teachers function as gatekeepers. They do not teach students how to use ICT explicitly, but when teachers have high expectations, skills and technology access, this leads to conditions for students learning how to use ICT. Finally, the data contributes to a better understanding of the new role that teachers and schools play in rural areas in terms of social and symbolic integration. (C) 2009 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Can Social Inclusion Policies Reduce Health Inequalities in Sub-Saharan Africa?-A Rapid Policy Appraisal^AUG 2009^JOURNAL OF HEALTH POPULATION AND NUTRITION^The global resurgence of interest in the social determinants of health provides an opportunity for determined action on unacceptable and unjust health inequalities that exist within and between countries. This paper reviews three categories of social inclusion policies: cash-transfers; free social services; and specific institutional arrangements for programme integration in six selected countries-Botswana, Mozambique, South Africa, Ethiopia, Nigeria, and Zimbabwe. The policies were appraised as part of the Social Exclusion Knowledge Network (SEKN set up under the auspices of the World Health Organization's Commission on Social Determinants of Health. The paper highlights the development landscape in sub-Saharan Africa and presents available indicators of the scale of inequity in the six countries. A summary of the policies appraised is presented, including whether or what the impact of these policies has been on health inequalities. Crosscutting benefits include poverty alleviation, notably among vulnerable children and youths, improved economic opportunities for disadvantaged households, reduction in access barriers to social services, and improved nutrition intake. The impact of these benefits, and hence the policies, on health status can only be inferred. Among the policies reviewed, weaknesses or constraints were in design and implementation. The policy design weaknesses include targeting criteria, their enforcement and latent costs, inadequate participation of the community and failure to take the cultural context into account. A major weakness of most policies was the lack of a monitoring and evaluation system, with clear indicators that incorporate system responsiveness. The policy implementation weaknesses include uneven regional implementation with rural areas worst affected; inadequate or poor administrative and implementation capacity; insufficient resources; problems of fraud and corruption; and lack of involvement of civil servants, exacerbating implementation capacity problems. The key messages to sub-Saharan African governments include: health inequalities must be measured; social policies must be carefully designed and effectively implemented addressing the constraints identified; monitoring and evaluation systems need improvement; and participation of the community needs to be encouraged through conducive and enabling environments. There is a need for a strong movement by civil society to address health inequalities and to hold governments accountable for improved health and reduced health inequalities.
"The first port of call is always the doctor": general practitioner roles in addressing social inclusion^JUL 20 2009^MEDICAL JOURNAL OF AUSTRALIA^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.332  </td>  <td>4.479</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Rural Society, Social Inclusion and Landscape Change in Central and Eastern Europe: A Case Study of Latvia^JUL 2009^SOCIOLOGIA RURALIS^The countryside of Europe is undergoing many social, economic and environmental changes as a result of depopulation and agricultural land abandonment. This trend, driven in part by the wide disparity of income levels between rural and urban inhabitants, is particularly evident in the Central and Eastern European countries such as Latvia, which joined the EU in 2004 and in 2007. Research was undertaken in Latvia in 2003, the year before it joined the EU, to explore this trend, as manifested in the relationship of people to the countryside, using focus groups and a questionnaire survey. The results showed that, although Latvians retain a strong regard for their traditional countryside landscape, numerous socioeconomic barriers exist, especially the lack of services, which are some of the drivers of outmigration from the countryside to towns or to other countries. Unless these drivers are addressed in rural socioeconomic policy the remaining people, many of whom belong to the older generation, are likely to become increasingly marginalised while the countryside will continue to be abandoned and the cultural landscape will deteriorate further.
Digital Inclusion Projects in Developing Countries: Processes of Institutionalization^2009^INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FOR DEVELOPMENT^This article concerns digital inclusion projects in developing countries and, in particular, focuses on processes of institutionalization of such projects. Three case studies are described and analysed. The first is the Akshaya telecenter project in the state of Kerala in India. The second is a community-based ICT project in a town in a rural area of South Africa. The third is the efforts of various agencies on telecenter projects in the mega-city of Sao Paulo in Brazil. The cases are analysed through a simple theoretical schema derived from institutional theory. The analyses are used to derive four key processes of institutionalization, which are argued to be of relevance to all digital inclusion projects: getting symbolic acceptance by the community, stimulating valuable social activity in relevant social groups, generating linkage to viable revenue streams, and enrolling government support. The article concludes with some theoretical, methodological, and policy implications. (C) 2009 Wiley Periodicals, Inc.
How Mobile Money Can Drive Financial Inclusion for Women at the Bottom of the Pyramid (BOP) in Indian Urban Centers^2009^INTERNATIONALIZATION, DESIGN AND GLOBAL DEVELOPMENT, PROCEEDINGS^This paper looks at challenges and opportunities on how mobile money can drive financial inclusion for women at the BOP (Bottom of the Pyramid) in urban Indian centers. We explore the current ecosystem of financial transactions and the role of women in a BOP household. Specifically we look at how this ecosystem differs based on how long ago they migrated from rural India and how that impacts their financial transactions. By understanding the gaps and the barriers, we outline specific challenges and opportunities for driving financial inclusion for women, through mobile money. We also posit that the success of mobile money depends on whether the 'solution' moves away from the paradigms used for designing mobile money solutions for those at the top of pyramid.
Public Policy Interventions and Social Inclusion: The Case of National Rural Employment Guarantee Act, India^2009^PROCEEDINGS OF 2009 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION (5TH), VOL II^This paper examines the promises and potential of the National Rural Employment Guarantee Act (NREGA hereafter), 2005, a flagship programme of the Ministry of Rural Development Government of India, in relation to its impact on the processes of social inclusion in the countryside Based on a critical review of secondary literature concerning the ongoing assessment of the NREGA various states of India, it identifies the gaps and lacuna in its implementation at the grassroots level. a related vein, this paper also hints at the linkages between public policy intervention, participator governance structures and the quest for political legitimacy by the democratic state. It argues the public policies are not to be judged only by what they actually accomplish in terms of preset target and objectives but also by their contribution to the processes of mobilisation of the poor and the deprived. Very often, public policy interventions set in motion consolidation of interest constellation at the local level and facilitate articulation of collective rights. In this sense, they help spread the scope of citizenship among the masses and reinforce political integration in a culturally diverse country.
Are rural development programmes socially inclusive? Social inclusion, civic engagement, participation, and social capital: Exploring the differences^OCT 2008^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Considerable importance is attached to social exclusion/inclusion in recent EU rural development programmes. At the nationail/regional operation of these programmes groups of people who are not participating are often identified as 'socially excluded groups'. This article contends that rural development programmes are misinterpreting the social processes of participation and consequently labelling some groups as socially excluded when they are not. This is partly because of the interchangeable and confused use of the concepts social inclusion, social capital and civic engagement, and partly because of the presumption that to participate is the default position. Three groups identified as socially excluded groups in Northern Ireland are considered. It is argued that a more careful analysis of what social inclusion means, what civic engagement means, and why participation is presumed to be the norm, leads to a different conclusion about who is excluded. This has both theoretical and policy relevance for the much used concept of social inclusion. (C) 2008 Elsevier. Ltd. All rights reserved.
Rural development, National Biofuel Policy and the social inclusion myth in the Brazilian countryside^AUG 1 2008^SCRIPTA NOVA-REVISTA ELECTRONICA DE GEOGRAFIA Y CIENCIAS SOCIALES^Historically, the Brazilian State has generated various agricultural development programmes. The majority are sectoral rather than territorial programmes, preventing genuine fostering of rural development. Current public policies directed to rural areas, such as the National Program for Production and Use of Biodiesel and the Law # 11.097, which deals with the introduction of biodiesel in the national energy matrix, are evidence of the continuity of the earlier development model. Moreover, the State has maintained a policy of incentives for the agro-industrial sector of alcohol fuel production (ethanol), with the community of Proalcool. It is striking that since its initiation, the program was designed to benefit the owners of sugar mills who have had the political power and the organizational structure capable of directing the State apparatus serving its own interests. Therefore, this article aims to analyse the policies of biofuel (alcohol and biodiesel) associated to the Brazilian agricultural policy, showing how such policies contribute to rural development in the country. In order to achieve this goal, an analysis of the country's bio-energetic sector is carried out through the identification of its configuration and the prevailing work relations.
The Impact of Lifelong Learning Policies on the Inclusion of Vulnerable Groups^2008^EASTERN EUROPEAN COUNTRYSIDE^This paper presents the findings of a research project aiming to evaluate the "Impact of Lifelong Learning Policies on the Inclusion of Vulnerable Groups". The research approached lifelong learning as a "mediator" of social inclusion policies, especially those aiming at the integration of vulnerable groups in the labour market. The rural-urban dichotomy and the question of immigration, both in the rural and urban contexts, have also been central issues in the research. Fieldwork was conducted through personal interviews, Internet surveys and focus groups in the eight countries participating in the research. In 7 countries: Greece, Denmark, Germany and Spain the research concentrated on immigrants and ethnic minorities; while in UK, Poland and Hungary they concentrated on disadvantaged rural communities.
Methodology for the Inclusion of the Latin American Rural populations in the Technologies of the Next Generation Network (NGN).^2008^IMETI 2008: INTERNATIONAL MULTI-CONFERENCE ON ENGINEERING AND TECHNOLOGICAL INNOVATION, VOL III, POST-CONFERENCE ISSUE, PROCEEDINGS^This Works of investigation proposes the study, the conformation of work groups, the analysis and the generation of proposals to impel the development of the telecommunications; based on new technologies, with the purpose of serving in the rural and indigenous areas of Latin America. According to the index of human development of 2007, in the countries of Latin America are one great difference of the percentage of penetration of the services of communications between the urban zones and the rural and indigenous zones. This difference results in the underprivileged disposition of these social groups for the access to mass media, generating a breach differential between the zones of greater resources and these populations. One of the reasons by which this deficiency of services exists, is that the present telecommunications companies are not offering alternative viable for these geographic zones, given to the dispersion of their populations and the own characteristics of the used technologies. Therefore, the study of the networks of next generation sets out (Wimax, WiFi, WVoIP, VoIP, MESH protocol, among others); since the implantation cost can be transformed to a fraction of the traditional technologies and its operation tinder protocol IP and in the wireless form (wireless IP); it allows to integration and the handling through less expensive technological elements with a cover for the referenced populations.
Cyber kiosks and dilemmas of social inclusion in rural India^NOV 2007^MEDIA CULTURE &amp; SOCIETY^Enhanced deployment of information and communication technologies (ICTs) is considered as a major factor in eliminating vestiges of feudal social organization and hierarchies in rural Asia, and a techno-development paradigm of social change inherited from the industrial era is envisioned. South Asia has particularly witnessed massive proliferation of civil-society-based development initiatives to demonstrate ICTs' potential to provide unprecedented social and economic opportunities for vulnerable groups such as women and marginalized communities. Social exclusion is often understood as a matter of lack of awareness and inappropriate project design, and incorporation of gender concerns 'from the very beginning of the project design' is suggested as a more or less universal solution for enhancing participation. This article challenges this conventional wisdom and argues that civil society's engagement with ICTs has not been successful in bridging the social divides it attempted to address. The patterns of ICTs' deployment and control in the rural setting tend to reinforce existing social divides and, in certain cases, create new divides. The participation of women and the underprivileged in these projects is abysmally low and this is in striking contrast to the projected image of these initiatives as being overtly sensitive to issues of gender and social divisions. The article argues that the question of inclusion is better understood when addressed as a matter of structure rather choice.
Issues in mental health nursing^2007-Oct^Issues in mental health nursing^None
Working children and educational inclusion in Yemen^SEP 2007^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^The Republic of Yemen has a very high number of working children, employed in a variety of occupations, ranging from street vending to guards on farms, and domestic labour. Including these children in formal education is a major challenge facing the Republic, which has one of the lowest rates of female participation in primary education in the world, and a very underdeveloped non-formal sector. In a context where poverty levels are very high, particularly in rural areas, families remain under significant financial pressure to rely on children's work to supplement, or indeed provide, their income and survival. This broader context challenges school-based efforts to include working children, particularly where initiatives aiming to improve the quality of the formal system are only just beginning to make an impact. This paper discusses key challenges of providing education to working children in Yemen, focusing on the work of the International Labour Organisation's International Programme for the Elimination of Child Labour (IPEC) and some of the issues that it faces in using schooling as a strategy to prevent child labour. (C) 2007 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Wireless network architecture for digital inclusion in rural environments^2007^2007 FIRST INTERNATIONAL GLOBAL INFORMATION INFRASTRUCTURE SYMPOSIUM^None
Rurality and social inclusion: A case of preschool education^DEC 2006^SOCIAL POLICY &amp; ADMINISTRATION^This paper begins by reviewing several of the ways in which social inclusion has been conceptualized in the literature. The paper then explores these approaches in the context of the provision of preschool education in rural Scotland. Preschool education is viewed by government as a powerful weapon in the fight against social exclusion, but higher per capita costs in rural areas as well as the availability and cost of transport are major problems, raising questions in turn about inclusive models of provision. Moreover, many parents are sceptical about their ability to access preschool education for their children while also continuing their own engagement in the labour market (a central pillar of social inclusion policy). Issues of choice, quality and governance arise and these are discussed in depth. The paper concludes with some reflections on the concept of social inclusion in the light of this case study.
Social geographies of rural mental health: experiencing inclusions and exclusions^DEC 2004^TRANSACTIONS OF THE INSTITUTE OF BRITISH GEOGRAPHERS^A dominant urban focus in previous research on the social geographies of mental health has obscured the experiences of people with mental health problems living in rural localities. Critiquing this urban focus, we report on research conducted in the rural and remote Scottish Highlands. Evidence derived from in-depth interviews with over 100 users of psychiatric services in the Highlands is deployed to investigate the complex socio-spatial dynamics of inclusion and exclusion experienced by these users on a daily basis. A discussion of the explanations that users themselves offer of their experiences is accompanied by a theoretical framing of these issues pivoting on relations of proximity-distance and intimacy-repulsion.
Ethnic inclusion and exclusion - Managing the language of Hispanic integration in a rural community^OCT 2004^JOURNAL OF CONTEMPORARY ETHNOGRAPHY^This article is part of a larger qualitative project on the processes of Hispanic social integration in a rural Southern Illinois community. Findings indicate that Anglo insiders and outsiders describe the changes associated with Hispanic settlement by using a dualistic language of ethnocentrism and paternalism. I suggest that the discourse of inclusion is double edged because (1) it treads lightly on the sensitive nature of interethnic relations so that no one is offended, yet (2) it allows for the sentiment, especially among Anglos, that this is "our country" and Hispanics should "fit-in." A complex language of quasi-ethnocentrism is in operation that allows for Hispanic incorporation but only to the extent that it is 'fair" and not based on "special" ethnic considerations. Building oil critical race theory and other linguistic frameworks, several theoretical approaches are employed to understand the relationship between normative exclusion, language, paternalism, and ethnicity.
Health information and libraries journal^2004-Sep^Health information and libraries journal^None
Social capital, social inclusion and services for people with learning disabilities^MAY 2004^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^Both social capital and social inclusion have emerged as significant concepts for human services in the last decade and yet their inter-relationship remains largely unexplored. This article argues that, whilst they are similar in their vision for a healthy society, they adopt sufficiently different perspectives to stimulate and challenge each other. This can be well illustrated by reference to services for people with a learning disability. Commissioners and providers of learning disability services are encouraged through this article to harness both concepts in order to assist in the process of modernizing services and increasing life opportunities for the people they support. It is argued that it is not possible to understand the full consequences of adopting either theoretical position without an adequate understanding of the other. Examples are given of the implications of this for advocacy services, day opportunities, rural communities, transition and staff training.
Social or economic goals, civic inclusion or exclusion? An analysis of rural development theory and practice^JAN 2004^SOCIOLOGIA RURALIS^Based on research conducted in Northern Ireland, this article examines two aspects of rural development practice. Firstly, it examines the emphasis given to social and civic development alongside economic development. Secondly, the idea that partnerships represent increased democracy and civic participation is explored. The theoretical framework is informed by the social capital debate, with particular reference to the work of Robert Putnam. It is argued that the social capital debate clarifies the importance of economic goals vis-a-vis social and civic goals. it is further argued that the social capital debate gives renewed impetus to a romantic naive view of rural communities, where civic harmony and inclusion triumphs and there is little room for power struggles, exclusionary tactics by privileged groups, or ideological conflicts. This research corroborates that the rural development process is mired by difficulties because of unrealistic expectations, inadequate specification of goals, and a lack of central government responsibility for the process. It is suggested that the problems posed by area-based development do not represent questions for local partnerships to address, but rather ones that must be taken up by national governments.
Micro-businesses and social inclusion in rural households: A comparative analysis^OCT 2003^SOCIOLOGIA RURALIS^The In this paper we bring together arguments developed from three conceptual frameworks: the embeddedness of household economic behaviour the processes of social inclusion and exclusion; and ideas of choice and well-being. Our study is based on a comparative analysis of self-employed micro-business households in two rural locations: the Lofoten Islands in northern Norway and Northumberland in northern England. It explores the ways in which micro-businesses may limit social exclusion and promote rural development. Household behaviour and decision making are compared in different policy contexts and different micro contexts inside the household itself We demonstrate that the role that business activity plays in combating social exclusion is by no means straight forward. Choices by households and the individuals within households play a key role in determining perceptions of well-being. We demonstrate that well-being is made up through decisions made across a range of different spheres of inclusion such as family, community, gender and paid and unpaid work roles. The findings have implications for the formulation of rural development policies.
Federal register^2002-Dec-31^Federal register^None
Endogenous development, social capital and social inclusion: Perspectives from LEADER in the UK^APR 2000^SOCIOLOGIA RURALIS^There is a danger of subscribing too readily to the rhetoric of participative development. The communitarian assumptions of the endogenous approach privilege a 'territory' as potentially homogenous and gloss over internal socio-economic and cultural inequality. The insights of Bourdieu are particularly instructive here. This paper argues that LEADER-type programmes need to include pro-active action targeted at raising the social and cultural capital of individuals and of disadvantaged groups (either of which happen to be in the area, but not innately defined by the area). The ideas are illustrated in relation to LEADER in the United Kingdom.
The inclusion of pupils with a chronic health condition in mainstream school: what does it mean for teachers?^SPR 2000^EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH^This paper reports on a study which investigated the support needs of pupils in mainstream school with a chronic illness or physical disability. The research was carried out in three local education authorities covering both rural and urban areas. In-depth, qualitative data were collected from 33 pupils in secondary school; 58 parents of primary and secondary school pupils; and 34 primary and secondary school teachers. Overall, the data from young people suggest variability in the support offered to pupils by teachers, even by teachers within the same school, and highlights the importance of teachers' awareness and understanding of special health needs. A number of areas where young people need support from teachers were identified, including: dealing with school absence; taking part in school activities; peer relationships; explaining the condition to other pupils; and having someone to talk to about health-related worries. Data from teachers and parents indicate that school staff need assistance with obtaining health-related information; ensuring health-related information is passed between and within schools; providing emotional support; the provision of medical care; and coordinating support for this group of pupils. The implications of the findings for teachers, schools and educational policy are discussed.
Journal of health &amp; social policy^2000^Journal of health &amp; social policy^None
The thoughts and behaviors of learners in the inclusion style of teaching^OCT 1998^JOURNAL OF TEACHING IN PHYSICAL EDUCATION^The purpose of this study was to describe student decision making in the inclusion style of teaching. Two questions helped to guide the investigation: (a) Will learners select from alternative levels of difficulty within a given task? And (b) what is the basis for learner decision making when selecting from alternative levels of difficulty? Forty-two 5th-graders in one school received instruction in striking with a bat for two 30-minute lessons. The learners performed a batting task in three sets of 10 trials in each lesson and made decisions about level of task difficulty. Data sources were the lesson task sheets and transcribed postlesson interviews. The results indicated that 5th-graders (a) select different levels of task difficulty when provided the opportunity, and (b) make task decisions based on perceived success and challenge.
From exclusion to inclusion: Racial politics and South African educational reform^JUN 1996^ANTHROPOLOGY &amp; EDUCATION QUARTERLY^Research in South African schools reveals that racially segregated eduction established under apartheid is being dismantled. Most current change impacts formerly white schools and private schools; African and rural schools lag behind. A series of blocking factors are obstacles to participation in democratic rebuilding. Some demand extraordinary measures to eliminate historical inequities; others will be counteracted by official reforms complemented by local community initiatives. Progressive schools demonstrate the power of grassroots reform in eradicating apartheid.
Issues in comprehensive pediatric nursing^1994 Apr-Jun^Issues in comprehensive pediatric nursing^None
PROSPECTS AND PROBLEMS OF WOMEN SANITARIANS JUSTIFYING THEIR INCLUSION IN THE ENVIRONMENTAL-HEALTH PROFESSION - THE NIGERIAN SITUATION^OCT 1991^JOURNAL OF THE ROYAL SOCIETY OF HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.259  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2000  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion Body Herpesvirus Hepatitis in Captive Falcons in the Middle East: A Review of Clinical and Pathologic Findings^MAR 2019^JOURNAL OF AVIAN MEDICINE AND SURGERY^Inclusion body hepatitis in falcons is caused by a herpesvirus designated Falconid HV-1. This herpesvirus and other herpesviruses affecting birds of prey have not been assigned to a genus and include inclusion body herpesvirus hepatitis in eagles (Accipitrid HV-1) and inclusion body herpesvirus hepatitis in owls (Strigid HV-1). Herpesvirus infections have been diagnosed in both captive and free-living raptors across Europe, North America, and Asia in different species of the family Falconidae. Herpesviruses affecting owls and falcons have been found to be antigenically similar to pigeon herpesvirus (Columbid HV-1) and distinct from other avian herpesviruses. When the herpesvirus isolates from owls, falcons, and pigeons were compared by sequencing a fragment of the herpes viral DNA polymerase gene from those birds naturally infected with the virus, the sequences from these 3 sources were found to be nearly identical. The authors of this study concluded that the Falconid HV-1, Strigid HV-1, and Columbid HV-1 were the same virus. Furthermore, the authors also proposed that the virus therefore be referred to as Columbid HV-1 (CoHV-1), because pigeons may be responsible for the transmission of the virus to birds of prey. Pigeons are often carriers of the virus without showing any clinical signs. It has long been suspected that raptors may contract the infection by the ingestion of infected pigeons. Some studies have suggested that falcons may not contract the infection through the oral route by ingesting carrier pigeons, but through the ocular or nasal route. Inclusion body herpesvirus hepatitis is a frequently diagnosed disease in the captive falcon population used for falconry, racing, and breeding in the Middle East, and it seems to be associated with the extensive use of pigeons for training and as a food item. This paper reviews the clinical and pathological findings in falcons affected by inclusion body herpesvirus hepatitis in the Middle East.
An analysis of inclusion gaps in sustainable development themes: Findings from a review of recent social work literature^MAR 2019^INTERNATIONAL SOCIAL WORK^Recently, humans have negatively altered ecosystems more rapidly and extensively than in any other time in human history, contributing to gains in well-being and economic development for some, while threatening the security of most, particularly oppressed populations. We comprehensively reviewed recent social work literature (2010-2015) to examine gaps in environmental sustainability themes relevant to social work practice. Peer-reviewed manuscripts, dissertations/theses and white papers were examined. A total of 71 papers (less than 1% of social work literature) met inclusion criteria. Although our call is to protect human health and well-being, recent literature does not account for sustainability even with evidence that environmental issues directly impact clients, hindering practice efficacy.
Thorough characterization and stability of HP-beta-cyclodextrin thymol inclusion complexes prepared by microwave technology: A required approach to a successful application in food industry^FEB 2019^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^BACKGROUND The aims of the present study were to obtain a stable dry powder formulation of cyclodextrins (CDs) encapsulating thymol, for successful use as an ingredient on an industrial scale, and to characterize the thymol-CDs complexes using different techniques. RESULTS Thymol was successfully solubilized in aqueous solutions and the Kc value increased with the pH of the media until the pH was neutral, giving the highest values (2583 +/- 176 L mol(-1)) for HP-beta-cyclodextrins (HP-beta-CDs). The best encapsulation efficiency of thymol in solid complexes was obtained using the microwave (MWI) encapsulation method. The different characterization techniques have demonstrated the affinity of HP-beta-CDs for thymol molecules, forming stable complexes. CONCLUSIONS The results support the use of the MWI method in the preparation of solid HP-beta-CD-thymol complexes, due to greater encapsulation efficiency and technological and economic advantages for industrial applications. (c) 2018 Society of Chemical Industry
Inclusion of prebiotics on the viability of a commercial Lactobacillus casei subsp. rhamnosus culture in a tropical fruit beverage^FEB 2019^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY-MYSORE^The viability of probiotics in the development of functional tropical fruit beverages is a technological challenge that may benefit from the addition of prebiotics, due to the synergistic (synbiotic) interaction. This study evaluated the viability of a commercial probiotic (Lactobacillus casei) in a blended red fruit beverage (RFB; 20% strawberry, 10% blackberry and 5% papaya), enriched with three separate prebiotics: inulin (IN), fructooligosaccharides (FOS) and galactooligosaccharides, added at 1 and 5%. The consumer preference for the beverages was also examined. The inoculum was produced in MRS broth supplemented with 10% RFB, which reached the exponential phase (9.96 log CFUmL(-1)) after incubation at 37 degrees C for 24h. In search of the probiotic strain's adaptation and viability in the presence of the different prebiotics (measured by optical density, OD600 nm), the prebiotics were added to MRS broth at 1 and 5%. Since 1% IN (OD=3.99 +/- 0.36) and 1% FOS (OD=3.48 +/- 0.28) were the most significant, these treatments, without inoculation of probiotics, were assessed by the sensory panel. Although neither RFB was significantly preferred the RFB with 1% IN received the greatest number of responses (n=33/60). Its effect on the viability of L. casei inoculated in the RFB was monitored by the growth kinetics at 37 degrees C for 50h. The findings indicated that fortification with 1% IN could have a possible protective effect on the stability of L. casei in RFBs, highlighting the use of tropical fruits as potential carriers of probiotics.
Inclusion of Sunflower Oil in the Bovine Diet Improves Milk Nutritional Profile^FEB 2019^NUTRIENTS^Milk and its derivatives are important foods that contribute to daily nutrient requirements and improve consumers' health. This study evaluated the effects of supplementing the diet of lactating dairy cows with sunflower oil (SFO), selenium, and vitamin E on the milk's fatty acid profile and fat oxidative stability as well as the acceptability of the milk by consumers. For this purpose, 32 Jersey dairy cows were allocated to four treatment groups for 60 days, as follows: C (control diet); A (3.5 mg/kg DM (dry matter) organic selenium + 2000 IU vitamin E/cow per day); O (4% SFO DM); OA (equal doses of A and O treatments). The inclusion of SFO decreased the contents of 10:0, 10:1, 11:0, 12:0, 12:1, 14:0, and 9c-14:1 fatty acids as well as odd- and branched-chain fatty acids (13:0, iso 13:0, anteiso 13:0, 15:0, iso 15:0, and 17:0). There was also a tendency for 8:0 and 16:0 fatty acid concentrations to decrease when SFO was included in the cows ' diet. SFO decreased the concentration of 10:0 to 15:0 fatty acids in milk. The sum of the conjugated linoleic acids (CLAs), conjugated alpha-linolenic acid intermediates (CLnAs; 18:3 6 + 18:3 3), and 22:0 fatty acids in milk tended to increase, and there were significant increases in 18:0 and 9c11t-18:2 with SFO. In terms of the effects of SFO on the health-related lipid indices, the atherogenicity index tended to decrease and h/H tended to increase. When cows were supplemented with antioxidants, the concentration of 20:2 fatty acids decreased, the 6 + 7 + 8 + 9t-18:1, 16t-18:1, 20:0, 22:2, and 24:0 fatty acid concentrations increased, and there was a trend for the 22:1 9 fatty acid concentration to increase with antioxidants plus oil. There was a tendency for 6 fatty acids and 6/3 to increase with milk treated with antioxidants plus oil. The oxidative stability of milk was not influenced by the presence of SFO or antioxidants in the diet of dairy cows. Consumers desired the color and mouthfeel of the milk that was treated with SFO. Cows fed with 4% sunflower oil produced milk with an improved fatty acid profile for human nutrition, containing a higher CLA content and an improved ratio of hypocholesterolemic and hypercholesterolemic fatty acids, without increasing the milk's susceptibility to oxidation. The milk was also rated as being more acceptable by consumers.
Effects of inclusion rate of high fiber dietary ingredients on apparent ileal, hindgut, and total tract digestibility of dry matter and nutrients in ingredients fed to growing pigs^FEB 2019^ANIMAL FEED SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^An experiment was conducted to determine if values for the coefficient of ileal apparent digestibility (CLAD), the coefficient of hindgut apparent disappearance (CHAD), and the coefficient of total tract apparent digestibility (CTTAD) of dry matter (DM) and nutrients in high-fiber ingredients measured at 150 g/kg inclusion are also accurate if measured at 300 g/kg inclusion in diets fed to pigs. The second objective was to confirm that most of the insoluble dietary fiber (IDF) is not fermented by growing pigs. Twenty ileal-cannulated pigs (BW: 30.64 +/- 2.09 kg) were allotted to a replicated 10 x 4 incomplete Latin Square design with 10 diets and four 26-d periods. There were 2 pigs per diet in each period for a total of 8 replications per diet. A corn and soybean meal (SBM) basal diet and a corn-SBM diet with 300 g/kg corn starch were formulated. Six diets were formulated by replacing 150 or 300 g/kg corn starch by 150 or 300 g/kg corn germ meal (CGM), sugar beet pulp (SBP), or wheat middlings (WM). Two additional diets were formulated by adding 150 or 300 g/kg canola meal (CM) to the diet containing corn, SBM, and 300 g/kg corn starch at the expense of corn and SBM. Effects of inclusion rate of each fiber source in the diet on CLAD, CHAD, and CTTAD of DM and nutrients were analyzed using orthogonal contrasts. Independent t-tests were used to compare inclusion rates within each ingredient. Results indicated that CLAD and CHAD of CP, acid hydrolyzed ether extract (AEE), and most fiber fractions in CM decreased (P &lt; 0.05) as inclusion level increased from 150 to 300 g/kg, but that was not the case for CGM, SBP, or WM. The CTTAD of DM, organic matter (OM), AEE, and soluble dietary fiber (SDF) in CGM increased (P &lt; 0.05) if 300 g/kg rather than 150 g/kg was included in the diet and CTTAD of DM, OM, acid detergent fiber, and SDF in WM increased (P &lt; 0.05) as inclusion level increased. No differences in CTTAD of DM and nutrients in CM and SBP were observed between inclusion rates. The CTTAD of IDF ranged from 0.529 in WM included at 150 g/kg to 0.862 in SBP included at 300 g/kg in the diet. In conclusion, CLAD, CHAD, and CTTAD of most nutrients in test ingredients is not different between 150 and 300 g/kg inclusion rate. Under the conditions of this experiment, there was relatively high digestibility of IDF.
Longitudinal effects of human supremacy beliefs and vegetarianism threat on moral exclusion (vs. inclusion) of animals^FEB 2019^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SOCIAL PSYCHOLOGY^Stronger beliefs in human supremacy over animals, and stronger perceived threat posed by vegetarianism to traditional practices, are associated with stronger speciesism and more meat consumption. Both variables might also be implicated in the moral exclusion of animals. We tested this potential in a 16-month longitudinal study in the USA (N = 219). Human supremacy showed longitudinal effects on the moral exclusion of all animals. Vegetarianism threat only predicted moral exclusion of food animals (e.g., cows and pigs), and, unexpectedly, appealing wild animals (e.g., chimps and dolphins). These findings demonstrate the importance of both human supremacy and perceived threat in explaining moral exclusion of animals and highlight potential paradoxical negative consequences of the rise of vegetarianism.
EFFECT OF COWPEA (VIGNA UNGUICULATA (L.) WALP.) STOVER DIETARY INCLUSION LEVEL ON TOTAL TRACT APPARENT DIGESTIBILITY OF NUTRIENTS IN GROWING RABBITS^JAN-MAR 2019^WORLD RABBIT SCIENCE^Although agro-industrial co-products have low economic value as foods for human consumption, they may have potential value as animal feedstuffs. This experiment was carried out to evaluate the effect of cowpea stover inclusion in rabbits' diet on growth performance and nutrient digestibility. A total of 180 animals were randomly assigned to 3 treatments (CSO, CS2 or CS4, with no inclusion, 20 or 40 g/kg of cowpea stover, respectively). Animal performance was evaluated between the 53rd and 67th d of age in 48 animals per treatment. The coefficients of total tract apparent digestibility (CTTAD) of organic matter, crude protein, neutral detergent fibre and gross energy were measured between 63 to 67 d of age in 12 animals per treatment. Results showed that, in general, CTTAD values were not affected by the inclusion of cowpea stover. Nevertheless, a trend towards a decrease in crude protein digestibility (P=0.0848) was observed when including cowpea stover. This had a negative influence on digestible protein (P=0.0240) and on the ratio between digestible protein and digestible energy (P=0.0231) for diet CS4. Rabbits showed normal figures for growth rate (on ay. 46.8 g/d), feed intake (on ay. 168.3 g/d) and feed conversion ratio (on ay. 3.61). Future studies should assess the possibility of incorporating higher levels of cowpea stover while analysing the economic impact of this inclusion.
Normative Criteria and Their Inclusion in a Regulatory Framework for New Plant Varieties Derived From Genome Editing^DEC 19 2018^FRONTIERS IN BIOENGINEERING AND BIOTECHNOLOGY^Any legal regulation has to take into account fundamental interests and concerns, whether of private or public nature. This applies in particular to the politically and socially sensitive question of regulating plant biotechnology. With the advent of new breeding techniques, such as genome editing, new challenges are arising for legislators around the world. However, in coping with them not only the technical particularities of the new breeding techniques must be taken into account but also the diverse and sometimes conflicting interests of the various stakeholders. In order to be able to draft a suitable regulatory regime for these new techniques, the different interests and concerns at play are identified. Subsequently, a determination is made on how these interests relate to each other, before regulatory concepts to reconcile the conflicting demands are presented. The examined normative criteria, which can have an impact on regulatory decisions regarding genome edited plants and products derived from them, include: industry interests, farmer interests, public opinion, consumer rights and interests, human health and food safety, food security, environmental protection, consistency, and coherence of the regulatory framework and ethical or religious convictions. Since those interests differ from country to country depending on the respective political, economic, and social circumstances, the respective legislator has the task of identifying these normative criteria and must find a suitable balance between them. To this end, a concept is developed on how the different interests can be related to each other and how to deal with conflicting and irreconcilable demands. Additionally, a legislator may have recourse to a number of further analyzed regulatory measures. An approval or notification procedure can be used for a risk assessment or a socio-economic evaluation. Coexistence measures and labeling provisions are able to reconcile interests that are at odds with each other and the precautionary principle can justify certain safeguard measures. As a result, the individual country-specific regulatory outcomes regarding genome edited plants are likely to be as manifold as the interests and regulatory measures at hand.
Predicting Phyllaplysia taylori (Anaspidea: Aplysiidae) presence in Northeastern Pacific estuaries to facilitate grazer community inclusion in eelgrass restoration^DEC 15 2018^ESTUARINE COASTAL AND SHELF SCIENCE^Estuarine biodiversity is impacted by climate change and anthropogenic use due to the high productivity of estuarine ecosystems and convenient human use of nearshore areas. Human use of estuaries (e.g. with dredging, filling, and invasive species introductions) has decimated subtidal and marsh ecosystems, thus making them the focus of major restoration efforts. Submerged aquatic vegetation (SAV) such as eelgrass beds, and their associated communities, fall under these restoration efforts, especially in San Francisco Bay. Diverse eelgrass communities that include grazers, such as Phyllaplysia taylori, have been shown to maintain eelgrass health and promote increased biodiversity. This study addresses the need for simple, predictive models based on field data for use in SAV restoration that incorporates grazer diversity. Predictive models with ecological, abiotic, and landscape variables were generated that explained the presence of P. taylori in eelgrass beds along the coast of the western United States and seasonal patterns in population density. While surprising, the exclusion of abiotic factors in presence/absence model selection suggested that non-point source runoff promotes P. taylori populations via increased food and turbidity, resulting in decreased predation. P. taylori presence within eelgrass beds was best predicted by the positive impacts of nearshore irrigated land, vegetated land, and bare soil land. P. taylori abundance over time within one site was best described by the positive effects of eelgrass density and eelgrass length and the negative effects of epiphytic coverage and average temperature. These models were used to predict habitat suitability for P. taylori in seventeen San Francisco Bay eelgrass restoration areas in various phases of completion, indicating a 53% P. taylori success rate. Incorporating population persistence knowledge from the SAV-associated invertebrate perspective is a step towards grazer community-minded restoration tactics.
Effects of inclusion of porcine blood hydrolysate on physico-chemical quality, oxidative and microbial stability of pork batter stored at (4 +/- 1 degrees C)^DEC 2018^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY-MYSORE^Present study was conducted to evaluate the anti-oxidant and anti-microbial efficiency of porcine blood hydrolysate (PBH) in refrigerated pork batter. PBH produced by alcalase was included into pork batter at different levels viz. PBH1-0.03, PBH2-0.06 and PBH3-0.09% (w/w) and compared with control (C-0%) and positive control (PC-0.02% BHT w/w). The pH increased, whereas water activity, extract release volume and emulsion stability decreased during storage; however, all these parameters were better maintained in the treated groups. Anti-oxidant efficacy of treatments improved in a concentration dependent manner. Peroxide, thiobarbituric acid reacting substances and free fatty acid values were significantly lower than control throughout storage. The colour and microbial quality was better maintained in treatments than C and PC. In microbial challenge test, counts of tested microbes in treatment batter reduced up to 4th day but increased thereafter. Results suggest that PBH can be utilized as a potential component to improve physico-chemical quality, colour, oxidative and microbial stability of meat batter during refrigerated storage.
Fast-dissolving carvacrol/cyclodextrin inclusion complex electrospun fibers with enhanced thermal stability, water solubility, and antioxidant activity^DEC 2018^JOURNAL OF MATERIALS SCIENCE^Carvacrol is a known antioxidant molecule and commonly used in food and cosmetics as a flavor and fragrance agent; however, carvacrol has major issues such as high volatility, low water solubility, and stability. In this study, carvacrol/cyclodextrin inclusion complex fibers (carvacrol/CD-IC fibers) were produced via electrospinning in order to enhance thermal stability, water solubility and shelf-life of carvacrol having antioxidant activity. The phase solubility and computational modeling studies showed that carvacrol can form inclusion complexes with two types of modified CDs, hydroxypropyl-beta-cyclodextrin (HP beta CD) and hydroxypropyl-gamma-cyclodextrin (HP gamma CD). The carvacrol/cyclodextrin inclusion complex electrospun fibers (carvacrol/HP beta CD-IC fibers and carvacrol/HP gamma CD-IC fibers) were obtained as free-standing fibrous webs. Although pure carvacrol is highly volatile, the electrospun carvacrol/CD-IC fibers were quite effective to preserve high amount of carvacrol due to the inclusion complexation. In addition, carvacrol/CD-IC fibers have shown higher temperature stability for carvacrol. Moreover, carvacrol/CD-IC fibers showed more effective antioxidant activity as compared to pure carvacrol. The carvacrol/CD-IC fibrous webs have shown fast-dissolving character in water due to the enhanced water solubility of carvacrol/CD-IC and their ultrafine fiber structure. In short, encapsulation of carvacrol in electrospun CD-IC fibrous webs has shown potentials for food and oral care applications due to free-standing and fast-dissolving character along with high water solubility, high temperature stability and enhanced antioxidant by carvacrol/cyclodextrin inclusion complexation.
Quick changes of milk fatty acids after inclusion or suppression of linseed oil in the diet of goats^NOV 2018^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.422  </td>  <td>2.733</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Cross-country Evidence of the Relationship Between Resilience and the Subjective Perception of Well-being and Social Inclusion: Evidence from the Regions of Matam (Senegal) and the Triangle of Hope (Mauritania)^NOV 2018^JOURNAL OF INTERNATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^Resilience, commonly perceived as an unobservable household characteristic, has been defined differently according to each measurement approach utilized. This paper contributes to the literature, both conceptually, by reviewing the link between resilience, subjective well-being and social inclusion; and analytically, by providing statistical evidence of whether subjective measures of well-being are associated with higher household resilience. The paper shows that those who perceive themselves and their community to be involved in the decision-making process related to policies and service provision are associated with greater resilience capacity. The empirical evidence is based on two household surveys in Senegal and Mauritania. Copyright (c) 2017 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Ltd.
Fish sausages prepared with inclusion of Nile tilapia minced: Correlation between nutritional, chemical, and physical properties^OCT 2018^JOURNAL OF FOOD PROCESSING AND PRESERVATION^The aim of the study was to develop fish sausages and to identify the nutritional and technological effects of the increasing inclusion of minced fish (MF) derived from wastes of Nile tilapia processing. The sausages showed an increasing decrease in moisture and protein content, with consequent increase in fat, ash, and mineral content with inclusion from zero to 100% MF. The formulations had a good fatty acid profile and stood out because they did not have trans fat. The product showed higher red color intensity and higher red color intensity and adhesiveness indice, and lower hardness and chewiness indices as the inclusion of MF increased. Through Pearson's correlation coefficients, all the studied variables showed positive or negative correlation, confirming the influence of the MF addition on the developed sausages and evidencing the interaction importance of the components in the final product quality. The sausage developed with 50% MF was considered the ideal formulation. Practical applications In a scenario of constant competitiveness in the food sector, the development of new products focusing on the use of agroindustrial waste is closely related to current consumer trends. Fish is an excellent source of animal protein with a wide range of essential nutrients; therefore, there is a growing interest in the manufacture of innovative fish products that ensure mainly the use of minced fish, making possible the sustainable management of fish agribusiness. This study complies with the commitment of environmental protection due to the reduction, to practically zero, of the fish processing wastes.
Controlled Release System by Active Gelatin Film Incorporated with beta-Cyclodextrin-Thymol Inclusion Complexes^SEP 2018^FOOD AND BIOPROCESS TECHNOLOGY^Essential oils such as thymol are added to food packaging film to obtain active films with antimicrobial and antioxidant properties. However, thymol is insoluble in water, and release rate of thymol is usually too fast. Therefore, a need exists to increase thymol solubility and to deliver thymol in a controlled manner from film matrix to food surface. In this study, spray dried inclusion complexes of beta-cyclodextrin/thymol (1:1 molar ratio) was incorporated into gelatin solution to obtain active gelatin films. Both inclusion complexes and active films showed sustained release of thymol. Physical properties and thymol release kinetics were evaluated for active films. For gelatin films with 8.25% (mass ratio) inclusion complexes, complete thymol release took 235 h, compared with 38 h for thymol release from inclusion complexes. The diffusion coefficient reached 2.04 x 10(-15) m(2) s(-1).
Conceptions about the inclusion of people with disabilities in food and beverage companies from the city of Guayaquil - Ecuador^AUG-NOV 2018^REVISTA GESTION DE LAS PERSONAS Y TECNOLOGIA^This article presents the results of a qualitative cross-sectional study that analyzed the perceptions of 26 people regarding their disability status and explored the perceptions of 12 executives of human talent working in food companies in the city of Guayaquil. The food companies were chosen because they are the productive sector in the city of Guayaquil that provides employment to the greatest number of people in a situation of physical disability; the techniques used were the semi-structured interview and focus groups, both techniques, supported by a script of questions, the data that were collected later were analyzed through the construction of emerging categories in order to understand the perceptions and particular meanings that the disability has, both for the people who live this reality as well as for the Human Talent managers who carry out tasks of labor inclusion of this important group; It is concluded that both groups studied have coincident and divergent criteria on the results of labor inclusion and that despite the actions developed from the central administration, there are still conditions of injustice and disrespect for their rights.
Impact of inclusion of flaxseed oil (pre-emulsified or encapsulated) on the physical characteristics of chicken sausages^AUG 2018^JOURNAL OF FOOD ENGINEERING^Functional meat products containing elevated omega-3 (n-3) fatty acids, such as alpha-linolenic acid (ALA), may be formulated by replacing animal fat with flaxseed oil, but the addition of flaxseed oil to meat products can adversely affect sensory properties, particularly textural properties. The objective of this study was to investigate how different methods of flaxseed oil incorporation into chicken sausages affected their physical characteristics, as assessed by proximate composition, water holding capacity, water and fat binding capacity, cook loss, texture profile analysis (TPA), rheological analysis and nuclear magnetic resonance relaxometry (NMR). Sausages were formulated to contain enough ALA to meet the European Food Safety Authority requirements for nutrient and health claims (0.6 g per 100 g and 100 kcal) and compared with a non-oil containing control (C). Flaxseed oil, as a source of ALA, was incorporated in the following forms: direct addition (0); pre-emulsified (E); encapsulated and freezedried (F); encapsulated with cross-linker genipin and freeze-dried (G); encapsulated and spray-dried (S). When compared to the other formulations, the F and G formulations had lower values for storage and loss modulus and for all TPA measurements (p &lt;= 0.05). G and S formulations had lower values (p &lt;= 0.05) for cook loss than the other formulations. NMR showed that water populations in the G and S formulations behaved differently during heating compared to the other formulations. In summary, the physical characteristics of sausages were affected by flaxseed oil incorporation method, with encapsulation methods having the greatest impact compared to direct or pre-emulsified oil addition. (C) 2018 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Functionalization of Lipid-Based Nutrient Supplement with -Cyclodextrin Inclusions of Oregano Essential Oil^JUN 2018^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.081  </td>  <td>2.416</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effect of quality and origin of technical sucrose solutions on the inclusion of colourants into the sugar crystal matrix^JUN 2018^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.422  </td>  <td>2.733</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of social networks in the inclusion of small-scale producers in agri-food developing clusters^MAY 2018^FOOD POLICY^This paper discusses how network theory and social capital can help explain different patterns of inclusion of small and medium sized producers in agri-food clusters. We make the argument that despite the centralized nature of practices, the manner in which inclusion takes place can vary significantly depending on structural features of local networks and governance factors, especially social capital and the role of lead organisations. Social network analysis allows us to investigate how different patterns of bonding, bridging and centrality of key actors in agricultural clusters can influence diffusion of knowledge. We frame this discussion through a typology that allows us to identify diverse scenarios of inclusion of small producers. This is then used to guide an empirical analysis of two agri-food clusters of small producers in Peru (mango) and Colombia (palm oil). Judicious use of mixed methods and the typology can prove useful to explain diverse patterns of inclusion which have important implications for small-scale agricultural producers.
Physicochemical Quality, Fatty Acid Composition, and Sensory Analysis of Nellore Steers Meat Fed with Inclusion of Condensed Tannin in the Diet^MAY 2018^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^This study was conducted to test the effect of dietary tannin on the fatty acid profile and sensory attributes of meat from Nellore steers. Thirty-two Nellore bull male were distributed in a completely randomized design and fed diets with condensed tannin extract as follows: 0, 10, 30, and 50 g/kg total DM basis. The physicochemical composition of the meat, lipid oxidation, fatty acid profile, flavor, tenderness, and overall acceptance were evaluated. There was a linear decrease (P &lt;= 0.05) on lipid content, tenderness, cooking weight loss, myristic, palmitic, and oleic acids in meat as tannin increased in the diets. The total saturated and monounsaturated fatty acids, the atherogenicity index decreased. However, a linear increase (P &lt;= 0.05) was observed for linoleic, linolenic, arachidonic, eicosapentaenoic, and docosapentaenoic acids. The physicochemical characteristic of the meat, such as moisture, ash, and protein contents, water retention capacity, final pH, Warner-Bratzler shear force, collagen, and color indexes (lightness, redness, yellowness, and chrome) did not change with dietary tannin. Also, CLA, n-6:n-3ratio, Delta(9)-desaturase, and elongase activity were not different among diets. In conclusion, condensed tannin linearly increases unsaturated fatty acids and decreases the atherogenicity index of meat; thus, it can be recommended at the highest level (50 g/kg DM) in the diet of Nellore steers.
Hydroxypropyl--cyclodextrin for Delivery of Baicalin via Inclusion Complexation by Supercritical Fluid Encapsulation^MAY 2018^MOLECULES^Over the years, various methods have been developed to enhance the solubility of insoluble drugs; however, most of these methods are time-consuming and labor intensive or involve the use of toxic materials. A method that can safely and effectively enhance the solubility of insoluble drugs is lacking. This study adopted baicalin as an insoluble drug model, and used hydroxypropyl--cyclodextrin for the delivery of baicalin via the inclusion complexation by supercritical fluid encapsulation. Different parameters for the complex preparation as well as the physicochemical properties of the complex have been investigated. Our results showed that when compared to the conventional solution mixing approach, supercritical fluid encapsulation enables a more precise control of the properties of the complex, and gives higher loading and encapsulation efficiency. It is anticipated that our reported method can be useful in enhancing the preparation efficiency of inclusion complexes, and can expand the application potential of insoluble herbal ingredients in treatment development and pharmaceutical formulation.
Newcastle disease virus-attenuated vaccine co-contaminated with fowl adenovirus and chicken infectious anemia virus results in inclusion body hepatitis-hydropericardium syndrome in poultry^MAY 2018^VETERINARY MICROBIOLOGY^Inclusion body hepatitis-hydropericardium syndrome (IBH-HPS) induced by fowl adenovirus type 4 (FAdV-4) has caused huge economic losses to the poultry industry of China, but the source of infection for different flocks, especially flocks with high biological safety conditions, has remained unclear. This study tested the pathogenicity of Newcastle disease virus (NDV)-attenuated vaccine from a large-scale poultry farm in China where IBH-HPS had appeared with high mortality. Analysis revealed that the NDV-attenuated vaccine in use from the abovementioned poultry farm was simultaneously contaminated with FAdV-4 and chicken infectious anemia virus (CIAV). The FAdV and CIAV isolated from the vaccine were purified for the artificial preparation of an NDV-attenuated vaccine singly contaminated with FAdV or CIAV, or simultaneously contaminated with both of them. Seven-day-old specific pathogen-free chicks were inoculated with the artificially prepared contaminated vaccines and tested for corresponding indices. The experiments showed that no hydropericardium syndrome (HPS) and corresponding death occurred after administering the NDV-attenuated vaccine singly contaminated with FAdV or CIAV, but a mortality of 75% with IBH-HPS was commonly found in birds after administering the NDV-attenuated vaccine co-contaminated with FAdV and CIAV. In conclusion, this study found the co-contamination of FAdV-4 and CIAV in the same attenuated vaccine and confirmed that such a contaminated attenuated vaccine was a significant source of infection for outbreaks of IBH-HPS in some flocks.
Effects of stocking densities of tilapia Oreochromis niloticus (Linnaeus, 1758) with the inclusion of silver carp Hypophthalmichthys molitrix (Valenciennes, 1844) in C/N-CP prawn Macrobrachium rosenbergii (De Man, 1879) culture pond^APR 2018^AQUACULTURE INTERNATIONAL^The effects of stocking density of tilapia Oreochromis niloticus with the inclusion of silver carp Hypophthalmichthys molitrix were evaluated in the C/N-CP prawn Macrobrachium rosenbergii farming system in triplicate. Management practices were same for all treatments. Bamboo side shoots were posted vertically into the pond bottoms as a periphyton substrate. A locally formulated and prepared feed containing 15.44% crude protein with a C/N ratio 15 were applied twice daily in all ponds. Maize flour was supplied in water for raising the C/N ratio 20 in all treatments. Water quality parameters, except transparency and chlorophyll a, did not differ significantly (P &gt; 0.05) among the treatments. The periphytic abundance and biomass differed significantly (P &lt; 0.05) among the treatments and even among different months. Although the individual harvesting weight, individual weight gain, and SGR were significantly higher (P &lt; 0.05) in the T-10000 treatment compared to T-15000 and T-20000 treatments, respectively, the gross and net yields of tilapia were significantly higher (P &lt; 0.05) in the treatment T-20000 followed by T-15000 and T-10000 treatments resulting in higher combined gross and net yield of both prawn and tilapia (16.05 and 16.92%, 32 and 33.59% from the later two treatments, respectively) with a higher economic return (BCR 0.53) during a 122-day culture period. As a whole, the study revealed that prawn, tilapia, and silver carp with a stocking density at 30,000, 20,000, and 1250 ha(-1), respectively, was found to provide an optimum and sustainable production as well as economic benefit in the C/N-CP-based culture system.
Inclusion complexes dispersed in polystyrene-based labels for fruit ripening on demand^FEB 2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^In this work, the inclusion complexes of -cyclodextrin and ethylene were prepared by molecular encapsulation and then dispersed into a polystyrene film by solvent casting to produce active polymeric labels. These labels were produced to control ripening of fruit directly in the food container as an alternative to the injection of ethylene into thermo-regulated chambers. The samples were characterised, and the ethylene release was found to be dependent on temperature and relative humidity in the atmosphere. Finally, experimental data were used to simulate a realistic scenario of fruit ripening into a food container, showing the possibility to trigger ripening with the active label within 2days. Polystyrene/inclusion complex labels showed insitu release of ethylene, potentially able to trigger ripening of fruit in a food container within desired time, reducing costs in the supply chain and postharvest losses.
Inclusion of pregnant and breastfeeding women in research - efforts and initiatives^FEB 2018^BRITISH JOURNAL OF CLINICAL PHARMACOLOGY^Pregnant and breastfeeding women have been rendered therapeutic orphans as they have been historically excluded from clinical trials. Labelling for most approved drugs does not provide information about safety and efficacy during pregnancy. This lack of data is mainly due to ethico-legal challenges that have remained entrenched in the post-diethylstilbestrol and thalidomide era, and that have led to pregnancy being viewed in the clinical trial setting primarily through a pharmacovigilance lens. Policy considerations that encourage and/or require the inclusion of pregnant or lactating women in clinical trials may address the current lack of available information. However, there are additional pragmatic strategies, such the employment of pharmacometric tools and the introduction of innovative clinical trial designs, which could improve knowledge about the safety and efficacy of medication use during pregnancy and lactation. This paper provides a broad overview of the pharmacoepidemiology of drugs used during pregnancy and lactation, and offers recommendations for regulators and researchers in academia and industry to increase the available pharmacokinetic and -dynamic understanding of medication use in pregnancy.
The Cultural Connotation of Japanese Food Utensils and Analysis of Its Inclusion of Chinese Elements^2018^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2018 INTERNATIONAL WORKSHOP ON EDUCATION REFORM AND SOCIAL SCIENCES (ERSS 2018)^In Japanese diet, various delicate utensils are used to hold food, so that people can enjoy delicious food while getting visual pleasure. As a neighbor of China, Japan's catering culture is deeply influenced by Chinese culture besides its own style. This paper deeply analyses the relationship between Japanese food utensils and Chinese culture from the aspects of the cultural characteristics of Japanese food utensils, the influence of Chinese ceramics on Japanese food utensils and the influence of Chinese art on Japanese food utensils. It can be seen from the analysis that Japanese diet culture is closely related to Chinese culture.
DETERMINATION OF CARBENDAZIM IN VEGETABLE AND SOIL SAMPLES BASED ON INCLUSION COMPLEX AND FLUORESCENCE SPECTROSCOPY^2018^FRESENIUS ENVIRONMENTAL BULLETIN^Carbendazim is one of the most active pesticide compounds of benzimidazole fungicides which have both protective and curative activities against a wide range of fungal diseases in crops. Widespread use of pesticide in agricultural production leads to excessive pesticide residues. Pesticide residue problems have become increasingly prominent and caused widespread concern around the world. In this work, a kind of beta-cyclodextrin/4,4'-diaminobiphenyl (CDBD) fluorescent derivative was prepared with 4,4'-diaminobiphenyl, beta-cyclodextrin (beta-CD) and 4 toluene sulfonyl chloride as raw materials. The structure of CDBD was characterized by elemental analysis, fourier transform infrared spectra (FT-IR) and NMR and scanning electron microscope (SEM). An inclusion complex between CDBD and the carbendazim was formed and characterized by transmission electron microscopy (TEM) and X-ray diffraction (XRD); and the binding constant (Ks) of the inclusion complex was investigated. The effects of surfactant and pH value on the fluorescence spectra of the system were studied; and the inclusion complex could be applied to determination of carbendazim residues. Based on the enhancement of the fluorescence intensity of carbendazim produced through complex formation, a sensitive method for the determination of carbendazim was established. A linear relationship was obtained between the fluorescence intensity and carbendazim concentration in the range of 0 and 66.92 mu g L-1 with a correlation coefficient of 0.9952. The limit of detection (LOD) and the relative standard deviation (RSD) were 1.26 ng L-1 and 0.079%, respectively. The proposed method has better anti-interference ability and stability, and has been successfully applied to the determination of carbendazim in vegetable and water samples with satisfactory results; recoveries in the range of 98.2 % to 101.1 % were obtained. The method is rapid, simple, direct, economical, sensitive and useful for carbendazim analysis.
The effects of rice hull supplementation or inclusion on performance and gastrointestinal weight of broiler chickens^2018^1ST INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON FOOD AND AGRICULTURE 2018^The effects of rice hull inclusion or supplementation on the growth performance and gastrointestinal (GIT) weight of broiler chickens were investigated. Three diets, corn-soybean-based diet as control diet (CON), supplementation of 40 g/kg rice hulls on CON (SRH), inclusion of 40 g/kg rice hulls in the diets (IRH) were used for the experiment. The diets were fed to broiler chickens from 2 to 21 d of age. Each treatment was replicated 10 times (8 birds/replicate or 80 birds/treatment). From 14 to 21 d of age and across 2 to 21 d of age, broilers fed the IRH had a greater (P &lt;= 0.05) average daily gain (ADG) than those fed the SRH with birds fed the CON being intermediate. Feed intake (FI) followed a similar trend as ADG. From 14 to 21 d of age, birds fed the IRH had higher (P &lt;= 0.05) FI, followed by the CON, and the SRH as the lowest. Rice hull inclusion increased the intestinal content as a percentage of BW, with an effect similar to that of the CON (P &lt;= 0.05). Birds fed the IRH had a lower (P &lt;= 0.05) weight of empty ceca than those fed the SRH and the CON which were not different. The results indicated that the inclusion or supplementation of rice hull produces different effect on the growth performance and GIT weight of young broilers. Diet composition is suggested to be the factors that caused the differences. The diet composition due to rice hull inclusion affected the growth performance and GIT weight of broiler chicken more than the diet composition due to rice hull supplementation.
Health risk communication message comprehension is influenced by image inclusion^2018^JOURNAL OF VISUAL COMMUNICATION IN MEDICINE^The impact of images on risk communications such as public service announcements is unknown. Whether images contained within a printed message such as a food safety warning alters the comprehension of the underlying text, has not previously been explored. The present study examined three factors of a risk communication in the print form: (1) the role images play in promoting comprehension of risk messages, (2) how demographic variables such as gender impacts message reception and (3) the need for cognition, or the degree to which some individuals are innately motivated to comprehend and understand information. Examples of risk communications in the print form are warnings on food or tobacco and alcohol warnings. In the present study, students at an undergraduate university (N = 92, 61 females, age 19.89 (SD = 1.94) years, range 18-32), read risk communications with and without images. The purpose of the study was to ascertain the affect images have on message comprehension and receptivity. Comprehension was assessed by the structural knowledge test. Negative/fear-arousing images increase message receptivity and subsequent learning when accompanying printed risk communications. Gender alone did not significantly impact message receptivity, although males tended to show greater change in structural knowledge pre- to post-test. This was true especially for the negative fear-arousing images condition. Need for cognition plays a significant role in message receptivity. Nevertheless, for risk communications illustrated with fear arousing images, it appears that the need for cognition is not a necessary condition to learn the message. Further research is needed to determine how these factors impact the degree or depth of message processing.
Improvement of broiler meat quality due to dietary inclusion of soybean oligosaccharide derived from soybean meal extract^2018^INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM ON FOOD AND AGRO-BIODIVERSITY (ISFA) 2017^Dietary inclusion of antibiotics as growth promoters (AGPs) in poultry production has been applied for decades worldwide, but recently AGPs have been banned due to the negative consequences for health and food safety. Soybean oligosccharide (SOS) derived from soybean meal extract is one of natural compound without carrying-over the residue to product and is consumer's health friendly. The purpose of the present study was to evaluate dietary inclusion of SOS on broiler meat quality. A total of 120 broilers of 7-day-old were allocated into 3 treatments with 4 replications (10 birds each) in completely randomized design. Treatments applied were D-1: diet without SOS, D-2: D-1 plus 0.15% SOS, and D-3: D-1 plus 0.30% SOS. Intestinal lactic acid bacteria (LAB), protein digestibility, meat protein and fat depositions, and meat cholesterol were the parameters observed. Data were statistically tested using analysis of variance and Duncan test. Dietary SOS inclusion at 0.30% (D-3) significantly (P&lt; 0.05) increased LAB population (7.21x10(4) cfu/g), protein digestibility (72.80%), and meat protein deposition (90.83 g/bird), but it decreased meat fat (8.27 g/bird) and meat cholesterol (37.28 mg/100 g). In conclusion, dietary SOS inclusion at 0.30% improves meat quality of broiler based on the increase in meat protein deposition with lower fat and cholesterol.
Mobile Telephony, Financial Inclusion and Inclusive Growth^2018^JOURNAL OF AFRICAN BUSINESS^The paper employs the multipurpose nature of mobile telephony to investigate its welfare implications using a large sample of households in Ghana. We use seemingly unrelated probit and instrumental variable procedure to test for two related issues: First, we investigate whether mobile telephony promotes propoor development by helping households to efficiently allocate consumption and navigate out of poverty. Second, we analyze whether access to a broad array of financial services enhances the capacity of households to live worthwhile lives. The results show that mobile penetration and financial inclusion significantly reduce the probability of a household becoming poor and increase per capita household consumption of food and non-food items. Our results show that the welfare benefits of mobile telephony and financial inclusion are not more pronounced in female-headed households. These insights serve as useful guide for government and other stakeholders who are looking for avenues to improve livelihoods.
The Inclusion of Eco-Conditionalities in Brazilian Geographic Indicators. Dilemmas and Contradictions^2018^BRESIL-S^The historical development of Brazilian agriculture has been widely criticized for its socio-environmental impacts. These criticisms prompted the creation of regulatory, protection, and certification mechanisms. Some of these measures correlate directly to the institutionalization of emerging ecological values (the so-called "green stamps"). Others do so only indirectly, as is the case with Geographical Indications (GI). While mainly concerned with the relocation and segmentation of food markets, the institutional construction of GI has increasingly confronted the "ecological problem". This is the main conclusion of this article, which synthesizes the results of research that, between 2015 and 2016, analyzed the inclusion of "eco-conditionalities" in the Use Regulations of three GI projects in southern Brazil, each associated with a specific chain: Vale dos Vinhedos (wine), Pelotas (peaches), and Pampa Gaucho (meat).
Revista peruana de medicina experimental y salud publica^2018 Jan-Mar^Revista peruana de medicina experimental y salud publica^None
Inclusion of Saccharina latissima in conventional anaerobic digestion systems^2018^ENVIRONMENTAL TECHNOLOGY^Loading macroalgae into existing anaerobic digestion (AD) plants allows us to overcome challenges such as low digestion efficiencies, trace elements limitation, excessive salinity levels and accumulation of volatile fatty acids (VFAs), observed while digesting algae as a single substrate. In this work, the co-digestion of the brown macroalgae Saccharina latissima with mixed municipal wastewater sludge (WWS) was investigated in mesophilic and thermophilic conditions. The hydraulic retention time (HRT) and the organic loading rate (OLR) were fixed at 19 days and 2.1g l(-1)d(-1) of volatile solids (VS), respectively. Initially, WWS was digested alone. Subsequently, a percentage of the total OLR (20%, 50% and finally 80%) was replaced by S. latissima biomass. Optimal digestion conditions were observed at medium-low algae loading (50% of total OLR) with an average methane yield close to in mesophilic and thermophilic conditions, respectively. The conductivity values increased with the algae loading without inhibiting the digestion process. The viscosities of the reactor sludges revealed decreasing values with reduced WWS loading at both temperatures, enhancing mixing properties.
beta-Cyclodextrin inclusion complexes containing clove (Eugenia caryophyllata) and Mexican oregano (Lippia berlandieri) essential oils: Preparation, physicochemical and antimicrobial characterization^DEC 2017^FOOD PACKAGING AND SHELF LIFE^Mexican oregano and clove essential oils are widely used as antimicrobial, insecticidal, antifungal and antioxidant compounds. To reduce their volatility and their hydrophobicity, they were encapsulated in beta-cyclodextrin (beta-CD) complexes by co-precipitation method, and the physicochemical and microbiological properties of these inclusion complexes were characterized. Different essential oil (EO) to beta-CD weight ratios were tested (4: 96, 8: 92, 12: 88, and 16: 84 w/w) and encapsulation efficiency and rate were determined. GC-MS and GC-FID analysis were also performed to determine the main oil constituents, which were eugenol and carvacrol in clove and Mexican oregano essential oils respectively and to quantify their ratio in inclusion complexes. H-1 NMR spectroscopy confirmed essential oil inclusion. The 4: 96 ratio (clove essential oil: beta-CD) gave the highest eugenol content and greatest microencapsulation efficiency; and the 8: 92 and 12: 88 ratios (Mexican oregano essential oil: beta-CD) the highest carvacrol content. Complexes antimicrobial activity was tested against two food-related microorganisms: Listeria monocytogenes ATCC 19114 and Escherichia coli ATCC 25922 by means of agar disk diffusion assay. The results demonstrated the inclusion of the majority of biologically active clove and Mexican oregano essential oil molecules, providing increased stability by reducing their volatility and preserving their biological properties.
Value Chain Upgrading and the Inclusion of Smallholders in Markets: Reflections on Contributions of Multi-Stakeholder Processes in Dairy Development in Tanzania^NOV 2017^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT RESEARCH^Increasingly, value chain approaches are integrated with multi-stakeholder processes to facilitate inclusive innovation and value chain upgrading of smallholders. This pathway to smallholder integration into agri-food markets has received limited analysis. This article analyses this integration through a case study of an ongoing smallholder dairy development programme in Tanzania. Value chain upgrading and innovation systems perspectives were combined in an analytical framework to interpret the findings, which show that multi-stakeholder processes enhance horizontal and vertical coordination but limit process and product upgrading. The main conclusion is that, although such processes may catalyze smallholder market inclusion, their effects are largely bounded by existing value chain structures (e.g. production system, fragmented markets), timeframe and how prevailing institutional constraints are addressed, which may constrain the intentions of such collaboration action. This calls attention to the starting points of value chain interventions and the socio-political dynamics that are part of multi-stakeholder processes.
Development of Antimicrobial Gelatin-Based Edible Films by Incorporation of Trans-Anethole/beta-Cyclodextrin Inclusion Complex^OCT 2017^FOOD AND BIOPROCESS TECHNOLOGY^Antimicrobial activity is an attractive property for packaging materials which can extend the shelf life of products and provide microbial safety for consumers. The study aimed to analyze the physicochemical and antimicrobial properties of gelatin-based edible films containing trans-anethole as the active additive. Encapsulation with beta-cyclodextrin was used as an effective way to introduce trans-anethole into gelatin matrix. The results showed that the trans-anethole/beta-cyclodextrin inclusion complex could be evenly dispersed in the gelatin-based edible films with appropriate addition. The incorporation of trans-anethole conferred the edible films with good antimicrobial activity as expected, which increased with the content of trans-anethole increasing. Moreover, the addition of inclusion complex improved the tensile strength and surface hydrophobicity and reduced the moisture content of the edible films. It was interesting that the edible films presented great UV light barrier property and it was increased by the addition of inclusion complex. Overall, the antimicrobial gelatin-based edible films showed great potential as bioactive packaging materials to extend food shelf life.
The effect of gelatin inclusion in high protein extruded pet food on kibble physical properties^OCT 2017^ANIMAL FEED SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^Pet food is a $23 billion industry that continues to grow. Owners continue to humanize their pets and their dietary needs, thus the pet food industry tends to mirror human dietary trends. Currently, pet food is trending towards higher levels of protein, thus lower levels of starch. Decreasing starch, one of the main structure forming ingredients in extruded foods, creates issues of lower rates of expansion and decreased kibble durability. Consumers tend to dislike ingredients that do not serve a nutritional purpose; therefore, gelatin may be a plausible binding ingredient for high protein pet foods. Gelatin is a pure protein derived from collagen and is sold as a dry, odorless, tasteless powder. High-bloom gelatins find numerous uses in human food as a stabilizer, foaming agent, and capsule base among other uses. Low-bloom gelatin may find a value-added opportunity as a nutritional binder in pet food. Four extrusion experiments were performed to test this hypothesis. Experiment 1 compared gelatin at 0, 50, 100, and 150 g/kg inclusion and 150 g/kg gelatin at 3 different extruder screw speeds. Results showed a decrease in expansion but an increase in hardness and pellet durability index (PDI); however, there may have been inadequate preconditioning. It was unclear whether the decrease in expansion or presence of gelatin improved product durability. Experiment 2 analyzed two levels of gelatin, 0 and 100 g/kg, under two extruder screw speeds, 300 rpm and 500 rpm, and two hydration ratios, 170 and 280 g/kg. In this experiment, there were no differences in density, expansion, hardness, or PDI. This indicated preconditioning was more ideal and may indicate gelatin does not decrease product expansion. Experiment 3 analyzed two levels of gelatin, 0 and 100 g/kg, at two target densities, low and high. Results indicated that gelatin created a more expanded product when processed under similar conditions as a control formula. Experiment 4 analyzed different strengths of gelatin to determine if the low-bloom gelatin experiments were repeatable with more conventional strength gelatins. Treatments were a control with no gelatin, and a 100, 175, and 250 bloom gelatins. Results showed increased gelatin strength increased product expansion, likely through a foaming effect. However, durability declined with mid- and high-bloom gelatins; thus, low-bloom gelatin may be the most promising to improve product characteristics and preserve durability. Based on these experiments, low-bloom gelatin may find use as a nutritional binder in high protein pet foods.
Attribute importance segmentation of Norwegian seafood consumers: The inclusion of salient packaging attributes^OCT 1 2017^APPETITE^The main purpose of this study is to identify consumer segments based on the importance of product attributes when buying seafood for homemade meals on weekdays. There is a particular focus on the relative importance of the packaging attributes of fresh seafood. The results are based on a representative survey of 840 Norwegian consumers between 18 and 80 years of age. This study found that taste, freshness, nutritional value and naturalness are the most important attributes for the home consumption of seafood. Except for the high importance of information about expiration date, most other packaging attributes have only medium importance. Three consumer segments are identified based on the importance of 33 attributes associated with seafood: Perfectionists, Quality Conscious and Careless Consumers. The Quality Conscious consumers feel more self-confident in their evaluation of quality, and are less concerned with packaging, branding, convenience and emotional benefits compared to the Perfectionists. Careless Consumers are important as regular consumers of convenient and pre-packed seafood products and value recipe information on the packaging. The seafood industry may use the results provided in this study to strengthen their positioning of seafood across three different consumer segments. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Growth Performance and Survival of Clarias gariepinus Larvae Fed with Varying Inclusions of beef Brain Meal^SEP-OCT 2017^Journal of Applied Biology &amp; Biotechnology^Clarias gariepinus culture remains undeveloped in Cote d'Ivoire due to the lack of locally quality feed, fingerlings, and the high cost of imported feed Artemia salina. Because of the importance of feed and feeding strategy in fish fingerling production, beef brain meal was investigated as alternative compounded feed. Feeding trial was completed with five isonitrogenous diets at 35% crude protein formulated by substituting Artemia salina for beef brain (BB) meal on the basis of crude protein at 0% (Control diet), 25% (BB25), 50% (BB50), 75% (BB75) and 100% (BB100) level. Catfish, Clarias gariepinus larvae with an average weight of 0.006 +/- 0.001 g were fed with experiment diets in three replicate groups, three times a day (07:00, 12:00 and 17:00 hours) ad libitum 49 days. At the end of rearing period, highest values of growth parameters were recorded from larvae fed with BB100, BB75, and BB50. Beef brain meal increased the dietary total fat when the feed conversion ratio decreased. Fish fed diets BB25 and BB50 recorded the highest values of survival rate. Studies on the best feeding rates and water quality monitoring should be carried out to improve survival of Clarias gariepinus larvae fed with high level of beef brain meal in diet.
The decade of Roma Inclusion: did it make a difference to health and use of health care services?^SEP 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.373  </td>  <td>3.219</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Application of beta-Cyclodextrin/2-Nonanone Inclusion Complex as Active Agent to Design of Antimicrobial Packaging Films for Control of Botrytis cinerea^SEP 2017^FOOD AND BIOPROCESS TECHNOLOGY^The aim of this study was to develop, characterize and evaluate in vitro the efficacy of active films, based on an inclusion complex formed by beta-cyclodextrin, 2-nonanone and two polymer matrices (polylactic acid and low density polyethylene). The different films were characterized by scanning electronic microscopy (SEM), differential scanning calorimetry (DSC), themogravimetric analysis (TGA), optical properties and antimicrobial activity against B. cinerea. The results showed important differences in the parameters evaluated where the level of agglomerates of additives was a key to explain these changes. Finally, microbiological analysis showed high effectiveness in reducing the Botrytis cinerea growth. The active films developed in this study were able to inhibit the growth of phytopathogenic fungus B. cinerea at different experimental conditions. The studied films have potential use for packaging fresh fruit susceptible to biological attack by this fungus.
Inclusion of poultry based food ingredients in the formulation of noodles and their effects on noodle quality characteristics^SEP 2017^JOURNAL OF FOOD MEASUREMENT AND CHARACTERIZATION^Incorporating exogenous proteins into food products is a better practice for improving nutritional attributes of food commodities. In the search for a way to improve the product and nutritional quality of noodles, this study was aimed to evaluate the impact of the incorporation of poultry based ingredients egg yolk powder (EYP) and chicken mincemeat (CMM) in noodles at different levels (5, 10 and 15%, w/w). The incorporated noodles were subjected to evaluation of the cooking, texture, colour, sensory and microstructure properties. The results showed that the incorporation of poultry based food ingredient types and amount influence the nutritional content of noodles. Simultaneously, poultry based ingredients incorporated noodles showed the acceptable firmness and colour charatertistics. Scanning electron micrograph of the incorporated noodles showed the gelatinized starch granules enveloped by protein matrix, and also indicating a better structure as compared to the control. The sensory profile of incorporated noodles was showed significant (p &lt;= 0.05) high overall quality. The result of this study showed that 10% (w/w) EYP and 15% (w/w) CMM incorporated noodles showed a better overall noodles quality attributes (texture, colour, sensory and microstructure). The results also provide ideas about the inclusion of the appropriate levels of poultry based ingredients (EYP and CMM) with a better sensory and nutritional profile. Therefore, this study may be useful in the food industry for the production of poultry based ingredients noodles with enhanced quality characteristics.
Inclusion of Demographic-Specific Information in Studies Supporting US Food &amp; Drug Administration Approval of High-Risk Medical Devices^SEP 2017^JAMA INTERNAL MEDICINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  20.768  </td>  <td>19.276</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
OPTIMIZATION AND CHARACTERIZATION OF SHRIMP FLAVOR NANOCAPSULES CONTAINING 2,5-DIMETHYLPYRAZINE USING AN INCLUSION APPROACH^AUG 2017^JOURNAL OF FOOD PROCESSING AND PRESERVATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.288  </td>  <td>1.342</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Minorities Inclusion in Work Organizations: Semiotic analysis of a Recruitment Strategy for a Fast Food Multinational Company^JUL-DEC 2017^TEORIA E PRATICA EM ADMINISTRACAO-TPA^The inclusion of social minorities in work organizations is a delicate issue with regard to socio-organizational dynamics, marked by its reference to a hegemonic (and ideological) worker model that hierarchizes real possibilities to the subjects who distance themselves from such reference. Discourses for inclusion and development remain as a way of subjectively manipulating worker, without actually integrating and empowering him the organizational structure. This paper tries to reflect about limits and possibilities in this process, from a bibliographical research on the women, blacks, gays and people' situations with disabilities in the labour market and then to relate this context to a semiotic analysis of a recruitment strategy of a large company in Brazilian context. Main results suggest that companies still reproduce social spaces of stigmatization. We warn managers that the inclusion perspective must not be seen as a legal requirement or any other work appropriation mechanism. It is necessary do understand inclusion as a process which cano promote organizational, social and human development.
Addressing information gaps in wild-caught foods in the US: Brook trout nutritional analysis for inclusion into the USDA national nutrient database for standard reference^JUL 2017^JOURNAL OF FOOD COMPOSITION AND ANALYSIS^Motivations for seeking local food include eating foods for quality, nutritional value, ethics and environmental concerns. Wild foods, such as wild game and fish, are increasingly included as a local food source, yet many legally procured species of wild game and fish lack knownnutrition information in the USDA National Nutrient Database for Standard Reference (SR). Among those species that lack nutrition information are brook trout. The research team worked with the Nutrient Data Laboratory (NDL) within USDA to develop a collection protocol for brook trout. Using legal angling techniques, samples were collected in the Adirondack region of New York State during the months of May and June 2012 by members of the research team. The trout were processed according to USDA determined dissection protocols to attain edible meat portions. Nutrient analysis was conducted on raw brook trout meat samples at USDA appointed commercial laboratories for proximates, calcium, iron, magnesium, phosphorus, potassium, sodium, zinc, riboflavin, niacin, thiamin, Vitamin B6, Vitamin B12, individual fatty acids, and cholesterol. Analytical data was sent to NDL at USDA, where it was reviewed, compiled and published in SR. Nutrient values were determined by validated laboratories using quality assurance procedures. Full nutrient profiles were made available in SR. (C) 2017 Elsevier Inc. All rights reserved.
Assessing the inclusion of seafood in the sustainable diet literature^MAY 2017^FISH AND FISHERIES^The literature on sustainable diets is broad in its scope, and application yet is consistently supportive of a move away from animal-based diets towards more plant-based diets. The positioning of seafood within the sustainable diet literature is less clear. A literature review was conducted to examine how the environmental impacts of seafood consumption are assessed and what conclusions are being drawn about the inclusion of seafood in a sustainable diet. Seafood is an essential part of the global food system but is not adequately addressed in most of the sustainable diet literature. Aquaculture, the world's fastest growing food sector, was considered by very few papers. Seafood consumption was commonly presented as a dilemma due to the perceived trade-offs between positive health outcomes from eating seafood and concerns of overfishing. A number of studies included seafood as part of their sustainable diet scenario, or as part of a diet that had lower impacts than current consumption. Most of the indicators used were biophysical, with a strong focus on greenhouse gas emissions, and very few studies addressed biological or ecological impacts. The assessment of seafood was limited in many studies due to relevant data sets not being incorporated into the models used. Where they were used, data sources and methodological choices were often not stated thereby limiting the transparency of many studies. Both farmed and wild-capture production methods need to be integrated into research on the impacts of diets and future food scenarios to better understand and promote the benefits of sustainable diets.
Enhancing the antimicrobial activity of D-limonene nanoemulsion with the inclusion of epsilon-polylysine^APR 15 2017^FOOD CHEMISTRY^The objective of this research was to investigate the synergism between epsilon-polylysine and D-limonene and develop a novel nanoemulsion system by merging the positive effect of these two antimicrobial agents. Results from the checkerboard method showed that epsilon-polylysine and D-limonene exhibit strong synergistic and useful additive effects against Escherichia coli, Staphylococcus aureus, Bacillus subtilis and Saccharomyces cerevisiae. In addition, D-limonene nanoemulsion with the inclusion of epsilon-polylysine was successfully prepared by high pressure homogenizer technology. Its antimicrobial efficiency was compared with pure D-limonene nanoemulsion by measuring the minimal inhibitory concentration, electronic microscope observation and the leakage of the intercellular constituents. The results demonstrated a wide improvement of the antimicrobial activity of D-limonene nanoemulsion following the inclusion of epsilon-polylysine. Overall, the current study may have a valuable contribution to make in developing a more efficient antimicrobial system in the food industry. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Identification of a cyclodextrin inclusion complex of antimicrobial peptide CM4 and its antimicrobial activity^APR 15 2017^FOOD CHEMISTRY^Antibacterial peptide CM4 (ABP-CM4) is a natural product isolated from the silkworm Bombyx mori. It is a small cationic peptide with broad-spectrum activities against harmful microorganisms and may be used as a novel food preservative. However, ABP-CM4 lacks tertiary structure in water-like solutions, which makes it more susceptible to proteases and labile when exposed to air. In this study, beta-cyclodextrin (beta-CD) was chosen to form an inclusion complex with ABP-CM4, which enhanced the physical and chemical properties of ABP-CM4 but did not decrease its antibacterial activity. The storage stability and susceptibility to proteinases of ABP-CM4 were apparently improved under the protection of beta-CD. This technology could also be widely applied to other AMPs as an antimicrobial system to be used in the food industry. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Effects of dietary yeast inclusion and acute stress on post-prandial whole blood profiles of dorsal aorta-cannulated rainbow trout^APR 2017^FISH PHYSIOLOGY AND BIOCHEMISTRY^Yeast is a potential alternative to fish meal in diets for farmed fish, yet replacing more than 50 % of fish meal results in reduced fish growth. In a 4-week experiment, 15 rainbow trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss) were cannulated and fed three diets each week: 30 % fish meal as a control (FM); 60 % replacement of fish meal protein, on a digestible basis, with Saccharomyces cerevisiae (SC); and 60 % replacement with Wickerhamomyces anomalus and S. cerevisiae mix (WA). Blood was collected at 0, 3, 6, 12 and 24 h after feeding. In the final week, fish were exposed to a 1-min netting stressor to evaluate possible diet-stress interactions. Significant increases in pH, TCO2, HCO3 and base excess were found after fish were fed the SC and WA diets compared with FM, which elevated blood alkaline tides. Yeast ingredients had lower buffering capacity and ash content than fish meal, which explained the increase in alkaline tides. In addition, fish fed the WA diet had significantly reduced erythrocyte area and fish fed SC and WA diets had increased mean corpuscular haemoglobin levels, indicating haemolytic anaemia. Higher levels of nucleic acid in yeast-based diets and potentially higher production of reactive oxygen species were suspected of damaging haemoglobin, which require replacement by smaller immature erythrocytes. Acute stress caused the expected rise in cortisol and glucose levels, but no interaction with diet was found. These results show that replacing 60 % of fish meal protein with yeasts can induce haemolytic anaemia in rainbow trout, which may limit yeast inclusion in diets for farmed fish.
Citric acid substituted the inclusion of inorganic phosphorus in diet of rainbow trout (Oncorhynchus mykiss)^MAR 2017^AQUACULTURE RESEARCH^This study was conducted to evaluate the effects of citric acid (CA) supplementation in diet without inorganic phosphorus (P) on growth, muscle and bone composition, proteolytic activities and serum antioxidant property of rainbow trout. Six diets were designed as the negative diet without monocalcium phosphate (MCP) supplementation, the positive diet containing 10gkg(-1) MCP and CA supplementation diets with 4, 8, 12, 16gkg(-1) CA supplementation in negative diet, and then were fed to rainbow trout (113.6g) for 60days. Results showed that the fish fed 8gkg(-1) CA, 12gkg(-1) CA diet had higher weight gain, higher contents of crude ash and P in bone, and lower feed conversion ratio than those of fish fed negative diet (P&lt;0.05), and showed the similar levels as those of fish fed positive diet (P&gt;0.05). The proximate composition and P level of muscle were not affected by dietary CA and MCP. The proteolytic activity in intestine, but not in stomach and gastric digesta, was significantly improved by dietary CA and MCP (P&lt;0.05), when compared with negative control. The activities of serum superoxide dismutase of 12gkg(-1) CA and 10gkg(-1) MCP groups were significantly higher, and the malondialdehyde of 8gkg(-1) CA and 12 CA gkg(-1) groups were significantly lower than those of negative control (P&lt;0.05). The above results indicated that the supplementation of CA could substitute the inclusion of MCP in rainbow trout diet and the supplementation level was suggested to be 8-12gkg(-1).
Cultivating citizenship, equity, and social inclusion? Putting civic agriculture into practice through urban farming^MAR 2017^AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN VALUES^Civic agriculture is an approach to agriculture and food production that-in contrast with the industrial food system-is embedded in local environmental, social, and economic contexts. Alongside proliferation of the alternative food projects that characterize civic agriculture, growing literature critiques how their implementation runs counter to the ideal of civic agriculture. This study assesses the relevance of three such critiques to urban farming, aiming to understand how different farming models balance civic and economic exchange, prioritize food justice, and create socially inclusive spaces. Using a case study approach that incorporated interviews, participant observation, and document review, I compare two urban farms in Baltimore, Maryland-a "community farm" that emphasizes community engagement, and a "commercial farm" that focuses on job creation. Findings reveal the community farm prioritizes civic participation and food access for low-income residents, and strives to create socially inclusive space. However, the farmers' "outsider" status challenges community engagement efforts. The commercial farm focuses on financial sustainability rather than participatory processes or food equity, reflecting the use of food production as a means toward community development rather than propagation of a food citizenry. Both farms meet authentic needs that contribute to neighborhood improvement, though findings suggest a lack of interest by residents in obtaining urban farm food, raising concerns about its appeal and accessibility to diverse consumers. Though not equally participatory, equitable, or social inclusive, both farms exemplify projects physically and philosophically rooted in the local social context, necessary characteristics for promoting civic engagement with the food system.
The Necessary Items for Inclusion in a Questionnaire for Assessing the Nutrition Knowledge of Young Japanese Children^FEB 2017^JOURNAL OF NUTRITIONAL SCIENCE AND VITAMINOLOGY^It is well known nutrition education for 3- to 5-y-old children is important, and it is necessary to assess their nutrition knowledge before and after nutrition education to evaluate the effectiveness of an educational program. This study aimed to determine the necessary questions for inclusion in a questionnaire designed to assess the nutrition knowledge of young Japanese children in order to assess the effectiveness of the Shokuiku nutrition education program. Eighty and 124 children from 9 nursery schools in Japan participated in the intervention and control groups, respectively. A 15-item questionnaire was completed by the intervention group before and after total of 16 nutrition education lessons. The control group completed the questionnaire only once. The necessary questions for inclusion in the questionnaire were evaluated by comparing the frequency of correct answers given by the pre- and post-intervention groups using McNemar and Wilcoxon's signed rank sum tests, and by the post-intervention and control groups using Chi-square and Mann-Whitney tests. The frequency of correct answers given to questions in all categories except "Breakfast and life rhythm" significantly differed between the pre- and post-intervention groups (p&lt;0.05). The frequency of correct answers given by the post-intervention group was significantly higher than that of the control group only in the category of "Three colors food groups" (p&lt;0.05). The results suggest that it is necessary to include questions about functions of food and nutrients such as the role of food groups to assess the nutrition knowledge of young Japanese children in order to evaluate the effectiveness of the Shokuiku program.
Impacts of the Particle Sizes and Levels of Inclusions of Cherry Pomace on the Physical and Structural Properties of Direct Expanded Corn Starch^FEB 2017^FOOD AND BIOPROCESS TECHNOLOGY^An effort was made to understand the impacts of dried cherry pomace (by-product of cherry juice processing) inclusion into corn starch extrudates on their direct expansion characteristics. The effect of pomace particle sizes (whole unfractionated (&lt; 125 to &gt; 500 mu m), &lt; 125, 125-250, 250-500, and &gt; 500 mu m) and levels of pomace inclusion (0, 5. and 15% (w/w)) were specifically investigated. Feed moisture content of 15.5 +/- 0.5% (w.b.) and the extruder barrel temperature of 140 A degrees C were kept constant with varying extruder screw speed (150, 200, and 250 rpm). The radial expansion ratio (ER) increased with 5% pomace level of inclusion compared with control but decreased significantly (p &lt; 0.05) at 15% inclusion. Particle sizes significantly affected ER (p &lt; 0.05) with smaller particle sizes resulting in increased ER at all levels of pomace. Adding cherry pomace significantly decreased water absorption index (WAI) and water solubility index (WSI) with smaller particles leading to higher WSI. Extrusion process did not reduce the total phenolic content (gallic acid equivalents). Inclusion of the smallest particle size (&lt; 125 mu m) cherry pomace at 5% level of inclusion yielded extrudates with the highest expansion ratio among all treatments, including the control. The scanning electron images suggested improvements in the extrudate surface and the internal cell structures. The results indicated the presence of active interactions between the cherry pomace and starch during the expansion process which is not present as an inert material.
Preparation and structural characterization of corn starch-aroma compound inclusion complexes^JAN 15 2017^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.422  </td>  <td>2.733</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
When the burger becomes halal: a critical discourse analysis of privilege and marketplace inclusion^2017^CONSUMPTION MARKETS &amp; CULTURE^Although a rich body of research provides insights to understanding stigma within the marketplace, much less is known regarding its direct corollary, privilege. We posit that this void is problematic as it may inadvertently support and legitimate existing socio-political arrangements which inhibit consumer wellbeing and marketplace equality. The present study addresses this gap by offering a theoretical understanding of privilege within the marketplace. Using a Foucauldian approach to privilege and power, we draw on the discursive perspective on legitimation to critically investigate the contentious debate over the inclusion of halal meat at a popular burger chain in France. In light of French political secularism (laicite), we demonstrate how power discursively operates through narratives on rights and moral responsibility to constitute, defend and challenge a certain state of privilege within the marketplace. Our resulting theoretical discussion extends existing studies on marketplace equality and the growing body of literature related to the marketization of religion.
A critical analysis of the effects of the Central Bank of Nigeria foreign exchange policy on financial inclusion, anti-money laundering measures and fundamental rights^2017^JOURNAL OF MONEY LAUNDERING CONTROL^None
Beyond food: The multiple pathways for inclusion of materials into ancient dental calculus^JAN 2017^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PHYSICAL ANTHROPOLOGY^Dental calculus (mineralized dental plaque) was first recognised as a potentially useful archaeological deposit in the 1970s, though interest in human dental calculus as a resource material has increased sharply in the past few years. The majority of recent research has focused on the retrieval of plant microfossils embedded in its matrix and interpretation of these finds as largely the result of deliberate consumption of plant-derived food. However, while most of the material described in published works does represent food, dental calculus is in fact a depositional environment as material can enter the mouth from a range of sources. In this respect, it therefore represents an archaeological deposit that can also contain extensive non-dietary debris. This can comprise a wide variety of cultural and environmental material which reaches the mouth and can become embedded in dental calculus through alternative pathways. Here, we explore the human behaviors and activities besides eating that can generate a flux of particles into the human mouth, the broad range of additional cultural and environmental information that can be obtained through the analysis and contextualisation of this material, and the implications of the additional pathways by which material can become embedded in dental calculus.
Beyond Inclusion and Exclusion: Community Gardens as Spaces of Responsibility^2017^ANNALS OF THE AMERICAN ASSOCIATION OF GEOGRAPHERS^Geographers have a sustained interest in urban community gardens because such spaces provide a meaningful lens to interrogate the complexities of living at the intersection of nature-society relationships. Most community gardens strive to perform the dual functions of reconnecting urban residents with nature and strengthening the community. More recently, in the context of neoliberal urban restructuring, community gardens have also been viewed as platforms for the mobilization of inclusive sociopolitical arrangements to counteract the ill effects of urban problems. Common to this literature is the implicit assumption that a good community garden must necessarily be inclusive or that, conversely, community gardens that are exclusionary are bad. We argue that framing community gardens as spaces of responsibility is another way to reengage with the epistemology of community gardens. Instead of only asking how, and to what extent, community gardens are inclusionary or exclusionary, we can augment our understanding of the realities of managing a garden by asking what responsibilities are associated with any given community garden. Among other things, the answer to this question requires one to trace the responsibilization process of gardeners. Through the case study of Singapore, we argue that responsibilization invariably engenders practices of inclusion and exclusion in community gardens. Framed thusly, we first move away from the reductive view that apparent exclusionary practices in a community garden render that garden to be normatively undesirable. Second, we can appreciate why many community gardens-even seemingly inclusive ones-have shades of exclusions embedded in them.
Protein quality as functional unit - A methodological framework for. inclusion in life cycle assessment of food^JAN 1 2017^JOURNAL OF CLEANER PRODUCTION^In order to. develop more sustainable food systems, there is a need to find methods that simultaneously consider environmental impacts and nutritional benefits. The purpose of this, study was to develop a functional unit to be used in LCA of foods that builds on the nutritional value of food products. We used the content and quality of proteins as a basis, and included dietary context as part of our method, since the nutritional value of a nutrient depends on the total dietary intake. Our method uses the digestible intake of the nine essential amino acids in the product and relates these values to the equivalent total dietary intake of the same amino acids. We also employed simpler functional units such as "gram (g) protein" and "g digestible protein." We quantified the functional units for three dietary contexts and applied it on LCA results for bread, chicken fillet, minced pork, minced beef, milk and pea soup. The results showed that the relative differences between products changed when using a protein-based functional unit, with the largest change occurring when going from mass as the functional unit to g protein. By introducing protein digestibility, the systematic under-valuation of the animal products was partly avoided with little additional effort. The most advanced functional unit affected the results compared to the mass-based functional unit most, but required significantly more data. The impact of dietary context was smaller than expected; hence, it might be possible to simplify the inclusion of dietary context by using aggregated descriptions of diets. The method presented is valuable for adding an important aspect of nutrition (protein quality and content) to the LCA results of single products, but there is a large scope for development. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Chimonanthus praecox extract/cyclodextrin inclusion complexes: Selective inclusion, enhancement of antioxidant activity and thermal stability^JAN 2017^INDUSTRIAL CROPS AND PRODUCTS^In this research, the inclusion complexes of Chimonanthus Praecox extract (CPE) with cyclodextrins (CDs) were prepared. The samples before and after encapsulation were analyzed by UHPLC-QTOF-MS and the variation in the contents of each identified bioactive compound were visualized in the heat maps. It was found that beta-CD have selective inclusion capacity to flavonoids. Moreover, encapsulation with CDs could significantly improve the antioxidant activity and thermal stability of CPE, enabling application of Chimonanthus Praecox extract as natural antioxidants and/or food additive especially when expected to be thermally processed. Therefore, encapsulation with CDs was a promising way in further application of bioactive compounds in plants. Additionally, this study gives new insight into the inclusion behavior between the complicated guests and different hosts, which provided specific guidance on the choice of bioactive guests with appropriate hosts. (C) 2016 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Non-Contact Inclusion Detection in Food Through a Single-Photon Time-of-Flight Imager^JAN 1 2017^IEEE SENSORS JOURNAL^We present a non-contact and non-invasive diffuse optical imaging system, based on an array of 32 x 32 single-photon avalanche diodes and time-to-digital converters, able to measure the time-of-flight of single photons, with 350-ps resolution. Measurements using continuous-wave (CW) and time-domain (TD) techniques demonstrate the possibility to identify the presence of absorbing inclusions (not visible by eye because of high scattering) within a diffusive media in transmittance geometry, with no contact with the sample. Thanks to the 1024 fully independent and concurrent time-resolved detection points, TD acquisitions achieve better resolution than CW ones, with the same measurement time. Provided that the investigated medium presents adequate thickness and transmissivity at the wavelengths of interest in order to allow sufficient light penetration, the system can be employed as a quick imaging device in food industries for non-destructive quality control
Enhancement of orofacial antinociceptive effect of carvacrol, a monoterpene present in oregano and thyme oils, by beta-cyclodextrin inclusion complex in mice^DEC 2016^BIOMEDICINE &amp; PHARMACOTHERAPY^Orofacial pain is associated with diagnosis of chronic pain of head, face, mouth, neck and all the intraoral structures. Carvacrol, a naturally occurring isoprenoid with diverse class of biological activities including anti-inflammatory, analgesic, antitumor and antioxidant properties. Now, the antinociceptive effect was studied in mice pretreatment with carvacrol (CARV) and beta-cyclodextrin complex containing carvacrol (CARV-beta CD) in formalin-, capsaicin-, and glutamate-induced orofacial nociception. Mice were pretreated with vehicle (0.9% Nacl, p.o.), CARV (10 and 20 mg/kg, p.o.), CARV-beta CD (10 and 20 mg/kg, p.o.) or MOR (10 mg/kg, i.p.) before the nociceptive behavior induced by subcutaneous injections (s.c.) of formalin (20 mu l, 2%), capsaicin (20 mu l, 2.5 mu g) or glutamate (20 mu l, 25 mu M) into the upper lip respectively. The interference on motor coordination was determined using rotarod and grip strength meter apparatus. CARV-beta CD reduced the nociceptive during the two phases of the formalin test, whereas CARV did not produced the reduction in face-rubbing behavior in the initial phase. CARV-beta CD (20 mg/kg, p.o.) produced 49.3% behavior pain while CARV alone at 20 mg/kg, p.o, produced 28.7% of analgesic inhibition in the second phase of formalin test. CARV, CARV-beta CD and Morphine (MOR) showed a significant reduction against nociception caused by capsaicin or glutamate injection. Thus the encapsulation of carvacrol in beta-cyclodextrin can acts as a considerable therapeutic agent with pharmacological interest for the orofacial pain management. (C) 2016 Elsevier Masson SAS. All rights reserved.
How does a local initiative contribute to social inclusion and promote sustainable food practices? Focus on the example of social cooking workshops^NOV 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF CONSUMER STUDIES^Initiatives from food system players closer to citizens are currently valorized to promote sustainability. Based on TCR and on the practice theories, this research aims at studying the impacts of a local initiative on two aspects: social inclusion and sustainable food practices. To do so, we chose the example of cooking classes for people in social instability. Cooking classes may contribute to fight against social exclusion through two factors: first the group dynamic and then the value-creation for participants. Besides, cooking classes may drive towards sustainable food practices on the basis of advice about new skills. Cooking classes in three different social service structures were observed: a Social Centre; a social service structure hosting young people suffering from homophobia; and, a hosting centre for people with disabilities. To complete these observations, semi-directive one-hour interviews were conducted with three participants from the different groups. This information was analyzed with thematic analysis and practice theories tools. Results show that the main factor of social inclusion is the value-creation, with two factors contributing to people's self-esteem: (re)teach them how to cook; and offer them the opportunity to cook and eat good food. The cooking classes are efficient to promote sustainable food practices, promoting at the same time the interest in shared-eating, shared-cooking, and new skills. Nevertheless, it is not enough for the people to adopt new practices because of material and logistical barriers. As such, our findings are important for policy makers tasked with promoting sustainable consumption and social insertion within vulnerable population.
What does Life-Cycle Assessment of agricultural products need for more meaningful inclusion of biodiversity?^OCT 2016^JOURNAL OF APPLIED ECOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.782  </td>  <td>6.533</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Transgender Patients, Isotretinoin, and US Food and Drug Administration-Mandated Risk Evaluation and Mitigation Strategies A Prescription for Inclusion^MAY 2016^JAMA DERMATOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  7.995  </td>  <td>7.169</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effect of inclusion of key foods on in vitro iron bioaccessibility in composite meals^APR 2016^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY-MYSORE^The in vitro bioaccessibility of iron in context to fortification of key foods to cereal based diets was studied to optimize the meals for enhanced iron bioaccessibility to meet the needs of vegetarian and non-vegetarian adult women. Four individual food items and thirty six composite meals were selected to represent a wide spectrum of meal ingredients. The four individual foods: chapati, rice, dal and saag were choosen on the basis of data reported on meal pattern of surveyed households of north India. The basic meals were then fortified with key food ingredients which may influence in vitro iron bioaccessibility. Eight selected key foods were salad, orange, lemonade, milk, curd, chicken, egg and tea. The results revealed that inclusion of 200 g of chicken, 135 g of salad and 120 g of orange to the basic meals of rice or chapati with either dal or saag enhanced iron bioaccessibility by 1.6 fold to 5.0 fold; 5.2 to 28.9 % and 4.7 to 10.7 %, respectively. The best enhancer of iron absorption for vegetarians was lemonade (250 ml) which resulted in 70.2 and 61.0 % increase of in vitro bioaccessibility of iron to the rice based meals with dal and saag, respectively. The inclusion of lemonade resulted in 1.3 fold increase in iron bioaccessibility in chapati based meals. The major inhibitors of iron bioaccessibility were egg and tea, the percent reduction caused by egg being 16.1 to 50.2 % while by tea, it was between 21.5 to 55.3 %. The study recommends that those vulnerable to iron deficiency should be encouraged to increase overall intake of iron from iron rich foods. The increase should be coupled with efforts to combine appropriate foods in the diet to enhance the bioaccessibility of iron and reduce inhibitory factors.
Public procurement for school breakfasts in the Bolivian Altiplan: Governance structures enabling smallholder inclusion^APR 2016^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Public food procurement offers the prospect for an alternative development path toward market inclusion, upgraded skills, and raised income for smallholder farmers. In Bolivia, the current public administration favors smallholder participation by regulating a preference of up to 40% for smallholders and local producers as opposed to other types of suppliers. However, smallholders' provision to local public institutions remains limited. To analyze the reasons for this, three municipalities with different approaches to smallholder procurement were investigated in a multiple-case study. Using transaction cost theory, our findings show that high transaction costs and pure market coordination act as strong barriers to smallholders' active participation. We found that hybrid governance structures, based on different types of relationship-oriented coordination and market exchange enable the inclusion of smallholders via: a) direct and active support from decision-makers, b) gate openers at the municipalities, and c) community embeddedness that supports trust-building and reduces uncertainty. Thus, our study contributes to opening up the 'black box' of hybrids in transaction cost theory by illustrating how social capital influences the mechanisms through which resources are distributed a dimension inadequately considered in the traditional transaction cost theory approach. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Critical Success Factors for Smallholder Inclusion in High Value-Adding Supply Chains by Food &amp; Agribusiness Multinational Enterprises^2016^INTERNATIONAL FOOD AND AGRIBUSINESS MANAGEMENT REVIEW^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.937  </td>  <td>1.028</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of Gender perspective in scientific publications in Energy Efficiency^2016^21ST INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY INDICATORS (STI 2016)^None
Does financial inclusion affect monetary policy in SAARC countries?^2016^COGENT ECONOMICS &amp; FINANCE^Alike the role of heart for human body, finance is the focal point of an economy, whereas savings and investment are its tubes and vessels. Hence, a solid financial system is a fundamental character of an enduring economy. The frozen financial system endures longer if its foundation is concrete and subsists in the people of grass-root level. They are those, who live in villages and small towns, earn meager income, work in primary sector, spend more on food, and have lesser social securities. In this setting, the process of bringing these people into the main stream of financial activities is called financial inclusion. This study describes the impact of financial inclusion on monetary policy of South Asian Association for Regional Cooperation (SAARC) countries from 2004-2013. The study uses principal component analysis (PCA) to construct a Financial Inclusion Index that serves as a proxy variable for the accessibility of financial inclusion in the SAARC countries. Adding to it, three different models like FEM, REM, and Panel-corrected standard errors are used for the analysis. In this study, an empirical result of generalized least square(GLS) estimation shows that financial inclusion, exchange rate, and interest rate are negatively associated with inflation in SAARC countries.
Administration of Poly[di(sodium carboxylatoethylphenoxy)phosphazene] (PCEP) and Avian Beta Defensin as Adjuvants in Inactivated Inclusion Body Hepatitis Virus and its Hexon Protein-Based Experimental Vaccine Formulations in Chickens^DEC 2015^AVIAN DISEASES^Inclusion body hepatitis (IBH) is one of the major infectious diseases adversely affecting the poultry industry of the United States and Canada. Currently, no effective and safe vaccine is available for the control of IBH virus (IBHV) infection in chickens. However, based on the excellent safety and immunogenic profiles of experimental veterinary vaccines developed with the use of new generation adjuvants, we hypothesized that characterization of vaccine formulations containing inactivated IBHV or its capsid protein hexon as antigens, along with poly[di(sodium carboxylatoethylphenoxy)phosphazene] (PCEP) and avian beta defensin 2 (ABD2) as vaccine adjuvants, will be helpful in development of an effective and safe vaccine formulation for IBH. Our data demonstrated that experimental administration of vaccine formulations containing inactivated IBHV and a mixture of PCEP with or without ABD2 as an adjuvant induced significantly higher antibody responses compared with other vaccine formulations, while hexon protein-based vaccine formulations showed relatively lower levels of antibody responses. Thus, a vaccine formulation containing inactivated IBHV with PCEP or a mixture of PCEP and ABD2 (with a reduced dosage of PCEP) as an adjuvant may serve as a potential vaccine candidate. However, in order to overcome the risks associated with whole virus inactivated vaccines, characterization of additional viral capsid proteins, including fiber protein and penton of IBHV along with hexon protein in combination with more new generation adjuvants, will be helpful in further improvements of vaccines against IBHV infection.
Risk assessment and risk management for safe foods: Assessment needs inclusion of variability and uncertainty, management needs discrete decisions^NOV 20 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF FOOD MICROBIOLOGY^The introduction of relevant food safety changes in legislation, like time-temperature criteria for pasteurisation and sterilisation, microbiological criteria, HACCP and FSOs, generally took several decades. All these approaches have helped to define specific targets or systems to improve the management of food safety. More and more the measures could be related to specific efficiency in public health protection. With the use of quantitative risk assessment theoretically the effect of all interventions on the final risk can be determined, which can help to design the appropriate controls in the food safety management system. In such an assessment in practice, however results have understandably large variability and also uncertainty. There is large variability and uncertainty in the biological parts of the assessment, the dose response (infectivity, human susceptibility) the microorganism kinetics in the chain (growth, inactivation, stress response) and also in the more technological parts, the conditions in the chain and the consumer behaviour. Often the results of risk assessments are probability distributions of the variability in illness probability, also sometimes represented with their uncertainty. To make a link from these distributions to managerial decisions, that need to be black and white, should not be considered the job of risk managers. This link needs investment from both the assessor and the manager. (C) 2015 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Accelerating the paradigm shift toward inclusion of pregnant women in drug research: Ethical and regulatory considerations^NOV 2015^SEMINARS IN PERINATOLOGY^Although there has been long-standing reluctance to include pregnant women as clinical trial participants, increasing recognition of profound gaps in research on the safety and efficacy of drugs often prescribed to pregnant women calls into question the practice of routinely excluding them. This article presents compelling reasons for including pregnant women in clinical research, highlights certain regulatory barriers to the inclusion of pregnant women, and proposes that professional societies with expertise in obstetrics and maternal-fetal medicine can be instrumental in hastening the paradigm shift from the systematic exclusion of pregnant women in research to a one of responsible and fair inclusion. Published by Elsevier Inc.
Effect of dietary inclusion of a herbal extract mixture and different oils on pig performance and meat quality^OCT 2015^MEAT SCIENCE^The aim of the study was to evaluate the effect of a herbal extract mixture on pig performance and meat quality. The experiment was performed on 60 fatteners (60 +/- 0.5-112 +/- 2.0 kg). Group I (control) was fed with standard feed; groups II and III received the same feed supplemented with 150 mg BHT or 500 mg of a herbal extract mixture (sage, nettle, lemon balm and coneflower) per kg of feed, respectively. In each group, half of the animals received 4% rapeseed oil, the other half soybean oil. The herbal extracts had no effect on animal performance but significantly improved meat oxidative stability, lowered cholesterol and TI index and increased PUFA content in meat. Slight differences between animals fed with rapeseed or soybean oils were observed. Gilt meat had significantly better (P &lt;= 0.01) Al, TI, and h/H indices than barrow meat. It was concluded that herbal extracts have a beneficial effect on pork health-promoting properties due to changes in lipid fraction. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Effects of Levels of Inclusion of Locally Processed Fish Waste Meal in the Diets of White Leghorn Layers on Performance Parameters, Hatchability, Economics, Egg Production and Egg Quality^SEP 2015^IRANIAN JOURNAL OF APPLIED ANIMAL SCIENCE^The study was conducted at Haramaya university poultry farm to evaluate the effects of locally processed fish waste meal (FWM) in the diet of white leghorn layers on the performance and hatchability, egg quality, sensory flavor and profitability of the rations. One hundred eighty chickens at five months of age were randomly distributed (15 layers per each 12 pens). The pens were randomly assigned with three replications for each of four experimental rations. Ninety day age dry matter intake (DMI), laying performance, egg quality of T-1 (conventional layers ration with no FWM), T-2 5% FWM + 10% soybean meal (SBM) + 16% wheat short (WS) + 17% noug seed cake (NSC), T-3 10% FWM + 5% SBM + 8% (WS) + 16.8% (NSC), T-4 15% FWM + 0% SBM + 6% wheat high (WH) + 16.7% (NSC) were considered. The chemical analysis showed that FWM contained 41.2% crude protein (CP) and 2982.04 kcal metabolizable energy (ME)/kg DM. DMI (88.6, 90.1, 89.1 and 89.2 (SEM=2.81, for T1, T2, T3 and T4, respectively) was not statistically different between the treatments. Average daily body weight (BW) gain, (SEM=0.027 g), for T1, T2, T3 and T4, respectively) was significantly lower in T2 and T4 as compared to T3. Hen-day egg production (47.8%, 54.9, 58.1 and 53.8 (SEM=1.32), egg mass (23.0 g, 28.8, 27.1 and 26.8 (SEM=0.73), for T1, T2, T3 and T4, respectively) were significantly higher in diets fed with rations containing FWM as compared to the control group. Feed efficiency ratio (0.26, 0.30, 0.30 and 0.30 (SEM=0.007), for T1, T2, T3 and T4, respectively was significantly higher for groups consumed FWM diet than the control. Eggs from hens fed with rations containing 10 and 15% FWM had moderate fishy flavor (P&lt;0.05) as compared to those consuming the control and T2 diets. The results obtained from partial budget analysis indicated that inclusion of FWM improved the economics of egg production which is attributed to the high cost of soybean meal as compared to FWM and the better efficiency of feed utilization by FWM groups. Thus, FWM inclusion improved egg laying performance and profitability, but imparted moderate fishy flavor beyond 5% inclusion. However, when considering egg production, feed efficiency ratio, net return and egg sale to feed cost ratio, inclusion of FWM in White Leghorn diets at up to 10% is recommended.
Challenges, benefits, and factors to enhance recruitment and inclusion of children in pediatric dental research^SEP 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PAEDIATRIC DENTISTRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.057  </td>  <td>2.086</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
COMMUNITY BASED TOURISM AND SOCIAL INCLUSION: TOURIST ITINERARY ANALYSIS COMMUNITY BASED PROJECT GOOD PRACTICES IN SERRA DO BRIGADEIRO - MG/BRAZIL^SEP-DEC 2015^ANAIS BRASILEIROS DE ESTUDOS TURISTICOS-ABET^One of the great challenges of the communities that host community-based tourism / CBT is to be ready to welcome tourists. The routine of life in tourist communities is the great advantage of existing attractiveness, in this sense, to make a tourist program keeping the originality of activities becomes one of management difficulties. In the Project "Good Practice in the Serra do Brigadeiro" was prepared an itinerary that involved the Nucleo do Bone community-based tourism. In this sense the objective of this study was to systematize the actions operationalized for formatting itineraries this tourist segment that said project used. For this, the action research method was used, with questionnaires and observations. This allowed a systematic follow-up to be multiplied in other centers of community-based tourism. The strategies were based on the Routes of Brazil Program and the principles of Bagagem Project. In this itinerary tourists reviewed the food, transportation, lodging and guides. For tourists was an enriching experience with interactions in the community. However, requirements such as distance from the site and the short period for all experiences were criticized. Managers hosts of the itinerary evaluated the experiences at the inn, the restaurant, the trail, the waterfall, the tractor ride and tourists. Managers felt the desire to relate to their environments, demonstrating integrated environment to which they belong. Lastly that the activities to be scheduled on the experiences of this tourist segment should involve the daily routine of hosts for that the identity of the territory can be authentic and original allowing tourists to integrate into the local environment.
The European Union Food Distribution programme for the Most Deprived Persons of the community, 1987-2013: From agricultural policy to social inclusion policy?^JUL 2015^HEALTH POLICY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.075  </td>  <td>2.773</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Preparation, Characterization and Pharmacokinetic Study of Xiangfu Siwu Decoction Essential Oil/beta-Cyclodextrin Inclusion Complex^JUN 2015^MOLECULES^Xiang-Fu-Si-Wu Decoction (XFSWD), a famous Chinese herbal formula, is considered an effective prescription for treating primary dysmenorrhea. The essential oil is a significant effective ingredient of XFSWD. However, its volatility, instability and poor water-solubility influence its pharmacodynamic effects. -Cyclodextrin (-CD) has the intrinsic ability to form specific inclusion complexes with such drugs to enhance their stability, solubility and bioavailability. The aim of this study was thus to compare the pharmacokinetic characteristics and the oral bioavailability of XFSWD essential oil (XEO) and its -CD inclusion complex after oral administration to rats. A simple, rapid, and sensitive ultra-high performance liquid chromatography tandem mass spectrometry (UPLC-MS/MS) method was developed for the simultaneous quantification of five active components of XEO in rat plasma. The in vivo data showed that XEO/-CD inclusion complex displayed higher maximum plasma concentration (C-max), longer half-time (T-1/2) and bigger area under the concentration-time curve (AUC(0-24 h)). These results demonstrated that the formation of -CD inclusion complex has significantly increased the oral bioavailability of the drugs in rats than free oil.
Telephone and Face-to-Face Interviews with Low-Income Males with Child Care Responsibilities Support Inclusion as a Target Audience in SNAP-Ed^JUN 2015^JOURNAL OF COMMUNITY HEALTH^Federally funded nutrition programs mostly target females. Changes in family dynamics suggest low-income men have an important role in food management responsibilities. The purpose of this study was to inform nutrition education program planning to meet needs of lower-income males. Cross-sectional telephone and face-to-face interviews. Stratified random sample of men (n = 101), 18-59 years of age, with child care responsibilities, living in households participating in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and a convenience sample of adult males (n = 25) recruited from lower income venues. (1) Scripted telephone interviews about health status, eating behaviors, eating competence, food security, technology usage and topics and strategies for nutrition education. (2) In-person cognitive interviews during review of selected online nutrition education lessons. Nutrition education topics of interest, preferred educational strategies, influences on and barriers to intake, eating competence, critiques of online program content, graphics, format. Bivariate correlations, independent t tests, one-way analysis of variance or Chi square, as appropriate. Thematic analyses of cognitive interviews. Of telephone interviewees, 92.1 % prepared meals/snacks for children and 54.5 % made major household food decisions. Taste was the greatest influence on food selection and the greatest barrier to eating healthful foods. Topics of highest interest were "which foods are best for kids" and "how to eat more healthy foods." Preferred nutrition education strategies included online delivery. Online lessons were highly rated. Interactive components were recognized as particularly appealing; enhanced male centricity of lessons was supported. Findings provided compelling evidence for including needs specific to low-income males when planning, designing, and funding nutrition education programs.
Medical Countermeasures for Radiation Exposure and Related Injuries: Characterization of Medicines, FDA-Approval Status and Inclusion into the Strategic National Stockpile^JUN 2015^HEALTH PHYSICS^World events over the past decade have highlighted the threat of nuclear terrorism as well as an urgent need to develop radiation countermeasures for acute radiation exposures and subsequent bodily injuries. An increased probability of radiological or nuclear incidents due to detonation of nuclear weapons by terrorists, sabotage of nuclear facilities, dispersal and exposure to radioactive materials, and accidents provides the basis for such enhanced radiation exposure risks for civilian populations. Although the search for suitable radiation countermeasures for radiation-associated injuries was initiated more than half a century ago, no safe and effective radiation countermeasure for the most severe of these injuries, namely acute radiation syndrome (ARS), has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA). The dearth of FDA-approved radiation countermeasures has prompted intensified research for a new generation of radiation countermeasures. In this communication, the authors have listed and reviewed the status of radiation countermeasures that are currently available for use, or those that might be used for exceptional nuclear/radiological contingencies, plus a limited few medicines that show early promise but still remain experimental in nature and unauthorized for human use by the FDA.
Inclusion of Palmaria palmata (red seaweed) in Atlantic salmon diets: effects on the quality, shelf-life parameters and sensory properties of fresh and cooked salmon fillets^MAR 30 2015^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.422  </td>  <td>2.733</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Short communication: Estimation of the financial benefit of using Jersey milk at different inclusion rates for Cheddar cheese production using partial budgeting^MAR 2015^JOURNAL OF DAIRY SCIENCE^Partial budgeting was used to estimate the net benefit of blending Jersey milk in Holstein-Friesian milk for Cheddar cheese production. Jersey milk increases Cheddar cheese yield. However, the cost of Jersey milk is also higher; thus, determining the balance of profitability is necessary, including consideration of seasonal effects. Input variables were based on a pilot plant experiment run from 2012 to 2013 and industry milk and cheese prices during this period. When Jersey milk was used at an increasing rate with Holstein-Friesian milk (25, 50, 75, and 100% Jersey milk), it resulted in an increase of average net profit of 3.41, 6.44, 8.57, and 11.18 pence per kilogram of milk, respectively, and this additional profit was constant throughout the year. Sensitivity analysis showed that the most influential input on additional profit was cheese yield, whereas cheese price and milk price had a small effect. The minimum increase in yield, which was necessary for the use of Jersey milk to be profitable, was 2.63, 7.28, 9.95, and 12.37% at 25, 50, 75, and 100% Jersey milk, respectively. Including Jersey milk did not affect the quantity of whey butter and powder produced. Although further research is needed to ascertain the amount of additional profit that would be found on a commercial scale, the results indicate that using Jersey milk for Cheddar cheese making would lead to an improvement in profit for the cheese makers, especially at higher inclusion rates.
Augmentative and Alternative Communication System (AAC) for Social Inclusion of People With Complex Communication Needs in the Industry^2015^ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY^Inclusion of people with special needs in the labor market has been increasing in some regions of Brazil as a result of the Articles 6 and 7 of the Constitution of the Federal Republic of Brazil and the Quota Law (No. 8.213/91, Art. 93) which entitle people with disabilities to work in order to improve their social condition. To support persons with complex communication needs in the workplace, 40 graphic symbols termed "symbols of industrial expressions" were developed within the framework of the COMMUNIS package. The symbols were developed for a company of the food sector in the Metropolitan Region of Curitiba, Brazil. Individual interviews were held with the human resources professionals, as well as with employees with complex communication needs in order to identify problems, assess requirements, and generate a list of specific symbols to develop. The symbols were then validated with regard to their ease of recognition. Only five symbols needed revision. The results suggest that it is possible to develop a set of symbols for the workplace that are judged to be iconic by human resources professionals and employees with complex communication needs.
Inclusion of Safety Pharmacology Endpoints in Repeat-Dose Toxicity Studies^2015^Principles of Safety Pharmacology^Whereas pharmacological responses tend to be fairly rapid in onset and are therefore detectable after a single dose, some diminish on repeated dosing, and others increase in magnitude and therefore can be missed or underestimated in single-dose safety pharmacology studies. Safety pharmacology measurements can be incorporated into repeat-dose toxicity studies, either routinely or on an adhoc basis. Drivers for this are both scientific (see above) and regulatory (e.g. ICH S6, S7, S9). There are inherent challenges in achieving this: the availability of suitable technical and scientific expertise in the test facility, unsuitable laboratory conditions, use of simultaneous (as opposed to staggered) dosing, requirement for toxicokinetic sampling, unsuitability of certain techniques (e.g. use of anaesthesia, surgical implantation, food restriction), equipment availability at close proximity and sensitivity of the methods to detect small, clinically relevant, changes. Nonetheless, 'fit-for-purpose' data can still be acquired without requiring additional animals. Examples include assessment of behaviour, sensorimotor, visual and autonomic functions, ambulatory ECG and blood pressure, echocardiography, respiratory, gastrointestinal, renal and hepatic function. This is entirely achievable if the safety pharmacology measurements are relatively unobtrusive, both with respect to the animals and to the toxicology study itself. Careful pharmacological validation of any methods used, and establishing their detection sensitivity, is vital to ensure the credibility of generated data.
Labor inclusion of individuals with disabilities: Managers' conceptions as a contributing factor^2015^WORK-A JOURNAL OF PREVENTION ASSESSMENT &amp; REHABILITATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.009  </td>  <td>1.18</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
On inclusion of water resource management in Earth system models - Part 1: Problem definition and representation of water demand^2015^HYDROLOGY AND EARTH SYSTEM SCIENCES^Human activities have caused various changes to the Earth system, and hence the interconnections between human activities and the Earth system should be recognized and reflected in models that simulate Earth system processes. One key anthropogenic activity is water resource management, which determines the dynamics of human-water interactions in time and space and controls human livelihoods and economy, including energy and food production. There are immediate needs to include water resource management in Earth system models. First, the extent of human water requirements is increasing rapidly at the global scale and it is crucial to analyze the possible imbalance between water demands and supply under various scenarios of climate change and across various temporal and spatial scales. Second, recent observations show that human-water interactions, manifested through water resource management, can substantially alter the terrestrial water cycle, affect land-atmospheric feedbacks and may further interact with climate and contribute to sea-level change. Due to the importance of water resource management in determining the future of the global water and climate cycles, the World Climate Research Program's Global Energy and Water Exchanges project (WRCP-GEWEX) has recently identified gaps in describing human water interactions as one of the grand challenges in Earth system modeling (GEWEX, 2012). Here, we divide water resource management into two interdependent elements, related firstly to water demand and secondly to water supply and allocation. In this paper, we survey the current literature on how various components of water demand have been included in large-scale models, in particular land surface and global hydrological models. Issues of water supply and allocation are addressed in a companion paper. The available algorithms to represent the dominant demands are classified based on the demand type, mode of simulation and underlying modeling assumptions. We discuss the pros and cons of available algorithms, address various sources of uncertainty and highlight limitations in current applications. We conclude that current capability of large-scale models to represent human water demands is rather limited, particularly with respect to future projections and coupled land-atmospheric simulations. To fill these gaps, the available models, algorithms and data for representing various water demands should be systematically tested, intercompared and improved. In particular, human water demands should be considered in conjunction with water supply and allocation, particularly in the face of water scarcity and unknown future climate.
Crude glycerine inclusion in Limousin bull diets: Animal performance, carcass characteristics and meat quality^DEC 2014^MEAT SCIENCE^Three hundred and six Limousin young bulls (7 +/- 1 months of age, initial body weight 273 +/- 43 kg) were used to evaluate the effect of crude glycerine supplementation on animal performance, carcass characteristics and meat quality. Animals were assigned to three different diets: Control (0% of crude glycerine), G2 and G4 (2 and 4% of crude glycerine, respectively). The diets were administrated ad libitum for 240 days (final body weight 644 +/- 24 kg). Average daily weight gain, average daily feed intake, the gain:feed ratio, ultrasound measures in vivo, carcass characteristics, pH, water holding capacity, drip losses, and cooking losses were not affected (P &gt; 0.05) by diets. Diet decreased C16:0 (P &lt; 0.01) and C16:1 (P &lt; 0.05) contents in meat. The G4 meat showed lower C12:0, C14:0, C17:0, C18:0, C18:1, C18:2, C18:3, c9,t11-c18:2, C20:0 and C20:4 levels (P &lt; 0.05) than control. Glycerine increased desirable fatty acid percentages (P &lt; 0.05) in intramuscular fat. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Flavor release by enzymatic hydrolysis of starch samples containing vanillin-amylose inclusion complexes^DEC 2014^LWT-FOOD SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^Hylon VII is a high amylose corn starch which has excellent gelling properties, and its behavior as flavor encapsulant is relevant to the food industry because its ability to regulate a swelling-controlled release in aqueous media. We studied the release of vanillin, encapsulated in Hylon VII under experimental conditions in which the amylose-vanillin inclusion complex is obtained, along with the enzymatic hydrolysis of the starch carried out using salivary amylase of human origin. The flavor release into the aqueous phase was quantified spectrophotometrically and the partition into the headspace was assessed by a gas sensor array. Simultaneously, the progress of the enzymatic reaction was determined by analysis of reducing sugars. The release of flavor into the aqueous phase followed a diffusion/relaxation kinetic, whereas the headspace analysis showed an increase in the aroma intensity according to the increase of reducing sugars concentration in the solution. Furthermore, by using the Unfolded Cluster Analysis methodology it was possible to accurately discriminate the samples corresponding to each of the assayed hydrolysis times. The joint detection of the flavor in the condensed phase and in the headspace compared with the degree of starch hydrolysis provides an overall analytical painting of a daily food intake process. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Effect of Inclusion of Formaldehyde Treated Mustard Oil Cake in Diets on Performance of Corriedale Lambs^SEP 2014^Indian Journal of Animal Nutrition^An experiment was conducted on 15 weaned male Corriedale lambs of similar age (3-4 m) and body weight (13.0 +/- 0.46 kg) divided into 3 equal groups and fed diets for a period of 90 days to assess the effect of inclusion of formaldehyde treated mustard oil cake in concentrate mixture on growth, nutrient utilization, blood biochemical profiles, wool yield and economics of feedings. The animals were fed to meet their nutrient requirements using either GNC as main protein source (T-1- group) or MOO with complete replacement of GNC in 12 and T-3 groups while MOC in T-3 group was treated with formaldehyde solution. The DCP and TDN values of the rations reduced significantly (P&lt;0.05) with incorporation of MOO replacing GNC in group T-2 which was increased with formaldehyde treatment in group T-3 with higher feed intake, nitrogen utilization with significant (P&lt;0.05) improvement of feed efficiency in both T-1 and T-2 groups in comparison to grbup T. No significant differences were recorded among groups for blood biochemical constituents though the greasy as well as the clean wool yields in group T-1 and T-3 were significantly (P&lt;0.05) higher than the group T-2. The feed cost per kg body weight gain was lowest in group T-3 in comparison to other two groups and the reduction in feed cost in percentage as compared to the control group were 2.91 and 4.61 in group T-2 and T-3, respectively. The study revealed that high priced GNC could economically be replaced with MOO with or without formaldehyde treatment which is safe and effective for raising lambs for meat and wool production.
Functional electrospun polymeric nanofibers incorporating geraniol-cyclodextrin inclusion complexes: High thermal stability and enhanced durability of geraniol^AUG 2014^FOOD RESEARCH INTERNATIONAL^In this study, solid geraniol/cyclodextrin inclusion complexes (geraniol/CD-IC) were successfully prepared by using three types of native CD (alpha-CD, beta-CD and gamma-CD). The modeling studies for inclusion complexation between CD and geraniol were performed by using ab initio techniques. Both experimentally and theoretically, the cornplexation efficiency between geraniol and gamma-CD was higher; therefore, geraniol/gamma-CD-IC was chosen and then incorporated into polyvinyl alcohol (PVA) nanofibers (NF) via electrospinning. The scanning electron microscopy imaging elucidated that the aggregates of geraniol/gamma-CD-IC crystals were distributed in the PVA NF, whereas bead-free and uniform PVA and PVA/geraniol NF without CD-IC were obtained. Higher thermal stability of geraniol was observed in the electrospun PVA/geraniol/gamma-CD-IC NF, However, geraniol molecules having volatile nature could not be preserved without CD-IC during electrospinning or during storage; therefore, the complete evaporation of geraniol in PVA/geraniol NF was unavoidable even after one day of its production. On the contrary, the loss of geraniol was minimal (similar to 10%) for PVA/geraniol/gamma-CD-IC NF even after storage of these NF for two years owing to inclusion complexation. Our study demonstrated that electrospun NF incorporating CD-IC may be quite applicable in food industry, e.g.: active food packaging or functional foods, due to very high surface area and nanoporous structure of NF; high thermal stability and enhanced durability of active agents and functional food ingredients. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Inclusao de farinha de visceras de aves sobre caracteristicas de desempenho de juvenis de jundia Rhamdia quelen^JUL-DEC 2014^Revista Portuguesa de Ciencias Veterinarias^Interest in use of alternative foods in animal diets need to reduce production costs. Intensive fish farming increases this trend, since the cost of food ranges from 50 to 80 % of total production. Given this context, the replacement of fishmeal by alternative foods of animal origin and low cost are a viable alternative. This experiment was performed on the Laboratory of Ichtyology, Faculdade de Agronomia Eliseu Maciel, Universidade Federal de Pelotas, Capao do Leao, RS. The inclusion of poultry viscera flour replacing the fish flour in diets of silver catfish at level of 0, 25, 50, 75 and 100% was tested and 75 silver catfish juvenile (Rhamdia quelen) were used for a period of 30 days. At the end of the experiment, biometric characteristics of the animals (weight and length) and performance (weight gain) were evaluated and their values were compared statistically. It was conclude that poultry meal can be used as a substitute for fischmeal in diets juvenile silver catfish (Rhamdia quelen).
The inclusion of science in election manifestos^JUN 25 2014^CURRENT SCIENCE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.756  </td>  <td>1.027</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Enhancing an Extruded Puffed Snack by Optimising Die Head Temperature, Screw Speed and Apple Pomace Inclusion^JUN 2014^FOOD AND BIOPROCESS TECHNOLOGY^Extrusion cooking is recognised as a smart technology for food processors. It requires low cost, high temperature, short-time process and few ingredients to create a puffed snack. The only drawback is that it contains multiple parameters that need to be rigorously trialled to develop an optimal process. This study investigated the effects of two extruding parameters (die head temperature and screw speed) and examined the addition of apple pomace into a corn flour-based extruded snack formulation. A response surface design was utilised. A D-optimal design was chosen, which generated 21 combinations; within these combinations, the control formulation existed. Extrudate characteristics, i.e. bulk density and porosity, textural properties, cooked starch properties and moisture, were analysed. Screw speed was found to have the greatest effect on extrudate quality, e.g. bulk density increased as the screw speed increased (p &lt; 0.001). Both apple pomace addition and screw speed impacted expansion ratio; as they increased, expansion decreased (p &lt; 0.0001). The optimised and validated formulation contained the following parameter levels: 7.7 % apple pomace, 150 A degrees C die head temperature and a screw speed of 69 rpm. As apple pomace and corn flour are naturally gluten free, the extruded product would appeal to people who suffer from intolerances, allergies and coeliac disease.
Executive summary: evaluating the evidence base to support the inclusion of infants and children from birth to 24 mo of age in the Dietary Guidelines for Americans - "the B-24 Project"^MAR 2014^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF CLINICAL NUTRITION^The Dietary Guidelines for Americans (DGA) are the cornerstone of US government efforts to promote health and prevent disease through diet and nutrition. The DGA currently provides guidelines for ages &gt;= 2 y. In an effort to determine the strength of the evidence to support the inclusion of infants and children from birth to age 24 mo, the partner agencies led by the Department of Health and Human Services Office of Disease Prevention and Health Promotion and the USDA Center for Nutrition Program and Policy initiated the project entitled "Evaluating the evidence base to support the inclusion of infants and children from birth to 24 months of age in the Dietary Guidelines for Americans-the B-24 Project." This project represents the first step in the process of applying systematic reviews to the process of deciding whether the evidence is sufficient to include this age group in future editions of the DGA. This supplement includes the B-24 Executive Summary, which describes the B-24 Project and the deliberations of the 4 working groups during the process of developing priority topics for the systematic review, and a research agenda to address the critical gaps. Also included in this supplement issue is an article on the Nutrition Evidence Library methodology for developing systematic review questions and articles from the invited content presenters at the B-24 Prime meeting.
Selecting pesticides for inclusion in drinking water quality guidelines on the basis of detection probability and ranking^FEB 2014^ENVIRONMENT INTERNATIONAL^Pesticides released into the environment may pose both ecological and human health risks. Governments set the regulations and guidelines for the allowable levels of active components of pesticides in various exposure sources, including drinking water. Several pesticide risk indicators have been developed using various methodologies, but such indicators are seldom used for the selection of pesticides to be included in national regulations and guidelines. The aim of the current study was to use risk indicators for the selection of pesticides to be included in regulations and guidelines. Twenty-four risk indicators were created, and a detection rate was defined to judge which indicators were the best for selection. The combination of two indicators (local sales of a pesticide for the purposes of either rice farming or other farming, divided by the guideline value and annual precipitation, and amended with the scores from the physical and chemical properties of the pesticide) gave the highest detection rates. In this case study, this procedure was used to evaluate 134 pesticides that are currently unregulated in the Japanese Drinking Water Quality Guidelines, from which 44 were selected as pesticides to be added to the primary group in the guidelines. The detection probability of the 44 pesticides was more than 72%. Among the 102 pesticides currently in the primary group, 17 were selected for withdrawal from the group. (C) 2013 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Educational Concepts for Social Inclusion on the Labor Market of Young People at Risk^2014^ADULT EDUCATION IN UNIVERSITIES: LOCAL AND REGIONAL PERSPECTIVES^The European policies through its own funding programs underline the increase need for creating educational models for people at risk. Many official documents speak about vulnerable groups of the European society, constantly creating categorizations that are not always understandable and relevant for social workers with activities in social inclusion. Slightly less is discussed about the failure of some implemented programs to facilitate the social inclusion of vulnerable raised within the social assistance systems of the Member State. In Romania also, for some years now, a series of social integration models for youngsters which come from the child protection system was experimented, which unfortunately can't always be considered good practices. These young people abandoned by their families, are abandoned for the second time after graduation by the system in which they grew up and which offered them a range of services and protection measures, but without access to the labor market. Through the opportunities opened by the adult education system it is possible to develop some innovative training concepts for these young people which often do not require state protection by basic services, a house and food, but adequate employment opportunities. This article analyses the European and Romanian possibilities for the inclusion of youngsters at risk by proposing the implementation of a training and employment system through apprenticeship in local workshops or Small and medium enterprises (SMEs). This model offers youngsters a place of work where they can practice their competencies, a mentor from which they can learn, the experience of a job environment and of course a minimum income for their work. This training concept can be included and valorized by establishing a legal framework to facilitate the public-private partnership, the cooperation between adult education institutions, local businesses and child protection systems, for the benefit of this disadvantaged category. (C) 2014 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd. This is an open access article under the CC BY-NC-ND license (http://creativecommons.org/licences/by-nc-nd/3.0/).
The analysis of the polymorphic variations of the dopamine gen transporter (DAT 1) and the serotonin transporter (5-HTTLPR) in patients with Alcohol Dependence Syndrome with inclusion of the phenotypic feature of sweet liking preference^2014^PSYCHIATRIA POLSKA^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.311  </td>  <td>1.009</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Greenhouse gas reduction through social inclusion in Brazil^2014^International Journal of Sustainable Development^With the objective to offer contributions to resolve ecological, social and economic problems in Amazonia, Brazil's sustainable production of palm oil legislation has the specific goal of mobilising public administrations, private business, social aid agencies and family farmers with the following overall objectives: create employment and increase income by means of palm cultivation; reforest degraded lands in the Amazon (Margulis, 2004); contribute to carbon storage with the goal of reducing greenhouse gases; and induce family farmers to participate in the programme and thus favour their social inclusion. The study is based on information from documentary research undertaken to identify and a series of regionally-based interviews. Our research reveals that the national programme has mobilised a range of stakeholders (governments, firms, universities and NGOs) and small farmers' associations.
Effect of the inclusion of chestnut in the finishing diet on volatile compounds during the manufacture of dry-cured "Lacon" from Celta pig breed^JAN 2014^MEAT SCIENCE^The effect of the finishing diet on the volatile compounds throughout the manufacture of dry-cured "lacon" (a Spanish traditional meat product), from the Celta pig breed was studied. Thirty-six pigs were separated into three groups according to the type of feeding during the finish-fattening period of three months (concentrate, mixed diet and chestnut). From the pigs of each diet, four batches of dry-cured "lacon" were manufactured. From each batch, samples of fresh meat, meat after salting, after post-salting, and after 14, 28, 56 and 84 days of drying-ripening were taken. Volatiles were extracted by a purge-and-trap method and analyzed by gas chromatographic/mass spectrometry (GC/MS). Seventy-six volatile compounds were identified and quantified from dry-cured "lacon" samples in pigs finished with chestnut, eighty-two for concentrate fed pigs and eighty in pigs fed with the mixed diet. The number of identified volatile compounds increased during the manufacturing process; at 84 days of drying-ripening, in the dry-cured "lacon" samples from pigs finished with concentrate, mixed diet and chestnut, 54, 58 and 62 volatile compounds were detected, respectively. The most abundant group of flavour compounds at the end of the manufacturing process was hydrocarbons in the three feeding systems, followed by aldehydes, ketones and alcohols. Discriminant analysis selected six variables (dodecane, butadienol, pentenol, 2-pentenal, decen-3-ona and pyridine-2-methyl) and calculated two discriminating functions which allowed verification of chestnut in the finishing diet. (C) 2013 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Life cycle and economic assessment of Western Canadian pulse systems: The inclusion of pulses in crop rotations^JAN 2014^AGRICULTURAL SYSTEMS^The introduction of a pulse crop into a cereal production rotation has been widely recognized for the rotational benefits resulting from nitrogen fixation and crop diversification. Pulses are the dry, edible seeds of pod-bearing plants in the legume family, such as dry pea and lentil. Both dry pea and lentil are widely grown across Western Canada and provide an important source of food and feed worldwide. In addition, these pulse crops demonstrate positive returns over and above the production of traditional crops in most situations except when their prices are low. Although the economic and environmental benefits of pulse crops have been examined in many different capacities, an examination of the rotational implications of including pulse crops in a cereal-based rotation in Western Canada has not been conducted on a life cycle basis. In this study, life cycle and economic assessments were used to examine the environmental and economic implications of including dry pea and lentil crops in an oilseed-cereal rotation in Western Canada. An analysis was performed in which dry pea or lentil replaced a spring wheat crop in a canola - spring wheat - spring wheat - spring wheat rotation. Pulses were ultimately produced for their protein content. Results suggested that introducing dry pea or lentil in the rotation reduced environmental effects in all impact categories examined (Global Warming and Resource Use: -17% to -25%; Ecosystem Quality: -1% to -24%; and Human Health: -3% to -28%). In addition, the economic benefits of this practice suggested that the farm level returns over variable costs improved for both the dry pea and lentil rotations (from $-20.43 ha(-1) for the traditional rotation to $110.45 and $138.78 ha(-1), respectively, for dry pea and lentil rotation). These reductions were a result of reduced fertilizer requirements for the pulse-containing rotations (i.e. no application of nitrogen fertilizer to the pulse crop and reduced application to the succeeding cereal crop) as well as higher cereal yields. Based on these results, improved returns to producers and reduced amounts of material and energy inputs can be realized with optimized crop management that can include dry pea and/or lentil in rotation with other high yielding crops. Including pulse crops in an oilseed-cereal rotation is an effective method to enhance the economics and environmental effects of crop production. (C) 2013 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
The Inclusion of Nonsafety Criteria within the Regulatory Framework of Agricultural Biotechnology: Exploring Factors that Are Likely to Influence Policy Transfer^NOV 2013^REVIEW OF POLICY RESEARCH^Policy makers of various countries are exposed to critiques that call for the consideration of issues that transcend human, animal, and environmental safety concerns when assessing agricultural biotechnology products. While some jurisdictions have decided to broaden the scope of their approval process for genetically modified (GM) foods, this paper analyzes legal, political, and economic factors that can influence the transfer of these initiatives. Drawing on mechanisms presented in the policy transfer literature, this article examines their mixed effects pertaining to the regulation of biotechnology. Although the mechanisms of competition and coercion do not preclude such a possibility, one must admit that they do not create any incentives for policy makers to include nonsafety criteria within biotechnology regulations. By contrast, to varying degrees, the mechanisms of mimicry and learning can foster the transfer of such a broadened scope that allows a better assessment of GM foods' social acceptability.
Biodiesel fuel production from waste cooking oil by the inclusion complex of heteropoly acid with bridged bis-cyclodextrin^OCT 2013^BIORESOURCE TECHNOLOGY^The inclusion complex of Cs2.5H0.5PW12O40 with bridged bis-cyclodextrin (CsPW/B) is prepared as a highly efficient catalyst for the direct production of biodiesel via the transesterification of waste cooking oil. CsPW/B is characterized by X-ray diffraction, and the biodiesel is analyzed by Gas Chromatography-Mass Spectrometer. The conversion rate of waste cooking oil is up to 94.2% under the optimum experimental conditions that are methanol/oil molar ratio of 9:1, catalyst dosage of 3 wt%, temperature of 65 degrees C and reaction time of 180 mm. The physical properties of biodiesel sample satisfy the requirement of ASTM 06751 standards. The novel CsPW/B catalyst used for the transesterification can lead to 96.9% fatty acid methyl esters and 86.5% of the biodiesel product can serve as the ideal substitute for diesel fuel, indicating its excellent potential application in biodiesel production. (C) 2013 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Feed-grade amino acid use in the United States: The synergetic inclusion history with linear programming^SEP 2013^JOURNAL OF APPLIED POULTRY RESEARCH^This review highlights research instrumental in the adoption of feed-grade amino acid inclusion in poultry diets. Attitudes toward industry adoption are discussed by decade, beginning in 1950. Synergies between acceptance of least-cost formulation and feed-grade amino acid use are provided. Early acceptance of feed-grade Met was accomplished with formulation examples and resultant bird performance trials, rather than on amino acid requirement research. However, research reports delineating needs of Thr, Ile, and Val are included, as these reports will aid the nutritionist in meeting minimum needs and establishing shadow prices based on current economics. This is useful for fermentation companies to project potential new markets for the branched-chain amino acids. The need for more practical research with the less limiting amino acids to offer cost savings from aggressive feed-grade amino acid use while maintaining bird performance goals is discussed.
Fitting It All In: Adapting a Green Chemistry Extraction Experiment for Inclusion in an Undergraduate Analytical Laboratory^JUN 2013^JOURNAL OF CHEMICAL EDUCATION^Several principles of green chemistry are introduced through this experiment designed for use in the undergraduate analytical chemistry laboratory: An established experiment of liquid CO2 extraction of D-limonene has been adapted to include a quantitative analysis by gas chromatography. This facilitates drop-in incorporation of an exciting experiment into an existing curriculum. The experiment provides an introduction to natural product extraction, calibration curves, and internal standards while simultaneously demonstrating alternative solvent selection for pollution prevention and increased chemical safety.
Georgian medical news^2013-Apr^Georgian medical news^None
The application of PVA antibacterial film with clove oil/beta-cyclodextrin inclusion complex in fruit packaging^2013^ENGINEERING SOLUTIONS FOR MANUFACTURING PROCESSES, PTS 1-3^In this paper, the PVA film with clove oil/beta-cyclodextrin inclusion complex was used to package cherry tomatoes Experiment on cherry tomatoes showed that weightless rates increased along with time, and sensory equality score of cherry tomatoes began to decrease sharply in the 2nd day of storage. PVC antibacterial film had a controlled effect weightless and sensory change obviously, when the clathrate adding is 15%, the effect was the best.
The Socio-Technical Alliance: Bringing New Tools to the Design of Policies Aimed to Promote Social Inclusion^NOV 2012^REVIEW OF POLICY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.864  </td>  <td>2.333</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effects of Dietary Alfalfa Inclusion on Salmonella Typhimurium Populations in Growing Layer Chicks^OCT 2012^FOODBORNE PATHOGENS AND DISEASE^Reducing Salmonella in poultry has been a paramount goal of the poultry industry in order to improve food safety. Inclusion of high-fiber fermentable feedstuffs in chicken diets has been shown to reduce the incidence of Salmonella colonization in laying hens, but no work has been performed in growing birds. Therefore, the present study was designed to quantify differences in artificially inoculated cecal Salmonella Typhimurium populations in growing layer chicks (n = 60 in each of two replications) fed 0%, 25%, and 50% of their diet (w/w) replaced with alfalfa meal from day (d) 7 to d14 after hatch. Alfalfa supplementation reduced cecal populations of Salmonella by 0.95 and 1.25 log(10) colony-forming unit per gram in the 25% and 50% alfalfa groups compared to controls. Alfalfa feeding reduced (p &lt; 0.05) the number of cecal- and crop-positive birds compared to controls. Increasing levels of alfalfa increased (p &lt; 0.05) total volatile fatty acids (VFA) and the proportion of acetate in the cecum. Surprisingly, alfalfa inclusion did not negatively impact average daily gain (ADG) in birds over the 7-d feeding period. Alfalfa inclusion at 50% of the diet increased (p &lt; 0.05) the number of bacterial genera detected in the cecum compared to controls, and also altered proportions of the microbial population by reducing Ruminococcus and increasing Clostridia populations. Results support the idea that providing a fermentable substrate can increase gastrointestinal VFA production and bacterial diversity which in turn can reduce colonization by Salmonella via natural competitive barriers. However, further studies are obviously needed to more fully understand the impact of changes made in diet or management procedures on poultry production.
Inclusion of 1-Naphthylacetic Acid and 2-(1-Naphthyl)acetamide into Three Typical Multiresidue Methods for LC/MS/MS Analysis of Tomatoes and Zucchini^SEP-OCT 2012^JOURNAL OF AOAC INTERNATIONAL^In spite of high plant growth regulator application rates, little has been reported in the literature on determination of their residues in fruits and vegetables. This would be useful in monitoring good manufacturing practices and overall safety through the enforcement of maximum residue levels (MRLs). The present work describes method validation for the determination of 1-naphthylacetic acid (NAA) and 2(1-naphthyl)acetamide (NAAm) in tomato and zucchini using the mini-Luke, ethyl acetate (EtOAc) and acetate-buffered quick, easy, cheap, effective, rugged, and safe (QuEChERS) methods. Samples were spiked at two different levels: 50 and 100 mu g/kg for NAA and 20 and 100 mu g/kg for NAAm. These compounds were analyzed within the same chromatographic run with LC coupled to triple quadrupole MS (LC/(QqQ)MS/MS) in positive and negative electrospray ionization [ESI(+) and ESI(-)] modes for NAAm and NAA, respectively. For analyte confirmation, LC/ESI(-)QTOE-MS was also investigated given that NAA has only one multiple reaction monitoring transition (185.1 -&gt; 040.9 m/z). These three common methods were used to determine linearity, recoveries, precision (RSD), matrix effects, repeatability, and reproducibility (n = 5) for the selected matrixes. In terms of the Directorate-General for Health and Consumers (DG-SANCO) guidelines, only insignificant differences were found for the multiresidue methods tested, regardless of the commodity. Matrix-matched calibration was used, and LODs were below 10.1 mu g/kg for NAA and 6.0 mu g/kg for NAAm, which were lower than the MRLs established in current European Union legislation for these compounds. Obtained recoveries for NAA ranged from 87 to 107% with RSD values below 10% for mini-Luke, 83 to 107% with RSD &lt;11% for EtOAc, and 76 to 85% with RSD &lt;= 7% for QuEChERS. NAAm recoveries ranged from 74 to 102% with RSD &lt;= 15% for mini-Luke, 76 to 97% with RSD &lt;4% for EtOAc, and 76 to 93% with RSD &lt;= 5% for OuEChERS. The linearity of the response over two orders of magnitude was demonstrated (r(2) &gt; 0.996) for all methods used. Good repeatability and reproducibility in terms of RSD were obtained (11.3-17.8%) for these analytical methods. The results were acceptable within the studied ranges for both analytes in all methods. As these multiresidue methods are used at the present time in many laboratories, this survey indicates that these analytes should be included in their monitoring scope.
Effects of Cassia tora (Linn.) leaves meal inclusion in the diet on growth performances, carcass and organs characteristics and economic margins in growing indigenous Senegal chickens^AUG-SEP 2012^REVUE DE MEDECINE VETERINAIRE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.338  </td>  <td>0.526</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of discard assessment indicators in fisheries life cycle assessment studies. Expanding the use of fishery-specific impact categories^JUN 2012^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF LIFE CYCLE ASSESSMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.868  </td>  <td>5.524</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Use of maize silage in beef heifers fattening diets: effects on performance, carcass and meat quality^JUN 2012^ITEA-INFORMACION TECNICA ECONOMICA AGRARIA^The technical and economic interest of fattening beef heifers with maize silage as an alternative to conventional feeding on concentrates was analyzed in a commercial farm. Heifers received ad libitum during the fattening phase (from 6 months of age till they reached 440 kg live weight) either a total mixed ration of maize silage and a high-protein concentrate (TMR, n=8) or concentrates and barley straw (CONC, n=8). Growth performance was similar for both treatments, and although total feed consumption and feed:gain ratio were higher in the TMR group, the economic cost per kg gain was 11% lower in this group. Carcass weight and conformation score were similar, but carcasses from the TMR had a slightly lower fat score and higher pigment content in subcutaneous fat. Meat instrumental quality (pH, colour, shear force) were similar in both treatments, but fatty acid profile differed between diets, with a higher proportion of n-3 polyunsaturated fatty acids and a lower n-6/n-3 ratio in meat from TMR heifers, which indicates a healthier nutritional quality.
Pathotypic and Molecular Characterization of a Fowl Adenovirus Associated with Inclusion Body Hepatitis in Saskatchewan Chickens^MAR 2012^AVIAN DISEASES^Inclusion body hepatitis (IBH) is one of the major global disease problems, causing significant economic losses to poultry industry of the United States and Canada. The disease is characterized by its sudden onset and high mortalities. Amongst different serotypes of fowl adenoviruses (FAdVs) associated with IBH, serotype 8 of group 1 FAdV has been isolated from majority of IBH cases. In present studies, we isolated a FAdV from morbid liver of a 17-day-old broiler from a Saskatchewan broiler farm. This newly isolated virus was designated as IBHV(SK). However, based on the sequence analysis of the L I region of the hexon gene, the IBHV(SK) may be classified as FAdV 8b strain 764. These studies describe for the first time the complete hexon gene sequence of FAdV serotype 8b. Experimental infection of 2-day-old (n = 48) and 2-wk-old (n = 56) chicks caused 83% and 43% mortalities, respectively. Determination of the complete hexon gene sequence of IBHV(SK) with establishment of a disease model in chickens will facilitate the development of type-specific diagnostic reagents and assays for the evaluation of potential experimental vaccines against pathogenic FAdV infections.
Influence of whip speed ratios on the inclusion of air into a bakery foam produced with a planetary mixer device^FEB 2012^JOURNAL OF FOOD ENGINEERING^In the present study, dimensional analysis has been developed in order to identify the ratios governing the foam development network, with mixers combining dual whip revolution speeds. It is first suggested that, for a given planetary whip mixer and foaming solution, the set of dimensionless ratios characterizing the course of gas hold-up can be reduced to modified Froude and revolution numbers, as in the case of a classical mixing system. This requires the introduction of a characteristic velocity, instead of the two individual rotational speeds of the whip, in the corresponding list of governing parameters. An analytical expression for this characteristic velocity is then proposed, and gas hold-up measurements are made at various whip speed ratios, using a given food model-recipe, containing whole eggs and sugar. Our experimental results were evaluated, in order to validate the proposed dimensional analysis. It is shown that the aeration process requires a very low, modified revolution number to reach steady state values. It is also shown that the asymptotic values of gas hold-up are influenced by the modified Froude number. Depending on the values of the modified Froude number, it is noted that coalescence can occur, which then contributes to a reduction in gas hold-up. It has also been established that the modified Froude number can account for the eccentricity of planetary mixers, and consequently, that this number is a robust indicator for the determination of the optimum gas hold-up value, when air incorporation is produced by various planetary whipping devices. The results described in this paper enable foaming processes using planetary whipping mixers to be optimized, by proposing a framework in which the impeller speed ratio and aeration time can be set in such a way as to control the simultaneous entrainment and disentrainment of gas. Finally, this work can be further extended to other gas/liquid applications in which planetary mixers are used, such as surface aeration in wastewater treatment plants. (C) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
The Brazilian organic food sector: Prospects and constraints of facilitating the inclusion of smallholders^JAN 2012^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^The Brazilian organic food sector has experienced important growth during the last two decades. Brazilian smallholders, however, are facing huge challenges to enter and benefit from this growth in a sustainable way. Combining the lens of New Institutional Economics and socio-anthropology, we analyze six experiences of Brazilian smallholders who converted to organics in the 1990s'. Three different food systems are featured in this analysis: an alternative food system, which is strongly interwoven with the Brazilian Agro-ecological movement and two commercial food procurement systems oriented towards domestic and an export markets driven mainly by supermarket chains. The analytical focus was on 1) the governance of these food systems, 2) the constraints farmers are facing within these food systems and, 3) the benefits that they can expect from market inclusion. We highlighted the roles that NGOs, Faith-based organizations and public-related agencies play in supporting the inclusion of smallholders into all three food systems. We confirmed the arguments in support of pursuing the agro-ecological development based model in Brazil, but underlined that there is a critical lack of support for farmers included in the commercial market-oriented food systems. Such a lack is even more critical as the food systems driven by expanding supermarket chains are characterized by strong asymmetric power relations at the expense of smallholders. Considering the reluctance of NGOs and Faith-based organizations to support these farmers, we call for efforts to be made to provide a policy framework to enable public-related entities to secure sustainable inclusion into these systems and exit strategies for those experiencing exclusion from these highly competitive food systems. (C) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Recent patents on food, nutrition &amp; agriculture^2011-Sep^Recent patents on food, nutrition &amp; agriculture^None
Techno-Economic Evaluation of an Inclusion Body Solubilization and Recombinant Protein Refolding Process^SEP-OCT 2011^BIOTECHNOLOGY PROGRESS^Expression of recombinant proteins in Escherichia coli is normally accompanied by the formation of inclusion bodies (IBs). To obtain the protein product in an active (native) soluble form, the IBs must be first solubilized, and thereafter, the soluble, often denatured and reduced protein must be refolded. Several technically feasible alternatives to conduct IBs solubilization and on-column refolding have been proposed in recent years. However, rarely these on-column refolding alternatives have been evaluated from an economical point of view, questioning the feasibility of their implementation at a preparative scale. The presented study assesses the economic performance of four distinct process alternatives that include pH induced IBs solubilization and protein refolding (pH_IndSR); IBs solubilization using urea, dithiothreitol (DTT), and alkaline pH followed by batch size-exclusion protein refolding; inclusion bodies (IBs) solubilization using urea, DTT, and alkaline pH followed by simulated moving bed (SMB) size-exclusion protein refolding, and IBs solubilization using urea, DTT and alkaline pH followed by batch dilution protein refolding. The economic performance was judged on the basis of the direct fixed capital, and the production cost per unit of product (PC). This work shows that (1) pH_IndSR system is a relatively economical process, because of the low IBs solubilization cost; (2) substituting beta-mercaptoethanol for dithiothreithol is an attractive alternative, as it significantly decreases the product cost contribution from the IBs solubilization; and (3) protein refolding by size-exclusion chromatography becomes economically attractive by changing the mode of operation of the chromatographic reactor from batch to continuous using SMB technology. (C) 2011 American Institute of Chemical Engineers Biotechnol. Prog., 27: 1315-1328, 2011
Inclusion of Ensiled Cassava KM94 Leaves in Diets for Growing Pigs in Vietnam Reduces Growth Rate but Increases Profitability^AUG 2011^ASIAN-AUSTRALASIAN JOURNAL OF ANIMAL SCIENCES^This study was conducted to determine the effect of the inclusion of different levels of ensiled cassava leaves (variety KM94) in the diets on performance and carcass characteristics of growing pigs in Vietnam. A total of 40 crossbreds pigs (Large Whitex Mong Cai, 20 males and 20 females) with an initial live weight of 23.5 kg (SD = 0.86) were randomly allocated to one of the four pens across 5 units. Four experimental diets were formulated for two growth periods, period 1 (60 days) for 20 to 50 kg and period 2 lasted 30 days, from 50 kg until slaughter. Four diets were formulated containing inclusion levels of ensiled cassava KM94 leaves diet of 0, 10. 15 and 20% in the DM. Diets were formulated based on previously determined ileal amino acid digestibility values of the KM94 products and were isonitrogenous and isocaloric on a metabolizable energy basis. Each pen of pigs was randomly assigned to one of the four dietary treatments. Dry matter intake and final weight tended to decreased with increasing levels of ensiled cassava KM94 leaves in the diet while there was a significant (p = 0.022) decrease in average daily gain. Protein depositions of the F1 pigs tended (p = 0.093) to decrease with increasing inclusion levels of ensiled cassava KM94 leaves. There was no significant difference in feed conversion ratio, carcass quality and fat gain between the groups of pigs. There were clear differences in feed costs among the experimental diets (p = 0.001) with increasing levels of ensiled cassava KM 94 leaves in the diet reducing feed costs. It was concluded that, in diets for growing pig, inclusion of ensiled cassava leaves reduces growth rate of pigs in Vietnam but increases profitability as measured by feed costs.
Caracterizacao fisico-quimica e sensorial de queijo de coalho produzido com mistura de leite de cabra e de leite de vaca^JUL-SEP 2011^Revista do Instituto Adolfo Lutz^In this research, we aimed to evaluate the effect on the physicochemical and sensory characteristics of using bovine milk in the manufacture of goat milk coalho cheese. The purpose of this evaluation was to corroborate the improvement in quality and product acceptance. The cheese was prepared by varying the proportions of the milk mixture in five groups: (caprine: bovine) Q(1) (4:0); Q(2) (3:1); Q(3) (1:1); Q(4) (1:3) and Q(5) (0:4). The completely randomized design consisted of three repetitions for each of these five ratios. The samples were subjected to microbiological analysis (such as quality control), physicochemical analysis (such as colorimetric properties, melting point, yield, pH, the activity of water - Aw and the moisture, fat, protein and total solid content) and sensory analysis (such as the acceptance test and order of preference). The mean values were significant (p&lt;0.05) for moisture, Total Solids (TS), protein, ash, acidity and the colorimetric parameter b*. In the sensory analysis, the overall evaluation and consumer preference differed significantly for the cheese made with 100% goat's milk. The preparation of cheese curd using these mixtures of milks was found to be viable, from both nutritional and sensory standpoints and represents a potential alternative for the dairy products industry.
ADOPTING THE SYSTEM-JUSTIFYING ATTITUDES OF OTHERS: EFFECTS OF TRIVIAL INTERPERSONAL CONNECTIONS IN THE CONTEXT OF SOCIAL INCLUSION AND EXCLUSION^JUN 2011^SOCIAL COGNITION^Although system justification research has focused most on the needs to explain and control the social world, system justification may also be regulated by the need to maintain social connections with others. Three experiments demonstrate that trivial interpersonal ties to system-justifying others can facilitate the endorsement of system-justifying attitudes, sometimes even in the face of social exclusion. In Experiment 1, participants exhibited stronger implicit pro-system, anti-labor attitudes after playing a game of catch with economically advantaged, high-status (vs. equal-status) partners. Experiments 2 and 3 demonstrated that social exclusion (vs. inclusion) by system-justifying partners increased endorsement of implicit anti-system attitudes unless participants believed that they shared a birthday or food preference with their partners. In sum, results suggest that system-justifying attitudes are based in part on motivations to regulate interpersonal relationships, including relationships that are temporary, superficial, and even exclusionary.
Pilot-Scale Technology Development, Nutritional and Consumer Assessment of Whole-Multigrain Cookies as Influenced by Fructan Inclusion^APR 2011^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.081  </td>  <td>2.416</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of Training Patients in US Food and Drug Administration Premarket Approval Cardiovascular Device Studies^MAR 28 2011^ARCHIVES OF INTERNAL MEDICINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  17.333  </td>  <td>13.098</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2014  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The inclusion of functional foods enriched in fibre, calcium, iodine, fat-soluble vitamins and n-3 fatty acids in a conventional diet improves the nutrient profile according to the Spanish reference intake^MAR 2011^PUBLIC HEALTH NUTRITION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.526  </td>  <td>3.046</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion and Exclusion in Nutrigenetics Clinical Research: Ethical and Scientific Challenges^2011^JOURNAL OF NUTRIGENETICS AND NUTRIGENOMICS^Background/Aims: There are compelling reasons to ensure the participation of ethnic minorities and populations of all ages worldwide in nutrigenetics clinical research. If findings in such research are valid for some individuals, groups, or communities, and not for others, then ethical questions of justice - and not only issues of methodology and external validity - arise. This paper aims to examine inclusion in nutrigenetics clinical research and its scientific and ethical challenges. Methods: In total, 173 publications were identified through a systematic review of clinical studies in nutrigenetics published between 1998 and 2007. Data such as participants' demographics as well as eligibility criteria were extracted. Results: There is no consistency in the way participants' origins (ancestry, ethnicity, or race) and ages are described in publications. A vast majority of the studies identified was conducted in North America and Europe and focused on 'white' participants. Our results show that pregnant women (and fetuses), minors, and the elderly (&gt;= 75 years old) remain underrepresented. Conclusion: Representativeness in nutrigenetics research is a challenging ethical and scientific issue. Yet, if nutrigenetics is to benefit whole populations and be used in public and global health agendas, fair representation as well as clear descriptions of participants in publications are crucial. Copyright (C) 2012 S. Karger AG, Basel
Inclusion of family farm products and organic foods for school feeding in Southern Brazil^2011^ANNALS OF NUTRITION AND METABOLISM^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.051  </td>  <td>3.725</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
ON THE INCLUSION OF INDIRECT LAND USE IN BIOFUEL REGULATIONS^2011^UNIVERSITY OF ILLINOIS LAW REVIEW^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.6  </td>  <td>0.905</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of Blended Lipid Solutions as Functional Ingredients to Alter the Fatty Acid Profile of Beef Patties^SEP 10 2010^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.081  </td>  <td>2.416</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effects of vitamin E and fish oil inclusion in broiler diets on meat fatty acid composition and on the flavour of a composite sample of breast meat^AUG 15 2010^JOURNAL OF THE SCIENCE OF FOOD AND AGRICULTURE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.422  </td>  <td>2.733</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Consultation of pig farmers on the inclusion of some welfare outcome assessments within UK farm assurance^MAY 29 2010^VETERINARY RECORD^Fifty-six pig farmers who attended a series of health seminars completed a questionnaire to assess their attitude to the inclusion of some welfare outcome assessments within farm assurance. In answer to open questions, farmers were most commonly proud of the productivity (27.5 per cent) and welfare (23.5 per cent) of the pigs on their farm, and the welfare of pigs in the UK industry as a whole (26.1 per cent). The most common thing that farmers wanted to tell consumers about was the welfare of the pigs (55.8 per cent), followed by their stockmanship qualities, the quality of their pig meat and the safety of their pig meat (all 13.5 per cent). In answer to closed questions, 66 per cent of farmers stated they would be either quite willing or very willing to perform welfare self-assessments as part of farm assurance, and 66 per cent would be quite or very willing to be anonymously benchmarked on the welfare of their pigs.
Effect of Inclusion of Salmon Roe on Characteristics of Salmon Baby Food Products^MAY 2010^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^Baby food was formulated from sockeye salmon (puree alone, puree + chunks, puree + pink row, puree + pink row + chunks, puree + red row, puree + red roe + chunks). In the 1st study, physical (pH, instrumental color, water activity) and descriptive sensory (odor, flavor, texture, visual color) characteristics were determined. Samples containing roe were lighter and less red (by approximately 3 to 4 a* units) than formulations without roe regardless of the type of roe added. Visual pink color followed the same trend. Formulations with roe, both pink and sockeye, were almost twice as fibrous as formulations without roe. Salmon flavor was stronger in samples containing roe from sockeye salmon. In the 2nd study, retort processed samples were stored at room temperature for 6 mo. Sweaty odor decreased over storage time. Visual cream-brown color correlated with L*, a*, b*, and chroma values (r = -0.80, 0.75, 0.80, and 0.84, respectively). TBARS values of all samples were &lt; 0.35 mg MDA/kg and declined after month 0 indicating that these products were oxidatively stable. Overall, adding roe to these products lightened them and increased fibrous texture. Samples containing sockeye salmon roe had stronger salmon flavor. Once retort processed, these products were quite stable in terms of color, odor, and TBARS. Potential nutrient contributions of this type of product to the infant diet warrant additional research.
Characterization of variation in inclusion of competitive-food policy items in South Carolina school-district wellness policies^APR 2010^FASEB JOURNAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.391  </td>  <td>5.421</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effect of the inclusion of artichoke silage in the ration of lactating ewes on the properties of milk and cheese characteristics during ripening^APR 2010^JOURNAL OF DAIRY SCIENCE^The effect of including artichoke silage in the rations of dairy ewes on milk characteristics and biochemical changes of ripened cheeses was evaluated. Four groups of lactating ewes were fed rations containing 0, 10, 20, or 30% artichoke silage on a dry matter basis. Bulk milk samples were collected 3 times during the feeding period, and semi-hard cheeses were manufactured and sampled during ripening. Milk composition and cheese yield were not affected by diet. Inclusion of 20 and 30% artichoke silage reduced the firmness of the curds at a level only detected by the Gelograph (Gelograph-NT, Gel-Instrumente, Thalwil, Switzerland) probe. Inclusion of artichoke silage in ewes' diet decreased fat and total free fatty acids content of these cheeses and increased total free amino acids content. Despite the effect of diet on cheese ripening characteristics, the overall sensory scores for cheeses corresponding to artichoke silage diets were statistically higher than those for the control cheeses.
Dietary inclusion level effects of distillers dried grains with solubles on broiler meat quality^APR 1 2010^POULTRY SCIENCE^A completely randomized design with 7 replications (n = 7, treatments = 5 with 8 subsamples per treatment) was used to evaluate the effects of feeding various levels of distillers dried grains with solubles (DDGS; 0, 6, 12, 18, and 24%) on broiler breast and thigh meat quality. Broilers were harvested in a pilot scale processing plant with commercial prototype equipment at 42 d of age. The right half of each breast was evaluated for pH, instrumental color, cooking loss, proximate analysis, and tenderness. The left half of each breast was used for consumer acceptability testing. Thigh meat was evaluated for proximate composition, fatty acid composition, and TBA reactive substances. Breast meat from broilers that were fed DDGS had a higher (P &lt; 0.05) pH than those from the control diet. In addition, the 18 and 24% DDGS treatments yielded breast meat with higher (P &lt; 0.05) pH values than the 6% DDGS treatment. No differences existed (P &gt; 0.05) among breast meat from the different treatments with respect to cooking loss, instrumental color, and consumer acceptability, but breast meat from the control (0% DDGS) treatment had slightly lower (P &lt; 0.05) shear force than breast meat from the 18 and 24% DDGS treatments. In addition, no differences (P &gt; 0.05) existed among proximate composition of breast and thigh meat from the control and DDGS treatments. As DDGS concentration increased, there was a linear increase (P &lt; 0.05) in linoleic and polyunsaturated fatty acids, which indicates a greater potential for lipid oxidation. The TBA reactive substances values were greater (P &lt; 0.05) for the 18 and 24% DDGS treatments at d 5 when compared with the control and 6% DDGS treatments, which indicates increased oxidation. Overall, data suggest that all treatments yielded high-quality breast meat and that thigh meat quality was similar among treatments containing 0 to 12% DDGS, but higher inclusion levels led to thigh meat that was more susceptible to oxidation.
Inclusion of social aspects in Life Cycle Assessment of food^2010^Environmental Assessment and Management in the Food Industry: Life Cycle Assessment and Related Approaches^This chapter focuses on how the social 'pillar' of sustainability might be more fully integrated into the life cycle assessment framework in the specific context of food production systems. The chapter includes a discussion of why social impacts are relevant in the context of food production systems and also highlights several existing food system applications of social impacts using life-cycling thinking.
Disparate Inclusion of Older Adults in Clinical Trials: Priorities and Opportunities for Policy and Practice Change^2010^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^Older adults are vastly underrepresented in clinical trials in spite of shouldering a disproportionate burden of disease and consumption of prescription drugs and therapies, restricting treatments' generalizability, efficacy, and safety. Eliminating Disparities in Clinical Trials, a national initiative comprising a stake-holder network of researchers, community advocates, policymakers, and federal representatives, undertook a critical analysis of older adults' structural barriers to clinical trial participation. We present practice and policy change recommendations emerging from this process and their rationale, which spanned multiple themes: (1) decision making with cognitively impaired patients; (2) pharmacokinetic differences and physiological age; (3) health literacy, communication, and aging; (4) geriatric training; (5) federal monitoring and accountability; (6) clinical trial costs; and (7) cumulative effects of aging and ethnicity. (Am J Public Health. 2010;100:S105-S112. doi:10.2105/AJPH.2009.162982)
Processes of inclusion and adverse incorporation: oil palm and agrarian change in Sumatra, Indonesia^2010^JOURNAL OF PEASANT STUDIES^Changes in globalised agriculture raise critical questions as rapid agricultural development leads to widespread social and environmental transformation. With increased global demand for vegetable oils and biofuel, in Indonesia the area under oil palm has doubled over the last decade. This paper presents a case study of how micro-processes that are linked to wider dynamics shape oil palm related agrarian change in villages in Sumatra, Indonesia. It pursues related questions regarding the impact of agribusiness-driven agriculture, the fate of smallholders experiencing contemporary agrarian transition, and the impact of increased demand for vegetable oils and biofuels on agrarian structures in Sumatra. It argues that the paths of agrarian change are highly uneven and depend on how changing livelihood strategies are enabled or constrained by economic, social and political relations that vary over time and space. In contrast to simplifying narratives of inclusion/exclusion, it argues that outcomes depend on the terms under which smallholders engage with oil palm. Distinguishing between exogenous processes of agribusiness expansion and endogenous commodity market expansion, it finds each is associated with characteristic processes of change. It concludes that the way successive policy interventions have worked with the specific characteristics of oil palm have cumulatively shaped the space where agrarian change occurs in Sumatra.
Improving the quality of infant sleep through the inclusion at supper of cereals enriched with tryptophan, adenosine-5 '-phosphate, and uridine-5 '-phosphate^DEC 2009^NUTRITIONAL NEUROSCIENCE^The present study evaluated whether the administration of cereals enriched with nutrients that are facilitators of sleep could help improve the sleep of infants who had sleep disorders at night time. Thirty infants aged 8-16 months with sleep disorders involving at least three nocturnal waking episodes took part in the study. They were given a night-time 'sleep facilitating cereal' product containing 225 mg tryptophan, 5.3 mg adenosine-5'-P, and 6.3 mg uridine-5'-P per 100 g of product. These cereals were given in a double-blind procedure lasting 5 weeks, with ingestion of the cereal between 18: 00 and 06:00. In the control week, the children received a standard cereal (75 mg tryptophan/100 g product without nucleotides) dissolved in a standard formula milk (231.5 mg tryptophan, 2.6 mg adenosine-5'-P, 5 mg uridine-5'-P, per 100 g product). In one experimental week, the children received the night-time sleep facilitating cereal together with the standard formula milk. In another week, they received the sleep facilitating cereal together with a night milk specially formulated to attain the sleep rhythm (480 mg tryptophan, 8.8 mg uridine-5'-P, and 7.6 mg adenosine-5'-P per 100 g product). The three experimental weeks were separated by two wash-out weeks in which the milk and cereal administered was identical in composition to that of the control week. All the infants received a programmed writer actimeter which they wore continually, attached to their ankles, to record their motor activity. The recorded activity was used to calculate information about the time in bed, assumed sleep, actual sleep, sleep efficiency, sleep latency, immobility, and total activity. The infants receiving the enriched cereal during the time of darkness showed improvements in their sleep parameters, regardless of whether the milk they took at night was standard or enriched with tryptophan, adenosine-5'-P, and uridine-5'-P. In summary, the administration of enriched cereals led to an improvement in sleep, regardless of the type of infant milk used. These results support the concept of chrononutrition since they confirm that the sleep/wake rhythm can be influenced by diet.
Reflections from a systematic review of dietary energy density and weight gain: is the inclusion of drinks valid?^NOV 2009^OBESITY REVIEWS^P&gt;The association between dietary energy density, increased energy intake and weight gain is supported by experimental evidence, but confirmation of an effect in free-living humans is limited. Experimental evidence supports a role of energy density in obesity through changes in food composition, not drinks consumption. The inclusion of drinks in the calculation creates a variable of questionable validity and has a substantive impact on the estimated energy density of the diet. We posit, based on the experimental evidence, that calculating the energy density of diets by excluding drinks and including calories from drinks as a covariate in the analysis is the most valid and reliable method of testing the relationship between energy density and weight gain in free-living humans. We demonstrate, by systematically reviewing existing observational studies of dietary energy density and weight gain in free-living humans, how current variation in the method for calculating energy density hampers the interpretation of these data. Reaching an a priori decision on the appropriate methodology will reduce the error caused by multiple comparisons and facilitate meaningful interpretation of epidemiological evidence to inform the development of effective obesity prevention strategies.
Inclusion of indigenous and ethnic minority populations in intervention trials: challenges and strategies in a New Zealand supermarket study^OCT 2009^JOURNAL OF EPIDEMIOLOGY AND COMMUNITY HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.872  </td>  <td>4.124</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A critical review of susceptibility of crustaceans to Taura syndrome, Yellowhead disease and White Spot Disease and implications of inclusion of these diseases in European legislation^JUN 3 2009^AQUACULTURE^The EC Council Directive 2006/88/EC adopted during 2008 has listed three Crustacean disease: White Spot Disease (WSD) caused by the White Spot Syndrome Virus (WSSV), Yellowhead disease (YHD) caused by Yellowhead Virus (YHV) and Taura syndrome (TS) caused by Taura Syndrome Virus (TSV). Their inclusion within the Directive acknowledges a lack of protection (regarding biosecurity) to aquaculture and wild stocks of crustaceans in European waters in previous aquatic animal health legislation. In the context of the Directive, it is important to consider the range of host species deemed to be susceptible to these pathogens in order to assess the risk that these species may inadvertently introduce the pathogens to European waters via animal and commodity movements. This review has provided a brief synopsis of available literature for WSD, TS and YHD and has systematically assessed this literature against four objective susceptibility criteria laid down by the European Food Safety Authority (EFSA): (A) Evidence of replication or growth of the organism; (B) Presence of a viable organism: (C) Presence of specific clinico-pathological changes; and (D) Specific location of the pathogen within the host. Importantly these criteria enable discrimination of infected hosts from mechanical carriers (vector status). Hosts are assigned to one of two criteria: Group I hosts for which the literature provides evidence for susceptibility and Group II for which the literature provides limited evidence for susceptibility. The susceptibility of crustacean hosts is discussed in terms of the taxonomic range of these hosts to the specific pathogens and to the use of this information in informing risk assessments for the potential release, exposure and impact of their introduction on the European aquatic environment. Crown Copyright (c) 2009 Published by Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Tracking Inclusion of Women in Clinical Studies^MAR 2009^JOURNAL OF WOMENS HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.009  </td>  <td>2.694</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Effect of the inclusion of whole citrus in the ration of lactating ewes on the properties of milk and cheese characteristics during ripening^FEB 2009^JOURNAL OF DAIRY SCIENCE^The effect of including citrus fruits (CF) in the rations of dairy ewes on the milk characteristics and biochemical changes of cheeses during ripening was evaluated. For this purpose, 48 lactating ewes (Guirra breed) were divided into 4 homogeneous groups and fed with isoenergetic and isoprotein rations containing CF at 0, 10, 20, and 30% on a dry matter basis in substitution of dry barley and pelleted beet pulp. During the experimental period, 3 batches of bulk milk were collected from each group and semi-hard cheeses were manufactured. Cheeses were sampled at 15, 30, and 60 d of ripening. Milk coagulation parameters and cheese yield were not negatively affected by the inclusion of CF in the ration. Physicochemical composition of cheeses at 60 d showed statistical differences for lower total solids and fat content of 30% CF cheeses. Proteolysis of cheeses measured by water-soluble nitrogen and total free amino acids content was not influenced by the ration. Differences between rations with respect to free fatty acids were significant for medium- and long-chain free fatty acids, and therefore for total content, but differences did not show a trend related to the increase of CF in the diet. The inclusion of CF in the ration of lactating ewes up to levels of 30% did not negatively affect the properties of milk and the biochemical and sensory characteristics of cheeses.
A contribution to global sustainable development: inclusion of microalgae and their biomass in production and bio cycles^NOV 2008^CLEAN TECHNOLOGIES AND ENVIRONMENTAL POLICY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.277  </td>  <td>2.421</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Forms of Cheese Producers' Inclusion in the New Supply Chain of the Jordan Badia Region^SEP 2008^NEW MEDIT^Based on field research in the Badia region, Jordan, this paper attempts to answer questions about levels of small producers' inclusion in the new cheese market that opened after the launch of a cheese-making factory. Data were elicited from 118 interviewed subjects on the occasion of a survey carried out in March-June 2007. Additional data were collected by interviews with key informants and PRA of farmers. Conclusions indicated that farmers entrance into the new supply chain involved investments, in contrast with traditional systems. Levels of inclusion were mostly affected by village location, farmers, additional job, provision of assistance, disease control, feed requirements, availability of loans, land ownership, bank savings, farm labour. and educational level. The capacity of small-scale producers to maintain their participation in the factory supply chain was poor because they had no capital and no expertise in market shares. Choice of technology, as well as value-added quality and quantity, are directly associated with the inclusion level of farmers. As recommendations, the Factory should improve Milk quality and follow a management development strategy in order to implement better governing measures.
Columbid herpesvirus-1 in two Cooper's Hawks (Accipiter cooperii) with fatal inclusion body disease^JUL 2008^JOURNAL OF WILDLIFE DISEASES^We report two seperate naturally occurring cases of fatal herpesviral disease in Cooper's Hawks (Accipiter coopertii). Gross lesions included splenomegaly and hepatomegaly, with diffuse pale mottling or scattered small white foci. Histologic lesions included splenic and hepatic necrosis associated with eosinophilic intranuclear inclusion bodies characteristic of herpesvirus. In one case, necrosis and inclusions were also noted in bone marrow, thymus, bursa of Fabricius, thyroid gland, parathyroid gland, ceca, and the enteric system. Transmission electron microscopy demonstrated ciral particles typical of herpesvirus within hepatocyte nuclei and budding from the nuclear memberane. Herpesviral DNA was amplified via polymerase chain reaction (PCR) of paraffin-embedded liver and spleen, and sequence data were consistent with columbid herpesvirus-1, an alphaherpesvirus of Rock Pigeons (Columba livia). PCR results provide evidence that this disease is transmitted to raptors via Rock Pigeons, most likely through ingestion of Rock Pigeons as prey.
Transactions of the American Ophthalmological Society^2008^Transactions of the American Ophthalmological Society^None
BIOT 225-Rapid upstream commercial development of an Escherichia coli.-based process for producing therapeutic proteins in inclusion bodies^AUG 19 2007^ABSTRACTS OF PAPERS OF THE AMERICAN CHEMICAL SOCIETY^None
Influence of subject eligibility criteria on compliance with national institutes of health guidelines for inclusion of women, minorities, and children in treatment research^JUN 2007^ALCOHOLISM-CLINICAL AND EXPERIMENTAL RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.235  </td>  <td>3.276</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Improvement of moistness and texture of high omega-3 fatty acid mackerel nuggets by inclusion of moisture-releasing ingredients^MAR 2007^JOURNAL OF FOOD SCIENCE^In developing mince-based nugget products using mackerel, an abundant, underutilized, high omega-3 fatty acid species, attention was given to moistness and textured improvement with moisture-releasing ingredients. Three basic approaches were used: added water level variation (0 to 35%), varying added water-moisture-releasing vegetable combination (28/0, 21/7, 14/14, 7/21, 0/28), and varying milk-water combination (0/21, 7/14, 14/7, 21/0). Main ingredients of nugget included mackerel mince, mild cheddar cheese, and hydrated textured soy protein concentrate. The formulated products were molded, lightly battered, flash fried, and frozen until tested. Frozen nuggets were cooked to 65 degrees C and subjected to Instron texture analysis (compressive force CF at 70% deformation, expressible fluid EF) and sensory analysis (firmness F, moistness M, overall desirability OD). The 28% added water, 7% moisture-releasing vegetable at 21% water, and 14:7 and 21:0 milk-water combinations were preferred (P &lt; 0.05). Among the vegetables, onion and mushroom were preferred. Positive correlations were M-OD (r=0.82), EF-OD(r=0.54), and EF-M (r=0.49), and negative correlations were F-OD (r=-0.83) and CF-OD (r=-0.34). Milk was more effective than water in rendering moistness and tender texture. the vegetable was effective in forming and making the cooked product moist with less liquid added by holding moisture release during forming and liquid cells after fluid were observed in nuggets made with vegetable and milk.
Optimum inclusion and replacement value of boiled Mucuna cochinchinensis for soybean meal in broiler diets^2007^AUSTRALIAN JOURNAL OF EXPERIMENTAL AGRICULTURE^Optimum inclusion level of boiled Mucuna cochinchinensis and its replacement value for soybean meal in both starter and finisher broiler diets were assessed using 400 unsexed 7-day-old broiler chickens in a completely randomised experiment. The boiled Mucuna meal was used to replace soybean protein at five levels (0, 19, 38, 57 and 76%) in isonitrogenous and isocaloric diets. Feeding of the experimental diets lasted 4 weeks in each of the starter and finisher phases. During the last week of each phase, three birds per replicate were selected and used for metabolism (nutrient retention) studies. At the starter phase, only bodyweight and daily weight gain were significantly depressed (P &lt; 0.05) by inclusion levels of 38% and above, whereas bodyweight, daily weight gain, feed conversion ratio and protein efficiency ratio were depressed (P &lt; 0.05) by inclusion levels of 57 and 76% at the finisher phase. At both phases, the inclusion level had a cost sparing effect such that the highest inclusion level resulted in the production of the cheapest diet and lowest cost per unit weight gain. The replacement and inclusion levels produced no significant (P &gt; 0.05) effects on the retention of all the proximate components and energy at both starter and finisher phases. Therefore, on the basis of bodyweight and weight gain, the replacement of soybean protein by boiled M. cochinchinensis at 19 and 38% for starter and finisher phases, respectively, is recommended. These translate to 9.36 and 14.4% inclusion levels of boiled M. cochinchinensis in starter and finisher broiler diets, respectively.
Fruit, vegetables and social inclusion^NOV 2006^JOURNAL OF THE ROYAL SOCIETY FOR THE PROMOTION OF HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.615  </td>  <td>0.758</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2010  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The urban creative-food economy: producing food for the urban elite or social inclusion opportunity?^OCT 2006^ENVIRONMENT AND PLANNING A-ECONOMY AND SPACE^The food industry has always been a major generator of economic activity in the Greater Toronto Area. However, recently the innovative and creative elements of the industry have changed. Since the mid-1990s, the fastest growing segment within the industry has been small and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs). The specialty, ethnic, and organic SMEs (hereinafter referred to as the 'creative-food' industry) appear to be particularly innovative as they respond to consumer demand for local, fresh, ethnic, and fusion cuisine. On the basis of sixty-five interviews with food producers, processors, restaurateurs, food media, non-government organizations, government, and private sector agencies, it is suggested that this creative-food sector is thriving despite existing public policies that bias toward large-scale, industrialized agri-food firms in the region. As such, a disconnect currently exists between on the one hand, the traditional agrifood paradigm that the government regulatory environment is promoting and, on the other hand, the locally consumer-driven food cluster that is emerging. Public policies of multiculturalism and education have done more to facilitate the unprecedented growth of this creative subcomponent of the food sector than have explicit public food-policy initiatives. However, there is still room for policy initiatives that advance the development of this dynamic sector, especially in the area of supportive infrastructure, access to health-based ethnically appropriate food, food education, and fair labour standards. Contrary to a widely held view, the creative-food industry is not just about promoting exclusive foods for the pleasure of urban elite. Rather, it offers an opportunity for a more socially inclusive and sustainable urban development model. The findings also have implications for multilevel governance in cluster formation and policy, future research on food, as well as for theories on innovation, urban creativity, and governance.
Roczniki Panstwowego Zakladu Higieny^2005^Roczniki Panstwowego Zakladu Higieny^None
The inclusion of recently introduced plants in the Hawaiian ethnopharmacopoeia^WIN 2004^ECONOMIC BOTANY^This study examines the adaptation and evolution of the Hawaiian ethnopharmacopoeia looking specifically at the inclusion of recently introduced plants in the pharmacopoeia as recorded within ethnobotanical studies from 1838-2002. Generally, the number of native plants (both indigenous and endemic) recorded in ethnobotanical studies decreases over time, while the number of recently introduced plant increases. This study lists the recently introduced plants, the date they were first recorded as part of the ethnopharmacopoeia, and their place of origin. It also discusses some of the possible factors influencing the inclusion of new plants in the Hawaiian medical tradition, building on and adding to the current work on the origin of Polynesian herbal medicine.
Influence of health insurance status on inclusion of HER-2/neu testing in the diagnostic workup of breast cancer patients^DEC 2004^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL FOR QUALITY IN HEALTH CARE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.829  </td>  <td>2.356</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of carotenoids in consumer choice and the likely benefits from their inclusion into products for human consumption^OCT 2004^TRENDS IN FOOD SCIENCE &amp; TECHNOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  8.519  </td>  <td>9.303</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Influence of steam-peeled potato-processing waste inclusion level in beef finishing diets: Effects on digestion, feedlot performance, and meat quality^NOV 2003^JOURNAL OF ANIMAL SCIENCE^Inclusion of potato-processing waste (PW) from the frozen potato products industry in high-grain beef cattle finishing diets was evaluated in two studies. In a randomized complete block design, 125 crossbred yearling heifers (365 +/- 0.3 kg initial BW; five pens per treatment; five heifers per pen) were used to evaluate PW level on feedlot performance and meat quality. Heifers were fed for 85 (two blocks) or 104 d (three blocks). In a digestion study, four ruminally, duodenally, and ileally cannulated Holstein steers (474.7 +/- 26.6 kg initial BW) were used in a 4 x 4 Latin square design to evaluate effects of PW level on ruminal fermentation, site of digestion, and microbial protein synthesis. The control diet for both studies contained 80% corn, 10% alfalfa hay, 5% concentrated separator by-product (CSB), and 5% supplement (DM basis). Potato waste replaced corn and separator by-product (DM basis) in the diet at 0, 10, 20, 30, and 40% in the feedlot study, and at 0, 13, 27, and 40% in the digestion study. In the feedlot study, DMI decreased (linear; P = 0.007) with increasing inclusion of PW. Increasing PW decreased ADG and feed efficiency from 0 to 30% and then increased at 40% (quadratic; P &lt; 0.01). Calculated dietary NEg concentrations did not differ among treatments (P = 0.18). Hot carcass weight decreased as PW increased from 0 to 30% and then increased at 40% PW (cubic; P &lt; 0.01). Fat thickness and longissimus muscle area decreased with increasing PW (linear; P &lt; 0.05). Level of PW did not affect marbling or liver scores (P &gt; 0.30). No difference (P &gt; 0.20) was observed for Warner-Bratzler shear force at 0, 10, 20, and 30% PW levels; however, 40% PW resulted in lower (P = 0.05) shear force values. Taste panel scores for juiciness and flavor intensity did not differ with increasing PW (P &gt; 0.30). Steaks from cattle fed 0% were scored less tender than 10 and 40% PW (cubic; P &lt; 0.05). In the digestion study, DMI decreased (quadratic; P &lt; 0.01) with increasing PW. Ruminal pH and total VFA concentration increased (linear; P &lt; 0.05) and true N disappearance from the stomach complex and apparent total-tract N disappearance decreased with increasing level of PW (linear; P &lt; 0.01). Starch intake and ruminal disappearance decreased with increasing level of PW (quadratic; P &lt; 0.05). Inclusion of PW decreased feedlot performance, with little effect on carcass characteristics or meat quality. Optimal inclusion of PW in finishing diets may depend on the cost of transportation and other dietary ingredients.
Urban regeneration, social inclusion and large store development: The Seacroft development in context^OCT 2002^URBAN STUDIES^Of central importance to the policy debate which emerged during the late 1990s in the UK on the topic of 'food deserts' were the causes of the perceived worsening access to food retail provision in certain poor neighbourhoods of British cities. The 1980s/early 1990s era of intense food superstore development on edge-of-city sites was seen as having unevenly stripped food retailing out of parts of those cities, or having repositioned that provision downwards in range and quality terms. By the late 1990s, however, tightened land-use planning regulation had begun significantly to impact the development programmes of the major food retailers and those retailers increasingly came to adopt an urban regeneration agenda to drive forwards the new store development vital to their corporate growth. Simultaneously, issues of social exclusion rose to prominence on the political agenda and 'tackling social exclusion' began to be promoted as a possible new criterion for retail planning policy in the UK. In this paper, we explore this nexus of interest in urban regeneration and social inclusion. Using the example of a major retail development in the deprived area of Seacroft, Leeds, we outline the characteristics of the increasingly important regeneration partnerships involving retailers, local authorities, government agencies and community groups. We ask to what extent such partnerships can be dismissed merely as 'clever devices to get stores built and passed by planners' and discuss the implications for retail planning policy of attempts to address both the social exclusion and public health agendas of deprived and poorly served areas of British cities.
Microvillus inclusion disease as a cause of severe protracted diarrhea in infants^September, 2001^Journal of the Medical Association of Thailand^There are many etiologies responsible for severe intractable diarrhea in infancy, for instance, autoimmune enteropathy, microvillus inclusion disease, tufting enteropathy, food allergy, post-enteritis syndrome, chronic intestinal pseudo-obstruction, Hirschsprung's disease, intestinal lymphangiectasia, congenital sodium or chloride diarrhea, and congenital enzymatic deficiency. This article reports a case of microvillus inclusion disease in a Thai patient. He presented with severe intractable watery diarrhea with persistent metabolic acidosis. After extensive investigation, the diagnosis of microvillus inclusion disease was made, based on the ultrastructural findings of microvillus inclusions in the cytoplasm of the enterocyte on electron microscopic study. Various treatments were introduced to the patient without clinical improvement, including cholestyramine, metronidazole, probiotics, and octreotide. He was dependent on total parenteral nutrition and subsequently died from TPN-related complications. Even though it is a rare disease, it should be considered if an infant has chronic secretory diarrhea.
Inclusion of resistance exercise in a multidisciplinary outpatient treatment program for preadolescent obese children^JUN 1999^SOUTHERN MEDICAL JOURNAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.65  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2001  </th>  </tr> </table> 
Consent documents, reproductive issues, and the inclusion of women in clinical trials^MAR 1999^ACADEMIC MEDICINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.083  </td>  <td>5.819</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The journal of gender-specific medicine : JGSM : the official journal of the Partnership for Women's Health at Columbia^1998 Oct-Nov^The journal of gender-specific medicine : JGSM : the official journal of the Partnership for Women's Health at Columbia^None
US Food and Drug Administration perspective of the inclusion of effects of low-level exposures in safety and risk assessment^FEB 1998^ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH PERSPECTIVES^A brief overview is provided of some of the general safety and risk assessment procedures used by the different centers of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (U.S. FDA) to evaluate low-level exposures. The U.S. FDA protects public health by regulating a wide variety of consumer products including foods, human and animal drugs, biologics, and medical devices under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act. The diverse legal and regulatory standards in the act allow for the consideration of benefits for some products (e.g., drugs) but preclude them from others (e.g., food additives). When not precluded by statutory mandates (e.g., Delaney prohibition), the U.S. FDA considers both physiologic adaptive responses and beneficial effects. For the basic safety assessment paradigm as presently used, for example in the premarket approval of food additives, the emphasis is on the identification of adverse effects and no observed adverse effect level(s) (NOAEL). Generally, the NOAEL is divided by safety factors to establish an acceptable exposure level. This safely assessment paradigm does not preclude the consideration of effects whether they are biologically adaptive or beneficial at lower dose levels. The flexibility to consider issues such as mechanisms of action and adaptive and beneficial responses depends on the product under consideration. For carcinogenic contaminants and radiation from medical devices, the U.S. FDA considers the potential cancer risk at low exposure levels. This generally involves downward extrapolation from the observed dose-response range. The consideration of adverse effects of other toxicologic end points (e.g., reproductive, immunologic, neurologic, developmental) associated with low exposure levels is also becoming more of a reality (e.g., endocrine disrupters). The evaluation of the biologic effects of low-level exposures to toxic substances must include whether the effect is adverse or a normal physiologic adaptive response and also determine the resiliency of a physiologic system. The public health mandate of the U.S. FDA includes an active research program at the National Center for Toxicological Research and the other U.S. FDA centers to support the regulatory mission of the U.S. FDA. This includes the development of knowledge bases, predictive strategies, and toxicologic studies to investigate effects at the lower end of the dose-response range. Because of the wide diversity of legal and regulatory standards for various products regulated by the U.S. FDA, agency-wide safety and risk assessment procedures and policies generally do not exist.
Journal of obstetric, gynecologic, and neonatal nursing : JOGNN^1998 Jan-Feb^Journal of obstetric, gynecologic, and neonatal nursing : JOGNN^None
Don't test, do sell: Legal implications of inclusion and exclusion of women in clinical drug trials^1997^EPILEPSIA^This article explores the historic underpinnings of the exclusion of women from clinical drug trials, identifies recent developments, and examines legal implications for women with epilepsy and for others. Distinguishing stakeholders and their interests may lead to policies that better serve all. Past and present statutory, regulatory, and judicial frameworks were reviewed, as well as legal, medical, and historical commentary. Traditionally, researchers and manufacturers have not tested particular drugs on women. Physicians and pharmacists routinely prescribe and sell these same medications regardless of gender. Only since 1993 have females been more likely to be included in clinical drug trial subject pools. The impact of past and future practices on health care provision and legal liability remains unknown. A policy of ''Don't test, do sell'' will not protect women with epilepsy or would-be defendants. At this time the most effective shields will involve procurement of informed consent as well as testing of both women and men. In the long run, tort, health care, and regulatory reform will best serve all interested persons. Inclusion of women in clinical drug trials has become a hew question, not an if one.
Modelling rabies control in the UK: The inclusion of vaccination^1995^MAMMALIA^British Government policy on wildlife rabies control has always concentrated exclusively on poison baiting of foxes. This approach has been followed, because unlike continental countries, a rabies outbreak would originate from a focal point of infection. Given the level of success of rabies vaccination on the European continent, it is time to evaluate the possible inclusion of vaccines into rabies control in the U.K. This paper details the recent development of MAFFs Rabies Model to include vaccination and revised fox contact data. A number of different strategies are examined by this new model, including poisoning, vaccination, and poisoning combined with a ring of vaccination. The results of each strategy are presented, and discussed in terms of rabies control in the U.K.
THE INDUSTRY PERSPECTIVE ON THE INCLUSION OF WOMEN IN CLINICAL-TRIALS^SEP 1994^ACADEMIC MEDICINE^The author emphasizes that while women are currently included in clinical trials, more effort must be made to include them in ways that will provide more appropriate and specific information (for example, by including them in earlier phases of trials when possible) and to perform proper analyses that take into account factors of gender and age. Although it is generally agreed that there needs to be more emphasis on determining how to study drugs that may be important for use in women, there is no consensus on what the appropriate proportion of women in trials should be or how early young women should and can be included in trials. The strategies to answer the need for more data about women must be supported by a clear scientific rationale rather than fashioned to meet arbitrary quotas. The author outlines the complex drug development process, describes some of the factors that may affect the data acquired as drugs are studied, provides an overview of reproductive and teratology testing, describes the Food and Drug Administration's proposed guidelines for the inclusion of women in clinical trials, discusses issues of the cost of drug development, states the problems of recruitment and retention of women in trials, and reflects upon the complex issues of liability and ethics that arise when women of childbearing potential are included in clinical trials. She concludes with a summary of the key issues affecting women's participation in trials, a list of suggested strategies for the inclusion of women in trials, and an indication of areas where further discussion and resolution are needed. She emphasizes the importance of including physicians and others from the pharmaceutical industry in any discussions of this topic, and reiterates that the industry is committed to fostering the cause of inclusion of women in trials in the most appropriate and workable fashion.
INCLUSION OF SEMEN PRICE OF THE SIRE IN AN ANIMAL-MODEL TO ACCOUNT FOR PREFERENTIAL TREATMENT^FEB 1994^JOURNAL OF DAIRY SCIENCE^Histories of semen price for AI bulls used from 1970 to 1991 were collected and merged with first lactation milk and fat records of Ontario Holstein cows calving from 1970 through 1990. Data were analyzed with two animal models, both of which included herd-year-season and animal additive genetic effects. The second model included a fixed effect for semen price group. Cows that did not have a semen price for their sire were assigned to a separate group. Both models were used for milk and fat yields, and the second model was used separately for the semen price group of the sire at the time of daughter's conception, birth, and first calving. Hypothesis testing of group differences for semen price (excluding the group without a price match) resulted in significant effects of price group at first calving for milk and fat yields. The changes in estimated breeding values for cows and sires were summarized for cows by year of calving and for sires by Canadian versus US. Very few animals were affected by the inclusion of semen price groups in the model. Inclusion of effects of semen price group in an animal model did not significantly improve the accuracy of animal evaluations.
Determinants of compliance with the JCAHO smoke-free hospital standard^1994^Journal of General Internal Medicine^None
Clinical pharmacy^1993-Oct^Clinical pharmacy^None
A DRUG COMPANY REPORT - WHAT IS THE SAME AND WHAT IS CHANGING WITH RESPECT TO INCLUSION EXCLUSION OF WOMEN IN CLINICAL-TRIALS^1993^FOOD AND DRUG LAW JOURNAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.619  </td>  <td>0.602</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
DEVELOPMENTAL TOXICITY AND PSYCHOTOXICITY OF POTASSIUM-IODIDE IN RATS - A CASE FOR THE INCLUSION OF BEHAVIOR IN TOXICOLOGICAL ASSESSMENT^1984^FOOD AND CHEMICAL TOXICOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.775  </td>  <td>4.248</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
DIFFERENTIATED INTENSIFICATION IN THE BRANCHES OF AGRICULTURAL PRODUCTION FROM THE POINT OF VIEW OF OPTIMAL INCLUSION OF THE COUNTRY IN THE INTERNATIONAL DIVISION OF LABOUR^1966^POLITICKA EKONOMIE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.341  </td>  <td>0.397</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
DECONTAMINATION OF PIGEONS BY INCLUSION OF CHLORTETRACYCLINE IN THE FEED^1965^JOURNAL OF THE EXPERIMENTAL ANALYSIS OF BEHAVIOR^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.146  </td>  <td>2.256</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of higher education in China's inclusive urbanization^FEB 2017^CITIES^One momentum of rural-urban transition in China is for university graduates to work and live in the city where they pursued tertiary education. Against this background, we investigate the role of higher education for urban growth in China. A panel data analysis reveals that an increase of share in the population with at least a bachelor's degree induces regional population to grow. Nevertheless, contrary to other developed countries, inflow of high caliber immigrants from the countryside or cities of lower tiers in China in fact brings down real wages. We hypothesize that in China where education resources are limited, higher education attainment induces faster urban growth through breaking the barriers to rural-urban transition for new job market entrants, but at the cost of lower real wages due to affluent labor supply. However, the increase of population share with high education has insignificant direct impact on housing price, indicating that new talented migrants may not be the major home buyers. Yet, through the trigger of a faster urbanization process, housing prices are jetted up indirectly in provinces with higher proportions of degree holders. It poses pressing challenges to China where the country is advocating the idea of inclusive urbanization. This paper will discuss some of the key issues in relation to the provisions of education and housing services in China such that local governments can be more embracing to rural degree holder migrants, who will play a contributing role in urban growth. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Popular education and rural education: perspectives for inclusive education - the School Familia Agricola in Sidrolandia - MS^JAN-JUN 2017^REVISTA BRASILEIRA DE EDUCACAO DO CAMPO^This article is results of research carried out in the Geography Course of the Universidade Estadual do Mato Grosso do Sul - UEMS. This research is centered in the Pedagogical experience of the Agricultural Family School of the municipality of Sidrolandia, Mato Grosso do Sul State, representing the class struggle of the peasant population in the state, particularly the rural settlers, actors who for decades have been fighting for an education as a public policy with a pedagogical make that does not work with the denial of the culture understood the rural, that respects its life style, considering that the education offered to them almost always presents itself in the same way as offered in urban areas. In the development, the research presents a qualitative approach, having as main contribution the dialogicity defended by the pedagogic practice of the alternating schools. As a methodological procedure, the bibliographical survey, documentary analysis, interviews and an on-site visit were chosen. It was discussed through the views of Popular Education what possibilities social movements could develop a differentiated education, whether or not the State apparatus, producing scientific knowledge and important effective intervention in their reality and pedagogical practice that best respond to their desires, happening an education in and for the countryside.
An inclusive outdoors? Disabled people's experiences of countryside leisure services^2009^LEISURE STUDIES^In recent years, disabled people's access to the outdoors has been the subject of renewed interest. This has in part been driven by legislative developments coupled with an increasing recognition that disabled people are under-represented as users of the countryside. However, very little is actually known about disabled people's views and experiences of the outdoors. Drawing on the concept of affordances and combining this with a social barrier's approach to disability, we explore disabled people's attitudes towards and experiences of woodland and countryside leisure. We argue that disabled people's reasons for being outdoors are more complex than simply seeking 'rehabilitation'; and, like their non-disabled counterparts, access to the outdoors is perceived for some as an integral aspect of wellbeing and revitalisation. Through engagement with the outdoors, disabled people are challenging normative constructions of who they are and their purpose in being in the countryside. The paper concludes by arguing that providers of outdoor leisure services need to go beyond barrier removal and understand disabled people's uses and views of the outdoors in planning the provision of services.
The betweeness of being a rural youth: inclusive and exclusive lifestyles^2008^SOCIAL &amp; CULTURAL GEOGRAPHY^In this paper I demonstrate the ways in which young people imagine, define and create discourses of the countryside, in particular how they envision both the place of the countryside and their place in the countryside. I focus on how rural youth situate themselves within discourses of the rural and in so doing, I challenge previous constructions of the relationship between young people, the rural idyll and cultural marginality. Specifically, I assess the role and importance of place-myths and practices in the formation of identity. In particular, this paper offers a more developed account than previously conceived of how rural youth identity is formulated in and between complex social and material relations predicated on difference. My analysis takes account of the ways in which young people actively produce culture and experience and understand belonging and not-belonging, their different views of rurality, their production of an 'intensive-self' and the extent to which the countryside is, on one hand, enabling and nurturing (inclusive), and on the other, restrictive and prohibitive. This paper makes an important contribution to the geography of youth by presenting a framework for understanding young people in the countryside that is predicated on exposing conflicting and sometimes contradictory feelings of inclusion and exclusion.
INCLUSIVE PEDAGOGICAL ASPECTS IN LATVIAN RURAL SCHOOLS^2008^SOCIETY, INTEGRATION, EDUCATION, PROCEEDINGS^Inclusive education in is gradually developing being based on stately regulations. The number of inclusive schools grows every year, especially in countryside regions. The opinion of teachers about the possibilities of all learners to study close to their place of residence is characteristic exactly of countryside inclusive schools. The growing number of such type of schools can be clearly foreseen and it will quite radically change the aspects of school life. At the same time there is a hope that it will develop our society into the inclusive one.
Okay to promote eating less meat, but don't be a cheat - The role of dietary identity, perceived inconsistency and inclusive language of an advocate in legitimizing meat reduction^JUL 1 2019^APPETITE^The legitimacy of meat-rich diets in Western societies is slowly in decline as the benefits of meat reduction for personal health, ecological welfare, and animal welfare are become increasingly clear. This is mirrored by a surge of campaigns, which rely heavily on social media platforms to legitimize meat reduction among their target audience: meat-eaters. Social Identity Theory suggests that the effectiveness of meat reduction advocacy will depend on the dietary identity of advocates and their rhetorical style. To examine this, we used a 2 x 2 between-participants factorial design in which we exposed meat-eaters (N = 186) to a meat reduction campaign image shared by an advocate on Facebook, where the advocate was portrayed as either a meat-eater (ingroup) or a vegetarian (outgroup), who used either inclusive language ("we can eat less meat") or personal language ("you can eat less meat") to promote meat reduction. Results reveal that the meat-eating (versus vegetarian) advocate was more likely perceived as inconsistent when promoting meat reduction. Higher perceptions of inconsistency were significantly associated with a lower perceived legitimacy of the message for both advocate types, especially when the advocate was a vegetarian. We also found that meat-eaters were more tolerant of a perceived inconsistency when advocates used inclusive rather than personal language. Perceptions of favouritism towards the advocate could explain the conditional effects of perceived inconsistency on message legitimacy. Lastly, we could observe that meat-eaters who perceived the message as more legitimate and identified less as meat-eaters were more willing to eat less meat. Practical implications of our findings are considered.
Pathways for Sustainable and Inclusive Cities in Southern and Eastern Africa through Urban Green Infrastructure?^MAY 2 2019^SUSTAINABILITY^Cities in sub-Saharan Africa are currently confronted with a multitude, and hitherto unexperienced, magnitude of transformative phenomena such as rising inequality, exclusion, poverty and increased residency in informal settlements. These stressors are posing challenges to cities in terms of housing, infrastructure and provision of basic services as well as climate change adaptation. Despite the high dynamics and novel characteristics of city transformation, this urban transition seems to take place rather quietly' and has, so far, obviously hardly been understood or appreciated by researchers and governments. Subsequently, the multifaceted and extremely challenging problems associated with the process of urbanisation cannot be adequately addressed. Green infrastructure (GI) is currently emerging as a concept for cost-effective urban sustainability and livelihood security. Preservation and provision of accessible urban green spaces is increasingly recognised as an essential part of the liveability of cities. Extensive literature review revealed that the systematic integration of GI concepts in urban planning is seen by an increasing number of researchers as an essential approach to tackle major current and future challenges. Based on the literature review, we suggest that broadening the concept of urban GI by linking it to governance and rights-based conceptualisations will have the potential to unlock more resourceful paths for sustainable, green, and inclusive urban development of cities in Southern and Eastern Africa.
Inclusive Management Through Gender Consideration in Small-Scale Fisheries: The Why and the How^MAR 29 2019^FRONTIERS IN MARINE SCIENCE^In a world in which ocean degradation is widespread and aggravated by the effects of climate change, there is a need to contribute with new management approaches to ameliorate the situation. Here, inclusive management is proposed as such an alternative. This contribution argues that including all genders in the management process is needed and the inclusion itself can generate new ways to solve problems. An assessment of findings from literature of the positive aspects when considering gender in environmental governance is presented and related to the specific situation of small-scale fisheries (SSF). These positive findings are explained in terms of (1) Participation, (2) Space, actors and activities, (3) Economic power, and (4) Equity and environmental stewardship. Further, a practical approach is taken and a model for gender inclusion in coastal/ocean management for SSF is presented and illustrated with a case of seagrass SSF in East Africa. The central argument is that in view of ongoing coastal/ocean degradation and the moderate governance and management success, it is worth trying management approaches that consciously and explicitly consider gender and diversity of actors. This will bring central actors (e.g., women not previously considered) into the management process and will provide the base for better governance and policy reform.
Working with Low Income Students: Ideas and concepts to create a more inclusive classroom^MAR 2019^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PHYSICAL ANTHROPOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.662  </td>  <td>2.916</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A pathway to inclusive sustainable intensification in agriculture? Assessing evidence on the application of agroecology in Tanzania^FEB 7 2019^AGROECOLOGY AND SUSTAINABLE FOOD SYSTEMS^Neo-Malthusian narratives argue that the world urgently needs to produce more food for an expanding global population in the face of climate change, and that food security can only be assured through high input and large-scale agricultural production. This paper explores agroecology as an alternative approach to this narrative. Can a second "Green Revolution" be more "climate smart" and inclusive than the first one, through driving a process of genuinely sustainable intensification? Using a livelihoods framework, we assess evidence on the adoption of agroecological practices in the Uluguru Mountains in Tanzania, through a meta-analysis of four empirical studies, and conclude that the supported adoption of agroecological practice in conjunction with suitable market access has considerable potential for creating inclusive sustainable agricultural livelihoods.
Accessible Packaging: A Study for Inclusive Models for Visual Impairment People^2019^ADVANCES IN ERGONOMICS IN DESIGN (AHFE 2018)^This paper presents the study of a accessible packaging proposal that is accessible according to the users requirements, to facilitate the handling, opening and identification of the product information in packaging for the people with visual impairment. For data collection method, we performed usability tests and interviews, with film. There was five volunteers participants: four blind and one with 5% visual acuity who handled five packages of food products. The methodological procedure was the GODP - Guidance for Project Development. The tests were performed on November, 2017 at the Laboratory of Ergonomics and Usability, Parana Federal University, Brazil. The results indicate difficulties in reading and opening the packages. Suggests creation a briefing with guidelines for the development of accessible packaging that provides greater efficient communication of the information in packaging for the visually impaired.
Reflexive and inclusive: Reimagining local government engagement in food systems^OCT 2018^JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURE FOOD SYSTEMS AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT^None
Inclusive climate change mitigation and food security policy under 1.5 degrees C climate goal^JUL 2018^ENVIRONMENTAL RESEARCH LETTERS^Climate change mitigation to limit warming to 1.5 degrees C orwell below 2 degrees C, as suggested by the Paris Agreement, can rely on large-scale deployment of land-related measures (e.g. afforestation, or bioenergy production). This can increase food prices, and hence raises food security concerns. Here we show how an inclusive policy design can avoid these adverse side-effects. Food-security support through international aid, bioenergy tax, or domestic reallocation of income can shield impoverished and vulnerable people from the additional risk of hunger that would be caused by the economic effects of policies narrowly focussing on climate objectives only. In the absence of such support, 35% more people might be at risk of hunger by 2050 (i.e. 84 million additional people) in a 2 degrees C-consistent scenario. The additional global welfare changes due to inclusive climate policies are small (&lt; 0.1%) compared to the total climate mitigation cost (3.7% welfare loss), and the financial costs of international aid amount to about half a percent of high-income countries' GDP. This implies that climate policy should treat this issue carefully. Although there are challenges to implement food policies, options exist to avoid the food security concerns often linked to climate mitigation.
The Farm in the City in the Recent Past: Thoughts on a More Inclusive Urban Historiography^MAY 2018^JOURNAL OF URBAN HISTORY^The scholarly and journalistic literature usually treats urban agriculture as a new phenomenon, but it is a neglected dimension of urban history. Some U.S. cities, at least in the Northeast, had food-raising and processing practices not just in colonial times but up until the relatively recent past. Three areas of history are explored that have mostly omitted discussion of city food production but nonetheless provide important frameworks to explore such production: urban development, agricultural, and immigrant history. Woven throughout this piece is evidence from a study of Waterbury, Connecticut. Local food production did not die when the Industrial Revolution came to Waterbury. Farms and other food-producing, processing, and marketing operations remained and even adapted to the growing city's needs and resources. The city government both supported and undermined agriculture in ways that add to an understanding of urban history and are lessons for current urban agriculture policy.
Food growing in the city: Exploring the productive urban landscape as a new paradigm for inclusive approaches to the design and planning of future urban open spaces^FEB 2018^LANDSCAPE AND URBAN PLANNING^This special issue considers food growing in the city. It presents a series of papers which explore the interface between urban growing initiatives and the planned city, and identifies the development of the movement in different world regions and situations. It explores the characteristics of different food growing and urban gardening scenarios regarding the inherent properties of the urban agriculture/food growing complex as an urban movement, its drivers and the niche that it occupies within the city. The papers address circumstances of food growing in highly developed western planning systems, typically represented in Europe, but also other global regions which show different historical and development contexts. These demonstrate that urban food growing initiatives are largely activist-led and tend to fall outside of, or conflict with current city planning models. Where these initiatives are incorporated, they have the potential to provide effective urban landscape solutions that respond to local circumstances, new markets, engendering social and environmental improvement. Taken together, the papers suggest that urban agriculture models need to be recognised more widely within mainstream urban planning and the urban development process.
Editorial: Inclusive Innovation in Developed Countries^FEB 2018^TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION MANAGEMENT REVIEW^None
Convergent Innovation in Food through Big Data and Artificial Intelligence for Societal-Scale Inclusive Growth^FEB 2018^TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION MANAGEMENT REVIEW^Inclusive innovation has not yet reached societal scale due to a well-entrenched divide between wealth creation and social equity. Taking food as the initial test bed, we have proposed the convergent innovation model to address such challenges still facing 21st century society by bridging sectors and disciplines around an integrated goal on both sides of the social-economic divide for innovations that target wealth creation with an upfront consideration of its externalities. The convergent innovation model is empowered by two key enablers that integrate an advanced digital infrastructure with leading scientific knowledge on the drivers of human behaviour in varying contexts. This article discusses the structure, methods, and development of an artificial intelligence platform to support convergent innovation. Insights are gathered on consumer sentiment and behavioural drivers through the analysis of user-generated content on social media platforms. Empirical results show that user discussions related to marketing, consequences, and occasions are positive. Further regression modelling finds that economic consequences are a strong predictor of consumer global sentiment, but are also sensitive to both the actual price and economic awareness. This finding has important implications for inclusive growth and further emphasizes the need for affordable and accessible foods, as well as for consumer education. Challenges and opportunities inspired by the research results are discussed to inform the design, marketing, and delivery of convergent innovation products and services, while also contributing to dimensions of inclusion and economic performance for equitable health and wealth.
Public-Private Partnerships for Inclusive Agribusiness Sustainability in Africa^2018^Agriculturae Conspectus Scientificus^This paper examines important areas where Public-Private Partnerships (PPPs) have been effective in agribusiness and agro-industrial development, and assesses whether PPPs are being increasingly promoted as a mechanism for pooling the needed finance in agribusiness. The study explores the current state of knowledge in relation to PPPs. It also reviews some of the relevant discussions on the use of PPP in agribusiness in the last decade. PPPs are increasingly used in joint agricultural research, innovation and technology transfer, building and upgrading market infrastructure, and delivery of business development services to farmers, small and medium enterprises. The use of PPPs has the potential of propelling sustainable and inclusive agribusiness development in African countries despite the outstanding challenges. Strong political will, good governance, and provision of enabling economic and regulatory environment by the public sector for the private sector to operate are major drivers of success of PPPs implementation in agribusiness. Development of agribusiness and agro-industries in African countries require a substantial infusion of both fixed and working capitals from private sector which are difficult for the public sector alone to provide.
Creating universal and sustainable access to plants and seeds The role of clearinghouses, open source licenses, and inclusive patents^2018^COMMONS, PLANT BREEDING AND AGRICULTURAL RESEARCH: CHALLENGES FOR FOOD SECURITY AND AGROBIODIVERSITY^None
Gender, nutrition, and the human right to adequate food: toward an inclusive framework^2018^JOURNAL OF PEACE EDUCATION^None
Contract farming in Uganda and Tanzania: inclusive development or adverse incorporation?^2018^REVIEW OF AFRICAN POLITICAL ECONOMY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.989  </td>  <td>1.434</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Food security and democracy: do inclusive institutions matter?^2018^CANADIAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES-REVUE CANADIENNE D ETUDES DU DEVELOPPEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.194  </td>  <td>1.283</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
WOMEN AS DRIVERS FOR A SUSTAINABLE AND SOCIAL INCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT IN MOUNTAIN REGIONS -THE CASE OF THE AUSTRIAN ALPS^DEC 2017^EUROPEAN COUNTRYSIDE^Women in mountain regions play an important role regarding the agricultural production and ensuring sustainable livelihoods. Furthermore, they are active in climate change adaption and preservation of biodiversity. Despite these important activities and performances the vital role of women for a sustainable and social inclusive development in mountain regions is often invisible and not appreciated enough in society. There still exists structural discrimination of women which is caused by patriarchal societies, social and cultural norms as well as difficult economic situations. Considering the need to foster the dynamic and sustainable development of mountain regions all over the world, it is of paramount importance to reflect and integrate women's issues, problems and needs to a larger extent in research, public policy and in worldwide decision-making agendas.
Origin products from African forests: A Kenyan pathway to prosperity and green inclusive growth?^NOV 2017^FOREST POLICY AND ECONOMICS^Many tropical countries have potential for adding market value to unique forest origin products similarly to how EU gain billions of Euro's annually from registering agricultural origin products, with Protected Denomination of Origin or Protected Geographical Indication. Following analysis of the renaissance for the global Geographical Indication (GI) regime, this article provides case-studies from Kenya - on Mwingi Honey, Kakamega Silk and institutional conditions under which producers may incorporate territory specific cultural, environmental, and social qualities of their unique products. We investigate prospects for Kenyan producers to create and capture additional monetary value for their forest related origin products, allowing smallholders to build livelihood, while stewarding natural environments. The origin products are investigated for their potential for protection with a GI, within five different dimensions of and links with the social and natural world. Our study shows that Mwingi Honey and Kakamega Silk have potential for registration under a GI regime based mainly on close links between local environment, flora and product quality, and product specificity. The institutional environment presents major challenges for the development of GI products and markets, exemplified by the Kenyan GI bill which is not yet enacted after almost a decade in the making. (C) 2016 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Bringing together learning from two worlds: Lessons from a gender-inclusive community education approach with smallholder farmers in Papua New Guinea^JUL 2017^AUSTRALIAN JOURNAL OF ADULT LEARNING^Smallholder farmers are the backbone of food production in Papua New Guinea (PNG). Due to an increasing need to pay for schooling and health costs, many farming families are seeking ways to move from semi-subsistence farming to activities that generate more income. The long tradition of agricultural training in PNG to support the development of farmers has focused on technology transfer and on the production of cash crops. This form of farmer education has primarily benefited men, who typically control cash crop production. It has often excluded women, whose significant engagement in it is precluded by their low literacy, low education, family responsibilities and daily work on subsistence crops. This article examines the lessons learned from a project that facilitated village-level community education workshops that sought to bring male and female heads of families together in a culturally appropriate way in order to encourage more gender equitable planning and farming practices. Through the development and capacity building of local training teams, the project developed a critical and place-based pedagogy underpinned by gender-inclusive and asset-based community development principles.
Gender, Nutrition and the Human Right to Adequate Food: Toward an Inclusive Framework^MAY 2017^HUMAN RIGHTS QUARTERLY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.985  </td>  <td>1.28</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Biofuels and inclusive development: the Brazilian experience^APR 2017^DEVELOPMENT IN PRACTICE^None
Inclusive development and agricultural adaptation to climate change^FEB 2017^CURRENT OPINION IN ENVIRONMENTAL SUSTAINABILITY^Agriculture need to adapt to the climate impacts. Such processes should be both socially equitable and environmentally sustainable if the aim is more inclusive development. This paper reviews the literature on agricultural adaptation to climate variability and change to show how governments, institutions and farmers are adopting measures to cope with changes in temperature and rainfall patterns as well as weather extremes, and the extent to which and how social equity issues, ecological sustainability issues and the empowerment of farmers are taken on board in different parts of the world. The framework of inclusive eco-efficient and climate-smart agriculture is proposed to confront climate change and ensure food security by enhancing resilience, increasing sustainable productivity, reducing inequality and promoting shared prosperity.
Promoting country ownership and inclusive growth? An assessment of Feed the Future^2017^DEVELOPMENT IN PRACTICE^This article investigates the level of country ownership and inclusivity in Feed the Future (FtF) projects in Ethiopia, Ghana, Haiti, Senegal, and Tanzania. It finds that though interventions largely align with country-defined priorities and plans, other aspects of country ownership consultation and provision of aid through local systems - are weaker than expected. Regarding inclusion, FtF is to some extent exclusive, perhaps as an unintended consequence of alignment with national development plans that do not reasonably promote equity. Focus is mostly on productive areas and 'market-ready' smallholders. The article suggests policy actions needed to better achieve expected results.
Technology adoption and the challenges of inclusive participation in economic activities: Evidence from small scale oil palm fruit processors in southwestern Nigeria^NOV 2016^TECHNOLOGY IN SOCIETY^The lack of technology adoption has been mentioned as a source of lack of inclusive participation of low income groups in economic activities leading to income disparity in developing countries. The study utilized an input-process-output framework to develop a set of indicators to inform the development of policies and practices to ensure the participation of low income groups in economic activities. The input element consists of technology adoption influencing factors such as socio-economic characteristics and innovating units and institutions that provide support for innovation activities. The process and output elements consist of the level of technology adoption in production processes and productivity measures respectively. Focusing on small-scale oil palm fruit processors in Nigeria, the study revealed that inadequate funding of the input processes lead to inadequate technology adoption in specific unit operations of palm oil production. Utilising selected physicochemical properties of palm oil as indicators of productivity, the samples of palm oil assessed were found to be unsuitable for industrial use and may limit the processors from participating in formal sectors of palm oil production. The study recommends policy levers that will enhance input factors through adequate funding to improve the technological base of the small-scale oil palm fruit processing. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Entrenched Disbelief: Complex Hunter-Gatherers and the Case for Inclusive Cultural Evolutionary Thinking^JUN 2016^JOURNAL OF ARCHAEOLOGICAL METHOD AND THEORY^Advocates of traditional, agriculture-based models of sociopolitical evolution argue that the adoption of domesticates is requisite for developments such as sedentism, village life, ascribed status, hereditary leadership, and other features that underpin institutionalized political complexity. We counter in this essay with a well-documented suite of politically complex hunter-gatherer (CHG) societies that exhibit these same features, thereby demonstrating that reliance on agriculture per se-or any other specific food regime such as fishing-should be excised from explanations of emergent political complexity. Despite the failure of the agricentric model to account for a significant number of cases of institutionalized complexity, some of its architects remain entrenched in their disbelief and rigidly ignore the implications of CHG studies. By continuing to situate farming as foundational to everything complex, they perpetuate not only a story of human cultural evolution over the last 10,000 years that is incomplete but also a narrative that is incorrect. We reject subsistence (domesticates) as the central organizing principle and introduce here a new forum for thinking about how societies operate and evolve. We propose a model consisting of integrated platforms of societal dynamics that are inclusive (encourage discourse of all societies), nonprogressive, and serve as an organizational structure to discuss cultural evolution in any comparative or singular ethnographic context. The platforms are nonhierarchical and not fixed in order or importance. They are (1) agency and authority, (2) social differentiation, (3) participation in communal events, (4) organization of production, (5) labor obligations, (6) articulation of ecology and subsistence, and (7) territoriality and ownership. All sociopolitical cases and all topics can be productively discussed on these platforms, from bands to the largest empires, comparatively or diachronically. In the present article, we use the platforms to examine political evolution. We assemble considerable evidence that a variety of dietary regimes are associated with the emergence of institutionalized political complexity. Rather than diet, it is the ways people integrate and use labor that demands our attention.
University Land-Grant Extension and Resistance to Inclusive Epistemologies^MAY-JUN 2016^JOURNAL OF HIGHER EDUCATION^Public land-grant universities have historically engaged with the public through knowledge extension in the agricultural sciences, which later grew into other forms of outreach. Given the important mission of land-grant institutions to positively impact agricultural sciences, this inquiry focuses on the role of agricultural extension and the exchange of Indigenous knowledge through university programs. In a case study of a Native-serving institution with land-grant status, we explored the roles of Western and Indigenous science through interviews with university faculty and food producers. The responses demonstrate that perceptions of Native science in the Western knowledge environment are varied and can create a barrier between the University and the community. The barrier, in turn, can produce a gap that prevents the university from fully offering public benefits that are inclusive of Native peoples, perspectives, and science.
The impacts of inclusive and exclusive taxes on healthy eating: An experimental study^OCT 2015^FOOD POLICY^Based on a laboratory experiment conducted with 131 adults (non-students subjects), we empirically examine the differential impacts of an inclusive and exclusive tax on changing consumers' eating behavior. We compare the caloric and nutrient content of the meals selected by the subjects using a difference-in-difference regression model to determine the efficacy of the policy treatments. The results indicate that an inclusive tax has a significantly stronger effect on reducing the consumption of total calories, calories from fat, and the intake of carbohydrates, cholesterol, sugar and sodium compared with an exclusive tax. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Mapping kinematic functional abilities of the hand to three dimensional shapes for inclusive design^AUG 20 2015^JOURNAL OF BIOMECHANICS^Loss of hand function can have adverse effects on an individual's ability to maintain independence. The ability to perform daily activities, such as food preparation and medication delivery, is dependent on the hand's ability to grasp and manipulate objects. Therefore, the goal of this research was to demonstrate that three dimensional (3D) modeling of hand function can be used to improve the accessibility of handheld objects for individuals with reduced functionality through informed design. Individual models of hand functionality were created for 43 participants and group models were developed for groups of individuals without (Healthy) and with reduced functionality due to arthritis (RFA) of the hand. Cylindrical models representative of auto-injectors of varying diameters were analyzed in 3D space relative to hand function. The individual model mappings showed the cylinder diameter with the highest mapped functional values varied depending on the type of functional weighting chosen: kinematic redundancy of fingertip pad positional placement fingertip pad orientation, or finger force directionality. The group mappings showed that for a cylinder to be grasped in a power grasp by at least 75% of the Healthy or RFA groups, a diameter of 40 mm was required. This research utilizes a new hand model to objectively compare design parameters across three different kinematic factors of hand function and across groups with different functional abilities. The ability to conduct these comparisons enables the creation of designs that are universal to all - including accommodation of individuals with limits in their functional abilities. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Is more inclusive more effective? The 'New Style' public distribution system in India^AUG 2015^FOOD POLICY^The targeted public distribution system (TPDS) of India world's largest food safety-net program has a reputation for poor targeting, rampant corruption and low impact. Five states of India modified TPDS by reducing targeting, lowering grain prices to Rs.1-3 per kg and tightening its administration. This paper assesses the impact of changes in the TPDS on household food consumption using data from a repeated cross-section of Indian households from five rounds of representative consumption surveys between 1993-1994 and 2009-2010. We use the Difference-in-Difference (DID) method to identify the policy impact, first on consumption of food-grains, and second, on food expenditure. We find that modifications in TPDS led not only to an increase in the purchase of subsidized grains from fair-price shops, but also to diversification of the food basket of poor households. We also find evidence for reduction in the diversion of grains from TPDS to the open market in reform states. Finally, we present suggestive evidence that a food policy reform is likely to fail if price and targeting policy components are not accompanied by effective administrative measures to reduce corruption and improve the logistics of subsidized food distribution. These are important findings for India's own National Food Security Act (NFSA) and for other food safety-net programs throughout the developing world. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
TOURISTS' PREFERENCES FOR THE ALL-INCLUSIVE SYSTEM AND ITS IMPACTS ON THE LOCAL ECONOMY^JUL 2015^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF TOURISM HOSPITALITY AND RECREATION^The purpose of this study is to verify whether the experiences and preferences of people with high wages and higher education who visited all-inclusive resorts can contribute to the development of the local economy. The methodology used is descriptive statistics and principal components analysis among people with high wages and education in Belo Horizonte, a major city in the state of Minas Gerais, Brazil. Results indicate that early definition of values and protection against price increases in the destination, at the time of the trip, are the two main advantages of the all-inclusive system. Furthermore, people assigning a higher level of importance to drinks reduced the importance of other items such as food and infrastructures, among others. Most participants are unlikely to consider the possibility of eating at a restaurant outside the hotel or visiting different local attractions that arc not mentioned in the package and they have no interest in renting a car in the destination. The study suggests that public managers should carefully evaluate resorts' all-inclusive system.
The Elusive Inclusive: Black Food Geographies and Racialized Food Spaces^JUN 2015^ANTIPODE^North American food scholars, activists and policymakers often consider how to make a community food project more inclusive to vulnerable populations to increase participation in local food efforts. Drawing from qualitative research conducted with two community food organizations in Seattle, Washington, I argue that inclusive efforts are not addressing the power asymmetries present in organizations and within communities. Engaging with black geographies literature, I reveal how a black food justice organization grapples with violent histories of slavery and dispossession rooted in a black farming imaginary, and works to re-envision this imaginary to one of power and transformation. The spatial imaginaries and spaces of each food organization acknowledge racial histories differentially, informing their activism. Black geographies possess knowledge and spatial politics that can revitalize community food movements, and I consider how white food activists might reframe their work so that their efforts are not fueling the displacement of residents of color.
Is the Africa Rising Cliche Sustainable? Toward Environmentally Sustainable and Socially Inclusive Growth in Africa^MAY 4 2015^ENVIRONMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.176  </td>  <td>3.091</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusive fitness and differential productivity across the life course determine intergenerational transfers in a small-scale human society^MAR 22 2015^PROCEEDINGS OF THE ROYAL SOCIETY B-BIOLOGICAL SCIENCES^Transfers of resources between generations are an essential element in current models of human life-history evolution accounting for prolonged development, extended lifespan and menopause. Integrating these models with Hamilton's theory of inclusive fitness, we predict that the interaction of biological kinship with the age-schedule of resource production should be a key driver of intergenerational transfers. In the empirical case of Tsimane' forager-horticulturalists in Bolivian Amazonia, we provide a detailed characterization of net transfers of food according to age, sex, kinship and the net need of donors and recipients. We show that parents, grandparents and siblings provide significant net downward transfers of food across generations. We demonstrate that the extent of provisioning responds facultatively to variation in the productivity and demographic composition of families, as predicted by the theory. We hypothesize that the motivation to provide these critical transfers is a fundamental force that binds together human nuclear and extended families. The ubiquity of three-generational families in human societies may thus be a direct reflection of fundamental evolutionary constraints on an organism's life-history and social organization.
Reference Budgets for More Inclusive Societies^2015^18TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ENTERPRISE AND COMPETITIVE ENVIRONMENT^The aim of this paper is to introduce the concept of Reference Budgets which is under development in several EU countries with the Czech Republic under a special focus. This contribution will introduce the pilot project for the development of a common methodology on reference budgets in Europe and current national study which is done at The Faculty of Business and Economics at Mendel University in Brno. This paper will focus on the CR food-based dietary guidelines and the development of new methodology. The first dietary recommendations for the CR were suggested by the Society for Nutrition in 1986, updated in 1989 and 1994. In 2004-2005, the Society for Nutrition published Nutrition recommendations for the CR. In 2012, this Society presented an innovative nutrition recommendations for the population of the CR which were intended for professionals who deal with the nutrition prevention of mass noninfectious diseases and promote good eating habits. For the first time, these recommendations were done in relation to the children's age, nutrition of pregnant and lactating women and the elderly nutrition. The nutrition recommendations were based on the EU document: The Strategy for Europe related to health problems connected to nutrition, overweight and obesity from 2007 and inspired by WHO. Later, the Society for Nutrition decided to promote new reference intakes of energy and nutrients with a reference framework of the Societies for Nutrition in countries, known as "DACH" (Germany, Austria, Switzerland).
Responsible research and innovation in miniature: Information asymmetries hindering a more inclusive 'nanofood' development^JUN 2014^SCIENCE AND PUBLIC POLICY^Responsible research and innovation (RRI) is about an interactive and comprehensive development of new technologies, also addressing social needs and ethical issues. But how do these ambitions of RRI relate to the practice of technological innovations? Nanotechnology is currently a large-scale techno-scientific development that offers many chances and opportunities but also raises concerns. Focusing on the issues of power, information (asymmetries) and responsibility we will describe the Dutch policy, assessments and debates on nanotechnology in general and on nanofood in particular. RRI assumes a willingness of all stakeholders to share or communicate information, but the case of nanofood exemplifies that industry can be reluctant to do this because of the fear that discussions will take a 'wrong direction'. We conclude that information asymmetries can be a principal problem for a more inclusive nanofood development and that policies that wish to strengthen RRI should take this into account.
Quality of Inclusive Educational System for Work with Students with Autism Different Needs in Italy^2014^SOCIETY, INTEGRATION, EDUCATION, VOL III, 2014^The need for realization of inclusive education, which is the basis of a sustainable education, will require new challenges in the Education System. The system used in Italy can be used as an example. Italy passed avant-garde laws concerning the integration and inclusion of special needs students into the general school system already more than thirty years ago, in the 1970s. However, even after all this time and experience, there are still unresolved problems, which testifies to the complexities of the matter. This research offers an insight into the quality of the existing Italian inclusive education system specifically in relation to students with autism. Thereby it hopes to provide educators in Latvia with food for thought about this currently important topic.
Smart innovation and inclusive patents for sustainable food and health care: Redefining the Europe 2020 objectives^2013^CONSTRUCTING EUROPEAN INTELLECTUAL PROPERTY: ACHIEVEMENTS AND NEW PERSPECTIVES^None
GLOBALIZATION CAN LEAD TO INCLUSIVE GROWTH IN DEVELOPING COUNTRIES - MYTH OR REALITY^2013^ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT: 2ND INTERNATIONAL SCIENTIFIC CONFERENCE BOOK OF PROCEEDINGS^Globalization and the related concerns for poverty and exclusionary development have become a focus of international discussion in recent years. Sometimes, contrary to the commitment of global corporations to act as engines of economic growth trickling down wealth to the rest of society, their policies lock wealth at the top, denying job opportunities to unskilled labour, increasing the number of people dislocated from their traditional livelihoods, decreasing access to food and vital social services to urban poor and reducing scope for participatory planning and community involvement. In India, due to globalization, the spatial structures of cities and the hinterland are changing as new economic production patterns require more horizontal integration between functions in different countries. With shifting of attention to external locations and activities by the major metropolitan cities of the country, a paradigm change from earlier urban spatial patterns is noted. The territories or regions which surround these rapidly globalizing cities are increasingly playing a very insignificant and irrelevant function in their business. However, in a major metropolitan region of eastern India i.e. Kolkata Metropolitan Area, due to a very unique process of internationalization of economic activities, the "local" and the "global" are deeply intertwined. This paper attempts to highlight that how within KMA, due to a very unique process of internationalization of economic activities, the hinterland especially the new towns are aspiring for world class life style including in the process a large number of local companies. These new centres of development are acting as excellent platform for diverse kind of linkages between global level activities and local business houses.
All-inclusive utilisation of sour whey components in different prototypes based on membrane separation^2012^MILCHWISSENSCHAFT-MILK SCIENCE INTERNATIONAL^Sour whey, a by-product of quark production, is currently produced at the rate of about 145 million tons per year worldwide. The majority of the sour whey is utilised in animal food production, and a small part is spray-dried. Despite these uses, every year 10.87 million tons of milk components are lost, including 362,500 tons of whey protein, 7.97 million tons of lactose, 1.08 million tons of calcium and other minerals, 942,500 tons of non-protein nitrogen materials (NPN), and 870,000 tons of lactic acid and water. Central processing of the left over sour whey (e.g., lactose, lactic acid or biogas manufacturing) is not a real solution due to the large distance of these facilities from the mostly small scale quark production plants and to the high investment costs. The objective of this study was to develop a new method to convert sour whey components to high-value human food products on-site at quark production plants by utilising membrane separation technology. We developed product models based on the separated sour whey components such as sour cream, kefir, yogurt and bread. This new technology has the potential to result an all-inclusive utilisation of sour whey and offers a new profit source for quark producers.
Algae biodiesel has potential despite inconclusive results to date^JAN 2012^BIORESOURCE TECHNOLOGY^A meta-analysis of several published life cycle assessments of algae-to-energy systems was developed to better understand the environmental implications of deploying this technology at large scales. Taken together, results from these six studies seemed largely inconclusive because of differences in modeling assumptions and system boundaries. To overcome this, the models were normalized using a generic pathway for cultivating algae in open ponds, converting it into biodiesel, and processing the nonlipid fraction using anaerobic digestion. Meta-analysis results suggest that algae-based biodiesel would result in energy consumption and greenhouse gas emissions on par with terrestrial alternatives such as corn ethanol and soy biodiesel. Net energy ratio and normalized greenhouse gas emissions were 1.4 MJ produced/MJ consumed and 0.19 kg CO2-equivalent/km traveled, respectively. A scenario analysis underscores the extent to which breakthroughs in key technologies are needed before algae-derived fuels become an attractive alternative to conventional biofuels. (C) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Crowdsourcing Crop Improvement in Sub-Saharan Africa: A Proposal for a Scalable and Inclusive Approach to Food Security^JUL 2011^IDS BULLETIN-INSTITUTE OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^In sub-Saharan Africa, modern varieties released by the formal seed sector cover only a small part of the total crop acreage. Participatory approaches to crop improvement and seed production have been developed to overcome some of the barriers to modern variety development and seed distribution, but have not been widely scaled up. Crowdsourcing, such as seen in online citizen science projects, might inspire new approaches to upscale farmer-participatory seed innovation, specifically aiming at household food production. Using mobile technology, African farmers may be engaged in massively evaluating and distributing seeds. It is argued that a crowdsourcing approach to seed innovation would not only be scalable, but also inclusive through the strengthening of crop diversity as an open informational resource.
[Nihon koshu eisei zasshi] Japanese journal of public health^2011-Jun^[Nihon koshu eisei zasshi] Japanese journal of public health^None
INCLUSIVE, GREEN AND PRODUCTIVE CITIES. THE ROLE OF URBAN AGRICULTURE^2011^JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AND ECOLOGY^Attention to urban agriculture has increased markedly during the last couple of decades. Urban agriculture contributes to a wide variety of urban issues and is increasingly being accepted and used as a tool in sustainable city development. Some forms of urban and pen-urban agriculture are based on temporary use of vacant lands, but urban agriculture as such is a permanent feature of many cities in developing as well as in developed countries, and positively contributes to sustainable city development, if properly managed. In Gurpinar, Istanbul ETC-RUAF and TKG collaborated in a demonstration project providing food, income and empowerment for low-income women and their families. The project convinced urban authorities that agricultural production could enhance food security, employment creation, micro-enterprise development, waste recycling, and the building of communities.
Unleashing Entrepreneurship Potential and Innovation for Inclusive and Sustainable Growth of Ethnic Indian Brand in Global Fast Food Industry: 'GOLI' Vada Pay Promoters' Growth Story^2011^STRATEGIES AND INNOVATIONS FOR SUSTAINABLE ORGANIZATIONS^Entrepreneurship has effectively shown potential in generation of wealth for nations. In a developing country like India, such ventures have shown immense potential in generating employment opportunities while shifting the balance of trade from an import orientation to an export orientation. The government policy has been to focus on development and nurturing of small scale industries and entrepreneurial ventures. Such a climate has boosted the potential of the average entrepreneur to think beyond the defined lines. The number of innovations has seen an upsurge, with business persons applying new thought and strategy to business. This search renders a conducive environment for the growth and sustenance of innovation in the country. For large firms innovation has the most significant impact on competitiveness, while for SMEs, innovation has the most significant impact on increase in market share. Additionally, the policy framework has constantly shifted the balance of trade in the country, focussing strongly on developing the market for Indian Exports. The demand for traditional Indian products in the international markets has seen a constant upsurge. The Indian food for instance, being spicy and nutritious have gained mass popularity and acceptance worldwide. Such a climate has created several new windows for business opportunities and put India in a strategic position on the world map. This study examines the factors that lead to the growth of entrepreneurship and innovation in India and establishes the case of 'Goli' Vada Pay-the branded vada pay with a shelf life of 9 months.' Finally the study presents recommendations for garnering the potential of entrepreneurship within the country and suggests measures to unleash India's potential for innovation to propel inclusive and sustainable growth.
Boundary Work in Inclusive Religious Groups: Constructing Identity at the New York Catholic Worker^SUM 2010^SOCIOLOGY OF RELIGION^Many religious groups use symbolic boundary work to construct distinctive collective identity. While boundary drawing may be unproblematic for some, it can create conflict for "inclusive" groups. How do inclusive groups construct and solidify identity and commitment? If they use boundary work, how do they manage the conflict between exclusive "othering" and inclusiveness? I show that while members of the inclusive New York Catholic Worker use boundary work to construct distinctive identity, their boundary work takes place largely on an abstract level while they practice inclusion of the "other" in their concrete interactions. Building on Martin Buber's insights regarding the transformarive power of "I-Thou" encounters, I argue that concrete practices of inclusion outweigh boundary drawing in inclusive groups like the Catholic Worker. Group ideologies that encourage practices that cultivate openness to I-Thou relations, such as Catholic Worker personalism, therefore provide an advantage in balancing inclusive identity with boundary work.
Do Inclusive Leaders Help to Reduce Turnover in Diverse Groups? The Moderating Role of Leader-Member Exchange in the Diversity to Turnover Relationship^NOV 2009^JOURNAL OF APPLIED PSYCHOLOGY^This research examines leader-member exchange (LMX) at the group level as a moderator of the relationships between demographic (i.e., race. age, gender) and tenure diversity and group turnover. Drawing primarily from LMX, social categorization, and expectation states theories, we hypothesized that through the pattern of LMX relationships that they develop with followers, group managers influence inclusion and status differentials within groups such that the positive relationship between diversity and group turnover will be weaker when the group mean on LMX is high or when group differentiation on LMX is low. Results from a sample of supermarket departments (N = 348) yielded general support for the study hypotheses. We also found evidence for a 3-way interaction involving demographic diversity, LMX mean, and LMX differentiation such that the interaction between demographic diversity and LMX differentiation was only significant when LMX mean was high. These findings highlight the important role that leaders play in influencing the relationship between diversity and turnover through the patterns of inclusion that they create in their units.
Are cost-inclusive evaluations worth the effort?^FEB 2009^EVALUATION AND PROGRAM PLANNING^Relative costs are as important as relative effectiveness when choosing between program alternatives or among a set of programs competing for scarce funds. Nevertheless, the number of cost-inclusive evaluations remains comparatively small. This article presents the results of three first-time cost-inclusive evaluations each performed by an experienced evaluator. Each evaluator performed a different type of cost-inclusive evaluation using different tobacco control programs as examples: "standard" cost-effectiveness analysis, threshold or break-even analysis, and a simulation model. Results are presented in terms of the challenges faced, and informational and insight benefits gained, as well as in terms of program cost-effectiveness. All three evaluators agreed that the benefits from performing cost-inclusive evaluations are well worth time and effort involved. They also found that this type of evaluation provides abundant information that can be used to improve program effectiveness and cost-effectiveness. (C) 2008 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
From global Sustainability to inclusive education: Understanding urban children's ideas about the food system^AUG 19 2005^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SCIENCE EDUCATION^The purpose of this paper is to report our findings from a qualitative study intended to develop our understandings of: what high-poverty urban children understand and believe about food and food systems; and how such children transform and use that knowledge in their everyday lives (i.e. how do they express their scientific literacies including content understandings, process understandings, habits of mind in these content areas). This qualitative study is part of a larger study focused on understanding and developing science and nutritional literacies among high-poverty urban fourth-grade through sixth-grade students and their teachers and caregivers.
The future of fisheries: from 'exclusive' resource policy to 'inclusive' public policy^2004^MARINE ECOLOGY PROGRESS SERIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.359  </td>  <td>2.715</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Recent discoveries in inclusive food-based approaches and dietary patterns for reduction in risk for cardiovascular disease^AUG 2002^CURRENT OPINION IN LIPIDOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.844  </td>  <td>4.671</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Brief Report: Examining the Association Between Classroom Social Network Inclusion and Playground Peer Engagement Among Children With Autism Spectrum Disorders^JUN 2019^FOCUS ON AUTISM AND OTHER DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^Children with autism spectrum disorder (ASD) often face barriers when establishing peer connections at school. This aim of this study is to explore how social network inclusion in the classroom is associated with playground peer engagement. Independent observers administered friendship surveys to determine social network inclusion in the classroom and recorded the playground engagement states of 55 children with ASD from 42 general education classrooms in 16 public elementary schools in the northeastern United States. Linear regression models were used to examine associations between social network inclusion and playground engagement. Results indicated an association between social network inclusion and playground engagement. Children who were included to a greater degree in their classrooms' social network spent more time engaged with peers on the playground. These findings highlight the importance of supporting social interactions in multiple contexts in schools.
Exploring the links between dispositions, romantic relationships, support networks and community inclusion in men and women^MAY 7 2019^PLOS ONE^Most studies of social cognition have focused on dyadic relationships, and rather few have looked at how we engage with individuals in the wider social world into which we are embedded. Here we use principle component analysis (PCA) and path analysis to explore how different aspects of human sociality interact. We demonstrate two distinct clusters in both sexes relating to (i) romantic relationships and (ii) wider social engagement, such as that with the local community. These two domains of relationship were associated with different dispositional traits: individual variation in impulsivity in the former, and in empathy and avoidant attachment in the latter. Although these clusters were broadly similar across both sexes, clearer differentiation is evident in males. In females only, support network size was positively related to the anxious dimension of attachment and, unlike in males, was not related to feelings of inclusion in the local community. This suggests that support networks may play different roles in the two sexes, indicating a productive line of future research. These findings have important practical applications: loneliness interventions that target the specific type of relationship that is felt to be lacking and the associated dispositional traits are likely to be more effective than more generic approaches.
Inclusion profile of theoretical frameworks on the study of sociocultural adaptation of international university students^MAY 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INTERCULTURAL RELATIONS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.713  </td>  <td>2.197</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Theorizing sites and strategies of differential inclusion: Unlawful migrant workers in Australia^MAY 2019^THEORETICAL CRIMINOLOGY^In this article, I extend the theoretical concept of differential inclusion, as developed in 2013 by Mezzadra and Neilson, via an empirical examination of the experiences of unlawful migrant workers in Australia and those who employ them. I explore the dynamic and shifting positionality of the unlawful migrant by examining several sites and strategies used to achieve differential inclusion in the Australian context, including migrant worker networks, the workplace and the broader community. My analysis reveals that the nation-state's effort to exclude and demarcate non-belonging via law and policy is destabilized by the inclusionary bordering practices of both citizens and unlawful non-citizens. My findings point to the importance of criminologists continuing to look beyond the physical border to make sense of the configuration and reconfiguration of belonging. The conceptualization of differential inclusion provided here recognizes that workers and employers utilize diverse strategies and sites which can subvert state exclusionary practices.
Institutions Developing Excellence in Academic Leadership (IDEAL) A partnership to advance gender equity, diversity, and inclusion in academic STEM^APR 15 2019^EQUALITY DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION^Purpose The purpose of this paper is to describe the objectives, activities and outcomes of the National Science Foundation ADVANCE project, Institutions Developing Excellence in Academic Leadership (IDEAL) during 2009-2012. The goal of IDEAL was to create an institutional learning community empowered to develop and leverage knowledge, skills, resources and networks to transform academic cultures and enhance gender equity, diversity and inclusion in science, technology, engineering and math (STEM) disciplines at six research universities in the northern Ohio region. Over the three-year period, these institutions developed academic leaders and institutionalized gender equity transformation through multi-dimensional and multi-level initiatives, improving the advancement and leadership of women faculty in STEM disciplines. Design/methodology/approach The authors describe the objectives, activities and outcomes of the NSF ADVANCE project, IDEAL during 2009-2012. The six research institutions included in IDEAL were Bowling Green State University, Case Western Reserve University (the lead institution), Cleveland State University, Kent State University, University of Akron and University of Toledo. Findings IDEAL's outcomes included the institutionalization of a number of gender equity initiatives at each university, an increase in the number of tenured women faculty in science and engineering disciplines over three years across the six universities, and increases in the numbers of women in faculty and administrative leadership positions. Out of 62 of the IDEAL participants (co-directors and change leaders), 25 were promoted or appointed to roles of leadership within or beyond their institutions during or after their participation in IDEAL. A number of new institutional collaborations and exchanges involving the six universities occurred during and emerged from IDEAL. An integrative model of the IDEAL program is developed, describing the nested components of each institution's gender equity transformation within the IDEAL partnership consortium and the larger NSF ADVANCE community, and highlighting the dynamic interactions between these levels. Originality/value This is an original description of a unique and distinctive partnership among research universities to foster gender equity IT. The manuscript details the objectives, activities and outcomes of the IDEAL program, established with the aim of broadening participation in the STEM academic workforce and advancing gender equity, diversity and inclusion in institutions of higher education. An integrative model is developed, illustrating the key components and outcomes of the IDEAL program.
A mission to converge for inclusion? The smart city and the women of Seelampur^APR 2019^MEDIA CULTURE &amp; SOCIETY^Based on ethnographic research in New Delhi, this article critically examines the promise of inclusion of the smart city, new governance program Mission Convergence for marginalized residents, especially minority women in the urban periphery of Seelampur. Drawing from transdisciplinary debates, I argue that this smart city program must be globally located in institutional shifts in New Public Management approaches that advocate the hybrid and networked state, entrepreneurial citizens, and self-regulated workers in the global economy. Program practices of counting the poor revealed structural inequities that were concealed behind the smooth interface of Convergence. Furthermore, subaltern women formed the nurturing interface of the networked state which was a hollow position without power. Finally, Seelampur women were trained in Information and Communication Technologies (ICTs) and other skills as precarious labor for the global economy. My research highlights contradictory experiences of marginalized women in the context of optimism about ICT-enabled inclusion.
Encouraging Volunteering in Nonprofit Organizations: The Role of Organizational Inclusion and Volunteer Need Satisfaction^None^JOURNAL OF NONPROFIT &amp; PUBLIC SECTOR MARKETING^Using self-determination theory as a framework, this study examined the relationship between perceived organizational inclusion, volunteer need satisfaction, and future behavioral intentions. A national survey of 428 volunteers found that when volunteers feel more included in the workplace, they experience higher need satisfaction, which leads to greater behavioral intentions toward the organization. Additionally, a path analysis found that some of the personal dimensions of inclusion (i.e., decision-making, information networks, and participation) predicted volunteer need satisfaction (i.e., competence, relatedness, and autonomy). All dimensions of need satisfaction predicted future behavioral intentions. There was a significant indirect effect of volunteering inclusion on behavioral intentions through need satisfaction. Results suggest that nonprofit organizations should encourage need satisfaction of their volunteers, and this can be accomplished in part through creating an inclusive environment. Other important theoretical and practical implications are discussed.
Going to school for the first time: inclusion committee members increasing the number of students with disabilities in primary schools in Kenya^MAR 4 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^This paper is an extension of a prior research project where Kenyan primary school teachers began using inclusive education strategies that proved beneficial for meeting the needs of diverse primary school students. Specifically, this paper highlights a project where these inclusive practices were expanded to a second region of western Kenya. This expansion of teacher training on inclusive education and critical disability studies promoted sustained school- and community-based discussions on inclusive education and sensitisation on issues related to disability. These practices also led to the development of inclusion committees, co-teaching practices, and stimulated the partial dissolution of the physical boundaries and categorical distinctions between 'primary' and 'special' schools. In conjunction, all of these factors ultimately led to an increase in the number of students with disabilities accessing any form of education for the first time. Furthermore, such approaches to the development and small-scale expansion of a sustainable inclusive education system led to the Kenyan government's consideration of the replication of such practices on a national scale. As a result of this work in conjunction with a growing inclusive network of governmental and non-governmental organisations, a national review on special education policy is underway.
Formation of the Inclusive Environments and Metrics in Biology Education and Research (iEMBER) Network: Building a Culture of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion^MAR 1 2019^CBE-LIFE SCIENCES EDUCATION^The Inclusive Environments and Metrics in Biology Education and Research (iEMBER) network is a newly forming national community of practice that engages diversity, equity, and inclusion stakeholders in interdisciplinary collaborative projects. iEMBER was initiated with incubator funding from the National Science Foundation program for Research Coordination Networks in Undergraduate Biology Education. In June 2017, biology education researchers, social scientists, biologists, and program and policy administrators, all with interests in diversity, equity, and inclusion, met to lay the foundation for the iEMBER network. iEMBER provides a distinct forum to coordinate efforts through networking, professional development, and the initiation of collaborative research. iEMBER advances science, technology, engineering, and mathematics reform focused on diversity, equity, and inclusion through the initiation of research teams at the iEMBER biennial conference and outreach efforts at discipline-specific meetings and conferences. The focus of iEMBER is on understanding how to create inclusive, supportive, and engaging environments to foster the success of all biology students and trainees. This report focuses on the structure of the iEMBER network, two takeaways that emerged from the 2017 conference (interdisciplinary networking/collaboration and intradisciplinary broadening participation strategies), and ways for prospective members to engage in ongoing dialogue and future events.
'I kind of figured it out': the views and experiences of people with traumatic brain injury (TBI) in using social media-self-determination for participation and inclusion online^MAR-APR 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF LANGUAGE &amp; COMMUNICATION DISORDERS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.504  </td>  <td>2.206</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Hoping for optimality or designing for inclusion: Persistence, learning, and the social network of citizen science^FEB 5 2019^PROCEEDINGS OF THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA^The explosive growth in citizen science combined with a recalcitrance on the part of mainstream science to fully embrace this data collection technique demands a rigorous examination of the factors influencing data quality and project efficacy. Patterns of contributor effort and task performance have been well reviewed in online projects; however, studies of hands-on citizen science are lacking. We used a single hands-on, out-of-doors project-the Coastal Observation and Seabird Survey Team (COASST)-to quantitatively explore the relationships among participant effort, task performance, and social connectedness as a function of the demographic characteristics and interests of participants, placing these results in the context of a meta-analysis of 54 citizen science projects. Although online projects were typified by high (&gt; 90%) rates of one-off participation and low retention (&lt; 10%) past 1 y, regular COASST participants were highly likely to continue past their first survey (86%), with 54% active 1 y later. Project-wide, task performance was high (88% correct species identifications over the 31,450 carcasses and 163 species found). However, there were distinct demographic differences. Age, birding expertise, and previous citizen science experience had the greatest impact on participant persistence and performance, albeit occasionally in opposite directions. Gender and sociality were relatively inconsequential, although highly gregarious social types, i. e., "nexus people," were extremely influential at recruiting others. Our findings suggest that hands-on citizen science can produce high-quality data especially if participants persist, and that understanding the demographic data of participation could be used to maximize data quality and breadth of participation across the larger societal landscape.
FOSTERING DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION IN THE NATIONAL HEART, LUNG, AND BLOOD INSTITUTE'S SMALL BUSINESS PROGRAM^FEB 2019^ETHNICITY &amp; DISEASE^The National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute has developed a strategic approach to fostering diversity and inclusion within its community of small business innovators. The approach is focused on three central goals: 1) Increase awareness of NHLBI's support for small businesses among underrepresented groups through focused outreach; 2) Identify and eliminate barriers to entry into small business funding programs and entrepreneurial activities for minority and female applicants through specific, targeted training and support; and 3) Expand diversity and inclusivity within our networks by providing additional support for NHLBI-funded small businesses to hire members of underrepresented groups. Key partnerships with biomedical accelerators in underserved regions will be leveraged to maximize impact and achieve all three goals. This article describes the historical context and current state of policies in this arena; it also provides details about mechanisms and approaches used to achieve the goals.
Exploring gaps in the online economic inclusion of persons with disabilities in Korea^2019^INFORMATION COMMUNICATION &amp; SOCIETY^This paper explores the difference in the online economic activities of people with and without disabilities in Korea. We conducted a multiple regression analysis to investigate the impact of socioeconomic characteristics, internet access, and internet skills on online economic activities. Our sample, based on a 2016 dataset that included 1554 people with disabilities and 6004 people without disabilities, was developed using quota sampling based on gender, age, and residence. We determined that individuals with disabilities were more likely to engage in online economic activities if they had higher levels of education, lived in urban areas, were employed, or had greater internet skills. Individuals without disabilities were more likely to engage in online economic activities if they were women, had higher levels of education, were employed, lived in a two-generation or more household, or had greater internet skills. For both people with and without disabilities, the level of education, employment status, and internet skills positively contribute to online economic activites. We also determined that education level, participation in economic activity, living in a two-generation or more household, and internet skills had a statistically significant influence on online economic activity for people both with and without disabilities. These results highlight the importance of education and internet training for people with disabilities, as well as social support systems that help them learn to use the internet in diverse ways through both formal and informal networks. The study also underscores the importance of information and communications technology that adequately addresses people's needs.
NOTES ON DIGITAL INCLUSION IN SCHOOL SPACE ACCORDING TO UNDERSTAD OF THE MEMES USES^JAN-APR 2019^PERIFERIA^The access and mastery of the information and communication new technologies in the contemporary world has become an important requirement for the work world. Something equally relevant for the better sociability and interaction of the individual with the other. The issue in question is also located in the educational field, requiring effective public policies by the State to attend a process of digital inclusion for education professionals. Therefore, new digital languages and technologies can be used as valuable teaching tools for improving the teaching and learning process. In this sense, memes are part of the people daily life who use social networks and communication apps, being very close to the youngers. Their use in the classroom is a possibility of approach between the hope world and students and teachers interests. Thus, the present paper intends to reflect on the digital inclusion in Brazilian education problem from the uses of memes, considering two possibilities: introducing notes about the digital exclusion in the Brazilian educational process and quote the meme as a reflection possibility of the classroom daily life according to understand digital exclusion and inclusion.
SWOT Analysis of the Inclusion of Machine Translation and PostEditing in the Master's Degrees Offered in the EMT Network^JAN 2019^JOURNAL OF SPECIALISED TRANSLATION^Machine translation has traditionally been linked to the translator's technological skills. However, the imperatives of the market have fostered the figure of the post-editor, understood not as an expert in machine translation systems, but as a professional in charge of revising and modifying the text proposed by the machine. This fact forces trainers to introduce these contents during the degree and to offer a greater specialisation during postgraduate studies. For this reason, in the present paper, taking into account the role that post-editing and machine translation are playing in the industry, the different Master's degrees in the European Master's in Translation (EMT) network are analysed in order to examine whether these contents are included in their syllabuses and with what degree of specialization. For that purpose, the information about the different subjects and modules offered in the EMT Master's degrees was collected and explored using the technique of content analysis. Taking this data as a starting point, a SWOT (Strengths, Weaknesses, Opportunities and Threats) analysis will be presented in order to identify internal and external factors that could be influencing the teaching of post-editing and machine translation in the EMT network.
The social inclusion of young people with serious mental illness: A narrative review of the literature and suggested future directions^JAN 2019^AUSTRALIAN AND NEW ZEALAND JOURNAL OF PSYCHIATRY^Background: Social inclusion involves objective participatory (e.g. education/employment) and subjective (e.g. sense of belonging/acceptance) elements across multiple domains. It has been associated with enhanced physical and mental wellbeing yet is a novel construct in the empirical literature (i.e. measures have not been sufficiently developed). Aims: Young people with serious mental illness are reported to be socially excluded. It is unclear whether this is reflected in the social inclusion/exclusion literature. The aim of this narrative review is to determine whether such literature permits a comprehensive (i.e. multi-dimensional, objective and subjective) understanding of social inclusion among young people with serious mental illness. Methods: Searches to identify studies related to the social inclusion and/or exclusion of young people with serious mental illness were conducted on 16 February 2016, 24 August 2016, 16 February 2017, 24 August 2017 and 16 February 2018 in PsycINFO, MEDLINE, the Cochrane Library, SCOPUS, Open Grey, Web of Science, Google and Google Scholar. Results: There is a paucity of research in the explicit social inclusion literature involving young people either with or without serious mental illness as participants. Literatures exist in related independent areas of research (e.g. employment, social networks), but such studies employ heterogeneous methodologies. Conclusion: Multi-dimensional measures of social inclusion incorporating objective and subjective indicators must be developed for young people with and without serious mental illness. This will enable the generation of normative and clinical data. Existing evidence for the social exclusion of young people with serious mental illness comes from objective indicators in isolated domains (e.g. unemployment). Subjective indicators continue to be under-researched. The above-described measures must be employed to further understanding of the apparent discrepancies between young people with serious mental illness and those without serious mental illness. This will elucidate the relationships between objective and subjective elements of social inclusion and the relationships between these elements and the psychological distress that young people with serious mental illness often experience. This has implications for intervention.
Neural Correlates of Social Inclusion in Borderline Personality Disorder^DEC 3 2018^FRONTIERS IN PSYCHIATRY^Humans engage in social interactions and have a fundamental need and motivation to establish and maintain social connections. Neuroimaging studies particularly focused on the neural substrates of social exclusion in healthy subjects (HC), borderline personality disorder (BPD), and major depression (MD). However, there is evidence regarding neural alterations also during social inclusion in BPD that we intended to elucidate in our study. Considering that patients with BPD often have comorbid MD, we investigated patients with BPD, and comorbid MD, patients with MD without BPD, and a sample of HC. By investigating these two clinical samples within one study design, we attempted to disentangle potential confounds arising by psychiatric disorder or medication and to relate neural alterations under social inclusion specifically to BPD. We investigated 48 females (15 BPD and MD, 16 MD, and 17 HC) aged between 18 and 40 years by fMRI (3D, using the established cyberball paradigm with social exclusion, inclusion, and passive watching conditions. Significant group-by-condition interaction effects (p &lt; 0.05, FWE-corrected on cluster level) were observed within the dorsolateral (dIPFC) and dorsomedial prefrontal cortex (dmPFC), the temporo-parietal junction (TPJ), the posterior cingulate cortex (PCC), and the precuneus. Comparisons of estimated neural activations revealed that significant interaction effects were related to a relative increase in neural activations during social inclusion in BPD. In detail, we observed a significant increase in differential (social inclusion vs. passive watching) neural activation within the dmPFC and the PCC in BPD compared to both, MD and HC. However, significant interaction effects within the dIPFC and the TPJ could not specifically be linked to BPD considering that they did not differ significantly between the two clinical groups in post-hoc comparisons. Our study supports previous results on effects of social and inclusion in BPD, and provides further evidence regarding disorder specific neural alterations in BPD for brain regions associated with self-referential and mentalizing processes during social inclusion.
Nowhere can be an island: Making inclusion happen through seeing the world beyond the borders^NOV 2018^HE KUPU^In today's globalised, interconnected world, the mobility of people across physical and virtual spaces and time has a significant influence on the young generation. It is critical for teaching professionals to create inclusive learning spaces that accommodate the diversity of families, including those from distinct religious and socio-economic backgrounds. This article looks at inclusion through a human mobility paradigm, which implies that all places are tied into "at least thin networks of connections that stretch beyond each such place and mean that nowhere can be an island" (Urry, 2007, p. 209). Some studies emphasise that the more mobile and fluid identity is, the more successfully the person integrates in the societal experiences (Bello, 2014; Butcher, 2009; Nowicka, 2007). This article stresses the importance for teaching professionals to develop an understanding that the notion of identity in the twenty-first century undergoes constant reconstruction, thus calling to perceive and accept children as global citizens by embracing transformational, inclusive teaching approaches and environments.
Mapping diversity and inclusion in student societies: A social network perspective^NOV 2018^COMPUTERS IN HUMAN BEHAVIOR^Diversity in higher education is associated with positive personal, societal and educational outcomes. These benefits are best achieved when diverse groups are engaged in meaningful interactions through formal and informal activities. While measuring student diversity by analyzing the proportions of students of different nationalities and ethnic backgrounds in the enrollment statistics is easily done, examining whether these diverse groups interact outside of compulsory activities in the classroom is significantly more challenging. The purpose of this research is to apply social network analysis to map students' social activities. Using large-scale data on students' participation in social events at a major public university, we illustrate how to use social network analysis to visualize the social fabric of the student body as a whole and to explore the interwoven and isolated social clusters at the core and the periphery of students' extracurricular activities. We explain how such findings can be used to inform university policies aimed at increasing social inclusion.
'More people talk to you when you have a dog' - dogs as catalysts for social inclusion of people with intellectual disabilities^OCT 2018^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.941  </td>  <td>2.637</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
PORTRAITS OF HIGHER EDUCATION - INCLUSION, INTERCULTURALITY AND PEDAGOGICAL INNOVATION^SEP 2018^REVISTA IBERO-AMERICANA DE ESTUDOS EM EDUCACAO^The Thematic Dossier Portraits of Higher Education - Inclusion, Interculturality and Pedagogical Innovation aims at systematizing productions of acknowledged contributions. It builds a network of socialization of the knowledge that is being developed and researched by the universities that compose the International Observatory of Inclusion, Interculturality and Pedagogical Innovation (OIIIIPe) and guests. It includes 18 articles, being three of them international and fifteen national articles regarding Teaching, Research and Extension of Undergraduate and Graduate courses. It also sets the knowledge produced by each university in National and International Scientific Exchange Programs, bringing visibility and inter-institutional dissemination.
SOCIAL INCLUSION AND EXCLUSION IN THE LIFE STORIES OF DEPORTED ASYLUM SEEKERS FROM FINLAND TO IRAQI KURDISTAN^SEP 2018^NORDIC JOURNAL OF MIGRATION RESEARCH^This study explores how social inclusion and exclusion manifest as a dynamic continuum in the everyday lived realities of irregular migrants. Based on narratives of Iraqi Kurdish asylum seekers, who were eventually deported from Finland, the analysis depicts the ways in which societal structures, personal negotiations as well as relationships and social networks interplay in lives characterized by multiple locations, transitions and positions. Establishing and maintaining social contacts, belonging to various networks and being able to decide and act are primary factors that help us understand how the narrators relate to the continuum. The participants construct narratives illustrating several viewpoints or positions regarding participation, agency and dependency on outside actors and networks.
Evaluation of e-commerce websites accessibility and usability: an e-commerce platform analysis with the inclusion of blind users^AUG 2018^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN THE INFORMATION SOCIETY^Considering the importance associated with e-commerce website accessibility and usability, a study on one of the most relevant Portuguese e-commerce websites has been performed using both automatic and manual assessment procedures. In an initial stage, we evaluated the chosen website with a Web accessibility and usability automatic tool called SortSite; after that, we performed a manual evaluation to verify each previously detected error and present possible solutions to overcome those faults. In a third phase, three usability specialists have been used to perform a heuristic evaluation of the chosen website. Finally, user tests with blind people were carried out in order to fully assess the compliance with accessibility and usability guidelines and standards. The results showed that the platform had a good score regarding the automatic evaluation; however, when the heuristic and manual evaluations were performed, some accessibility and usability problems were discovered. Moreover, the user test results showed bad marks regarding efficiency, effectiveness, and satisfaction by the group of participants. As a conclusion, we highlight user interaction problems and propose seven recommendations focused on enhancing accessibility and usability of not only the evaluated e-commerce website, but also of other similar ones.
Examination of the Status of Financial Inclusion and Its Determinants in Tanzania^AUG 2018^SUSTAINABILITY^The primary motive of this paper is to examine the determinants of financial inclusion in Tanzania. The paper borrows data from a household survey conducted by TWAWEZA. Employing the probit regression, the findings of this paper reveal that gender, education, age and income are the pertinent factors which affect the financial inclusion in Tanzania. The paper further shows the following: First, if you are a man, financially stable, have a good education and are relatively older, you then stand better chances of being financially included. The results show that, as the level of education increases, the individual is more likely to be financially included. The possible reason for this observation may be clearly linked with the financial ability of educated individuals to afford holding bank accounts and presenting personal guarantees when required by the banks during loan application because the level of education goes parallel with the income level. In addition, the results confirm a gender gap in formal financial inclusion, and this may be due to the factors such as inability of women to show collateral, their poor financial education awareness and lower business experience. Second, the paper also shows that the factors which affect traditional banking services are the same as those affecting mobile banking services (gender, age, income and education), and that there is a negative trend and a clear departure of customers' usage from banking retail services to mobile financial services. Although this gap has been narrowed recently, the best option with the banking sector is to create more new delivery channels while using mobile financial services as an infrastructure to deepen financial access reaching more un-banked population. The paper, therefore, recommends banks to create more delivery channels while using mobile telecommunication network as an infrastructure to deepen financial access reaching more unbanked people rather than competing with mobile network operators. The findings of this paper may also be used as a wake-up call for policy makers to put more emphasis on women and young people who are often left behind during Government's effort toward reaching the entire population as far as financial inclusion is concerned.
ICTs AS COGNITIVE TOOLS OF INCLUSION IN PHYSICS CLASS FOR HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS^JUL-DEC 2018^GONDOLA-ENSENANZA Y APRENDIZAJE DE LAS CIENCIAS^The aim was to learn about the impact of Information and Communication Technologies on high school physics students, with and without Special Educational Needs. We understand ICT as a pedagogical tool for learning basic concepts of optics, work, energy and fluids, both at the level of meaningful learning and inclusion. The contents of this study were based on the curriculum of the Ministry of Education of Chile for the first and third years of secondary education in a common module. We did four activities in the computer lab for one month in the second semester of 2015 at a local school. The information gathering technique consisted of a pre and post affinity, meaningful learning and knowledge of the discipline. We apply networked resources such as interactive simulations, animations, and videos. In order to evaluate the role that Information and Communication Technologies have in the academic and daily life of the students considered in this study, we used two surveys, the first one at the beginning of this study, which consisted of a 5-level Likert type, and the second one, with short answers Yes or No, which covered the students' opinion from the experiences carried out to the function they attributed to the teacher in the classroom. The results indicate an average conceptual gain in learning, with a normalized Hake learning gain rate of 0.41 for some courses, also shows changes in collective work, visualized through the analysis of affinity and collaboration networks for learning. All of this revealed that technological resources facilitated the teaching-learning process for students with some kind of special educational need; and for those without, the task was made easier.
Collaboration and social-educational networks for the inclusion of vulnerable children^JUL 2018^EDUCATIO SIGLO XXI^None
Unions and social media: Prospects for gender inclusion^JUL 2018^GENDER WORK AND ORGANIZATION^The emergence of web 2.0 technologies led to optimistic predictions that social media (SM) might alter traditional gendered patterns of member participation in trade unions. Greene, Hogan, and Grieco and others suggested that the forms of communication and engagement these technologies offered to unions and their members had the potential to foster gender inclusion and contribute to union diversity, arguably central to effective representation. This article reports on a survey of union members' experiences with and perceptions of their union's SM services, to identify whether there is a gendered dimension to members' use. The findings indicate that for most union members regardless of gender, more traditional communication channels such as face-to-face contact and email remain the preferred means of communication. However, the findings also show that women are just as likely as men, if not more so, to engage with union SM. Given that historically, women largely participated less in union activities than their male counterparts, this broad parity of use by women supports the conclusion that SM has substantial potential to improve women's participation in unions.
Effectiveness of a social inclusion program in people with non-affective psychosis^JUN 7 2018^BMC PSYCHIATRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.666  </td>  <td>3.302</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Opening borders for inclusion: Ecology of Equity^JUN 2018^REVISTA DE EDUCACION INCLUSIVA^Starting from the concept of equity, which refers to an educational and social system governed by criteria that all people can accept from a position of equality, the article presents an analysis of the "Ecology of Equity" (Ainscow, Dyson, Goldrick and West, 2012) in order to reflect on the interactions that occur within schools, between schools and beyond schools. This panorama places education in a scenario where the local community takes on a leading role. In this way, it is affirmed that today's school is no longer an institution encapsulated in its gates, but an organization that reflects on the context in which it is immersed and that is ready with a firm step to open its borders. The conclusions point to a new conception of the school institution which prioritizes the elimination of barriers to the development of inclusion and the promotion of alliances outside the walls.
Resisting Rights to Renounce Imperialism: East African Churches' Strategic Symbolic Resistance to LGBTQ Inclusion^JUN 2018^INTERNATIONAL STUDIES QUARTERLY^When American Anglican and Lutheran churches elected to ordain same-sex partnered clergy, nearly all African counterparts either denounced LGBTQ inclusion or entirely dissociated from their bilateral partners. Why did these disagreements over domestic policies introduce transnational schisms, and what explains this variation? I argue that East African churches responded to bilateral partners' LGBTQ inclusion by adopting a strategy of symbolic resistance. They invoked domestic anticolonial sentiments to buttress their symbolic capital, relative to domestic religious competitors. Churches who relied least on US counterparts (financially or institutionally) fortified that resistance by dissociating entirely. All others maintained bilateral partnerships but publicly denounced LGBTQ inclusion. This research contributes insights about transnational norm diffusion. Beyond simply dismissing norms deemed incongruent with domestic ideals, actors in the global South capitalize on incongruence to gain domestic symbolic capital. Global rights movements thereby unwittingly incentivize domestic actors to mobilize a strategy of symbolic resistance that obstructs transnational agendas.
Assessing the effects of habitat patches ensuring propagule supply and different costs inclusion in marine spatial planning through multivariate analyses^MAY 15 2018^JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.865  </td>  <td>4.962</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Changes in Primary Care Health Care Utilization after Inclusion of Epidemiologic Data in Lumbar Spine MR Imaging Reports for Uncomplicated Low Back Pain^MAY 2018^RADIOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  7.608  </td>  <td>8.282</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Amber inclusions from New Zealand^APR 2018^GONDWANA RESEARCH^Terrestrial ecosystems of the long-isolated former Gondwanan landmass of New Zealand are hotspots of modern global biodiversity, based on the level of endemism and distinctiveness of the biota. However, little is known of the evolutionary history of the rarely preserved but diverse, distinctive, fragile, mainly soft-bodied organisms such as arthropods and fungi that comprise 95% of biodiversity in forest ecosystems. Our discovery of fossils preserved in Oligocene/Miocene amber of araucarian origin reveals a diverse invertebrate and fungal biota and complex ecological networks. These fossils comprise 10 orders and approximately 20 families of terrestrial arthropods and include representatives of Pseudoscorpiones, Acari, Araneae, Collembola, Hemiptera, Psocoptera, Hymenoptera, Coleoptera, Lepidoptera and Diptera, together with nematodes, mold fungi and araucarian wood. Ecologically the fossils encompass predators such as spiders with web remains, soil and bark mites, detritivores, parasites, fungivores and decomposers, fungi that grew on solidified resin flows, as well as predatory fungi. This study reports the first major amber deposit with an abundance of biological inclusions from the Southern Hemisphere and the only Cenozoic one of verified araucarian origin. These fossils expand the global record and evolutionary history of many arthropod and fungal groups, providing insights into mid-Cenozoic araucarian forest ecosystems and resolving controversial issues around the antecedents of the modem New Zealand terrestrial biota. (C) 2017 International Association for Gondwana Research. Published by Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
A look at the networking of Laboratoire International sur l'Inclusion Scolaire (LISIS): strengthening a collaborative culture for the mobilization of knowledge about inclusive education.^APR-JUN 2018^PROFESORADO-REVISTA DE CURRICULUM Y FORMACION DE PROFESORADO^Knowledge Mobilization on inclusive inclusive education is one of the main objectives of Laboratoire International sur l'Inclusion Scolaire (LISIS). This work presents the emerging process of this idea during the last six years of network operation. The laboratory is constituted as a network of researchers / trainers organized in ten research teams, from twenty-two higher education institutions from five countries, which accompany transformation processes towards inclusion through action research as a general strategy. This work presents, through a case study (which is the net) the preliminary results about mobilization of the knowledge as a research topic on inclusive education. These acquires a practical character in the construction of more inclusive schools when researchers / trainers adopt positions and collaborative roles, acquire responsibilities and take into account the contextual constraints. Likewise, the work presents, in the discussion of the results, a reflection about the factors of networking that stimulate the advance of the inclusion. Also about the challenges that collaborative and participative research poses in an international network.
The effect of stakeholder inclusion on public sector project innovation^MAR 2018^INTERNATIONAL REVIEW OF ADMINISTRATIVE SCIENCES^The delivery of public services in collaborative agency networks has given rise to an increasing use of projects in administering policy and service delivery. Projects are assumed to provide mechanisms by which flexibility can be achieved and innovative solutions produced. The aim of the article is to advance the understanding of collaboration between stakeholders and its effect on innovation. It analyses stakeholders' influence on the creation of project innovations in 275 European Union-funded projects by using content analyses and logistic regression analyses. The results show that projects can act as hubs where valuable information is produced but that few projects produce innovations. Project stakeholder network, knowledge dissemination and project influence, as well as sources of advice, play a role in predicting project innovations. The article concludes that the overly optimistic view of collaboration as a remedy for a lack of innovation in the public sector can be questioned. Points for practitioners The results of the article help practitioners to compose public sector development projects that foster innovation. The results suggest that it pays to include representatives of research and education facilities among project staff as their inclusion predicts the possibilities of achieving innovations. The empirical findings provide insight into project innovation and indicate which practices to avoid. It is suggested that when managed correctly, stakeholder inclusion has an effect on public sector project innovation.
Guidelines for Inclusion of Patient-Reported Outcomes in Clinical Trial Protocols The SPIRIT-PRO Extension^FEB 6 2018^JAMA-JOURNAL OF THE AMERICAN MEDICAL ASSOCIATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  51.273  </td>  <td>46.312</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A Security-Oriented Analysis of Web Inclusions in the Italian Public Administration^2018^CYBERNETICS AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES^Modern web sites serve content that browsers fetch automatically from a number of different web servers that may be placed anywhere in the world. Such content is essential for defining the appearance and behavior of a web site and is thus a potential target for attacks. Many public administrations offer services on the web, thus we have entered a world in which web sites of public interest are continuously and systematically depending on web servers that may be located anywhere in the world and are potentially under control of other governments. In this work we focus on these issues by investigating the content included by almost 10000 web sites of the Italian Public Administration. We analyse the nature of such content, its quantity, its geographical location, the amount of dynamic variations over time. Our analyses demonstrate that the perimeter of trust of the Italian Public Administration collectively includes countries that are well beyond the control of the Italian government and provides several insights useful for implementing a centralized monitoring service aimed at detecting anomalies.
Are You in, or Are You Out? Implications of Inclusion Criteria in Sexual Minority Health Disparities Research^2018^JOURNAL OF BISEXUALITY^Those who identify as lesbian, gay, or bisexual are found to be at a heightened risk for problematic health outcomes, including substance use. Sexual minority identities are concealable, multidimensional, exist on a continuum, and develop fluidly. Together, these factors are important predictors of health outcomes, yet they have been neglected in the process of sample identification in health disparity research. Inclusion criteria employed when identifying samples affects research findings and potentially biases results when crucial factors are neglected. Using the National Longitudinal Study of Adolescent to Adult (Add Health), the authors identified four samples of sexual minorities (i.e., broad self-identified, broad multidimensional, narrow self-identified, and narrow multidimensional) based on the continuum of self-identification and multidimensional factors and examined a trajectory of binge drinking predicted by various relevant factors. When the authors defined the samples using different inclusion criteria and examined the results across these samples, differences in the results emerged and fell into four main patterns: (1) sex differences, (2) differences in the average frequency and rate of change in binge drinking, (3) differences in statistical significance, and (4) Implications. Inclusion criteria alone had a significant impact on the health implications for lesbian, gay, and bisexual individuals in this study and thus should encourage cautious interpretation and application of research on sexual minority health by care professionals. The authors discuss research implications for these findings.
THE EXPERIENCES OF CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES AND PRIMARY CAREGIVERS ON THE SOCIAL INCLUSION OF CHILDREN WITH DISABILITIES IN ETHIOPIA^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF CHILD YOUTH &amp; FAMILY STUDIES^This article presents the findings of a qualitative study on the social inclusion of children with disabilities in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia and how this affects their achievement of valued life goals. The study is based on focus group discussions with children with disabilities and primary caregivers of such children. The thematic analysis is based on family quality of life and the capability approach, which are used to explain the effects of social inclusion (and exclusion) on children with disabilities and their families in three areas of quality of life: being, belonging, and becoming. The study also looked at how the social inclusion of children with disabilities can be actualised. The results of the study confirm the existence of considerable challenges to the social inclusion of children with disabilities in Addis Ababa, which is reflected in their capabilities. The results suggest that children with disabilities need assistance and support to achieve a good quality of life. They also indicate the need for the involvement of the wider community to support children with disabilities and their families to enhance the capability of such children, and so improve their family quality of life.
FocusLocus: ADHD Management Gaming System for Educational Achievement and Social Inclusion^2018^SMART BIOMEDICAL AND PHYSIOLOGICAL SENSOR TECHNOLOGY XV^Attention Deficit and Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) is associated with symptoms of inattention, hyperactivity, and impulsivity and affects a significant part of the population. Current treatment approaches entail high costs and are commonly based on stimulant medication, which may lead to undesirable side-effects. FocusLocus is an EU H2-2-Innovation Action project that proposes a highly disruptive and innovative gamified monitoring and intervention programme for assisting children to manage and overcome ADHD symptoms. FocusLocus implements game mechanics that rely on cognitive training methods for mental and motor skill acquisition and behavioural change. The proposed programme is delivered through a multifaceted and adaptive gaming experience that permeates the child's daily life and activities, spanning across virtual and physical space and comprising two modes: (a) a mobile tablet game for home use by individual users and (b) a multisensory mixed reality game for supervised sessions at specialised facilities (e.g., clinics). FocusLocus is designed to be highly personalised and adaptive to each child's individual condition, symptoms, age, and character. By introducing advanced remote monitoring and management features, FocusLocus actively involves all stakeholders associated with children with ADHD (parents, clinicians, and special needs educators). FocusLocus employs an unobtrusive and multimodal sensing, assessment and monitoring methodology relying on (a) mobile device embedded sensors, (b) Electroencephalography (EEG) neurofeedback mechanisms, (c) Augmented Reality (AR) user tracking, (d) RFID-based object tracking for tangible user interaction, (e) in-game cognitive skill performance measurements, (f) cloud performance analytics, and (g) web-based secure access for remote profile monitoring and management.
The Inclusion Measure for Community Evaluation and Detection in Unweighted Networks^2018^2018 IEEE/ACM INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON ADVANCES IN SOCIAL NETWORKS ANALYSIS AND MINING (ASONAM)^One of the most interesting problems in network analysis is community detection, i.e. the partitioning of nodes into communities, with many edges connecting nodes of the same community and comparatively few edges connecting nodes of different communities. We introduce a new quality measure to evaluate a partitioning of an undirected and unweighted graph into communities that is called inclusion. This quality measure evaluates how well each node is included in its community by considering both its existent and its non-existent edges. We have implemented a strategy that maximizes the inclusion criterion by moving each time a single node to another community. We also considered inclusion as a criterion for evaluating partitions provided by spectral clustering. In our experimental study, the inclusion criterion is compared to the widely used modularity criterion providing improved community detection results without requiring the a priori specification of the number of communities.
Advances in gerontology = Uspekhi gerontologii^2018^Advances in gerontology = Uspekhi gerontologii^None
E-inclusion or digital divide: an integrated model of digital inequality^2018^JOURNAL OF DOCUMENTATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.573  </td>  <td>1.601</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Interculturality and inclusion in Physical Education: educative innovation Erasmus in Schools^2018^RETOS-NUEVAS TENDENCIAS EN EDUCACION FISICA DEPORTE Y RECREACION^It is described the educative innovation proposal Erasmus in Schools, which took place during the Physical Education and Foreign Language: English, lessons, through a didactic unit of 12 sessions for two groups of 4rth grade of a Spanish Secondary School. The main goal was to improve the coexistence and to achieve the inclusion of the foreign students. To do so, the educative innovation was based on a type of distribution named 'inclusion', which includes the participation of other members of the educative community in the classes. Thus, students with the Erasmus+ scholarship and volunteers of the Erasmus Student Network association shared their cultural diversity and experiences with the local students. involving themselves to the teaching team during the lessons. The results show a growth of the participation and motivation of all the students during the Physical Education lessons. Furthermore, it was perceived a decrease of the conflicts related with the ethnic origin and gender of the students. The Erasmus students that participated in this experience felt themselves more included into the host society. It is concluded that the implementation of the educative innovation Erasmus in Schools fosters the inclusion of the foreign students during the Physical Education classes.
Expanding the Technology Acceptance Model with the Inclusion of Trust, Social Influence, and Health Valuation to Determine the Predictors of German Users' Willingness to Continue using a Fitness App: A Structural Equation Modeling Approach^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF HUMAN-COMPUTER INTERACTION^According to one market research, fitness or running apps are hugely popular in Germany. Such a trend prompts the question concerning the factors influencing German users' intention to continue using a specific fitness app. To address the research question, the expanded Technology Acceptance Model (with the addition of trust, social influence, and health valuation) was tested with 476 German users of fitness apps. Structural equation modeling results reveal that respondents' intention to continue using a specific fitness app is predicated on three factors, namely perceived ease of use, perceived usefulness, and injunctive social norm. Trust in the app developer and descriptive social norm do not have statistically significant effects on repeat usage intention, but they (alongside perceived ease of use and descriptive social norm) both influence users' perception of a fitness app's usefulness. Furthermore, ease of use and both injunctive and descriptive social norms significantly contribute to users' trust in a fitness app developer.
FINANCIAL INCLUSION IN THE CONTEXT OF INSURANCE SERVICES^2018^FINANCIAL AND CREDIT ACTIVITY-PROBLEMS OF THEORY AND PRACTICE^None
SPECIAL EDUCATION IN FIRST CHILDHOOD: A TEACHER'S PERSPECTIVE ON THE INCLUSION OF DEAF CHILDREN^JAN-JUN 2018^PERSPECTIVAS EM DIALOGO-REVISTA DE EDUCACAO E SOCIEDADE^The National Policy on Special Education in the Perspective of Inclusive Education aims to access, participation and learning of students with disabilities in regular schools, aggregate subjects respecting their differences, cultures and historicity, being a modality that permeates all levels and stages, is also present in Early Childhood Education. The purpose of this study was to investigate the perspective of teachers regarding the care offered to infants and children deaf in the Early Childhood Education Centers (CEIs). For this purpose, a questionnaire on the subject was developed for 30 teachers, CEI employees of the municipal network of the Municipality of Sao Paulo, 30 women, aged between 21 and 50 years, from the Butanta region. The results of this research showed the opinion and concern of these teachers in relation to inclusion, the importance of their participation in the construction of a quality education, and their insecurity regarding their formation for an action that optimizes the potentialities of all subjects.
The Gender Dimension of the Inclusion: The Case of the Western Siberian Universities^2018^PSIKHOLOGICHESKAYA NAUKA I OBRAZOVANIE-PSYCHOLOGICAL SCIENCE AND EDUCATION^The paper focuses on the attitude of university staff towards students with disabilities and on the readiness for inclusive higher education in members of the academic staff. It is stressed that one of the main tasks of the resource and training centers network is to help overcome such powerful barriers as social stereotypes and incompetence in inclusive education and to assist university teachers in establishing contacts and interaction with students with disabilities. The paper presents a study that involved 2181 university teachers from 10 universities of the Tyumen region. The study had two objectives: first, to explore the attitude of the academic staff of the universities to students with disabilities and the former's readiness for inclusive education; secondly, to reveal gender differences in relation to inclusion. The main outcomes of the study are as follows. Women working in higher education are more positive towards inclusive education and its prospects, more tolerant and sympathetic to persons with disabilities. They are more focused on active inclusive behavior, on acquiring new knowledge and skills, and on rendering extensive support to students with disabilities. They value their own skills and competencies in inclusive teaching and collaboration highly enough. The paper concludes that women working at the universities of the Tyumen regions are an important resource for achieving the goals of resource training centers in the field of inclusive higher education.
Digital inclusion and online behaviour: five typologies of Australian internet users^2018^BEHAVIOUR &amp; INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY^Digital inclusion is no longer limited to issues of access (e.g. infrastructure, speed, and cost); these are simply components in a much broader and more complex conceptualisation of what it means to be included. This shift has seen many researchers turn their attention towards the different ways in which people are using the internet. The aim of the current study was to measure how Australians use the internet by employing a nuanced approach to measuring online behavioural preferences. Telephone interviews were conducted with 1584 respondents to measure online behavioural preferences, internet attitudes, digital self-efficacy, and access. Analyses confirmed five profiles of internet users: labelled Non-Users', Sporadic Users', Social Media &amp; Entertainment Users', Instrumental Users', and Advanced Users'. Each group differed significantly on key demographic and (more importantly) non-demographic internet characteristics. These findings provide useful learnings for tailoring digital inclusion programmes to the needs of specific user groups.
Sharing Care Responsibilities Between Professionals and Personal Networks in Mental Healthcare: A Plea for Inclusion^2018^ETHICS &amp; SOCIAL WELFARE^This positional paper explores the role of personal networks (family and friends) in caring for people with mental health problems. Since the eighties, major changes have been made in the organization and focus of professional mental healthcare. Correspondingly, new expectations and changes in the division of care responsibilities between people with mental health problems, their personal networks and their professional care providers were created. In this paper, I investigate how the transition in mental healthcare changed the allocation of care responsibilities between personal networks, people with mental health problems and professional caregivers. I will consider why care responsibilities of personal networks have been taken for granted in these processes, and discuss whether personal networks should have a more prominent voice in the assignment of care responsibilities, and how this can be done. A theoretical framework of feminist care ethics inspired by scholars such as Margaret Urban Walker, Joan Tronto and Hilde Lindemann is used to reflect on the need for social inclusion.
Inclusion/Exclusion as the Missing Link. A Luhmannian Analysis of Loneliness Among Older People^JAN-FEB 2018^SYSTEMS RESEARCH AND BEHAVIORAL SCIENCE^This article contributes to the interdisciplinary study of loneliness among older people with some insights based on Luhmann's systems theory. We argue that loneliness is a consequence of the way society includes/excludes people. In contrast to traditional societies, modern society forces people to act as individuals. In order to prevent loneliness, individuals themselves must search for membership in functionally diffuse collectivities (couple relations, friendships, communities). Luhmann's theory provides the framework to integrate the findings of empirical research. We claim that older people are more prone to loneliness for three reasons: first, after retirement they lose their performance role, which limits access to informal communities. Second, because they suffer from illness, impairment and a lack of resources more often than younger people, their access to functionally diffuse collectivities is impeded. Finally, because of structural and semantic changes in the family system, older people often find themselves at the margins of families. Copyright (c) 2016 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Ltd.
Gold deposits associated with the gabbroic rocks at Tirek area, western Hoggar, Algeria: fluid inclusion study^JAN 2018^ARABIAN JOURNAL OF GEOSCIENCES^The Tirek gold deposit hosted in the Archean shield is one of the richest sources of mined gold for Algeria. The deposit is controlled by the East Ouzzal shear zone (EOSZ), a transcurrent N-S lithospheric fault. The EOSZ is a late Pan-African dextral-ductile shear zone separating two contrasting Precambrian domains: the Archean In Ouzzal block to the west (Orthogenesis with subordinate metasediments reworked and granulitized during the ca. 2 Ga Eburnean event) and a middle Proterozoic block to the east involved in the ca. 600 Ma Pan-African event. The auriferous quartz veins are mainly oriented in two directions, N-S veins hosted in mylonitic rocks and NE-SW veins hosted in gabbroic or gneissic bands. The NE-SW veins contain the richest ore. Gold ore is found in a system of veins and lenticular quartz veinlets arranged in anastomosing networks. The hydrothermal alteration associated with these veins is characteristically a carbonate-sericite-albite-pyrite assemblage. Gold is the main metal of economic importance; it is disseminated in the quartz as grains or fibers along microcracks and as microscopic grains in the host rocks. Microthermometric results and Raman laser data from fluid inclusions demonstrate that the ore-forming fluids contained H2O-CO2 +/- CH4 and were low salinity. Homogenization temperatures are commonly 250-310 degrees C. In the Tirek deposit, the role of the shear zone that hosts the mineralization was to drain the hydrothermal fluid. Interactions between the fluid and the mafic host rocks and CO2 also contributed to the formation of the hydrothermal gold deposit at Tirek.
Cannibalizing the Informal Economy: Frugal Innovation and Economic Inclusion in Africa^JAN 2018^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT RESEARCH^This paper argues that, far from collaborating with informal economic systems and actors, frugal innovation tends to treat informal economies as a pool of workers and organizational resources to be tapped for the benefit of corporate actors. I will examine how frugal innovation models selectively transform informal economic and institutional systems around formal economic interests, reconfiguring informal opportunities and the distribution of gains in ways that promote adverse incorporation of informal actors rather than mutual benefit. I will examine four mechanisms of adverse incorporation operating within frugal innovation models: copying, free-riding, bypassing nodes of accumulation and shifting risk. Drawing on case studies of M-Pesa and micro-insurance, I will illustrate the often selective and disempowering effects of frugal innovation, which operate to reconfigure informal economic systems in ways that divert profits and control away from informal operators.
Jack'd, a Mobile Social Networking Application: A Site of Exclusion Within a Site of Inclusion^2018^JOURNAL OF HOMOSEXUALITY^User-generated smartphone applications have created a new level of virtual connectivity for gay males, one in which users can create profiles and meet other users as nearby or as far away as possible. For those within close proximity, the other users can be considered their "virtual neighbors." Although the applications are theoretically designed to be places of inclusion and not exclusion, where any gay male with economic means can download an application, many profiles have been created that exclude other users. Through an examination of profiles on one such application, Jack'd, exclusion is found in the way users celebrate and reinforce ideas of traditional masculinity and denigrate and reinforce stereotypic ideas of femininity embodied by some gay men. Jack'd, and other user-generated smartphone applications, can be read as virtual neighborhoods where one is excluded based on their gender performance.
Principals' moral purpose in the context of LGBT inclusion^2018^JOURNAL OF PROFESSIONAL CAPITAL AND COMMUNITY^None
Digital Inclusion Through the Insertion of Acessibility in the NetAnimations Online Repository^JAN 2018^IEEE LATIN AMERICA TRANSACTIONS^The use of new technologies in the teaching-learning process has become a challenge to teachers. Besides that, disciplines such as Computer Networks have complex concepts to be explained and understood. Therefore, teachers need to find new methods to foment the interest of the students. The Department of Informatics at the State University of Maringa hosts the NetAnimations repository that has animations focused in Computer Networks. However, the developed animations did not provide accessibility for visually impaired could use them to learn. Despite that, all students have the right to access didactic materials equally. This work aims to insert audiovisual accessibility in the NetAnimations repository and to provide better conditions for those who are visually impaired. The main contributions are the insertion of accessibility in the repository and the inclusion of audio description in the animations. The evaluations carried out showed that improvements have been made in the usability and in the quality of user experience with and without visual impairment.
Nihon Ronen Igakkai zasshi. Japanese journal of geriatrics^2018^Nihon Ronen Igakkai zasshi. Japanese journal of geriatrics^None
The Guide to Community Preventive Services and Disability Inclusion^DEC 2017^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PREVENTIVE MEDICINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.435  </td>  <td>5.307</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Social inclusion and relationship satisfaction of patients with a severe mental illness^DEC 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL PSYCHIATRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.37  </td>  <td>1.778</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Enhancing the Economic Value of Large Investments in Sustainable Drainage Systems (SuDS) through Inclusion of Ecosystems Services Benefits^NOV 2017^WATER^Although Sustainable Drainage Systems (SuDS) are used in cities across the world as effective flood adaptation responses, their economic viability has frequently been questioned. Inclusion of the monetary value of ecosystem services (ES) provided by SuDS can increase the rate of return on investments made. Hence, this paper aims at reviewing the enhancement of the economic value of large-scale investments in SuDS through inclusion of ecosystem services. This study focuses on the flood reduction capacity and the ES benefits of green roofs and rain barrels in the combined sewerage network of Montevideo Municipality in Uruguay. The methodology comprises a cost-benefit analysiswith and without monetised ES provided by SuDSof two drainage network configurations comprising: (i) SuDS; and (ii) SuDS and detention storage. The optimal drainage design for both these drainage configurations have been determined using SWMM-EA, a tool which uses multi-objective optimisation based evolutionary algorithm (EA) and the storm water management model (SWMM). In both design configurations, total benefits comprising both flood reduction and ES benefits are always higher than their costs. The use of storage along with SuDS provides greater benefits with a larger reduction in flooding, and thus is more cost-effective than using SuDS alone. The results show that, for both of the drainage configurations, the larger investments are not beneficial unless ES benefits are taken into account. Hence, it can be concluded that the inclusion of ES benefits is necessary to justify large-scale investments in SuDS.
EVALUATION OF LEARNING AND SCHOOL INCLUSION: A PROCESS OF EXCLUSION OR AN ACT OF LOVE^NOV 2017^REVISTA ON LINE DE POLITICA E GESTAO EDUCACIONAL^Much has been written and spoken about the school inclusion of students with special educational needs in the regular school network. However, registration alone is not sufficient to include if there are no effective learning and assessment conditions, so that the differences are respected and worked out. The present study aims to study and analyze the different forms of evaluation from a theoretical point of view and how it can contribute to the success of school inclusion. We will present the historical course on the types of evaluation, a brief reflection on the inclusion and the role of the teacher in this process and we point out the role of evaluation in the effectiveness of school inclusion. Based on the principles that education is the basis for the development of the citizen and that school inclusion is a right, and based on the assumptions of the historical-critical conception, we highlight the contribution of evaluation in this process. However, if the student needs are not met and the evaluation points out the limitations, not the possibilities, the inclusion process can not actually take place. The discussions here show that, gradually and interactively, inclusion is taking place, although there is still a long way to go.
Recent Evidence on the Inclusion of Hospice and Palliative Care Physicians in Medicare Shared Savings Program Accountable Care Organization Networks^MAR 2018^JOURNAL OF PALLIATIVE MEDICINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.477  </td>  <td>2.806</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
INCLUSION OF COMPARATOR SINGLE ARM TRIALS USED FOR EMA/FDA REGISTRATION IN THE NETWORK META-ANALYSIS USING MATCHING ADJUSTED INDIRECT COMPARISONS^OCT-NOV 2017^VALUE IN HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.037  </td>  <td>6.131</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Digital Participation through Mobile Internet Banking and Its Impact on Financial Inclusion: A Study of Jan Dhan Yojana^OCT-DEC 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION IN THE DIGITAL AGE^Prime Minister of India Mr. Narendra Modi launched a national government project called "Jan Dhan Yojana", with the aim of providing banking opportunity and insurance coverage to all the citizens of India including the under privileged section who until now did not open bank accounts or personal insurance. The aim of this project is to attract those people with low incomes, who lack knowledge, who feel they do not need banking service or do not have funds to open an account. The present study attempts to examine the Indian Financial Inclusion in the context of Individual participation, through the case of Pradhan Mantri Jan Dhan Yojana. The paper aims to understand the consumer participation and non-participation and its implications as a financial inclusion strategy. The paper evaluates the impact of digital divide on digital participation of the consumers in the context of internet and mobile banking service users.
The inclusion of biodiversity in environmental impact assessment: Policy-related progress limited by gaps and semantic confusion^SEP 15 2017^JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT^Natural habitat loss and fragmentation, as a result of development projects, are major causes of biodiversity erosion. Environmental impact assessment (EIA) is the most commonly used site-specific planning tool that takes into account the effects of development projects on biodiversity by integrating potential impacts into the mitigation hierarchy of avoidance, reduction, and offset measures. However, the extent to which EIA fully address the identification of impacts and conservation stakes associated with biodiversity loss has been criticized in recent work. In this paper we examine the extent to which biodiversity criteria have been integrated into 42 EIA from 2006 to 2016 for small development projects in the Montpellier Metropolitan territory in southern France. This study system allowed us to question how EIA integrates biodiversity impacts on a scale relevant to land-use planning. We examine how biodiversity inclusion has changed over time in relation to new policy for EIA and how the mitigation hierarchy is implemented in practice and in comparison with national guidelines. We demonstrate that the inclusion of biodiversity features into EIA has increased significantly in relation to policy change. Several weaknesses nevertheless persist, including the continued absence of substitution solution assessment, a correct analysis of cumulative impacts, the evaluation of impacts on common species, the inclusion of an ecological network scale, and the lack of monitoring and evaluation measures. We also show that measures for mitigation hierarchy are primarily associated with the reduction of impacts rather than their avoidance, and avoidance and offset measures are often misleadingly proposed in EIA. There is in fact marked semantic confusion between avoidance, reduction and offset measures that may impair stakeholders' understanding. All in all, reconsideration of stakeholders routine practices associated with a more strategic approach towards impact anticipation and avoidance at a land-use planning scale is now necessary for the mitigation hierarchy to become a clear and practical hierarchy for "no net loss" objectives based on conservation priorities. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
A fluid inclusion study of blueschist-facies lithologies from the Indus suture zone, Ladakh (India): Implications for the exhumation of the subduction related Sapi-Shergol ophiolitic melange^SEP 15 2017^JOURNAL OF ASIAN EARTH SCIENCES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.762  </td>  <td>3.456</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Applying a critical approach to investigate barriers to digital inclusion and online social networking among young people with disabilities^SEP 2017^INFORMATION SYSTEMS JOURNAL^Despite the seeming ubiquity of young people's Internet use, there are still many for whom access to the Internet and online social networking remains inequitable and patterned by disadvantage. The connection between information technology and young people with disabilities is particularly under-researched. This article contributes to the field of critical information systems research by exposing significant barriers and facilitators to Internet accessibility for young people with disabilities. It uses Bourdieu's critical theory to explore how the unequal distribution of resources shapes processes of digital inclusion for young people with disabilities. It highlights access needs and experiences that are both disability and non-disability related. The article draws on interviews in South Australia with 18 young people aged 10-18years with a physical disability (such as cerebral palsy) or acquired brain injury and with 17 of their family members. Interviews evaluated participants' and parents' reflections on the benefits of a home-based, goal-oriented intervention to increase the young person's Internet use for social participation purposes. The Bourdieuian analysis demonstrated how varying levels of accrued individual and family offline capital resources are related to digital/online resources and disability-specific online resources. This revealed how unequal resources of capital can influence technology use and hence digital inclusion for young people with disabilities. Our study demonstrates that young people with particular types of disabilities require intensive, personalised and long-term support from within and beyond the family to get online'. We conclude that Internet studies need to more frequently adopt critical approaches to investigate the needs of users and barriers to information technology use within sub-groups, such as young people with disabilities. (c) 2016 John Wiley &amp; Sons Ltd
Origin of the saline paleofluids in fault-damage zones of the Jabal Qusaybah Anticline (Adam Foothills, Oman): Constraints from fluid inclusions geochemistry^SEP 2017^MARINE AND PETROLEUM GEOLOGY^The Jabal Qusaybah Anticline, in north Oman, is affected by syn-folding strike-slip and extensional fault zones developed during foreland deformation ahead of the Northern Oman Mountains thrust wedge, in Cenozoic times. Migration of fluids in fault-damage zones is recorded in complex calcite vein networks. By employing the microthermometric and compositional microanalysis of the fluid inclusions (crush leach), two distinct generations of veins have been studied. The aim was to determine the source of elevated salinity in fluids involved in their cementation and explain their compositional evolution through fluid-rock interactions. The ionic ratios (Na/Br and Cl/Br) obtained from crush-leach analysis give supporting evidence that the elevated salinity of fluid inclusions in both vein groups originated from an evaporated seawater beyond the onset of halite precipitation (residual brines). The results reveal a gradual increase in salinity of the fluids, NCI molar ratios, as well as Li/C1 molar ratios. These results imply the progressively increasing contribution of evaporitic residual brines and fluids that interacted with, or were derived from siliciclastic rocks. We suggest that the most likely origin of the former fluids is provided by residual brines associated with precipitation of the Ara evaporites (Cambrian). The regional driving mechanism for such a significant fluid migration is believed to be compaction-driven upward flow that was channeled into faults and fractures during major deformational events. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
From Social Exclusion to Supported Inclusion: Adults with Intellectual Disability Discuss Their Lived Experiences of a Structured Social Group^SEP 2017^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Designing interaction, voice, and inclusion in AAC research^SEP 2017^AUGMENTATIVE AND ALTERNATIVE COMMUNICATION^The ISAAC 2016 Research Symposium included a Design Stream that examined timely issues across augmentative and alternative communication (AAC), framed in terms of designing interaction, designing voice, and designing inclusion. Each is a complex term with multiple meanings; together they represent challenging yet important frontiers of AAC research. The Design Stream was conceived by the four authors, researchers who have been exploring AAC and disability-related design throughout their careers, brought together by a shared conviction that designing for communication implies more than ensuring access to words and utterances. Each of these presenters came to AAC from a different background: interaction design, inclusive design, speech science, and social science. The resulting discussion among 24 symposium participants included controversies about the role of technology, tensions about independence and interdependence, and a provocation about taste. The paper concludes by proposing new directions for AAC research: (a) new interdisciplinary research could combine scientific and design research methods, as distant yet complementary as microanalysis and interaction design, (b) new research tools could seed accessible and engaging contextual research into voice within a social model of disability, and (c) new open research networks could support inclusive, international and interdisciplinary research.
A National Early Intervention System as a Strategy to Promote Inclusion and Academic Achievement in Portugal^JUL 5 2017^FRONTIERS IN PSYCHOLOGY^Early intervention with children at risk or facing developmental problems is a practice defined by three fundamental characteristics: being family-centered, being based on the community and on the child's life context, and being conducted by a team with transdisciplinary practice. In this paper we wish to present how the SNIPI-National System of Early Intervention, implemented in Portugal over the past 15 years, contributes to promote maximum development and the full inclusion of children up to 6 years of age and works to prevent school failure. The SNIPI covers the entire territory and intends to respond to the needs of children with developmental disorders or those in at risk situations. This community-based early intervention model is linked to the health, education and social care systems, involving the three responsible Ministries. In the present community case study, we present the implementation of this program in the Alentejo region, involving 31 local teams and almost 2500 children. Through the regional structure's reports and the responses of parents and professionals in impact studies, we demonstrate how the system is established and how it tackles school failure and improves the educational inclusion of these children. The impact of this Early Intervention model has been significant not only on children's developmental outcomes, but also for the health, education and social care professionals who work in a transdisciplinary perspective, as well as for the families who became more skilled at evaluating the children's needs and the support provided. This approach to implementing a family-centered Early Intervention program can contribute to full inclusion. It facilitates the transition to schooling based on a non-discriminatory approach and educational achievement by aiding development and an adapted contextualization in pre-school education. This program system introduces significant innovation within the framework of existing educational policies that promote development and inclusion, and has therefore earned the interest of the scientific community and policy-makers alike. It has been possible to implement some of principles already studied but it had never been tested. The Early Intervention program in Alentejo, as part of the SNIPI, can be an example of good practices, with its own characteristics that allowed to create a network of integrated and comprehensive responses to the needs of the population in this region.
Networks collaboration between English schools to improve socio-educational inclusion^JUL 2017^PROFESORADO-REVISTA DE CURRICULUM Y FORMACION DE PROFESORADO^The aim of this paper is to review how schools can overcome barriers to be more inclusive. Further this work examines ways in which schools in the same geographical area can use networks of collaboration to achieve student diversity. Case studies from three English schools which have already established networks with other schools are presented. Data has been collected by interviewing, leadership teams, teachers, administrative staff and researchers. This data has been analyzed using Atlas. ti 7 software. The findings indicate that schools need, among other things: a) to have a political support to develop inclusion inside and outside of the classrooms, b) to create networks with neighbouring schools for sharing experiences and resources and c) to open their gates to the local community for a better use of social capital.
Rank-based voting with inclusion relationship for accurate image search^JUN 2017^VISUAL COMPUTER^We present a rank-based voting technique utilizing inclusion relationship for high-quality image search. Since images can have multiple regions of interest, we extract representative object regions using a state-of-the-art region proposal method tailored for our search problem. We then extract CNN features locally from those representative regions and identify inclusion relationship between those regions. To identify similar images given a query, we propose a novel similarity measure based on representative regions and their inclusion relationship. Our similarity measure gives a high score to a pair of images that contain similar object regions with similar spatial arrangement. To verify benefits of our method, we test our method in three standard benchmarks and compare it against the state-of-the-art image search methods using CNN features. Our experiment results demonstrate effectiveness and robustness of the proposed algorithm.
Social inclusion of individuals with intellectual disabilities in the military^JUN 2017^RESEARCH IN DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.872  </td>  <td>2.376</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of the Support and Attention to Diversity Teacher (SADT) from a community-based perspective: Promoting educational success and educational inclusion for all^MAY 2017^TEACHING AND TEACHER EDUCATION^This article addresses the transformation of the role of the Support and Attention to Diversity Teacher (SADT), traditionally called special education faculty. The results are from a qualitative study in three inclusive preschool and elementary schools in Catalonia, Spain. The results demonstrate a transformation in the role of the SADT that mobilizes teachers, specialists and diverse agents in the community to join the work of educational support. The transformation of the SADT role fosters an improvement in the attention and learning of children in the classroom, and existing resources are optimized in collaboration with the entire educative community. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Municipal territorial services: From "integration" to "inclusion"^APR-JUN 2017^QUESTION^This report analyzes the different senses that are built around the Municipal Territorial Services of the city of Olavarria, as well as the various valuations attributed to those social groups that effectively have unequal access to urban collective consumption. Municipal Territorial Services will be considered as State provisions designed to meet the demands of marginalized groups regarding these consumptions. This brings into play multiple meanings linked in a restricted sense to access to urban services (public lighting, asphalt, gas, sewage network, etc.) and in a broad sense the right to live the city. That is to say, in legal-juridical level, the equality of rights is raised in a universal way and the State is conceived like guarantor of those rights. However, at other levels, a structural inequality of the capitalist system becomes visible, which produces tension with what is legally postulated. In this way it will be tried to visualize these wefts at local level taking into account the peculiarities of the city of Olavarria and taking into account the time frame in which the field work in question was carried out.
The Case of Crowdfunding in Financial Inclusion: A Survey^MAR 2017^STRATEGIC CHANGE-BRIEFINGS IN ENTREPRENEURIAL FINANCE^Crowdfunding can contribute to financial inclusion through various models including donation-based, reward-based, lending-based, and equity-based crowdfunding.
The role of cross-group friendship and emotions in adolescents' attitudes towards inclusion^MAR 2017^RESEARCH IN DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.872  </td>  <td>2.376</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Leveraging the EHR4CR platform to support patient inclusion in academic studies: challenges and lessons learned^FEB 28 2017^BMC MEDICAL RESEARCH METHODOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.509  </td>  <td>4.95</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Using sociometric techniques to assess the social impacts of inclusion: Some methodological considerations^FEB 2017^EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH REVIEW^In recent years, sociometric techniques have been increasingly used to assess friendship development in children with special educational needs integrated in regular educational settings. In this paper, the findings produced by different techniques are contrasted with a view to examining whether the variable findings reported can be attributed to the technique employed. The analysis revealed that peer nominations have been used to determine pupils ' social status and have overwhelmingly produced negative results. Peer ratings have been used to ascertain the level of acceptance pupils enjoy within their class network and have also produced negative results. Social Cognitive Mapping has been used to obtain information about the nature of social networks and the relations among peers and has produced mixed to positive results. As such, Social Cognitive Mapping could be viewed as a more robust approach that addresses more thoroughly the complexities of young children ' s social relations than the other two classic sociometric techniques. The paper concludes with highlighting methodological challenges surrounding the application of sociometric techniques and advocates their embedding within innovative multi-method research designs. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Immigrant entrepreneurship in Canada: sites for cultural preservation, inclusion, and community development^2017^JOURNAL OF MULTICULTURAL DISCOURSES^In this paper we investigate the social dimensions of immigrant entrepreneurship within the context of normative discourses produced by Canada's official Multiculturalism Platform. Using the extended case method approach, we explored how 12 ethno-cultural minorities in the Windsor-Essex region of southwestern Ontario mobilized business activities to produce valuable interactions with local, national, and international networks that expanded their possibilities for recognition and equal rights in the social, cultural, and political spheres of Canadian society. Informed by the theoretical work of Michael Foucault, through our data analysis we identified the central significance of business formation as sites and mediums for cultural preservation, inclusion, and community development. These findings inform our discussion of the potential and limitations of entrepreneurship for ethno-cultural minorities' civic engagement in Canadian society.
The digital revolution in financial inclusion: international development in the fintech era^2017^NEW POLITICAL ECONOMY^This paper examines the growing importance of digital-based financial inclusion as a form of organising development interventions through networks of state institutions, international development organisations, philanthropic investment and fintech companies. The fintech-philanthropy-development complex generates digital ecosystems that map, expand and monetise digital footprints. Its know thy (irrational) customer' vision combines behavioural economics with predictive algorithms to accelerate access to, and monitor engagement with, finance. The digital revolution adds new layers to the material cultures of financial(ised) inclusion, offering the state new ways of expanding the inclusion of the legible', and global finance new forms of profiling' poor households into generators of financial assets.
EXPERIENCES OF CONTINUING TEACHERS EDUCATION: POSSIBILITIES FOR EFFECTIVE INCLUSION OF STUDENTS WITH INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^JAN-JUN 2017^PERIFERIA^This text discusses the ongoing formation of teachers in response to the demands placed by the current policies of school inclusion directed to people with disabilities, in particular, with intellectual disabilities. To do so, it takes as reference the qualitative analysis of a Continuing Education Program by the Observatory Research Group on Special Education and Educational Inclusion (ObEE / UFRRJ), held in 2015. The research was attended by 120 teachers from seven networks Municipalities of Baixada Fluminense / RJ. The results, analyzed from the historical-cultural perspective, showed that, despite the existence of federal guidelines favorable to a more inclusive education policy, municipal networks have implemented actions and formation programs that are very diverse among them. Another aspect concerns the importance of continuous training that enables the active participation of teachers in the construction of pedagogical proposals, as well as the need to expand articulated actions between the University and Basic Education.
A Joint Sparse Recovery Framework for Accurate Reconstruction of Inclusions in Elastic Media^2017^SIAM JOURNAL ON IMAGING SCIENCES^A robust algorithm is proposed to reconstruct the spatial support and the Lame parameters of multiple inclusions in a homogeneous background elastic material using a few measurements of the displacement field over a finite collection of boundary points. The algorithm does not require any linearization or iterative update of Green's function but still allows very accurate reconstruction. The breakthrough comes from a novel interpretation of Lippmann Schwinger type integral representation of the displacement field in terms of unknown densities having common sparse support on the location of inclusions. Accordingly, the proposed algorithm consists of a two-step approach. First, the localization problem is recast as a joint sparse recovery problem that renders the densities and the inclusion support simultaneously. Then, a noise robust constrained optimization problem is formulated for the reconstruction of elastic parameters. An efficient algorithm is designed for numerical implementation using the Multiple Sparse Bayesian Learning (M-SBL) for joint sparse recovery problem and the Constrained Split Augmented Lagrangian Shrinkage Algorithm (C-SALSA) for the constrained optimization problem. The efficacy of the proposed framework is manifested through extensive numerical simulations. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first algorithm tailored for parameter reconstruction problems in elastic media using highly under-sampled data in the sense of Nyquist rate.
SOCIAL NETWORKS: THE USE OF ASSISTIVE TECHNOLOGY TO PROMOTE INCLUSION AND CITIZENSHIP^JAN-JUN 2017^PERIFERIA^The aim of this article is to update the study we have been developing over the past three years, focusing on accessibility, citizenship, communication and journalism, using social networks as the public sphere for research development. We make use of some previous studies developed on this matter, recognizing the advances, even though still incipient, in making social networks more user-friendly spaces for people with disabilities and analyzing the extent to which online networks are strong or weak links in the organization and struggle practices of these collectives for citizenship rights. We dialogue with approaches from Boaventura de Sousa Santos (2013), Ferreira and Viser (2007), Sousa (2013, 2015, 2016). Having citizenship and accessibility as its background, this study recognizes social networks as relevant environment on which individuals or groups of people with disabilities can be introduced, as they are increasingly using network via smartphones and personal computers to interact and socialize, aiming to become visible in a still excluding society. Finally, it emphasizes the relevance of doing a thorough research on this matter enhancing knowledge on present and future perspectives.
INCLUSION OF MANNER OF ARTICULATION TO ACHIEVE IMPROVED PHONEME CLASSIFICATION ACCURACY FOR BENGALI CONTINUOUS SPEECH^2017^2017 20TH CONFERENCE OF THE ORIENTAL CHAPTER OF THE INTERNATIONAL COORDINATING COMMITTEE ON SPEECH DATABASES AND SPEECH I/O SYSTEMS AND ASSESSMENT (O-COCOSDA)^In this experiment, a phoneme classification model has been developed using a Deep Neural Network based framework. The experiment is conducted in two phases. In the first phase, phoneme classification task has been performed. The deep-structured model provided good overall classification accuracy of 87.8%. All the phonemes are classified with precision and recall values. A confusion matrix of all the Bengali phonemes is derived. Using the confusion matrix, the phonemes are classified into nine groups. These nine groups provided better overall classification accuracy of 98.7%, and a new confusion matrix is derived for this nine groups. A lower confusion rate is observed this time. In the second phase of the experiment, the nine groups are reclassified into 15 groups using the manner of articulation based knowledge and the deep-structured model is retrained. The system provided 98.9% of overall classification accuracy this time. This result is almost equal to the overall accuracy which was observed for nine groups. But as the nine groups are redivided into 15 groups, the phoneme confusion in a single group became less which leads to a better phoneme classification model.
TSETANES NAAL AND NEVO TIIJA - A NEW EDUCATIONAL MODEL FOR PROMOTING SOCIAL INCLUSION OF THE FINNISH ROMA^2017^10TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI2017)^None
City margins as spaces of becoming: inclusions, exclusions and intersections in Milan's contemporary urban territory^2017^JOURNAL OF CONTEMPORARY EUROPEAN STUDIES^This article looks at how the Milanese margins are being re-written. It adopts three different perspectives. First, it explores how these have been shaped by economic and social changes; second, how these have been affected by shifts in the spaces or materials that are included in, or excluded from the city and its urban territory; and third, it explores their contemporary connotations by focusing on the notions of porosity and permeability. With the atomisation of the contemporary city, the margin becomes an autonomous entity and often coincides with the fragment, a single object or surface and is characterised by mobility. When taken together, the fragments form a porous spatial network that connect and enliven the individual fragments; a series of margins constantly intersecting and mirroring the heterogeneity of the contemporary spatial condition.
Visualizing the Impacts of Movement Infrastructures on Social Inclusion: Graph-Based Methods for Observing Community Formations in Contrasting Geographic Contexts^2017^SOCIAL INCLUSION^In this article we describe some innovative methods for observing the possible impacts of roads, junctions and pathways (movement infrastructures), on community life in terms of their affordances and hindrances for social connectivity. In seeking to observe these impacts, we combined a range of visualization research methods, based on qualitative points-data mapping, graphic representation and urban morphological analysis at local and global geographic scales. Our overall aim in this study was to develop exploratory methods for combining and visualizing various kinds of data that relate to urban community formations in contrasting urban contexts. We focused our enquiry on the perspectives of adolescents in two urban contexts: Liverpool, UK, and Medellin, Colombia. While they contrast in their geo-political and cultural characteristics, these two cities each present polarized socio-economic inequalities across distinctive spatial patterns. We found that adolescents in these cities offer generally localized, pedestrian perspectives of their local areas, and unique insights into the opportunities and challenges for place-making in their local community spaces. We gathered the communities' local perspectives through map-making workshops, in which participants used given iconographic symbols to select and weight the social and structural assets that they deemed to be significant features of their community spaces. We then sampled and visualized these selective points data to observe ways in which local community assets relate to infrastructural affordances for movement (in terms of network integration). This analysis was based on the theory and method of Space Syntax, which provides a model of affordances for movement across the urban network over various scales of network configuration. In particular, we sought to determine how city-scale movement infrastructures interact with local-scale infrastructures, and to develop methods for observing ways in which these interactions have positive or negative consequences for community formations.
ICT learning for digital inclusion. Women as weavers of social networks^2017^BORDON-REVISTA DE PEDAGOGIA^None
Muslims' social inclusion and exclusion in France, Quebec, and Canada: does national context matter?^2017^JOURNAL OF ETHNIC AND MIGRATION STUDIES^This article compares the social experiences of Muslim minorities in three contexts - France, Quebec, and English Canada -each reflecting a different approach to immigrant integration. France's republican model emphasises cultural assimilation and the exclusion of religion from the public sphere; Canada's multicultural model advocates official recognition of minority cultures; Quebec shares Canada's tradition of large-scale permanent immigration but embodies a unique intercultural discourse of integration, in some ways resembling France. We compare the social experiences of Muslim and non-Muslim minorities in these three settings using the French 'Trajectories and Origins' survey (2009) and the Canadian 'Ethnic Diversity Survey' (2002) data on reports of discrimination, friendship networks, social trust, voluntarism, and national identity. We find the Muslim/non-Muslim gap in social inclusion is significant in all three settings and results from ethnic, cultural, or racial differences, more than religion. In assessing immigrants' social inclusion, we suggest consideration be given to: (i) the reality of 'national models' in the community, (ii) a tendency for minorities to locate in more accepting segments of mainstream society, and (iii) the limited impact of policies based on national models.
Fragmented Inclusion: Community Participation and Lesbian, Gay, Bisexual, Trans, and Queer People With Diagnoses of Schizophrenia and Bipolar Disorder^2017^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF ORTHOPSYCHIATRY^Community participation is often cited as a crucial component of wellness for people with mental health diagnoses. Few studies explore community participation from the perspective of lesbian, gay, bisexual, trans, and queer (LGBTQ) people with diagnoses of schizophrenia and bipolar disorder. This article describes an in-depth qualitative study with 16 LGBTQ people; 18 social service workers; and 2 key informants in Toronto, Ontario that examined access to communities for LGBTQ people with mental health diagnoses. Results indicate that community participation is particularly relevant to this group given the functions of communities for marginalized people as a source of support and resistance. However, the participants faced barriers to accessing support and creating social networks due to the lack of intersectional inclusion in various contexts, including LGBTQ communities and mental health/mad communities.
Recycling and social technologies for sustainability: The Brazilian experience of wastepickers' inclusion in selective collection programs^2017^WORK-A JOURNAL OF PREVENTION ASSESSMENT &amp; REHABILITATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.009  </td>  <td>1.18</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The challenges facing poverty alleviation and financial inclusion in North-East Kenya Province (NEKP)^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL ECONOMICS^None
DIGITAL FUTURE CLASSROOM: THE PHYSICAL SPACE AND THE INCLUSION OF THE NEET/REFUGEE POPULATION - CONCEPTUAL AND THEORETICAL FRAMEWORKS AND METHODOLOGY^2017^INTED2017: 11TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^None
Social teaching: Student perspectives on the inclusion of social media in higher education^JAN 2017^EDUCATION AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES^The traditional teaching methodologies employed within universities, comprising of lectures and seminars, have come to be scrutinised for their impersonal approach. Recently, social media and networking sites have become increasingly popular as learning and teaching resources in higher education, providing students with increased opportunities for educational engagement. Whilst research has examined the effects of including social media in class and whether it assists students in academic engagement, it remains to be seen whether social media is understood to affect student attitudes towards their learning experiences. Subsequently, this research endeavours to understand student perspectives on the inclusion of social media in higher education and seeks to establish whether the inclusion of social media sites, such as Facebook and Twitter, can impact on student motivation and goal orientation. Whilst research in this area is increasing, this paper provides valuable insight into student perspectives on the inclusion of social media in higher education, whether they believe motivation and goals to have been affected by it, and the broader reaching consequences of its inclusions with regard to departmental interaction.
Promoting Social Inclusion through Sport for Refugee-Background Youth in Australia: Analysing Different Participation Models^2017^SOCIAL INCLUSION^Sports participation can confer a range of physical and psychosocial benefits and, for refugee and migrant youth, may even act as a critical mediator for achieving positive settlement and engaging meaningfully in Australian society. This group has low participation rates however, with identified barriers including costs; discrimination and a lack of cultural sensitivity in sporting environments; lack of knowledge of mainstream sports services on the part of refugee-background settlers; inadequate access to transport; culturally determined gender norms; and family attitudes. Organisations in various sectors have devised programs and strategies for addressing these participation barriers. In many cases however, these responses appear to be ad hoc and under-theorised. This article reports findings from a qualitative exploratory study conducted in a range of settings to examine the benefits, challenges and shortcomings associated with different participation models. Interview participants were drawn from non-government organisations, local governments, schools, and sports clubs. Three distinct models of participation were identified, including short term programs for refugee-background children; ongoing programs for refugee-background children and youth; and integration into mainstream clubs. These models are discussed in terms of their relative challenges and benefits and their capacity to promote sustainable engagement and social inclusion for this population group.
Policing the Void: Recreation, Social Inclusion and the Baltimore Police Athletic League^2017^SOCIAL INCLUSION^In this article, we explore the relationship between public recreation policy and planning and the transformation of urban governance in the context of the Police Athletic League centers in Baltimore, Maryland. In light of contemporary discussions of the role of youth programs for sport and physical activity within post-industrial cities, the origination, development, and eventual demise of Baltimore's network of Police Activity League centers is an instructive, if disheartening, saga. It illustrates the social and political rationales mobilized in justifying recreation policy and programming, the framing of sport and physical activity as preventative measures towards crime and juvenile delinquency, and the precarity of such initiatives given the efficiency-driven orthodoxies of neoliberal urban entrepreneurialism (Harvey, 1989). This analysis emphasizes how the PAL centers were designed to 'fill the void' left by a declining system of public recreation, thereby providing an example of a recreation program as part of the "social problems industry" (Pitter &amp; Andrews 1997).
THE INCLUSIVE EDUCATION IN TIME OF JUDICIALIZATION OF THE STATE: THE DIALY OF SCHOOLS WITH THE BRAZILIAN LAW OF INCLUSION - N degrees 13.146/2015^2017^POLEM!CA^This article intends to analyze the daily life of schools after the implementation of the Brazilian Inclusion Law, the Law n degrees 13146/2015. It is possible to notice in the document: guidelines on the evaluation criteria of students with disabilities, guidelines on how to enroll for education networks and changes of the civil rights. In the educational setting, the most important issue of the law and a record of filing lawsuits has been the school mediation; not only by private institutions but also by families. There have been advances, setbacks and unclear points in the field of education with the new law, which requires an analysis of its application in schools a year after it was established and four months after the deadline schools received to adapt to the new parameters.
Facilitating Financial Inclusion Through E-Governance: Case Based Study in Indian Scenario^2017^2017 FOURTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDEMOCRACY &amp; EGOVERNMENT (ICEDEG)^with the mandates of Millennium development goals followed by sustainable development goals, the United Nations have argued in favour of eradicating poverty and achieving economic growth with equitable access to resources. Financial inclusion that aims at extending financial and related services to all citizens is considered an important contributor to development. It is argued that financial inclusion, as a strategy, would encourage citizens to enhance their activity portfolios and would encourage savings, empower women, facilitate remittance, boost production and consumption. E-Governance services are aimed at interventions with the primary purpose of enhancing citizen engagements on line, creating enabling conditions for interactions. Focus of E-Governance services is also on empowering citizens with the scope to reduce information asymmetry, transact on line; establish networks to augment their activities in production, consumption, income, expenditure, access to government services and participation in decision making etc. Therefore, it is important to explore the scope for E-Governance strategies to support financial inclusion services and provide synergy. In India there are considerable efforts to foster financial inclusion and E-Governance (NeGP V.2.0). This paper seeks to explore whether these two efforts have progressed for convergence and assess the present status through a proposed framework and case based study in Indian context.
Inclusion of Variable Disinfection Levels in Slug Feed Optimal Disinfection of Water Distribution Systems^2017^WORLD ENVIRONMENTAL AND WATER RESOURCES CONGRESS 2017: HYDRAULICS AND WATERWAYS AND WATER DISTRIBUTION SYSTEMS ANALYSIS^Water distribution systems are vulnerable of being intentionally or accidentally contaminated. In the case of a contamination event the contaminated section of the water distribution system should be located, isolated and cleaned before it can be returned to regular service. Depending on the specific contaminant, the cleaning process mainly includes flushing and disinfection. All of the disinfection methods (for example: tablet, continuous and slug) require that the disinfectants will have minimal contact time (T) in a predefined concentration (C) with the pipes and the system's apparatuses. The regulatory agencies, such as the Ministry of Health in Israel or the American Water Work Association, publishes procedures for the disinfection of water systems in which usually only a single water main is considered and no specific procedures are given for larger portions of the water system. This paper presents an optimal operation plan for the disinfection of water distribution systems using the slug feed method while considering the injection times, flow rates and drainage locations while keeping variable disinfection C*T values in different areas of the network. The method is a two stage GA-EPANET procedure. It is demonstrated on a small real-world network section.
Education without a shared language: dynamics of inclusion and exclusion in Norwegian introductory classes for newly arrived minority language students^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Based upon fieldwork in two upper secondary schools in Norway, this article offers an analysis of inclusion and exclusion processes for newly arrived minority language students. Minority language students are defined by policy as students who have a different mother tongue than the Norwegian and Sami languages, and students who are newly arrived in Norway are considered especially at risk for marginalisation. This article explores processes of inclusion and exclusion in two schools with segregated classes for this group, called introductory classes. The analytical framework is Niklas Luhmann's theory of autopoietic social systems, where inclusion is defined as the requirements for participation set by a system, and exclusion accordingly as being unable to meet these requirements. The article displays different constellations of inclusions and exclusions for newly arrived students in the educational system: in school organisations, organisation-based interactions and informal networks of students. It will be showed that introductory classes erect several barriers towards newly arrived students' inclusion, especially towards those students who are placed at the basic level of the schools' hierarchy of performances. As a consequence of multiple educational exclusions, informal networks emerge as alternative socialities that include and exclude students on the basis of mother tongue.
Spatializing Student Learning to Reimagine the "Place" of Inclusion^DEC 2016^TEACHERS COLLEGE RECORD^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.91  </td>  <td>1.727</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Design and Implementation of a CoAP-Compliant Solution for RFID Inclusion in the Internet of Things^DEC 2016^JOURNAL OF SENSOR AND ACTUATOR NETWORKS^Recent technological advancements allowed widening the applicability scope of the RFID (Radio Frequency Identification) technology from item identification to sensor-enabled computation platforms. This feature, added to the native radio energy-harvesting capability and the extremely low power consumption, has attracted the interest of research and industrial communities and pushed them to include the RFID technology into a global network of interconnected objects, as envisaged by the Internet of Things paradigm. In the last few years, standardization bodies have made significant efforts to design lightweight approaches, such as CoAP (Constrained Application Protocol), to efficiently manage resource-constrained nodes by using traditional web interfaces; nevertheless, RFID integration is not addressed yet. In this paper, we propose a CoAP-compliant solution where RFID tags, behaving as virtual CoAP servers, are directly accessible by remote CoAP clients via a reader, which acts as a CoAP proxy. A real testbed, addressing key aspects, such as tag addressing, discovery and management of CoAP requests via RFID operations, is deployed to validate the feasibility of the proposal. Experimental results show rapid response times: less than 60 ms are requested for resource retrieval, while from 80 to 360 ms for sending data to the RFID device, depending on the tag memory dimension.
Convict Criminology and the Struggle for Inclusion^DEC 2016^CRITICAL CRIMINOLOGY^Convict Criminology (CC) began in the early 1990s as a reaction to the then current state of academic criminology that did not adequately reflect the voices of convicted felons. Since its beginnings, CC has attempted to draw attention to a range of problems created by the criminal justice apparatus and defenders of the status quo. Dr. Joanne Belknap's 2014 ASC presidential address and subsequent article presented an argument that stressed the importance of activism to be considered as part of criminological research. In the process, she reviewed her career and then criticized the field of Critical Criminology, in particular Convict Criminology. The article, however, ignored the numerous efforts that CC has engaged in to build an inclusive group school, movement, organization and network that includes the diverse voices of Ph.D. educated convicts and excons, and overall reflected a superficial understanding of the history and intent of Convict Criminology. This article attempts to explain the shortcomings of Belknap's article and clarifies misunderstandings.
Middle School Students' Attitudes Toward a Peer With Autism Spectrum Disorder: Effects of Social Acceptance and Physical Inclusion^DEC 2016^FOCUS ON AUTISM AND OTHER DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^Students with autism spectrum disorder (ASD) often experience peer conflict and social challenges, which likely relate to compounded characteristics of both the child with ASD and his or her peers. However, few studies have experimentally investigated these associations to inform prevention and intervention efforts. The present study used social networking blogs to examine how middle school students' attitudes toward a fictional peer with ASD, Charlie, vary according to whether Charlie was (a) physically included with typically developing peers and (b) socially accepted. Participants expressed less favorable attitudes when Charlie was socially excluded by his peers, regardless of whether his peers had disabilities. More favorable attitudes were associated with participant popularity, previous exposure to ASD, younger age, and being female. Charlie's ASD status was associated with more negative anticipated peer attitudes. These results indicate that facilitating positive, public social experiences of students with ASD may promote positive attitudes and social acceptance by peers.
Unconnected component inclusion technique for patent network analysis: Case study of Internet of Things-related technologies^NOV 2016^JOURNAL OF INFORMETRICS^In this study, we propose an unconnected component inclusion technique (UCIT) for patent citation analysis. Our method generates a cluster solution that includes unconnected and connected components of a direct citation network, enabling a more complete analysis of the technology fields. Case studies of Internet of Things-related technologies were conducted to test the effectiveness of our proposed method. We observed that UCIT increased the number of nodes especially in relatively small networks. Additionally, we analyzed how the clusters changed by adding unconnected patents to the citation network and identified four types of clustering phenomenon. Our method can be used by patent officers, R&amp;D managers, and policy makers when they want to understand the technology landscape better. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Building Inclusion: Toward an Aging- and Disability-Friendly City^NOV 2016^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.381  </td>  <td>5.6</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Asylum Seekers and the Co-production of Public Services: Understanding the Implications for Social Inclusion and Citizenship^OCT 2016^JOURNAL OF SOCIAL POLICY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.296  </td>  <td>2.855</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Student Women's Internet Skills and its Relation with the Digital Inclusion: New Digital Divides^SEP 2016^EDUCATION IN THE KNOWLEDGE SOCIETY^The aims of this research are to know the women's internet skills, and form different groups of skills of women related with the digital inclusion. To do this, we surveyed 215 Spanish student women aged 20 to 34 using two scales measuring their internet skills and digital inclusion. The findings show four profiles of student women depending on the types of Internet skills and their developmental level ("beginner", "average", "advanced" and specialized in e-administration). The skill to create and share content on social networks and skills for e-administration, along with skills to ensure privacy and security on the Internet are associated with a high degree of digital inclusion for student women. The findings showed that the skills for e-administration and the skills to ensure the security and privacy are the most influential in the digital trust. These results suggest the skills to create and share content in social networks sites makes the basic difference between the "advanced" group and the "specialized in e-administration" group. These results raise educational proposals that prioritize skill's types to improve digital inclusion in other profiles of women and overcoming new digital divides.
Fear of missing out (FOMO) is associated with activation of the right middle temporal gyrus during inclusion social cue^AUG 2016^COMPUTERS IN HUMAN BEHAVIOR^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.306  </td>  <td>4.964</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Designing incentive packages for increased density and social inclusion in the neighbourhood of mass transit stations^JUL 2016^HABITAT INTERNATIONAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.846  </td>  <td>4.079</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
SOCIAL NETWORKS AND ACADEMIC SUPPORT OF STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES CONTRIBUTING TO INCLUSION IN HIGHER EDUCATION^JUN-NOV 2016^PRISMA SOCIAL^The article presents the results of a research project "deleted title for anonymous review" financed by the Ministry of Economy and Competitiveness of Spain. The purpose was to study, from the perspective of students with disabilities, the factors that contribute to their academic success (access, retention and college completion), through their family, social and academic support networks. The methodology used was the biographical narrative. The study used various techniques of data collection: group and individual interviews, lifelines, self-reports and photographs. Data analysis was done using a system of categories and codes. Results analyzes family, social and academic support networks in terms of what and how people who make up these networks to help them in their college careers do. College students with disabilities identified several people who have been key in access, and in their careers as well as their academic performance. In the conclusions is discussed the importance of having strong support networks to contribute to the educational and social inclusion. It is recommended that the university becomes resilient.
Microfinance Banks and Financial Inclusion^MAY 2016^REVIEW OF FINANCE^We examine how the geographical proximity to a microfinance bank affects financial inclusion. We study the expansion of the branch network of ProCredit banks in South-East Europe between 2006 and 2010. We report three main findings: First, ProCredit is more likely to open a new branch in areas with a large share of low-income households. Second, in locations where ProCredit opens a new branch the share of banked households increases more than in locations where it does not open a new branch. Third, this increase is particularly strong among low-income households, older households, and households which rely on transfer income.
Introduction: Global Economic Inclusion and African Workers^APR 2 2016^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^This introductory article explores the transformative potential of global connections for African workers. It challenges recent claims that African workers have become functionally irrelevant to the global economy by examining the shift of global demand for African workers from formal to increasingly informalised labour arrangements, mediated by social enterprises, labour brokers and graduate entrepreneurs. Focusing on global employment connections initiated from above and from below, we consider why global labour linkages have tended to increase rather than reduce problems of vulnerable and unstable working conditions within African countries, and consider the economic and political conditions needed for African workers to capture the gains of inclusion in the global economy.
Remaking Africa's Informal Economies: Youth, Entrepreneurship and the Promise of Inclusion at the Bottom of the Pyramid^APR 2 2016^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^In recent years, the quest for 'inclusive markets' that incorporate Africa's youth has become a key focus of national and international development efforts, with so-called bottom of the pyramid (BoP) initiatives increasingly seen as a way to draw the continent's poor into new networks of global capitalism. SSA has become a fertile frontier for such systems, as capital sets its sights on the continents' vast 'under-served' informal economies, harnessing the entrepreneurial mettle of youth to create new markets for a range of products, from solar lanterns and shampoo to cook stoves and sanitary pads. Drawing on ethnographic research with youth entrepreneurs, we trace the processes of individual and collective 'transformation' that the mission of (self-) empowerment through entrepreneurship seeks to bring about. We argue that, while such systems are meant to bring those below the poverty line above it, the 'line' is reified and reinforced through a range of discursive and strategic practices that actively construct and embed distinctions between the past and the future, valuable and valueless, and the idle and productive in Africa's informal economies.
Coordination of 'inclusion' First Results of an exploratory Study in the State of Tyrol^APR 2016^ZEITSCHRIFT FUR PADAGOGIK^In this contribution, the object of inquiry the implementation of an inclusive educational system is examined in three steps. First, the concept of inclusion is discussed because depending on the respective interpretation of the term it may lead to distinct processes of implementation. In a second step, the perspective of (educational) governance is presented and investigated as to its potential for the analysis of inclusion as a multi-level constellation. In a third step, first results of an explorative study carried out in the province of Tyrol are outlined, in which the perspective of a key actor, the coordinator of inclusion appointed on the provincial level for Tyrol, were examined within the framework of a qualitative case study. In conclusion, the results are discussed in the context of governance and further research perspectives are outlined.
Moving convergence culture towards cultural intermediation: social media and cultural inclusion^MAR 3 2016^CONTINUUM-JOURNAL OF MEDIA &amp; CULTURAL STUDIES^Raymond Williams noted culture is specific to each society, where the making of a society is the finding of common meanings and direction'. Cultural studies provide a foundation for an array of emerging research areas that seek to explore those meanings and directions, such as convergence culture. Recent humanities scholarship has called for researchers to move beyond the marvel of convergence culture, with its potential for increased social inclusion and cultural diversity, to a more nuanced understanding of networked participation. This paper uses empirical research data gathered from the Australian Broadcasting Corporation to argue that embedded cultural industries research can contribute, through the cultural intermediation framework, to cultural studies and the political, economic, and practice-based strengths of the creative industries. It also argues that in a contemporary institutional social media environment, cultural intermediation is a useful framework to understand convergent media practices.
Has airline efficiency affected by the inclusion of aviation into European Union Emission Trading Scheme? Evidences from 22 airlines during 2008-2012^FEB 1 2016^ENERGY^We investigate the impacts of including aviation into European Union Emission Trading Scheme on airline efficiency since 2008. Airline efficiency is divided into three stages: Operations Stage, Services Stage and Sales Stage, and Greenhouse Gases Emission is treated as an undesirable output of Services Stage. Two models, Network Slacks-Based Measure with weak disposability and Network Slacks-Based Measure with strong disposability, are established to evaluate the efficiencies of 22 international airlines from 2008 to 2012. The results show that: (1) Most airlines' efficiencies have increased in the period. (2) The average efficiency of European airlines is much higher than that of non-European airlines. (3) The model with weak disposability is more reasonable in distinguishing the airline efficiency while strong disposability, Is a more reasonable way in treating undesirable outputs. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Profiles of Exclusion and Social Inclusion Policies in Spain: Dimensions of Change^FEB 2016^REVISTA DEL CLAD REFORMA Y DEMOCRACIA^This article outlines, firstly, the European context of social inclusion policies, by means of a double perspective: comparative (diversity of welfare regimes) and dynamic (diversity of restructuring paths). On that basis, our analysis comprises two parts. On the one hand, the empirical foundations are traced: both the institutional map of the social inclusion policies in Spain, and the main profiles of poverty, exclusion and social inequality in Spanish and EU comparative perspective. On the other hand, we consider the challenges and the policy proposals to meet them. A threefold approach is developed: the policy frame, where the inclusion/exclusion cleavage and the concept of new poverty are reinforced; the policy contents, where the alternatives are drawn in terms of human rights and personal autonomy (the new social services paradigm); and the governance dimension, with the option for new localism and action networks to implement social inclusion policies. The document offers a new set of variables emerging from the most intense years of crisis (2007-2012) and austerity (2010-2015). The growing gap between the impacts of the crisis-austerity policy regime, and the relative weakness of the social inclusion strategies across the diverse welfare models, leads us to sustain the case for a stronger social inclusion dimension, to play a central role within the new welfare cycle which is emerging in Europe.
Does the Inclusion of Non-Internet Households in a Web Panel Reduce Coverage Bias?^FEB 2016^SOCIAL SCIENCE COMPUTER REVIEW^The LISS online panel has made extra efforts to recruit and retain households that were not regular users of the Internet into the study. Households were provided with computers and/or Internet when necessary. Including these cases made the panel more representative of the Dutch population, by bringing in respondents who were more likely to be older, to live in single-person homes, and to have migration backgrounds. This article replicates five published articles that used LISS data and explores how the conclusions in these articles would have been different had the LISS panel not included the non-Internet households. There are strong demographic differences between the Internet and non-Internet households, and estimates of means would in many cases be biased if these households had not been included. However, across the five replicated studies, few of the published model estimates are substantively affected by the inclusion of these households in the LISS sample.
"The state cannot help them all". Russian media discourse on the inclusion of non-state actors in governance^2016^EAST EUROPEAN POLITICS^This article investigates positions on network governance-type arrangements in Russian non-oppositional media. State-based actors articulated a discourse of mutual dependency, akin to observations in liberal parliamentary democracies. The state described itself as possessing necessary funding and competence to regulate and coordinate, while non-state actors were described as possessing resources necessary to fulfil state policy. Non-state actors occasionally cast doubt on the state's competence to regulate, but fears of state cooptation were rarely articulated. The hegemonic discourse on mutual dependency, and the state as an active network manager, mirrors the observed growth of state-controlled arenas for civil society inclusion in Russia.
The law concepts of inclusion in the curriculum school of municipal network.^2016^REDES COM-REVISTA DE ESTUDIOS PARA EL DESARROLLO SOCIAL DE LA COMUNICACION^The text presents the Bill 64 of Marilia-SP number that deals with the inclusion of constitutional law notions, Justice and Citizenship in the school curriculum of the municipal network covering education from kindergarten to elementary school, whose curriculum will prepared with the support and supervision of the Department of Municipal Education aimed at legal inclusion, citizenship and democratization of law, so as to reach all sections of society. The introduction will be given according to the age of the students, in a playful and educational manner, it is certainly essential for the formation of citizens who will work in building a democratic state, with a view to ensuring the values and principles necessary for their training citizen and Human rights, whose jurisdiction is also school to train young citizens and a citizen is, among other things, have equal rights and duties. It is a qualitative research, ensuring the equality of education, because education to be a fundamental right is linked to the principle of human dignity.
UPTAKE ICT - AN ERASMUS plus PROJECT FOR DIGITAL INCLUSION^2016^INTED2016: 10TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^Despite the growth in the use of Internet worldwide, there is still a large amount of people that never used it, even in European countries like Portugal and Italy with 33% and 35% citizens that never used respectively. This project aims to address this problem by engaging synergies of nine partners in four countries (Portugal, Italy, United Kingdom and Germany) whose good practices will be shared and validated by the Science and Technology Foundation in Portugal. This network will work both at local, regional, national and international levels in transversal and trans-sectorial areas, both in terms of the partners involved (academic and enterprise), and in terms of the focus group (Vocational education and training; adult and elderly education with special focus on disadvantaged background citizens) literacy inclusion, re-qualification and employability. The main focus is to attend the info-excluded citizen, mainly the ones with disadvantaged backgrounds, both in social and geographical terms by integrating the ICTs in their lives and to share and spread those good practices either among partners and with the community. To include and train these citizens in Information and communications technologies, educational content was developed in various formats and in three levels of difficulty, hoping to respect the individual way of learning.
The empty rhetoric of the smart city: from digital inclusion to economic promotion in Philadelphia^2016^URBAN GEOGRAPHY^Smart city initiatives have been adopted by cities worldwide, proposing forward-looking, technological solutions to urban problems big and small. These policies are indicative of a digitized urban condition, where social and economic exchange rely on globalized telecommunications networks, and governance strategies follow suit. Propelled through events such as IBM's Smarter Cities Challenge, the smart city acts as a data-driven logic urban change where widespread benefit to a city and its residents is proposed, masking the utility of these policies to further entrepreneurial economic development strategies. In this article, I present a case study of the Digital On-Ramps initiative that emerged from IBM's policy-consultation in Philadelphia. The initiative proposed a social media-style workforce education application (app) to train up to 500,000 low-literacy residents for jobs in the information and knowledge economy, but even as the city's mayor declared the project a success, it did not meet expectations. This essay argues that the rhetoric of intelligent, transformative digital change works much more to "sell" a city in the global economy than to actually address urban inequalities.
SCHOOL INCLUSION AND DISORDER AUTISM SPECTRUM^2016^COMUNICACOES^The school inclusion of students with autism spectrum disorder is a controversial topic that has been widely discussed in academic circles and by the society. The teaching experience and investigation carried inside this thematic concludes that students with autism spectrum disorder are being enrolled in regular schools. Given this fact, it sought to through this research, reflect to understand, if the actions taken by teachers are meeting the educational needs of these students in special classes and regular classes. We opted for the multiple case study, by having like research subjects, four students with autism, two frequenting regular class and two special class. Through observation of the trajectory and performance of these students and their teachers in class, we concluded the urgency to reframe a pedagogical practice that come to stimulate and support the learning of the person with autism spectrum disorder and, also, that the inclusion of these students in the class of the regular network is possible, by setting the best environment to develop their potential, since for many of them is the only place of social interaction and learning.
THE BORDERS OF SENIORS' SOCIAL INCLUSION INTO THE DIGITAL WORLD: SOCIOLOGICAL RESEARCH RESULTS^2016^SGEM 2016, BK 3: ANTHROPOLOGY, ARCHAEOLOGY, HISTORY &amp; PHILOSOPHY CONFERENCE PROCEEDINGS, VOL I^None
INCLUSION OF SOCIAL NETWORKING SERVICES IN THE EXISTING MODEL OF ORGANIZATION OF STUDENTS' LEARNING^2016^INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES AND LEARNING TOOLS^The combination of ICT with pedagogical training technologies promotes to the formation and development of information and educational environment of students' learning, as well as the appearance and development of services of network technologies allows to expand the traditional educational process. Educational practice of networking tools usage, such as social services, is at the stage of formation. In the article the functional features of social Internet services in the context of the information and educational environment development as an environment of social interaction between students and appearance of new ways of their educational and cognitive activities have been investigated. There are highlighted the groups of social networking services and organizational forms of teaching, in which the use of the relevant services is a pedagogically appropriate.
CONTRIBUTION OF PUBLIC LIBRARIES TO THE INCREASE OF DIGITAL INCLUSION IN THE OSIJEK-BARANYA COUNTY^2016^5. MEDUNARODNI ZNANSTVENI SIMPOZIJ GOSPODARSTVO ISTOCNE HRVATSKE - VIZIJA I RAZVOJ: 5TH INTERNATIONAL SCIENTIFIC SYMPOSIUM ECONOMY OF EASTERN CROATIA - VISION AND GROWTH^None
Questioning the Digital Inclusion Concept^2016^SOCIAL INCLUSION AND EQUAL OPPORTUNITIES (SIEO 2016)^The technological progress was epiphylogenetically connected with the evolution of human species. The progress of society was dialectically intertwined with the technological progress. The present human cognition is changing under the influence of digital technologies. The pervasive Information and Communication Technologies (ICT) becomes already the new social environment. Their ubiquity, every-purpose and utility are taken for granted. ICT has a similar social-like networking structure and there is no wonder that their effects are seen as being beneficial in all social areas to address resourcefully to any social issue. But can they solve sensitive issues such as social inclusion, equal opportunities, economic and life chances, civic engagements, self efficacy and so on? A proper social inclusion implies more intermingled resources, dimensions and interventions than that. What should be and how can be achieved social inclusion remains a matter of intentionality, empathy and human solidarity.
Cash Transfers in Nepal: Do They Contribute to Social Inclusion?^2016^OXFORD DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^It is often assumed that social protection leads to social inclusion and other wellbeing indicators. Yet evidence of this impact is weak. Cash transfers are a social protection tool designed to reduce poverty which can also have an impact on human development indicators such as health and education. In the district of Sarlahi, Nepal, cash transfer amounts are too low to improve health and education opportunities or productive pursuits and thus to break the intergenerational cycle of poverty. However, the transfer allows beneficiaries to participate more in community activities, increases their access to information and social networks, and enhances the social contract and people's relationship with the state. This breaks down some of the invisible barriers that perpetuate exclusion. Paying cash transfers in Nepal kick-starts other processes of inclusion and well-being that are hard to overcome by other means because they are invisible, denied and relational. The findings reveal that universal transfers generate perceptions of equality for beneficiaries who value receiving the same thing from the state as the rich. Yet being treated the same as the well-off will not necessarily lead to equal opportunities, poverty reduction or improved local governance. Cash transfers can facilitate social inclusion but are not enough alone to achieve substantive inclusion.
Cutting Edge Multi Stratum Secured Electronic Voting Machine Design with Inclusion of Biometrics RFID and GSM Module^2016^2016 IEEE 6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON ADVANCED COMPUTING (IACC)^Elections casts an ennobling influence on the minds of people and forms the prominent feature of our country-India, in which every individual participates vigilantly and the populace remains the sovereign power. The world has been experimenting with diverse technologies to conduct controversy free elections, to fulfill the elementary needs of the people. It should be taken into account that no elector should be disenfranchised from their voting rights. Our main objective is to design a model to provide equitable elections. In this project, the baseline information stored in the RFID tag provides topical reference data that mediate intensive computational prerequisite; it also provides easy match-on-card sui generis feature and meet the constraint that only eligible voters can cast their vote. Moreover, added tier of security is enforced as bio-metrics. It is seen that there is a noticeable diminution in the turnout rate of voters, especially the youth. To foster participation among all demographic groups, our design looks into the multiple dimensions and notes all security requirements and provides an inexpensive solution based on RFID, GSM and fingerprint module in quest for election legitimacy.
A rights-based conceptual framework for the social inclusion of children and young persons with an intellectual disability^2016^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^There is a basic principle that all children and young persons with intellectual disabilities should be able to enjoy citizenship on an equal basis with others. This includes enjoying personal dignity and exercising choice, control and freedom in social, community and cultural life, in keeping with their individual lifestyle preferences and aspirations. There is a need for a stronger human rights narrative to achieve this. This article identifies a conceptual framework for a rights-based approach to the integration of children and young persons with disabilities. Seven components of such a framework are identified: citizenship and social inclusion; recognition; agency; voice; capabilities; equality; and self-realisation. This framework was developed as part of an Irish case study involving consultation with young persons with intellectual disabilities, their parents or guardians and professional staff delivering support services. The rights of children/young persons with intellectual disabilities are essentially those of children generally. While this principle may be obvious in many respects, its implementation presents significant challenges. The need for a transformative narrative and its components are outlined.
Digital inclusion of mature students: Analysis of their attitudes and ICT competences^2016^REVISTA COMPLUTENSE DE EDUCACION^This research aims to identify the attitudes and competences of mature students regarding information and communication technologies (ICT), with special focus on digital learning platforms and social networks (Web 2.0). In addition, the study tries to assess the influence of several socio-demographic variables (gender and age) in the use of these tools and in the students' self-perception of their digital competency. The research uses the survey method and a questionnaire has been applied to a sample of 382 students entering the University of Seville via the special routes for older than 25, than 40 and 45 years. Results showed a general positive attitude towards the ICT, which could also be qualified as pragmatic, since the tools are positively valued based on their potential benefits in the learning processes. Results also point to the fact that students have not been specifically trained in the use of ITC. The level of competency that they claim to possess regarding the use of these resources is medium-low. Furthermore, the over 45 year group declare themselves less competent than the over 25 and 40. Finally, some suggestions are given in order to improve the participation of mature students in Higher Education.
Digital inclusion and social exclusion: The political economy of value in a networked world^2016^INFORMATION SOCIETY^Current debates around user-generated content and its role in wealth generation can be understood as attempts to apply or develop a theory of exploitation or, more broadly, a theory of value. This article seeks to provide a theory based on the network asymmetries of late capitalism, which tend to unevenly distribute network resources through a logic of "digital inclusion." The mechanisms that enable this asymmetric situation are introduced, and the historical displacements that have given rise to those mechanisms are briefly discussed. The conceptual model that emerges from the analysis reveals the salient features of the contemporary connexionist world that transcend, but do not erase, class boundaries.
Analysis of the Socio-digital inclusion policy in Andalusia (Spain) and its territorial strategy Guadalinfo^2016^CUADERNOS GEOGRAFICOS^None
THE INCLUSION OF THE DISABLED PERSON AND THE MULTIC ULTURALISM: THE CONSTRUCTION OF A MORE SOLIDARY COUNTRY^2016^QUAESTIO IURIS^This article aims to study the inclusion of disabled person under the bias of multiculturalism, that seek to bias shows how to design the fundamental rights of this population, with a view to forming a social ethic that allows respect for the disabled, and consequently guarantees the effectiveness of their citizenship. Meanwhile, fosters the creation of a agrafa network based on a communicative action which has the aim of instilling in society solidarity between citizens providing a sensitivity to differences, and therefore with the deficiencies. This study was done based on an inductive methodology -bibliography.
Persons with Epilepsy: Between Social Inclusion and Marginalisation^2016^BEHAVIOURAL NEUROLOGY^Background. Epilepsy is a chronic neurological disorder that can lead to complex psychosocial consequences. Epilepsy can change the social status of persons with epilepsy (PWE) and has an effect on their social inclusion as well as their perception of social inclusion. This study aims to explore subjective experiences with social inclusion of PWE in Slovenia. Methods. This study takes a qualitative approach. Eleven semistructured interviews were conducted with eleven participants. Interviews were analysed using thematic analysis. Results. Epilepsy has physical, emotional, and social consequences. Physical consequences of epilepsy are mainly tiredness and exhaustion following an epileptic episode, frequently accompanied by headaches. Emotional consequences are different forms of fear. The main social consequence identified is a negative effect on PWE's social network, which leads to (self) isolation and social distrust. Conclusion. PWE experience of social inclusion depends on various psychosocial factors and differs from person to person. The consequences of epilepsy are shown in PWE social contacts and their sense of social inclusion and autonomy.
Inclusion of Mobile Sensors in Water Distribution System Monitoring Operations^JAN 2016^JOURNAL OF WATER RESOURCES PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT^This study describes a binary integer programming model for mutually-operating fixed and mobile sensors in water distribution systems. The proposed method applies a deterministic optimization scheme for maximizing the monitored volume within network clusters. For a given budget, the model determines the ratio of mobile sensors to fixed sensors along with their placement and release strategies. Through assessing the benefit of placing each fixed sensor and the time and location of mobile sensors release, the combination of fixed and mobile sensors is determined. Utilizing mobile sensors for water quality monitoring is still in its infancy. Such sensors are equipped with self-powered sensing, sampling, data acquisition, and wireless transmission units. The model initiates with the combined operation of mobile and fixed sensors. It then explores the benefits of mobile sensors compared to fixed. The two battle of the water sensor networks ( BWSN) are utilized for demonstrating the model's capabilities. Mobile sensors are found to be beneficial to water distribution system monitoring when operated in conjunction with static sensors. (C) 2015 American Society of Civil Engineers.
More than an intervention: strategies for increasing diversity and inclusion in STEM^2016^JOURNAL FOR MULTICULTURAL EDUCATION^None
Finding a Place to Belong: The Role of Social Inclusion in the Lives of Homeless Men^DEC 2015^QUALITATIVE REPORT^This study explores the role of informal social support networks of male homeless shelter residents. Authors utilized ethnographic methods, relationality and reflexive research approaches and key informant interviews with 10 shelter residents to investigate perceptions of belonging in overcoming social exclusion and countering the stigmatization cast onto as a result of their condition of homelessness. Study findings challenge our normative conceptions of homelessness by discerning between "rooflessness" and "rootlessness" suggesting that homelessness is more than the absence of shelter, but rather denotes the absence of support and inclusion in one's community. This research highlights a community within the shelter characterized by notions of acceptance and companionship. The associations shelter residents developed are creative and collaborative survival strategies allowing residents to negotiate their conditions of homelessness. As a result, some residents expressed reluctance to leave the shelter and (re) integrate into the community that had cast them off.
FROM SMART CITIES TO SMART HUMAN CITIES: DIGITAL INCLUSION IN APP'S^DEC 2015^REVISTA FUENTES^None
Efficient and equitable design of marine protected areas in Fiji through inclusion of stakeholder-specific objectives in conservation planning^OCT 2015^CONSERVATION BIOLOGY^The efficacy of protected areas varies, partly because socioeconomic factors are not sufficiently considered in planning and management. Although integrating socioeconomic factors into systematic conservation planning is increasingly advocated, research is needed to progress from recognition of these factors to incorporating them effectively in spatial prioritization of protected areas. We evaluated 2 key aspects of incorporating socioeconomic factors into spatial prioritization: treatment of socioeconomic factors as costs or objectives and treatment of stakeholders as a single group or multiple groups. Using as a case study the design of a system of no-take marine protected areas (MPAs) in Kubulau, Fiji, we assessed how these aspects affected the configuration of no-take MPAs in terms of trade-offs between biodiversity objectives, fisheries objectives, and equity in catch losses among fisher stakeholder groups. The achievement of fisheries objectives and equity tended to trade-off concavely with increasing biodiversity objectives, indicating that it is possible to achieve low to mid-range biodiversity objectives with relatively small losses to fisheries and equity. Importantly, the extent of trade-offs depended on the method used to incorporate socioeconomic data and was least severe when objectives were set for each fisher stakeholder group explicitly. We found that using different methods to incorporate socioeconomic factors that require similar data and expertise can result in plans with very different impacts on local stakeholders.
Being and feeling liked by others: How social inclusion impacts health^SEP 2 2015^PSYCHOLOGY &amp; HEALTH^This study examined the effects of perceived and actual social inclusion on health across and within individuals from a network perspective. During the first semester, 75 freshmen students provided bi-weekly ratings on their perceived social inclusion and health. To capture actual social inclusion, each student nominated liked and disliked fellow students. Perceived social inclusion mediated the effect of actual social inclusion on health. Specifically, students with more likes' perceived more social inclusion and those with higher perceived inclusion reported a better health status (between-person effect). In addition, at time points, when students received more likes' they also perceived more social inclusion. They reported better health at times when they felt more included (within-person effect). Thus, the perception of social inclusion is rooted in reality and actual social inclusion has an impact on health when passing the filter of perception.
Dalits Enter the Indian Markets as Owners of Capital Adverse Inclusion, Social Networks, and Civil Society^SEP-OCT 2015^ASIAN SURVEY^Dalits find themselves included in India's markets at adverse terms, due to the lack of social networks based on caste locations. This paper argues for considering caste as a specific Indian form of civil society-as a site of accumulation.
Perceptions of School Administration Team Members concerning inclusion in Israel: are they in congruence with the ecological sustainable perspective?^SEP 2015^BRITISH JOURNAL OF SPECIAL EDUCATION^Based on an ecological perspective, inclusive education should involve two essential components: a shared ideology of providing a culturally responsive educational system where the needs of every child are met and a school policy geared towards the implementation of inclusion practices, with collaborations among staff members who create sustainable relationships. The study's aim was to gain a better understanding of School Administration Team Members' (SATMs') perceptions of inclusive education in general elementary schools. It was found that although SATMs expressed pro-inclusion ideological statements, they have not yet manifested an ecological view of inclusion de facto that is holistic in nature. By and large, respondents expressed reactive rather than proactive perceptions. It appears that collaborations have not yet been initiated where inclusion is discussed, and a shared ideology is constructed. The research suggests that the perceptions of SATMs reflect perspectives of problem solving, survival, and partial collaborative networks that do not fully embrace ecological sustainable perspectives.
INTEGRATING IN HOMEOWNERLAND: The Norwegian housing regime and why it matters for immigrants' social inclusion^SEP 2015^NORDIC JOURNAL OF MIGRATION RESEARCH^The Norwegian housing model stands out internationally with its emphasis on home ownership. Immigrants, however, disproportionally live in rented housing. The rental market is poorly regulated, and renters often encounter poor housing standards, deprived neighbourhoods, and discrimination. Focusing on families with children, we use quantitative data to establish that housing and neighbourhood problems accumulate. We then draw on qualitative interviews to illuminate how such problems impact on family life. Our data indicate that the Norwegian housing model works well for a majority of immigrants, while a minority faces severe obstacles. We argue that poor and/or unstable housing represents challenges for family life, and also for immigrants' capacities to build social networks beyond the family. We further suggest that the arbitrary and potentially discriminatory selection processes in the rental market undermines the development of generalised trust.
The Inclusion of Functional Connectivity Information into fMRI-based Neurofeedback Improves Its Efficacy in the Reduction of Cigarette Cravings^AUG 2015^JOURNAL OF COGNITIVE NEUROSCIENCE^Real-time fMRI (rtfMRI) neurofeedback (NF) facilitates volitional control over brain activity and the modulation of associated mental functions. The NF signals of traditional rtfMRI-NF studies predominantly reflect neuronal activity within ROIs. In this study, we describe a novel rtfMRI-NF approach that includes a functional connectivity (FC) component in the NF signal (FC-added rtfMRI-NF). We estimated the efficacy of the FC-added rtfMRI-NF method by applying it to nicotine-dependent heavy smokers in an effort to reduce cigarette craving. ACC and medial pFC as well as the posterior cingulate cortex and precuneus are associated with cigarette craving and were chosen as ROIs. Fourteen heavy smokers were randomly assigned to receive one of two types of NF: traditional activity-based rtfMRI-NF or FC-added rtfMRI-NF. Participants received rtfMRI-NF training during two separate visits after overnight smoking cessation, and cigarette craving score was assessed. The FC-added rtfMRI-NF resulted in greater neuronal activity and increased FC between the targeted ROIs than the traditional activity-based rtfMRI-NF and resulted in lower craving score. In the FC-added rtfMRI-NF condition, the average of neuronal activity and FC was tightly associated with craving score (Bonferroni-corrected p = .028). However, in the activity-based rtfMRI-NF condition, no association was detected (uncorrected p &gt; .081). Non-rtfMRI data analysis also showed enhanced neuronal activity and FC with FC-added NF than with activity-based NF. These results demonstrate that FC-added rtfMRI-NF facilitates greater volitional control over brain activity and connectivity and greater modulation of mental function than activity-based rtfMRI-NF.
The World Bank online: inclusion and exclusion through digital networks^JUL 3 2015^CANADIAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES-REVUE CANADIENNE D ETUDES DU DEVELOPPEMENT^The World Bank has increasingly adopted the Internet as a tool to support its development assistance activities. The rhetoric has been clear in announcing that digital networks will empower a greater range of actors, democratising development. However, the potential of online engagement is contingent upon the presence of and the ability to use such technology. As such, in adopting a techno-development paradigm, the World Bank has contributed to reinforcing new hierarchies of inclusion and exclusion between those who have access to the Internet and those who do not. ResumeLa Banque Mondiale adopte de plus en plus Internet comme un outil pour soutenir ses activites d'aide au developpement. La rhetorique est claire depuis son annonce que les reseaux numeriques vont permettre l'autonomisation d'un eventail plus grand d'acteurs, democratisant ainsi le developpement. Toutefois, le potentiel de l'engagement en ligne depend de la presence et la capacite d'utiliser cette technologie. Ainsi, en adoptant un paradigme de techno-developpement, la Banque Mondiale a contribue a renforcer de nouvelles hierarchies d'inclusion et d'exclusion entre ceux qui ont acces a Internet et ceux qui n'ont pas acces.
Older adults' experiences and perceptions of digital technology: (Dis)empowerment, wellbeing, and inclusion^JUL 2015^COMPUTERS IN HUMAN BEHAVIOR^As more and more of the business of society is transferred and conducted online, older adults frequently find themselves without the skills to participate effectively. This is frequently confounded by limited physical mobility and a decrease in their social network and contact. This paper examines the lived reality of that process and how digital technology could be used to enhance the life activity of older adults and their wellbeing by increasing their social network. Seventeen older adults (10 female, 7 male Mage = 71.67, SDage = 10.05) participated in two focus groups that each lasted approximately 90 min. Interpretative phenomenological analysis yielded two main themes: digital technology serving as a tool to disempower and empower. Findings support evidence of a digital divide and how that divide is evolving from the ideographic perspective of digitally-engaged older adults and for society. Discussions also surround barriers to digital technology use for older adults, the codification of digital technology use within society, and how older adults use digital technology in a facilitative and inclusive way to empower themselves and protect them from the negative effects of the digital divide. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
What Characterizes a Health Region of Tomorrow? The Research Practice Network VorteilJena - Prevention via Inclusion^JUN 2015^PSYCHOTHERAPIE PSYCHOSOMATIK MEDIZINISCHE PSYCHOLOGIE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.835  </td>  <td>0.883</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Reverse logistics network for municipal solid waste management: The inclusion of waste pickers as a Brazilian legal requirement^JUN 2015^WASTE MANAGEMENT^This study proposes a reverse logistics network involved in the management of municipal solid waste (MSW) to solve the challenge of economically managing these wastes considering the recent legal requirements of the Brazilian Waste Management Policy. The feasibility of the allocation of MSW material recovery facilities (MRF) as intermediate points between the generators of these wastes and the options for reuse and disposal was evaluated, as well as the participation of associations and cooperatives of waste pickers. This network was mathematically modelled and validated through a scenario analysis of the municipality of Sao Mateus, which makes the location model more complete and applicable in practice. The mathematical model allows the determination of the number of facilities required for the reverse logistics network, their location, capacities, and product flows between these facilities. The fixed costs of installation and operation of the proposed MRF were balanced with the reduction of transport costs, allowing the inclusion of waste pickers to the reverse logistics network. The main contribution of this study lies in the proposition of a reverse logistics network for MSW simultaneously involving legal, environmental, economic and social criteria, which is a very complex goal. This study can guide practices in other countries that have realities similar to those in Brazil of accelerated urbanisation without adequate planning for solid waste management, added to the strong presence of waste pickers that, through the characteristic of social vulnerability, must be included in the system. In addition to the theoretical contribution to the reverse logistics network problem, this study aids in decision-making for public managers who have limited technical and administrative capacities for the management of solid wastes. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Counting inclusion with Chantal Mouffe: a radical democratic approach to intellectual disability research^MAY 28 2015^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^As mandates for social inclusion of people with intellectual disabilities remain unfulfilled, many scholars question whether the concept of inclusion is to blame. Critics worry that quantitative measurements of inclusion miss what should count: a meaningful life gained from a sense of belonging. We argue that both concepts - inclusion and belonging - embody a communitarian ethos in which citizens mirror the values of their community. In contrast, Chantal Mouffe's radical democratic approach to inclusion emphasizes the importance of difference and the inevitability of exclusion. Mouffe thus offers a way to broaden our approach to social inclusion in the twenty-first century.
Teacher expectations for the inclusion of digital textbooks in the classroom of high school^MAY-AUG 2015^REVISTA EDAPECI-EDUCACAO A DISTANCIA E PRATICAS EDUCATIVAS COMUNICACIONAIS E INTERCULTURAIS^The popularization of the use of tablets has led educational managers and publishers to consider the conversion of textbooks printed in digital versions. Such a shift could impact teaching and learning in the school context, considering the significant role that the textbook has in the Brazilian context. From this perspective, what is the vision that the teachers and the inclusion of digital textbooks in the classroom? That was the research question that motivated the exploratory study with high school teachers in a Brazilian educational network. The qualitative analysis of data obtained through a questionnaire, allowed to realize the responsiveness of teachers to this possibility in view of the possibility of closer technological context of the students as well as the integration of different media resources. On the other, it emphasizes the expectation as to possible methodological changes to cope with the challenge of ICT use in the school environment which requires teacher training and awareness among students.
How an intervention project contributes to social inclusion of adolescents and young people of foreign origin^MAY 2015^CHILDREN AND YOUTH SERVICES REVIEW^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.684  </td>  <td>2.138</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The social function of public libraries: new places for learning and social inclusion^MAR-APR 2015^PROFESIONAL DE LA INFORMACION^With the development of information and communication technologies, particularly with regards to the Internet, the needs of the public and the ways in which they can access information have changed. The Web is changing the role of traditional libraries and that of librarians, and we see how the future of libraries is questioned more and more every day. In this paper, we discuss the need to redefine public library services and to understand libraries as social centres rather than cultural ones. Public libraries must strive to become meeting points for learning and social inclusion. In order to accomplish this, it is necessary to assume new work profiles and to shape and redefine the workforce of librarians. Only in this way will the public library be able to have social impact and validity as a relevant service in current society.
"Bridal Show" in Russian- Jewish- German. Inclusion- and Exclusion- processes of the Russian Jewish Language Networks in Germany^SPR 2015^GERMAN QUARTERLY^None
Evaluating the knowledge of elementary school children using a class inclusion network^MAR 2015^PSYCHOLOGIE FRANCAISE^The purpose of this work is to show that a class inclusion network that makes explicit the hierarchy between concepts involved within a knowledge domain can be used to create school evaluations and to analyze the mistakes made by pupils, to show their consistency and to identify the determinants of this consistency. This idea is demonstrated by an experiment with 124 grade 4 pupils involved in a task of verb categorization after four learning sessions regarding verb conjugation. (C) 2014 Societe francaise de psychologie. Published by Elsevier Masson SAS. All rights reserved.
Defining social inclusion of people with intellectual and developmental disabilities: An ecological model of social networks and community participation^MAR 2015^RESEARCH IN DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^Social inclusion is an important goal for people with intellectual and developmental disabilities, families, service providers; and policymakers; however, the concept of social inclusion remains unclear, largely due to multiple and conflicting definitions in research and policy. We define social inclusion as the interaction between two major life domains: interpersonal relationships and community participation. We then propose an ecological model of social inclusion that includes individual, interpersonal, organizational, community, and socio-political factors. We identify four areas of research that our ecological model of social inclusion can move forward: (1) organizational implementation of social inclusion; (2) social inclusion of people with intellectual and developmental disabilities living with their families, (3) social inclusion of people along a broader spectrum of disability, and (4) the potential role of self-advocacy organizations in promoting social inclusion. (C) 2014 Published by Elsevier Ltd.
A structural equation model of the effects of diversity characteristics and inclusion on organizational outcomes in the child welfare workforce^MAR 2015^CHILDREN AND YOUTH SERVICES REVIEW^The purpose of this study was to investigate the effects of diversity characteristics and organizational inclusion on organizational outcomes (e.g., organizational commitment, job satisfaction, and intention to leave) among public child welfare workers. The study used secondary data collected from public child welfare workers across a diversified Mid-Atlantic state. Structural Equation Modeling (SEM) was used to test the conceptual model. The results indicated that workers' higher perceptions of inclusion resulted in significantly higher levels of organizational commitment and job satisfaction. Furthermore, higher levels of workers' organizational commitment played a role in significantly reducing their intention to leave. The findings of the study provide practical implications for enhancing diversity management and organizational commitment, including instituting more participative decision-making structures and processes, and creating more accessible organizational information networks. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Enablers and barriers of social inclusion for young adults with intellectual disability: A multidimensional view^JAN 2 2015^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL &amp; DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.467  </td>  <td>1.701</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
INCLUSION OF BUILDING INFORMATION MODELING IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF DIGITAL COMPETENCIES FOR THE BUILDING ENGINEERING DEGREE^2015^ICERI2015: 8TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^None
STAKEHOLDER COOPERATION FOR ICT (FOR) LEARNING AND INCLUSION WITH REGARD TO YOUTH EMPLOYABILITY AND ENTREPRENEURSHIP^2015^ICERI2015: 8TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^The project I-LINC aims at developing a platform for ICT (for) learning and inclusion with regard to enhancing youth employability and entrepreneurship by creating a common blended stakeholder platform and engaging in it a large number of stakeholders in a dialogue and participatory awareness process. The research done within the project aims at identifying the variety of actors and initiatives in the field of I-LINC (ICT, Youth, Learning, Inclusion, Employability and Entrepreneurship). In detail, we analyse actor constellations within networks and are particularly interested in cross-sector collaborations (e.g. cooperation between civil society, formal education, local governments and industry actors).
UNIVERSITY TUTORSHIP, STUDENT INCLUSION AND TRAINING STRATEGIES^2015^EDULEARN15: 7TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^None
E-inclusion modeling for blended e-learning course^2015^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMMUNICATIONS, MANAGEMENT, AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY (ICCMIT'2015)^This study addresses the e-inclusion problem that relates to the inclusion of as many individuals as possible enjoy benefits of information and communication technology. Despite the fact that European Union accepted inclusion declaration in 2006 which aims to reduce disparities that exist among individuals and to improve the of e-skills among people, nowadays e-inclusion problem still exists. Therefore it is necessary to find out approach to promote e-inclusion in society. We propose a more nuanced design approach that takes into account student's satisfaction with e-learning environment and e-materials, student's ability to learn, instructor willingness share knowledge and others factors. Moreover we believe that e-inclusion means not only high level of digital but also the usage of these digital skills to benefit from technologies. To obtain predictors for algorithms we inclusion data domain study based on knowledge management theory. The aim of proposed work is to present inclusion theoretical model which is based on integration of several algorithms as multiply linear regression cluster analysis. These algorithms were calculated based on statistical data obtained on evaluating a group of hundred blended e-course learners. In this paper we propose architecture designed to predict e-inclusion degree student based on machine learning and intelligent agent approach. We identified two main processes in the inclusion prediction system. The first process consists of agent learning activities. Intelligent agents learn the appropriate algorithm to predict e-inclusion degree of student based on linear regression or cluster analysis. second process includes activities to predict e-inclusion degree of student. This process covers analysis of inclusion risks and communication between student and instructor also. Proposed e-inclusion model consists of diagram, use cases diagrams and main algorithms of the system. As the result of the e-inclusion model is prediction of e-inclusion degree of person as well as e-inclusion risk factors for person, for instance inappropriate e-learning materials or no interest to learn, or dissatisfaction with e-learning environment, or others factors.
Older adults' understandings of social inclusion: Views from a healthy ageing community program^2015^JOURNAL OF SOCIAL INCLUSION^Keeping older adults over 65 years of age socially included is a challenge still being addressed. Older adults' views of feeling socially included and avoiding social exclusion and isolation are individual. This ethnographic study examines the views participants have about feeling socially included in their community when attending a community healthy ageing program in Brisbane, Australia. Niche studies of social inclusion in particular settings are valuable as alternatives to large studies, because of the diversity they offer in finding out what older adults identify as making them feel socially included. Data was collected by participant observation and focus groups, with supporting member checks and brief follow-up interviews. The main finding was that the program encouraged program participants to view themselves as feeling socially mobile, mainly because of access to information resources and to the human networks the program offered. Five concerns dominated the analysis where participants felt exclusion and isolation was an issue: transport, housing and living arrangements, health, crime and personal safety, and technology use. This paper contributes to the understanding of views of social inclusion in a particular setting and brings an awareness of the types of solutions a community program can bring to older adults to help keep them socially included.
Inclusion of high resolution MODIS maps on a 3D tropospheric water vapor GPS tomography model^2015^REMOTE SENSING OF CLOUDS AND THE ATMOSPHERE XX^Observing the water vapor distribution on the troposphere remains a challenge for the weather forecast. Radiosondes provide precise water vapor profiles of the troposphere, but lack geographical and temporal coverage, while satellite meteorological maps have good spatial resolution but even poorer temporal resolution. GPS has proved its capacity to measure the integrated water vapor in all weather conditions with high temporal sampling frequency. However these measurements lack a vertical water vapor discretization. Reconstruction of the slant path GPS observation to the satellite allows oblique water vapor measurements. Implementation of a 3D grid of voxels along the troposphere over an area where GPS stations are available enables the observation ray tracing. A relation between the water vapor density and the distanced traveled inside the voxels is established, defining GPS tomography. An inverse problem formulation is needed to obtain a water vapor solution. The combination of precipitable water vapor (PWV) maps obtained from MODIS satellite data with the GPS tomography is performed in this work. The MODIS PWV maps can have 1 or 5 km pixel resolution, being obtained 2 times per day in the same location at most. The inclusion of MODIS PWV maps provides an enhanced horizontal resolution for the tomographic solution and benefits the stability of the inversion problem. A 3D tomographic grid was adjusted over a regional area covering Lisbon, Portugal, where a GNSS network of 9 receivers is available. Radiosonde measurements in the area are used to evaluate the 3D water vapor tomography maps.
The Need to Foster Creativity and Digital Inclusion among Women Users in Developing Context - Addressing Second Order Digital Divide in Online Skills^2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES IN LEARNING^This paper provides a literature review aiming to discuss the need for fostering creativity and digital inclusion among women students in developing contexts by addressing the second order digital divide in online skills. As the literature review indicates, we are in the change towards creative society and creativity is the core competency of students to be mastered in the digital age. The digital technologies also provide conditions of developing creativity, for example, YouTube can be regarded as a creative platform. This paper also discusses the links between creativity, learning and knowledge, digital divide in developing contexts especially the second order digital divide as the main barrier to women students' learning. This further implies how to teach creativity more effectively in the future.
RESULTS OF THE TERRITORIAL STRATEGY FOR THE SOCIODIGITAL INCLUSION IN ANDALUSIA^2015^BOLETIN DE LA ASOCIACION DE GEOGRAFOS ESPANOLES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.598  </td>  <td>0.728</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Frequency, types and determinants of degenerative complications of type 2 diabetes in Morocco: "EpiDiaM" cohort inclusion data^2015^EASTERN MEDITERRANEAN HEALTH JOURNAL^Degenerative complications as a result of diabetes impose a heavy disease burden and increase mortality. This study presents epidemiological and clinical profiles of diabetic patients in the EpiDiaM cohort study, which include 1196 diabetic cases recruited from the basic health care network in the city of Fez. The mean age of the participants was 57.5 (SD 10.4) years with 47.1% aged between 50 and 60 years. The majority (77.7%) were women. The mean duration of diabetes was 8 (SD 6.6) years. Hypertension was found in 49.3% of the cohort, 77.9% were overweight or obese and 63.8% had one or more complications. Among those with complications, retinopathy was the most common (69.4%), followed by heart conditions (50.8%), neuropathy (45.6%) and renal disease (4.8%). The high prevalence of complications emphasizes the need to address the avoidable risk factors and prevent complications.
Housing and Socio-Spatial Inclusion^2015^SOCIAL INCLUSION^This special issue on housing and socio-spatial inclusion had its genesis in the 5th Housing Theory Symposium (HTS) on the theme of housing and space, held in Brisbane, Australia in 2013. In late 2013 we put out a call for papers in an attempt to collect an initial suite of theoretical and empirical scholarship on this theme. This collection of articles progresses our initial discussions about the theoretical implications of adding the "social" to the conceptual project of thinking through housing and space. We hope that this special issue will act as a springboard for a critical review of housing theory, which could locate housing at the centre of a much broader network of social and cultural practices across different temporal trajectories and spatial scales. This editorial presents an overview of the theoretical discussions at the HTS and summarises the six articles in this themed issue, which are: (1) The meaning of home in home birth experiences; (2) Reconceptualizing the "publicness" of public housing; (3) The provision of visitable housing in Australia; (4) The self-production of dwellings made by the Brazilian new middle class; (5) Innovative housing models and the struggle against social exclusion in cities; and (6) A theoretical and an empirical analysis of "poverty suburbanization".
Digital Inclusion for Older Adults based on Physical Activities: an Age Concern^2015^MEDINFO 2015: EHEALTH-ENABLED HEALTH^Nowadays, we are living in an interdependent and interconnected world during an age that is driven by technological progress. It has extraordinary potential to improve the quality of later life: creating social networks to tackle isolation and loneliness; transforming services to help people live independently at home for longer; empowering consumers; and enabling civil participation. In light of this, this poster aims to present the development process of a digital booklet for mobile devices - smartphones and tablets that illustrate the benefits of doing physical exercises for older adults aiming to improve life quality and minimizing digital exclusion.
The digital divide and social inclusion among refugee migrants A case in regional Australia^2015^INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY &amp; PEOPLE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.263  </td>  <td>2.477</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusion of Attentional Networks in the Pre-Surgical Neuroimaging Assessment of a Large Deep Hemispheric Cavernous Malformation: An fMRI Case Report^2015^CEREBROVASCULAR DISEASES^Background and Importance: Functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) is a noninvasive and reliable tool for mapping eloquent cortex in patients prior to brain surgery. Ensuring intact perceptual and cognitive processing is a key goal for neurosurgeons, and recent research has indicated the value of including attentional network processing in presurgical fMRI in order to help preserve such abilities, including reading, after surgery. Clinical Presentation: We report a 42-year-old patient with a large cavernous malformation, near the left basal ganglia. The lesion measured 3.8 x 1.7 x 1.8 cm. In consultation with the patient and the multidisciplinary cerebrovascular team, the decision was made to offer the patient surgical resection. The surgical resection involved planned access via the left superior parietal lobule using stereotactic location. The patient declined an awake craniotomy; therefore, direct electrocortical stimulation (ECS) could not be used for intraoperative language localization in this case. Pre-surgical planning included fMRI localization of language, motor, sensory, and attentional processing. The key finding was that both reading and attention-processing tasks revealed consistent activation of the left superior parietal lobule, part of the attentional control network, and the site of the planned surgical access. Given this information, surgical access was adjusted to avoid interference with the attentional control network. The lesion was removed via the left inferior parietal lobule. The patient had no new neurologic deficits postoperatively but did develop mild neuropathic pain in the left hand. Conclusion: This case report supports recent research that indicates the value of including fMRI maps of attentional tasks along with traditional language-processing tasks in preoperative planning in patients undergoing neurosurgery procedures. (C) 2015 S. Karger AG, Basel
INTER-INSTITUTIONAL COLLABORATION IN RESPONSE TO THE CHALLENGE OF SOCIO-EDUCATIONAL INCLUSION. ANALYSIS OF 4 TERRITORIAL NETWORKING EXPERIENCES IN CATALONIA^2015^EDUCACION XX1^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.597  </td>  <td>1.583</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Bilateral and Trilateral Natural Resource and Biodiversity Governance in North America: Organizations, Networks, and Inclusion^JAN 2015^REVIEW OF POLICY RESEARCH^This special issue represents an assessment of international organizations and transboundary networks governing natural resource and biodiversity issues in and among Canada, Mexico, and the United States. The management of natural resources and protection of biodiversity is a highly technocratic process requiring collaboration and information sharing among a diversity of actors to facilitate the development and coordination of policy addressing complex and multisectoral issues. Numerous bilateral and trilateral organizations exist to ostensibly facilitate transboundary governance, yet the scholarly knowledge of their respective roles has many gaps. In this introductory article, we propose a typology of international environmental organizations based on two dimensions: (1) whether their activities center primarily on capacity building or regulation, and (2) the extent to which they exemplify the bureaucratic or post-bureaucratic model of governance. Using this typology we provide an overview of the special issue's contributions in terms of their assessment of North American bilateral and trilateral environmental organizations and transboundary networks.
Governance, inclusion and trust in Singapore, Hong Kong and Macao^2015^ASIAN EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^None
BOTH SIDES OF THE STORY Assessing audience participation in journalism through the concept of inclusion distance^2015^DIGITAL JOURNALISM^While digital networked media contribute to a substantial shift in the relationship between journalists and their audiences, current research still largely focuses on one side or the other. This paper aims to overcome this conceptual and empirical deficit by presenting findings from two case studies on German news journalism (a daily TV newscast and a weekly political talk show). They operationalize the concept of inclusion distance, which aims at the (in-) congruence of mutual expectations between journalists and audience members, in a series of standardized surveys among newsroom staff as well as their online users. The paper introduces three different comparative dimensions which this study design affords and illustrates them with findings (1) on journalistic role conceptions and (2) the (assumed) motivations for participation. Besides demonstrating the value of such a multi-level comparison, our findings also provide substantial and nuanced evidence concerning the relation between journalists and their audiences: in both cases we find high congruence regarding the importance of traditional journalistic tasks such as objective reporting on complex issues, while the inclusion distance is larger for tasks connected to new participatory practices such as opportunities for user-generated content. Regarding motivations for participation, we find a somewhat larger inclusion distance as journalists of both newsrooms overestimate emotional or self-directed goals, but underestimate the wish for expanding knowledge as reasons why users participate.
Global Alumni Networks: The Inclusion of Fellow Experts from Developing Countries in Epistemic Communities^2015^FORUM FOR DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^One significant and often overlooked outcome of technical assistance and overseas capacity development programmes is the inclusion of experts from developing countries in epistemic communities. The main argument of this article is that the formal network structure offered to alumni of Japanese technical assistance and capacity development programmes has provided experts from developing countries access to epistemic communities since the early 1960s. This exploration of an alternative way of understanding capacity development programmes shows how alumni have made the networks global by using the Japanese network structure responding to the multilateral United Nations Expanded Programme for Technical Assistance framework, which enables South-South and South-North connections.
The implications of 'naming' on Roma and Sinti right to education and social inclusion: an ethnography of education among a Sinti family network^2015^INTERCULTURAL EDUCATION^Acknowledging the European political commitment to Roma education and the research in this field, my article deals with the experience of education of a Sinti 'minority' (The terms 'minority' and 'majority' will be used in this article, according to the meaning that is given to them within Anthropology and Education studies (cf.). The inverted commas are used to note that they are categories, used with the aim of a clearer explanation for the present text but not necessarily showing the complexity of the social and cultural contexts observed) in northern Italy. The study presents an interpretation of the observations collected during 21 months of ethnographic research among a Sinti family network and in a multicultural middle school, attended by their teenage children in Trent. The ethnographic interpretations point out how the languages and communication codes used within schools partly reproduce the asymmetric power relationships that exist between Roma and Sinti 'ethnic minorities' and the Italian so-called majority society. The process of 'naming' the 'other' plays a crucial role in this analysis, as it shows how meanings are imposed and handled in the relationship between institutions, 'groups' and individuals. Consequently, this process highlights the important role of anthropologists in pointing out the 'emic' and 'etic' (The concepts of 'emic' and 'etic' were coined in 1954 by the linguist Kenneth Pike and then used by anthropologists. 'Emic' refers to the 'insiders' points of view on their cultures, and 'etic' refers to the 'outsiders' accounts on cultures that are not their own) dimensions of every culture. Furthermore, the study's methodology testifies to the author's choice of pursuing an 'engaged anthropology'. Finally, the relevance of the concept of propriospect will be stressed as a means to interpret educational and cultural processes in which the subjects actively take part, with particular attention to young Sinti and their peer groups.
SPORT FOR ALL EDUCATION AS A PROPOSAL FOR INCLUSION AND SOCIAL SUSTAINABILITY^2015^REVISTA FUENTES^INTRODUCTION. This article analyzes a program called Deporte para todos (Sport for All), which is developed in the French city of Montpellier. The study is performed in L' Herault Sport. This is an organization associated with the General Council of l'herault and member of the Heraultgroup, that supports all the sports movement of the French Department. METHOD. Through a descriptive research and based on five variables (gender, relationship of the involved sectors, community development, public policies and training of monitors and volunteers), we question the development of the program of "Sport for All" as a tool for the social inclusion. RESULTS. The first results presented correspond to the analysis around the five variables, showing the potential of the programme and the need to deepen in the variables of study for the construction of a real program that promotes good living through sport. CONCLUSIONS. Future lines of research target new research that make possible an improvement in the participation of girls and women as professional in the program, networking among the involved sectors that favors an integrated and systemic model of work, a personal and professional training for the monitor and the volunteer, a sustained public policy commitment and as a result the development of the community's study as an educational space that consolidates the good live.
Potentials for prosperity without growth: Ecological sustainability, social inclusion and the quality of life in 38 countries^DEC 2014^ECOLOGICAL ECONOMICS^Recent contributions to ecological economics and related social sciences indicate that issues such as climate change, resource depletion and environmental degradation cannot be effectively addressed under conditions of continued economic growth. This paper aims at empirically identifying structural potentials and policy challenges for prosperity at scales where economic development remains within ecological carrying capacities. Building on the growing literature that interprets prosperity 'beyond' economic growth, the paper presents a three-dimensional concept to operationalise prosperity in terms of ecological sustainability, social inclusion, and the quality of life. These dimensions are measured using data from sources such as The World Bank, the Global Footprint Network and the OECD. The results of cluster and correspondence analyses indicate the existence of five 'prosperity regimes' and demonstrate that all aspects of prosperity - including (unsatisfactory) ecological performance - are linked to economic development. However, our findings also indicate that in order to achieve a decent minimum of prosperity moderate levels of the material living standard are sufficient Further increases in the material living standard do not lead to significant additional prosperity; instead they cause greater environmental harms. The paper concludes by highlighting potentials for prosperity for each of the 'prosperity regimes' and corresponding policy challenges. (C) 2014 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
EVALUATION OF METHODS FOR THE INCLUSION OF REAL WORLD EVIDENCE IN NETWORK META-ANALYSIS - A CASE STUDY IN MULTIPLE SCLEROSIS^NOV 2014^VALUE IN HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.037  </td>  <td>6.131</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Missing in action: inclusion and exclusion in the first days of AIDS in The Netherlands^NOV 2014^SOCIOLOGY OF HEALTH &amp; ILLNESS^Approaches combining social and political theory with ontology have rarely been utilised in the evaluation of decision-making processes. Drawing on such an approach clarifies the questions that still need to be asked about the policy response to HIV/AIDS in The Netherlands in the early 1980s. The initial response in The Netherlands is internationally regarded as an example of successful cooperation between public authorities, health organisations, blood banks and the gay movement. In comparison with other countries, deeply dividing social conflicts as well as dramatic medical disasters were avoided. This image, however, is misleading. Although it was on a smaller scale than the disasters with contaminated blood products in other countries, The Netherlands had their blood scandal too. A reconstruction of this episode offers the opportunity to evaluate the role objects are granted in theories of institutionalisation and to critically examine the procedural notion of politics in actor network theory. The aim of the article is to show that analyses of decision-making processes under conditions of uncertainty ought to engage more carefully with processes of exclusion and the transformative role of objects.
How heterogeneous community engage newcomers? The effect of community diversity on newcomers' perception of inclusion: An empirical study in social media service^OCT 2014^COMPUTERS IN HUMAN BEHAVIOR^Online communities that provide social media services need to engage newcomers so as to not lose them to competitors. This study examines the role of community diversity (in terms of perceived visible dissimilarity, perceived informational dissimilarity and perceived value dissimilarity) in influencing perceived inclusion of newcomers in the online community and the influence of such perception on newcomers' engagement intention. The theoretical background on perceived inclusion is obtained from the optimal distinctiveness theory, which comprises of two dimensions, namely, social identification and perceived uniqueness. The results support the multiple roles of community diversity on a newcomer's perceived inclusion. The findings of this study contribute to a better understanding of the effect of community diversity on newcomers' engagement behavior, and provide recommendations on designing a personalized community diversity environment. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Combining image analysis and modular neural networks for classification of mineral inclusions and pores in archaeological potsherds^OCT 2014^JOURNAL OF ARCHAEOLOGICAL SCIENCE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.03  </td>  <td>3.291</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Community-based Men's Sheds: promoting male health, wellbeing and social inclusion in an international context^SEP 2014^HEALTH PROMOTION INTERNATIONAL^Males experience greater mortality and morbidity than females in most Western countries. The Australian and Irish National Male Health Policies aim to develop a framework to address this gendered health disparity. Men's Sheds have a distinct community development philosophy and are thus identified in both policies as an ideal location to address social isolation and positively impact the health and wellbeing of males who attend. The aim of this international cross-sectional survey was to gather information about Men's Sheds, the people who attend Men's Sheds, the activities at Men's Sheds, and the social and health dimensions of Men's Sheds. Results demonstrate that Men's Sheds are contributing a dual health and social role for a range of male subgroups. In particular, Men's Sheds have an outward social focus, supporting the social and mental health needs of men; health promotion and health literacy are key features of Men's Sheds. Men's Sheds have an important role to play in addressing the gendered health disparity that males face. They serve as an exemplar to health promotion professionals of a community development context where the aims of male health policy can be actualized as one part of a wider suite of global initiatives to reduce the gendered health disparity.
Inclusion of task dependence in human reliability analysis^AUG 2014^RELIABILITY ENGINEERING &amp; SYSTEM SAFETY^Dependence assessment among human errors in human reliability analysis (HRA) is an important issue, which includes the evaluation of the dependence among human tasks and the effect of the dependence on the final human error probability (HEP). This paper represents a computational model to handle dependence in human reliability analysis. The aim of the study is to automatically provide conclusions on the overall degree of dependence and calculate the conditional human error probability (CHEP) once the judgments of the input factors are given. The dependence influencing factors are first identified by the experts and the priorities of these factors are also taken into consideration. Anchors and qualitative labels are provided as guidance for the HRA analyst's judgment of the input factors. The overall degree of dependence between human failure events is calculated based on the input values and the weights of the input factors. Finally, the CHEP is obtained according to a computing formula derived from the technique for human error rate prediction (THERP) method. The proposed method is able to quantify the subjective judgment from the experts and improve the transparency in the HEP evaluation process. Two examples are illustrated to show the effectiveness and the flexibility of the proposed method. (C) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Lessons Learned from Community Organizations: Inclusion of People with Disabilities and Others^JUL 2014^BRITISH JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT^Workforce diversity requires broader vision and scope in managing diversity so that there is greater inclusion inside and outside organizations. This paper provides this vision by extending the stream of workforce diversity research to community-oriented inclusion and its processes. The authors interviewed 34 people with disabilities and 40 people without disabilities who were stakeholders of community arts and sports organizations. The participants with disabilities were mainly arts audiences, artists and sports athletes, and the participants without disabilities were mainly managers and government officials. The key findings report the importance of inclusion through common interest groups being facilitated by (1) non-minority specific communal activities, (2) listening to minority voices, (3) multidimensional accessibility, (4) availability of organizational and natural champions and (5) cross-boundary networks and collaborations. In order to create more inclusive organizations, the authors suggest that private organizations need more community-oriented values, goals and strategies that foster boundaryless inclusion of people with disabilities and other minority groups in organizations and society.
Community-based social inclusion in urban neighbourhoods of adult citizens with intellectual disability and citizens with psychiatric problems: contribution of informal networks^JUL 2014^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
How involved are they really? A comparative network analysis of the institutional drivers of local actor inclusion^JUL 2014^LAND USE POLICY^Different socio-economic and environmental drivers lead local communities in mountain regions to adapt land use practices and engage in protection policies. The political system also has to develop new approaches to adapt to those drivers. Local actors are the target group of those policy approaches, and the question arises of if and how much those actors are consulted or even integrated into the design of local land use and protection policies. This article addresses this question by comparing seven different case studies in Swiss mountain regions. Through a formal social network analysis, the inclusion of local actors in collaborative policy networks is investigated and compared to the involvement of other stakeholders representing the next higher sub-national or national decisional levels. Results show that there is a significant difference (1) in how local actors are embedded compared to other stakeholders; and (2) between top-down versus bottom-up designed policy processes. (c) 2014 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
How involved are they really? A comparative network analysis of the institutional drivers of local actor inclusion Reply^JUL 2014^LAND USE POLICY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.573  </td>  <td>4.236</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Between clients and bureaucrats: An ambivalent position of NGOs in the social inclusion agenda in Czech statutory cities^JUN 2014^POLICY AND SOCIETY^This paper examines the landscape of policy work conducted by NGOs with respect to the social inclusion agenda. Based on a qualitative case study of integration policy in a Czech city, the paper focuses on the relations between collaborative and critical policy work of NGOs. In this case, while the collaborative position is mainly justified by apolitical expertise, long-term professional experience and compliance with official standards of social work, the latter calls upon community-based knowledge and political participation. We argue that despite indisputable long-term benefits of collaborative policy work it includes risks of paternalism, accountability deficit and exclusiveness. These risks become more significant with increasing shared understanding and mutual interdependence. In this situation there is a room for the episodic external critical capacity to challenge the governance structure and enforce the accountability of collaborative networks. (C) 2014 Published by Elsevier Ltd on behalf of Policy and Society Associates (APSS).
Who's in and who's out? Inclusion and exclusion in Canterbury's freshwater governance^APR 2014^NEW ZEALAND GEOGRAPHER^The question of who is included, or who is excluded, from environmental governance arrangements is at the heart of debates of institutional legitimacy. The recent redefinition of representation as a claim to speak for' another provides an opportunity to re-examine the inclusiveness of environmental governance arrangements. This article builds on these developments by empirically evaluating the inclusiveness of three representative claims embedded in freshwater governance in Canterbury since 2002. The contribution argues that accounts of environmental governance must consider implicit forms of representation that can exclude or marginalise and raises some caveats relating to expansion of network governance.
ICT-supported learning for inclusion of people with special needs: Review of seven educational technology journals, 1970-2011^MAR 2014^BRITISH JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL TECHNOLOGY^Research and development of information and communication technology (ICT)-supported learning for people with disabilities has not received adequate attention. It is also difficult to access research findings and developments in this field. Under the ENABLE Network of ICT Supported Learning for Disabled People (2011-2014) project, an emerging European Union reference point portal for end-users will provide this information for a broad audience. In the design phase of the project idea, the authors of this paper conducted a review of papers indexed in Web of Science to provide a needs assessment and a design template for the project objectives. The results of the search clearly showed that ICT-supported learning for people with special educational needs is in the domain of the educational technology journals, with more papers published in the British Journal of Educational Technology than in any other journal. This paper presents the results of a content analysis of all papers published from 1970 to 2011 in seven educational technology journals indexed in Web of Science. More papers were published from 2006 to 2011 (44.7%) than during any other of five periods examined. Findings in terms of ICT intervention, disability groups, groups of study participants by relationship with ICT, and research design, together with trends in published studies in terms of mainstreaming and inclusion, are presented. The main objective of the study was to identify the level of inclusion through analysis of educational context (special schools [30.51%], mainstream schools [28.81%] and general support for life [40.68%]). Based on content analysis, ICT interventions were classified into the two categories of technical intervention in the pedagogical context (62.71% of all papers published) and technical intervention in the wider context (37.29% of all papers published), with nine paper types identified: papers on ICT access, papers on teaching and learning methods, papers on development and testing of ICT solutions, reviews, assessments, papers on inclusion, papers on behavioural and social development, papers on use of information technology and papers on interaction. Papers were also categorised according to types of disability and according to groups of study participants by relationship with ICT. Published papers were divided into four categories by research design: descriptive (49.15%), developmental (26.27%), experimental (17.8%), and developmental and experimental (6.78%). During the period from 1970 to 2000, papers examined design of learning materials with regard to particular categories of disability and particular accessibility needs, while papers published after 2000 also discussed universal design. Based on the review, the authors of this paper have identified a need for application of universal design principles in research and development of learning environments to provide equal accessibility and inclusive education.
The impact of psychosis on social inclusion and associated factors^MAR 2014^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL PSYCHIATRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.37  </td>  <td>1.778</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Advancing social inclusion in the neighbourhood for people with an intellectual disability: an exploration of the literature^FEB 7 2014^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^The shift from segregated facilities to community settings did not automatically lead to social inclusion for people with an intellectual disability (ID). Policies are increasingly decentralized but little is known about the factors that are important to realize social inclusion in the neighbourhood. This literature study identifies five domains barriers and facilitators for social inclusion in the neighbourhood: individual characteristics, informal network, professional care, neighbourhood characteristics, and government policies. The findings suggest that social inclusion in the neighbourhood is a dynamic process that shows a series of complex interactions between environmental factors and personal characteristics to provide opportunities for people with an ID. It is recommended to include the perspectives of people with an ID and other neighbourhood residents in future research on social inclusion. Specific attention is needed for the role of neighbourhood social capital in achieving social inclusion in the neighbourhood.
Regulating Inclusion: Spatial Form, Social Process, and the Normalization of Cycling Practice in the USA^JAN 2 2014^MOBILITIES^In recent years, bicycle infrastructure has been emerged as a valued part of urban development policy in many American cities, and a process that depends on the normalization of cycling practice in three respects. First, the various less confrontational' mutations of Critical Mass have redefined the politics of cycling in cultural and consumerist terms. Second, this bike culture' is mediated through Internet networks that generate concepts of proper cycling practice. Third, both spatial models and standards of correct' ridership circulate through these networks, linking bike culture' to institutional networks of implementation. While positive from the standpoint of increased ridership, this may reinscribe the exclusions that are constitutive of the contemporary American city and may limit cycling's egalitarian potential.
KNOWLEDGE-DRIVEN IMAGE MINING SYSTEM FOR BIG EARTH OBSERVATION DATA FUSION: GIS MAPS INCLUSION IN ACTIVE LEARNING STAGE^2014^2014 IEEE INTERNATIONAL GEOSCIENCE AND REMOTE SENSING SYMPOSIUM (IGARSS)^In this paper, we present an accelerated knowledge-driven content-based information mining system for Big Earth Observation data fusion. The tool combines, at pixel level, the unsupervised clustering results of different number of features. The features, extracted from different EO raster image types and from existing GIS vector maps, are combined, in form of a BoW, with a user given semantic concepts in order to calculate the posterior probability that allows the final search. The inclusion of GIS data during the active learning, based on Bayesian networks, accelerate the definition processes of semantic labels and retrieve the related images with only a few user interactions. The inclusion of GIS data in conjunction with the recently introduced search algorithm have as a result a system which greatly optimizes the computational costs and over performs existing similar systems in various orders of magnitude.
Reduced Recursive Inclusion-exclusion Principle for the Probability of Union Events^2014^2014 IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON INDUSTRIAL ENGINEERING AND ENGINEERING MANAGEMENT (IEEM)^The probability of union events is always important in management science. Many real life applications use such probability in their core implementations. The most popular method to calculate the probability of union events is the Inclusion-Exclusion Principle (IEP), which originates from the idea of Abraham de Moivre (1718). However, the computation complexity is exact O(2(n)), and no matter what the events are, the complexity order can not be decreased. A much efficient method namely Recursive Inclusion-Exclusion Principle (RIEP) was constructed by rearranging its equation to its recursive form. The computation complexity is also O(2(n)) in the worse cases, but it usually has 10 times efficiency than IEP in the normal cases. This paper proposed a novel reduction method for the RIEP to calculate the probability of union events, which can obtain over 100 times efficiency than RIEP in normal cases, and in the worse cases, it has at least the same complexity as that of RIEP. Some benchmarks on network reliability applications show that the proposed approach is very efficient.
Inclusion of Socio-Economic Indicators in the Cost Modeling of a WAN Network^2014^2014 SIXTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTATIONAL INTELLIGENCE, COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS AND NETWORKS (CICSYN)^The most important stages in designing a computer network in a wider geographical area include: definition of requirements, topological description, identification and calculation of relevant parameters (i.e. traffic matrix), determining the shortest paths between nodes, quantification of the effect of various levels of technical and technological development of urban areas involved, the cost of technology, and the cost of services. These parameters differ for WAN networks in different regions - their calculation depends directly on the data "on the ground": number of inhabitants, distance between populated areas, density of network traffic, as well as available bandwidth. However, behavioral interactions of individuals and groups play a significant role and have to be taken into consideration by employing either simple or composite indicators of socioeconomic status. In this paper, we propose the inclusion of a composite socioeconomic indicator in the cost-modeling of a WAN network, as a linear sum of products of weights and several measures of labor status and/or education.
Educating the Educators Involved in Homebound Training and Work Inclusion Network and Mobile Technology for Online Training and Smart Work^2014^2014 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION TECHNOLOGIES AND COMPUTERS (ICETC)^None
Society@school: Towards an e-Inclusion App for Social Reading^2014^LEARNING AND COLLABORATION TECHNOLOGIES: TECHNOLOGY-RICH ENVIRONMENTS FOR LEARNING AND COLLABORATION, PT II^Society@school, a Telecom-Italia Social Reading application designed as a tool for education (presented in its first version at HCI International 2013) turned out to be a useful tool for students with Specific Learning Disabilities (SLD). Social reading could be a way to compensate some SLD, such as dyslexia, allowing a real inclusion of these students in the school system. The design process, aimed at including specific design requirements for SLD students with a user-centered design approach, is presented.
Benefits and Challenges of Combining Automated and User Testing to Enhance e-Accessibility - The European Internet Inclusion Initiative^2014^COMPUTERS HELPING PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, ICCHP 2014, PT I^The European Internet Inclusion Initiative (EIII) presents a new approach by combining the benefits of automated and user testing in order to improve both the quality and the coverage of evaluation results. This paper provides an overview of the challenges posed by online accessibility assessment and outlines the initial steps towards the combination of automated and user testing in the form of crowd sourcing.
Capability, work and social inclusion^2014^5TH WORLD CONFERENCE ON EDUCATIONAL SCIENCES^None
Public Libraries - Facilitators of Information Society and e-Inclusion in Latvia^2014^2ND WORLD CONFERENCE ON BUSINESS, ECONOMICS AND MANAGEMENT^The economic growth and national competitiveness is closely correlated with the development of information society. In the last few years the role of public libraries has significantly increased and libraries have greatly contributed to the improvement of information society in Latvia. The usage of library services had never been as high as they were in 2011 - 42% of the population were active library users and 90% of them used the Internet. Nowadays, the public library network in Latvia provides a powerful network of information, knowledge and community centres and they are highly demanded by society. (C) 2014 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd.
EQUAL OPPORTUNITIES TO SOCIAL INCLUSION FOR AUTISTIC CHILDREN^2014^ICERI2014: 7TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^None
PREVENTING INITIAL VET DROPOUTS AND FOSTERING TRAINEE'S INCLUSION THROUGH EARLY DETECTION STRATEGIES - THE IN-VET PROJECT^2014^ICERI2014: 7TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^None
Relationships and Connectedness: Weak Ties that Help Social Inclusion Through Public Access Computing^OCT 1 2013^INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY FOR DEVELOPMENT^Of all the benefits public access to computers (PAC) offer users, the most valued by users are having more information for stronger relationships, better learning, and effective transactions. This article analyzes the most salient benefit, more information for stronger relationships with friends and family. Results of a qualitative study among users of libraries, telecenters, and cybercafes in Colombia, South America, show that social media and personal relationships can also have an important community and sociopolitical dimension. By fostering a sense of belonging and connectedness to community and to a larger world, PAC usage often leads to feelings of empowerment and development of social capital, two intangible factors that are critical for community development. This study used a mixed-methods approach, combining surveys and interviews in five regions of the country, to uncover the benefits of PAC for underserved communities. Its findings contribute new insight about the impact of information and communication technologies on community development and social inclusion.
A critical review of structural system control by the large-scaled neural network linear-deferential-inclusion-based criterion^AUG 2013^JOURNAL OF VIBRATION AND CONTROL^The objective of this paper is to review some important progress in structural system control and then derive an artificial algorithm for the solution of stability problems. In this study, a closed-form, easy-to-use fuzzy control method for large-scaled structural systems is developed. First, the structural systems are reviewed and large-scaled schemes are employed to represent the structural systems. The representation of the large-scaled systems consists of J large-scaled subsystems. The neural network modeling and the LDI (linear deferential inclusion) are recalled to represent a large-scaled structural system and a novel stability criterion can be derived via Lyapunov direct methods.
THE LIMITS OF TECHNOLOGY: Social class, occupation and digital inclusion in the city of Sunderland, England^AUG 1 2013^INFORMATION COMMUNICATION &amp; SOCIETY^Drawing upon the concept of capital and its uneven distribution, as outlined by Bourdieu, the article highlights the importance of social class, occupational status and place in understanding how individuals and communities make use of and benefit from technology in their everyday lives. Based upon quantitative and qualitative research conducted in the city of Sunderland, England, the article addresses the extent and manner to which those in socially excluded' areas of the city engage with technology, specifically personal computers and the internet and the impact of such engagement upon quality of life and social inclusion. The research indicates that the manner in which technology is experienced by marginalized social groups in this place, does not fit neatly with a dominant discourse of digital inclusion which emphasizes technology as a means for social inclusion, particularly in the realms of civic participation, educational achievement and employment.
Social inclusion of individuals with mental health problems: building social networks in everyday life^JUL 2013^CIENCIA &amp; SAUDE COLETIVA^The support of social networks is a fundamental aspect for the social inclusion of people with mental health problems. This study seeks to identify and analyze the difficulties and possibilities of users of a Psychosocial Care Center (CAPS) in building their extended social network. The qualitative approach was used as the research methodology and Agnes Heller's concept about everyday life was used as a philosophical benchmark. The subjects in this investigation were frequenters of Psychosocial Care Centers with people from their social network. Semi-structured interviews were conducted for the data gathering and discourse analysis was used for examining the data. It was seen that although this population is living in the community it is frequently segregated and isolated from living together with other people, thereby leading to social exclusion. Nevertheless, CAPS are a space of belonging and welcoming that undeniably produce favorable changes in the users' lives. People with mental health problems have also been able to relate to others in CAPS. By using the available opportunities, they make new friends and maintain friendships they already had. Living with others in the community is highly conducive to the formation of relationships.
Target-driven reforms: Education for All and the translations of equity and inclusion in India^MAY 1 2013^JOURNAL OF EDUCATION POLICY^This paper critically examines the ways in which inclusion and equity are constituted through education development policies in India. Programmes implemented under global and national Education for All (EFA) policies have largely involved the quantification of equity' whereby schooling processes are measured against broad targets for school outcomes focused mainly on student attendance, retention and academic achievement. Drawing on perspectives from Actor Network Theory, the paper puts forward the view of development reforms as networks of translation' in order to trace the shifts and vicissitudes of educational ideals. Reporting on ethnographic data of two reforms in the south Indian state of Karnataka, we show how narrow understandings of equity are produced through target-driven approaches to EFA. In doing so, the paper highlights the performative effects of education development policy and its potentially counterproductive consequences in contexts of poverty and marginalisation.
Evaluation model of e-inclusion for Colombian context: border zone case^2013^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON INFORMATION SOCIETY (I-SOCIETY 2013)^This paper presents the application of an evaluation model of e-inclusion in the Colombian border zone. To obtain the results, the research methodology proposed in the evaluation model of e-inclusion was used. It is composed by three stages: i) determine the application context, ii) data collection and iii) generation of reports and analysis. The main results were: to identify that 33.4% of population under study had vulnerable condition but despite their condition they were included in information society. Also, his work allows analyzing in detail the aspects that are considered in the measurement of e-inclusion, such as: access computing devices, Internet access, digital skills, motivational aspects for access Internet; and knowledge and use of service and products available on Internet. The results show that the evaluation model proposed allows obtaining and analyzing information for understand the e-inclusion process considering individual characteristics and particularities of Colombian context.
Reflections on enhancing pre-service teacher education programmes to support inclusion: perspectives from New Zealand and Australia^2013^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SPECIAL NEEDS EDUCATION^Positive changes to pre-service teacher education programmes (PSTEPs), driven in part by changing worldwide policy frameworks around inclusion, are occurring, albeit slowly. After briefly reviewing international trends and key policy and legislation platforms in New Zealand and Australia, this paper explores some of the challenges in enhancing PSTEPs to take on more inclusive perspectives and content. Examples of innovative changes in one programme in New Zealand and one in Australia are then described and discussed, particularly around how these changes seek to address these challenges. Some key facilitators for enhancing PSTEPs are put forward, namely positioning and embedding policy and practice in national and international contexts; embracing practices; working with the broader education faculty around the integration of course structures and content; listening to the views of practicing teachers; exploring pre-service teachers' values, beliefs, attitudes, knowledge and concerns about engaging with and teaching students with diverse learning needs; building evidence-based programming and instructional knowledge, skills and practices for effective differentiation and adjustments; contributing to authentic mentoring networks; and encouraging professional development planning.
Strategies for Digital Inclusion - Towards a Pedagogy for Embracing Student Diversity With Online Learning^2013^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 12TH EUROPEAN CONFERENCE ON E-LEARNING (ECEL 2013)^This paper presents an early stage PhD research study that aims to develop a conceptual framework for effective learning approaches that influence digital inclusion and exclusion of diverse students. The study will move away from the traditional definitions of diversity and explore the different characteristics of diverse learners in a modern-day setting using up-to-date technology. It will attempt to highlight factors that affect the experiences of online students and to offer practical guidelines for educators who are concerned with technology enhanced learning spaces in Higher Education (HE), and extends to adult education, training providers and further education. The findings could also impact on and benefit diverse learners by proposing strategies that facilitate individualised, needs tailored learning, particularly on blended learning programmes. A mixed methods study will evolve through two distinct phases: Phase 1 will draw on narratives using semi-structured interviews and a full review of the literature, publications and journal articles. This will serve not only to explore the many characteristics of diverse students but also investigate current and emerging pedagogies in the field of educational research; Phase 2 will build on the findings from Phase 1. The findings will be restructured to generate a conceptual framework. A full evaluation will take place to test the reliability and validity of the framework with other diverse student groups and teachers by administering an online questionnaire survey. The focus of this paper is to outline the background, current literature, objectives and methodology of the research and to discuss the next steps. At the time of writing, a Pilot Study has been completed and the primary research is at the early stages of data collection. The Pilot Study resulted in a need to re-word and re-order the interview questions to gain richer data from the sample which is now being implemented in the interview process. It is anticipated that Phase 1 analysis will be completed by October 2013.
Inclusion of Underserved Racial and Ethnic Groups in Cancer Intervention Research Using New Media: A Systematic Literature Review^2013^Journal of the National Cancer Institute Monographs^Background An increasing number of behavioral and psychosocial cancer interventions incorporate new media elements that are digital, networked, and interactive. However, it is unclear to what extent new media is being leveraged to benefit underserved racial and ethnic groups who disproportionately bear the burden of cancer. This inquiry is timely in light of growing evidence that these groups are receptive to new media. A systematic literature review was conducted to assess the inclusion of these groups in research on cancer-related new media interventions and use of new media to reduce racial and ethnic cancer disparities.Methods A systematic search of three databases was conducted for articles published between January 2000 and March 2012 that presented studies of user experience with a behavioral or psychosocial cancer-related intervention with at least one new media component.Results Thirty-six articles were included in the final review. In about one-quarter of the studies, less than 20% of participants were African American, Latino, Asian American, or American Indian. In less than 10% of the studies, 80% or more of the samples were members of the aforementioned groups. Almost one-third of the studies reviewed were categorized as disparity focused but limited data were available on racial and ethnic differences in responses to new media interventions.Conclusions Findings suggest that the promise and potential of new media cancer interventions are largely unrealized among the underserved. Additional research is needed to investigate a wide range of issues related to the development and delivery of such interventions in diverse racial and ethnic groups.
Digital Proficiency and Digital Inclusion: Comparison between students of computer science, public relations and engineering^2013^2013 IEEE GLOBAL ENGINEERING EDUCATION CONFERENCE (EDUCON)^New information and communication technologies may be useful for providing more in-depth knowledge to students in many ways, whether through online multimedia educational material, or through online debates with colleagues, teachers and other area professionals in a synchronous or asynchronous manner. This paper focuses on participation in online discussion in e-learning courses for promoting learning. Although an important theoretical aspect, an analysis of literature reveals there are few studies evaluating the personal and social aspects of online course users in a quantitative manner. This paper aims to introduce a method for diagnosing inclusion and digital proficiency and other personal aspects of the student through a case study comparing Information System, Public Relations and Engineering students at a public university in Brazil. Statistical analysis and analysis of variances (ANOVA) were used as the methodology for data analysis in order to understand existing relations between the components of the proposed method. The survey methodology was also used, in its online format, as a research instrument. The method is based on using online questionnaires that diagnose digital proficiency and time management, level of extroversion and social skills of the students. According to the sample studied, there is no strong correlation between digital proficiency and individual characteristics tied to the use of time, level of extroversion and social skills of students. The differences in course grades for some components are partly due to subject "Introduction to Economics" being offered to freshmen in Public Relations, whereas subject "Economics in Engineering" is offered in the final semesters of Engineering and Information Systems courses. Therefore, the difference could be more tied to the respondent's age than to the course. Information Systems students were observed to be older, with access to computers and Internet at the workplace, compared to the other students who access the Internet more often from home. This paper presents a pilot study aimed at conducting a diagnosis that permits proposing actions for information and communication technology to contribute towards student education. Three levels of digital inclusion are described as a scale to measure whether information technology increases personal performance and professional knowledge and skills. This study may be useful for other readers interested in themes related to education in engineering.
Improved DOT reconstruction by estimating the inclusion location using artificial neural network^2013^MEDICAL IMAGING 2013: PHYSICS OF MEDICAL IMAGING^Diffuse optical tomography (DOT), a noninvasive imaging modality, uses near infrared light to illuminate the tissue and reconstructs the optical parameters of the tissue from the intensity measurements at the surface. Here continuous wave measurement with improved localization is proposed to make the overall instrument inexpensive. Due to the non-unique solution of the inverse problem, prior information improves the resolution of the reconstructed image. An artificial neural network (ANN) based approach is developed to obtain the location of the inclusion. The peak amplitude, 50% and 10% bandwidth and their corresponding source-detector angles of the difference intensity plot with and without the inclusion are taken as the input. The offset distance between the source and centre of inclusion, the angle with x-axis, sample and inclusion radii are the output of the 2 layered error back propagation neural network. Least square optimization with regularization term is used to minimize the mean squared error for image reconstruction. The optical parameters are updated using the prior information from the ANN. The parameters present in double the region of detected area only are updated. The performance of the proposed method has been assessed quantitatively by computing the mean square error, object centroid error and misclassification ratio. The use of prior improves the convergence and reduces the presence of ghost or noise. Hence the proposed method shows potential to improve DOT reconstruction.
Social economy - means of social inclusion of Roma^2013^FOURTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE PSYCHO-SOCIAL PERSPECTIVES IN THE QUASI-COERCIVE TREATMENT OF OFFENDERS: SOCIAL CONTROL AND VULNERABLE GROUPS (SPECTO 2013)^This paper intends to list the main social and economic integration opportunities for the Roma population by means of the social economy activities, as well as the present situation of implementing these initiatives in Romania. The integration of the Roma population by forms of social economy may be an obvious opportunity for these communities. Social economy has the capacity to improve social cohesion and to promote an active citizenship, in order to activate the local networks and the communitarian ones, as well as local social support. The high level of unemployment within the Roma communities reflects a low level of education or professional training. From this point of view, the social economy comes with insertion solutions on the labour market, with professional training programs and job offers. Altogether, the social economy might represent a good solution for the preserving of Roma traits and crafts that are on the verge of being forgotten but are demanded on the commercial market. The NGOs are often facing problems concerning the general perception of the Roma population involved in social economy projects. These refer to the economical dimension, the support of some projects and a precarious informing of the NGO's leaders that are involved in the social economy activities.
ENSURING DIGITAL INCLUSION: LINKED'S INNOVATIVE APPROACH TO E-LEARNING FOR DEVELOPMENT FINANCE PRACTITIONERS ACROSS THE WORLD^2013^6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI 2013)^None
SCENARIOS OF SOCIO-EDUCATIONAL INCLUSION ENHANCED BY TECHNOLOGY^2013^6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI 2013)^None
Barriers to Electronic Government and Digital Inclusion^2013^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 13TH EUROPEAN CONFERENCE ON EGOVERNMENT^New channels have been created from the idea of electronic governance which allow access to and use of the electronic administration, the electronic services and also electronic participation so that the population can take part in the issues of public policy which have up to now been within the exclusive scope of the governmental institutions. The possibilities offered by this form of governance cannot be dissociated from the development of a digital citizenship which can unfold through participation in the mechanisms and structures of electronic governance and e-administration, although there are barriers which prevent the digital access or digital inclusion of some sectors of the population. The barriers to the development of E-Government are due to the real or perceived legal, social, technological or institutional characteristics which act against the development of the electronic administration; either due to the fact that they prevent the demand, hinder the users of the electronic Administration, or prevent the offer from the organizations in the public sector when it comes to providing electronic Administration services. Specifically, we are going to deal with both the barriers which are related to Internet skills and use by the population and also the e-government policies which have been developed, and all within the field of health. As regards the first group of barriers mentioned, we refer to issues like e-learning, the different uses of Internet, the use of the electronic Administration, etc. As regards the e-government policies, one must take into account that various actors have an influence on them (politicians, technicians, users, etc.), as well as specific actors in the area of health (doctors, health personnel in general and services personnel). In the latter, one must take into consideration that health one of the pillars of the Welfare State is in the firing line in these times economic crisis and budget reductions. As such, the e-health policies have - even more so if possible a central role in dealing with a twofold challenge: on the one hand, to contribute to the effectiveness and efficiency of the service through the introduction of the ICTs, without this leading to social segregation or exclusion; and on the other hand acting with criteria of economy and streamlining of resources. Along these lines, in the area of health in Spain there are various programmes (digital clinical history, preliminary medical appointment in the Internet, electronic prescription, etc.) which are in different phases of implementation. These plans are modernizing instruments but they can also have exactly the opposite effect by generating new social inequalities by leading to situations of social vulnerability and digital exclusion. This work seeks to provide a reflection on this process in order to explore inclusive strategies in the e-health initiatives in Spain and which could help other countries to find a new public governance process.
Social inclusion and people with intellectual disability and challenging behaviour: A systematic review^DEC 2012^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL &amp; DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.467  </td>  <td>1.701</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
"It's your badge of inclusion": The Red Hat Society as a gendered subculture of aging^DEC 2012^JOURNAL OF AGING STUDIES^Although studies document the health-enhancing effects of social engagement, they reveal little about the underlying mechanisms operating within specific organizational contexts. Limited attention is given to the role of inequality - particularly age and gender - in shaping either the organizations to which we belong or their consequences for our well-being. We address this issue by examining the Red Hat Society, a social organization for middle-aged and older women. Interviews with members (n = 52) illustrate how age and gender inequality interact to shape the organization, which can be viewed as a gendered subculture of aging. Drawing on this framework, we discuss four processes through which participation generates benefits for older women involved in age- and gender-segregated organizations: enhancing social networks, countering invisibility, creating positive frames for aging experiences, and promoting youthful identities. (C) 2012 Elsevier Inc. All rights reserved.
Bridging the gap between employment and social care for people with learning disabilities: Local Area Co-ordination and in-between spaces of social inclusion^NOV 2012^GEOFORUM^This paper identifies the growing gap between the spheres of paid employment and social care for people with learning disabilities. Social inclusion and independence remain closely associated with paid employment; social exclusion and dependency with receipt of care. The paper argues that, as employability and supported employment programmes increasingly select only the most able, and social care is ever more restricted to those in most need, an expanding number of people with learning disabilities are occupying a third or in-between sphere where the opportunities for work or care are limited. The paper draws on research undertaken for Scottish Government and interviews with policy makers and practitioners at national and local scales. The paper presents a critique of the array of employment programmes, arguing that their narrow and outcome-focused approach excludes most people with learning disabilities from opportunities for employment. 'Local Area Co-ordinators' present in many areas in Scotland provide personal support and 'brokerage' to facilitate access to, in some cases, employment and, perhaps more importantly, to other 'work' experiences (including voluntary work) and community capacity building. The 'progressive localist' network building work of Local Area Co-ordinators can potentially bridge the gap between the spheres of employment and social care, and in doing so contest the deterministic relation between social inclusion and paid employment. (C) 2012 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Strategies for improving disability awareness and social inclusion of children and young people with cerebral palsy^NOV 2012^CHILD CARE HEALTH AND DEVELOPMENT^Background Children and youth with disabilities are at a higher risk of being socially excluded or bullied while at school compared with their typically developing peers. This study explored disabled children's suggestions for improving social inclusion. Methods Fifteen children with cerebral palsy were interviewed or took part in a group discussion about social inclusion and bullying. All interviews and focus groups were audio-recorded and transcribed verbatim. Results The children and youth described several strategies to help improve social inclusion at school including: (1) disclosure of condition and creating awareness of disability; (2) awareness of bullying; (3) developing a peer support network and building self-confidence; and (4) suggestions on what teachers can do. Conclusions It is recommended that children's suggestions be considered within the classroom context to enhance the social inclusion and participation of children with disabilities.
Social cohesion in distributive policies and the role of knowledge^OCT 2012^SCIENCE AND PUBLIC POLICY^This paper discusses the different meanings of the concept of social cohesion, within the framework of sociology and of public policies related to strategies for development. The aim is to explore the relationship between social cohesion and the decrease in inequity and social inequality on one hand, and the role of knowledge in those strategies on the other, aiming to find alternative models for social development. The meaning of concepts parallel to that of social cohesion in the sociological literature, such as social capital, organized collective action and social networks, is reviewed. The paper systematizes the arguments of international organizations about social cohesion, in particular the approaches of the Economic Commission for Latin America. Finally, some arguments are built on the relationship between knowledge, social cohesion and social development.
Bold but balanced: how community development contributes to mental health and inclusion^OCT 2012^COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT JOURNAL^This article explores the positive contribution that community development (CD) can make to mental well-being by providing close but critical support to individuals and community-led initiatives. The emphasis on self-determination, collective action and empowerment within the CD approach inspires hope and recovery from mental distress. Drawing on a recent study of CD practice across varied UK settings, we demonstrate how practitioners use their skills to break down barriers, build relationships, manage group dynamics and tackle prejudice. They oconnect and include' people experiencing mental health difficulties with community activities and mainstream services, increasing opportunity and choice. We note that a skilfully balanced, empathetic but bold CD approach requires professional capabilities, flexible management and participative forms of evaluation. It fits the current UK policy emphasis on empowerment and engagement and responds to the growing evidence that personal networks and social equality correlate with health and well-being. However, its impact tends to be limited by workplace context, insufficient resources and a failure by health providers and others to recognize its potential.
Triggers and barriers to financial inclusion: The use of ICT-based branchless banking in an Amazon county^SEP-OCT 2012^ELECTRONIC COMMERCE RESEARCH AND APPLICATIONS^Financial inclusion can be defined as the access to formal financial services at an affordable cost for all members of an economy, favoring mainly low-income groups. It has been recognized as a critical element in policies for poverty reduction and economic growth. Some successful experiences with financial inclusion reported in developing countries are associated with the use of information and communication technology (ICT)-based branchless banking. One of these experiences is the Brazilian correspondent model, an ICT-based network responsible for delivering financial services to tens of millions of poor Brazilians, most of them having no other way to access banking services. This article presents a case study of financial inclusion in Autazes, a county in the Amazon region not served by banks until 2002, when a correspondent started its operations there. Since then, Autazes has experienced economic and social changes, due in part to government social benefits and other banking services delivered at the local level. The results of our field study in Autazes suggest that financial inclusion through the correspondents' process positively contributes to local socio-economic development but, at the same time, presents clear negative signs such as low-income population over-indebtedness, reproduction of social exclusion practices and reinforcement of power asymmetries. We conclude that although access to financial resources is a fundamental way to promote local development to low-income population, such access should be accompanied by other inclusive mechanisms like financial education in order to be effective. (C) 2011 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Overcoming Poverty through Digital Inclusion^MAY-JUN 2012^IT PROFESSIONAL^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.424  </td>  <td>2.454</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Internet social networks as important agents of social inclusion for contemporary children and youth^2012^3RD INTERNATIONAL INTERDISCIPLINARY SCIENTIFIC CONFERENCE ON SOCIETY. HEALTH. WELFARE - 1ST CONGRESS OF REHABILITATION DOCTORS OF LATVIA^The article shows that the use of social networks is a very powerful mean and often the way of socialization and social inclusion of contemporary children and youth. Direct social communication is often substituted by communication through the modern media, which takes places in the cyber space and has a great importance for experience and socialization of current generations. This article is trying to point out that the use of internet social networks is an important component of children's and youth's subculture. Potential absence in the world of internet social networks can bring individuals to the marginal position among their peer group. On the basis of the survey made among Czech children and youngsters, from 11 to 19 years, we can find out how important the use of internet social networks for the Czech contemporary young people is. Activities connected with the internet social networks create an important part of leisure time activities for the interviewed respondents. For them it is very considerable to be the part of some internet social community. Moreover, virtual communication helps respondents to keep in touch with their peers and increase their social status in the community. They can also experiment with different identities and find the best way of communication with others.
INCLUSION OF SOCIAL NETWORKS AND MOBILE DEVICES AS EDUCATIONAL RESOURCES IN HIGHER EDUCATION^2012^INTED2012: INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^None
MOBILE APPS: INNOVATIVE TECHNOLOGY FOR GLOBALISATION AND INCLUSION OF DEVELOPING COUNTRIES^2012^5TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI 2012)^The development of Mobile Applications (Mobile Apps) and the Technologies for deployment are clearly demonstrating that the digital gap between the developed industrialized world and the developing countries will be minimised in the not too distant future. In this paper, Mobile Communication Technologies and Mobile Application development on Smart Phones are reviewed. The applicability of these technologies in the developing countries as regards to communication infrastructures and other factors are main focus of this paper. We argue that the Mobile Apps technologies which at present have delivered social inclusion for developing countries through social networking like Facebook, Twitter, etc will help in the quest for Globalisation. Connectivity through the Internet is considered as bringing the world together as a Global Village, but, this has yet to be delivered as developing countries are still far behind the developed industrialised world. The advent of Mobile Apps is a positive development to achieve Globalisation as people in remote villages in the developing countries can now benefit through social inclusion. In the near future, more serious business transactions will be made available for the developing countries on the Internet. Since the present communication infrastructures (CDMA, GSM, 2G and 3G) in the developing countries can support Mobile Apps Technologies, this paper constructively argues the need for commercial Mobile Apps to include developing countries demographically without compromising standards and security.
Feature extraction and selection in Ground Penetrating Radar with experimental data set of inclusions in concrete blocks^2012^2012 11TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON MACHINE LEARNING AND APPLICATIONS (ICMLA 2012), VOL 2^Ground Penetrating Radar systems have been successfully used to access concrete structures conditions. Moreover, inclusions in concrete can be discriminated by simple models based on traces obtained by GPR. In this work, concrete blocks with different inclusions were probed in controlled conditions. Some features were extracted from A scans of this experimental data set. To get efficient models, raw data were submitted to features selection and space reduction methods. Without complex data pre-processing, good accuracy and more explainable models with less computational burden were obtained.
Going on a Class Journey: The Inclusion and Exclusion of Iraqi Refugees in Denmark^2012^JOURNAL OF ETHNIC AND MIGRATION STUDIES^Focusing on the settlement of Iraqi women and their families in Copenhagen, this article explores how the intersections of social class relations, ethnicity and gender affect the inclusion and exclusion of Iraqi refugees in Danish society. Through the analysis of an extended case study, it pays special attention to the downward 'class journey' experienced by many of the women in the course of their settlement, and the discrimination they can face as immigrants and Muslims. The article argues that, while the women's participation in Iraqi Shi'a Muslim activities may appear to make up a form of continuity rooted in their ethno-religious background, their social networks are to a large extent a reflection of their new social positions in society. Moreover, the cross-section of factors such as social class, gender, ethnicity and local context not only affect the social position that the women acquire in society, but also how they experience and come to see the society in which they live. Finally, the article demonstrates the great impact that the organisation of the Danish welfare state has had on the trajectories of the social incorporation of Iraqi refugees in Denmark.
City Branding and Social Inclusion in the Glocal City^2012^MOBILITIES^This article begins with a re-assessment of city branding that focuses on the marketing strategies routinely employed to promote a competitive identity for the contemporary 'glocal' city, before moving on to the issue of social inclusion. Combining a socio-semiotic approach with recent insights from urban studies, it explores a sample of 12 British city council websites to discuss to what extent web-mediated communication, within the modernisation agenda espoused by local authorities, may effectively help to represent and give voice to today's multicultural and migrant urban communities. The article adopts a critical reading of municipal websites with the aim of understanding how a social inclusion agenda can be incorporated into the authoritative and functional discourse typically used by the sites and proposes that the onset of new interactive technologies, such as blogs and social networks, do have significant democratic potential in this respect, even though their incorporation into the sites is still at a preliminary stage. As such, the article is concerned with how flows of information and people are coming together in the early twenty-first century and transforming what began as a static textual/discursive space into one that is responsive to the flux of the contemporary city. At the time of writing, this is very much a communication revolution in the making, with the new interactive portals sitting somewhat awkwardly alongside information-based web pages and links. In addition, the article investigates the ways in which the sites attempt to present their cities as diasporic, cosmopolitan and 'glocalized' spaces, paying particular attention to the subjugated discourse of migration and the way that the cities' non-white population is fixed and bounded by aesthetic and discursive means.
THE INCLUSION OF SOCIAL NETWORKS TO DEVELOP SKILLS IN SCIENCE LEARNING^2012^EDULEARN12: 4TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^Over the last decades, thanks to advances in technology, society has undergone great advances in accessibility to information and knowledge, as well as communication and social relationships. The inclusion of social networks in our university classrooms allows us to design new effective learning methods to achieve a real conceptual change in the science student's mind. Within this model we propose audiovisual, experimental and computer teaching resources, which allow students to develop epistemological conceptions about scientific knowledge and cognitive processes and products, which have a decisive influence on their learning strategies. Therefore, the initial training of future teachers should not assume the acquisition of content should also include a set of capabilities and skills that will allow, in addition to imparting knowledge, developing curriculum projects adapted to the reality of their school and their classroom.
E-INCLUSION PROJECT. IMPLEMENTATION OF ACCESSIBILITY STANDARDS IN THE PROCESS OF COURSE DESIGN IN VIRTUAL LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS^2012^PROCEEDINGS OF THE IADIS INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE E-LEARNING 2012^This article presents the project "E-Inclusion to people with disabilities. Implementation of accessibility standards in the process of course design in virtual learning environments", the objective of the project is to develop an accessible on-line educational program through pilot course experimentation, introducing key competences in the field of digital literacy through Internet. The project seeks to identify the most important guidelines and recommendations in an Open Source eLearning system to implement and document a methodology to produce multimedia/interactive content and learning activities following the main accessibility standards. This article is a work in progress document presenting the motivation and justification of the project, general information, goals and first results. Finally some conclusions and future work activities are presented.
Analyzing Random Network Coding With Differential Equations and Differential Inclusions^DEC 2011^IEEE TRANSACTIONS ON INFORMATION THEORY^We develop a framework based on differential equations (DE) and differential inclusions (DI) for analyzing Random Network Coding (RNC) in an arbitrary wireless network. The DEDI framework serves as a powerful numerical and analytical tool to study RNC. For demonstration, we first build a system of DE's with this framework, under the fluid approximation, to model the means of the rank evolution processes. By converting this system to DI's and explicitly solving them, we show that the average multicast throughput is equal to the min-cut bound. We then turn to the precise system of DE's regarding the means and variances of the rank evolution processes. By analyzing this system, we show that the rank evolution processes asymptotically concentrate to the solution of the DI's obtained previously. From this result, it immediately follows that the min-cut bound can be achieved as the number of source packets becomes large. We demonstrate the numerical accuracy and flexibility in performance analysis enabled by the DEDI framework via illustrative examples of networks with multiple multicast sessions, complex topology and correlated reception. We also briefly discuss its application in MAC and PHY adaptation and the extension to Random Coupon Selection.
Emerging Networks of Organized Urban Poor: Restructuring the Engagement with Government Toward the Inclusion of the Excluded^DEC 2011^VOLUNTAS^Aim of this article is to address the issue of citizen participation and democratic engagement within a specific area-slum upgrading-presenting and theoretically discussing the approach of an international network called Shack/Slum Dwellers International (SDI), which represents member federations of urban poor and homeless groups from about 30 countries in Asia, Africa, and Latin America. The article addresses the model of intervention embraced by the network, the activities carried out, its philosophy, etc., mainly focusing on the way it envisions and pursues the engagement of local governments in upgrading slum dwellers living conditions. The basic idea within SDI is that the lack of participation by the urban poor has historically been one of the major obstacles to achieve real development: either the government or the donors' agencies, in fact, usually treat the poor as beneficiaries of someone else's actions, thus undervaluing their knowledge and skills. Radically opposing this view, SDI interprets its role not as an intermediary agency of slum dwellers in the engagement/negotiation with local governments but rather as an "enabling tool" of direct negotiation between the urban poor and the public institutions. SDI's most relevant feature, in fact, is surely the genuine leading role assigned to the slum dwellers grassroots organizations.
Diagenetic and thermal history of the Jurassic-Tertiary succession of the Zagros Mountains in the Dezful Embayment (SW Iran): constraints from fluid inclusions^SEP 2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EARTH SCIENCES^To constraint the diagenetic and thermal history in the Mesozoic-Tertiary succession of the Zagros Fold-Belt, a study was performed on fluid inclusions trapped in intergranular, vug, and fracture-filling cements in Jurassic to Miocene outcrop samples collected along the Anneh and Fahliyan Valleys of Khuzestan Province, southwest Iran. Petrographic observations showed at least two systems of fractures that postdate intergranular cementation. Two different types of oil-filled fluid inclusions occur in the intergranular cements and in the first fracture network, but they are absent in the second fracture network. Microthermometry of fluid inclusions was used to determine the temperature and salinity of fluids responsible for mineral precipitation. Within intergranular cements and calcite fillings the oldest fractures, precipitation occurred from high saline fluids in a temperature range of 60-120A degrees C, depending on the stratigraphic depth. The strong correlation between fluid inclusions temperature and stratigraphic depth suggests that the intergranular cementation and the first fracture-filling event occurred prior to structural deformation. Furthermore, this correlation indicates a relatively constant paleogeothermal gradient at the time of cement precipitation of about 28A degrees C/Km. On the contrary, fluid inclusions trapped in cements within the second fracture network lack oil and contain freshwater trapped at low temperatures that do not correlate to the stratigraphic position. This suggests second fracturing event occurred after oil migration and during or after deformation of the Zagros Fold-Belt, when the samples were in a near-surface position.
Distinguishing Participation and Inclusion^SEP 2011^JOURNAL OF PLANNING EDUCATION AND RESEARCH^This article argues that participation and inclusion are independent dimensions of public engagement and elaborates the relationships of inclusion with deliberation and diversity. Inclusion continuously creates a community involved in defining and addressing public issues; participation emphasizes public input on the content of programs and policies. Features of inclusive processes are coproducing the process and content of decision making, engaging multiple ways of knowing, and sustaining temporal openness. Using a community of practice lens, we compare the consequences of participatory and inclusive practices in four processes, finding that inclusion supports an ongoing community with capacity to address a stream of issues.
Assessment of digital inclusion via the actor-network theory: The case of the Brazilian municipality of Pirai^AUG 2011^TELEMATICS AND INFORMATICS^This paper presents the results of the analysis of processes aimed at digital inclusion in the municipality of Ping in Rio de Janeiro state, Brazil. This city was chosen for this purpose due to the notoriety achieved by the Digital Pirai program, the origins of which date back to 1996. An approach based on the actor-network theory (ANT) was applied to evaluate the program. ANT was used to develop a model of digital inclusion, as well as investigate the formation of heterogeneous networks of actors around the components of the aforementioned model in Pirai. After collecting data in Pirai related to its digital program, interviewing several inhabitants, public administrators and merchants based in the municipality, with respect to their perceptions regarding this endeavor and analyzing this material vis-a-vis the digital inclusion model developed via the actor-network theory, it can be concluded that digital inclusion is a reality in Pirai, despite the fact that its effects do not benefit all segments of the society equally. The municipality presents different levels of appropriation of the advantages of information technology (IT), from the municipal executive body, students and teachers of the public school system - who have already progressed with the incorporation of IT in their daily lives - to the general public, including tradespeople and entrepreneurs, who are still far from reaping the full benefits of the digital inclusion movement. Lastly, some managerial and academic implications accrued from this research as well as the limitations of the study are set forth. (C) 2010 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Wildcats in banking fields: the politics of financial inclusion^JUL 2011^THEORY AND SOCIETY^Rightwing theorists argue that we owe the current financial crisis to the democratization of credit, or financial inclusion: politics interfered with the market to benefit marginalized actors, only to cause instability and risk. Leftwing theorists focus instead on financialization: namely, the shift of profit-making activities from industry to finance. These views implicitly draw on Schumpeter and Marx. Much like their intellectual progenitors, they emphasize exogenous processes to explain financial change. Here I claim that the connection between financial innovation and financial inclusion is endogenous. I suggest two main typologies of financial innovators: Market Utopians (MUs) and Populist Innovators (PIs). Financial inclusion, I submit, is the byproduct of the quest for power of the latter.
GAINING POLITICAL CAPITAL THROUGH SOCIAL CAPITAL: POLICY-MAKING INCLUSION AND NETWORK EMBEDDEDNESS OF MIGRANTS' ASSOCIATIONS IN SPAIN^JUN 2011^MOBILIZATION^This article analyzes the relevance of network embeddedness and social capital in allowing migrants' associations to gain political capital and access to policy making in the cities of Barcelona and Madrid. With data from a survey of migrants' associations in both locations, we examine the degree to which embeddedness in networks of links with other migrants' associations and with autochthonous Spanish civil society organizations are consequential for the inclusion of migrants' organizations in policy-making processes. The results show that migrants' organizational social capital is critical in facilitating their intermediation function vis a vis political institutions and decision makers, above and beyond their access to financial and human capital.
TOWARDS SOCIAL INCLUSION THROUGH LIFELONG LEARNING IN MENTAL HEALTH: ANALYSIS OF CHANGE IN THE LIVES OF THE EMILIA PROJECT SERVICE USERS^MAY 2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SOCIAL PSYCHIATRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.37  </td>  <td>1.778</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
A process for the inclusion of Aboriginal People in health research: Lessons from the Determinants of TB Transmission project^MAR 2011^SOCIAL SCIENCE &amp; MEDICINE^The Determinants of TB Transmission (DTT) project, a federally-funded study covering the period April 1, 2006-March 31, 2013, and examining the determinants of TB transmission amongst the Canadian-born population (Aboriginal and non-Aboriginal) in the prairie provinces of Canada, took a novel approach to health research involving Aboriginal people. The methodology aligned itself with the recently published Canadian Institutes of Health Research (CIHR) Guidelines for Health Research Involving Aboriginal People and the established principles of Ownership, Control, Access, and Possession (OCAP). This article details the process by which collaboration with Aboriginal peoples was achieved, including the involvement of Aboriginal researchers, the development of Provincial Network Committees (PNCs), and communications with First Nations Chiefs and Council. Strengths of this methodology included Aboriginal organizational and community support with a high rate of participation; PNC leadership, which brought together Aboriginal stakeholders with provincial and federal TB program planners; and the exploration of both on and off-reserve transmission factors. Challenges of the methodology included meeting funding agency timelines and expectations given the gradual process of trust development and PNC-reviewed publication; respecting both community and individual participants' autonomy regarding study participation; and political discomfort with strong Aboriginal involvement. While the methodology required a dedicated investment from researchers and funding agencies alike, the process was worthwhile and achieved a high degree of support from its major collaborators: the Aboriginal peoples. (C) 2011 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
From racial exclusions to new inclusions: Black and minority ethnic participation in football clubs in the East Midlands of England^MAR 2011^INTERNATIONAL REVIEW FOR THE SOCIOLOGY OF SPORT^This article reports on survey and interview data from a two-phase study examining the shape and scope of Black and Minority Ethnic (BME) participation in amateur football clubs in Leicestershire in the East Midlands of England. Survey results identified strongly differentiated patterns of participation and a concentration of BME (male) players, coaches and management committee members at a small number of clubs in the city of Leicester. Interview data contextualized the socio-historical development and ongoing reality of these BME clubs as a consequence of - and as active resistance to - racisms and exclusions within pre-existing and homogeneously White local football networks. BME clubs also had distinct social, cultural and religious attachments and had historically operated as symbolic and practical sites of community mobilization and cultural identity production for specific BME communities. Survey and interview data indicated that BME clubs and newer 'multi-ethnic' clubs increasingly featured a strong focus on the provision of valuable participation opportunities to younger players from a range of culturally and religiously diverse backgrounds and from communities experiencing disproportionate levels of social and economic deprivation. The article concludes by examining the role of BME clubs and newer 'multi-ethnic' clubs as facilitators of new inclusions and positive multi-cultural leisure spaces for young footballers within the context of the changing local cultural landscape of Leicester and with reference to wider debates around racial integration and multiculturalism in late modern Britain.
Interaction, language learning and social inclusion in early settlement^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF BILINGUAL EDUCATION AND BILINGUALISM^While first language social networks offer immigrants practical and emotional support in the early period of their settlement in a new country, the development of social networks through English is crucial at this time not only for the acquisition of the linguistic and social capital vital to their long-term advancement, but also for the development of a community that is socially inclusive. In this paper I draw on data from a nation-wide study of the experiences of newly arrived immigrants over a one-year period as they studied English in an on-arrival program and moved on to work and study in the community. I first explore the opportunities they reported for using and making social connections through English and then consider the impact of the issues they encountered on their language learning and attitudes to the community. I then reflect on the implications for a dynamic view of social inclusion as driving rather than reacting to social change.
Partnership in knowledge creation: lessons learned from a researcher-policy actor partnership to co-produce a rapid appraisal case study of South Australia's Social Inclusion Initiative^JAN 2011^EVIDENCE &amp; POLICY^This paper describes a partnership between researchers and policy actors that was developed within a short timeframe to produce a rapid appraisal case study of a government policy initiative - South Australia's Social Inclusion Initiative - for the Social Exclusion Knowledge Network of the international Commission on Social Determinants of Health. The paper does not focus on the case study findings or content, but rather on the researcher-policy actor partnership that developed in the process of producing the case study and its report. The paper is set against the broader literature on researcher-policy collaboration and is written to share lessons that may help others quickly establish or improve researcher-policy partnerships. It sets out six key elements for success in a framework for partnership that can meet policy rather than academic timeframes and which can effectively co-produce knowledge that meets both research and policy objectives.
Crafting Communities: Promoting Inclusion, Empowerment, and Learning between Older Women^2011^AUSTRALIAN SOCIAL WORK^While social policy and planning documents are replete with ominous warnings about the cost of an ageing population, this article tells a different story about the productive and self-sustaining networks that exist among older women in the community who do craftwork. From our research conducted in Victoria, Australia during 2007-2008 we discovered a resilient and committed group of older women quietly and steadily contributing to community fundraising, building social networks, and providing learning opportunities to each other in diverse ways. Through our conversations with nine craftswomen we have been able to articulate clear links between the theory and models commonly espoused in the community development literature and the life-enriching practices used in organising informal community craft group activities. From our interviews with the older women we provide evidence of sustained participation, the generation of social capital, and the fostering of life-long learning. While none of the women we spoke to were trained in community development and did not use language commonly associated with feminist ideology, the relationship between the informal group work with principles of empowerment and self-efficacy were unmistakeable. We conclude with a discussion of the implications of our findings for critical social work practice.
Intelligent Playgrounds: Measuring and Affecting Social Inclusion in Schools^2011^HUMAN-COMPUTER INTERACTION - INTERACT 2011, PT IV^Equal access to education has recently been declared by the United Nations a basic human right [14]. However, despite the substantial attention given to inclusive education in recent years, researchers have criticized a lack of empirical evidence on how exclusion is manifested in student behavior. Recent development in sensor technology and social network analysis techniques can provide a new perspective to the impact of educational practices through the measurement of students' social interactions. In this paper we outline our research agenda that aims at a) measuring the current stand as well as the impact of inclusive educational interventions using sensor technology and sociometric analysis, and b) challenging pupils' perceptions of diversity with the aim of eliminating discriminatory behaviors in primary schools using persuasive games.
Fuzziness of Inclusion/Exclusion in Networks^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF COMMUNICATION^This article addresses the concept of fuzziness of inclusion/exclusion in networks. It argues that the conceptualization of inclusion/exclusion is more complex than a static, binary dichotomy of in/out and requires that we take a viewpoint that examines the changes in the dynamics of power among the stakeholders. With this viewpoint we begin to examine the balance of power between gatekeepers and gated (the entity subjected to gatekeeping). The power dynamics are manifest through processes by which transient elites (gatekeepers) emerge and mature. Contrary to traditional thinking about gatekeepers controlling the whole process, we argue that the collective patterns of behavior of the gated have a crucial role in the emergence and sustainability of gatekeepers. Fuzziness is essential to the dynamics of these processes.
Exploring understandings of inclusion in schools in Zambia and Tanzania using reflective writing and photography^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^In this article I explore insights gained from participating in an exploratory, small-scale study led by the Enabling Education Network (EENET) in 17 schools in northern Zambia and five schools in Tanzania. Facilitating South-based research, while based in a Northern university, raises complex ethical issues about voice and control which are discussed in the article. The main aim of the study was to explore understandings of inclusive education at school and community level in northern Zambia and Tanzania in the light of government efforts to promote Education for All. Reflective writing, photo elicitation and participatory photography were some of the methods used to generate locally relevant knowledge about marginalisation from the educational process, although the focus here is primarily on the issue of disability as a cause of educational exclusion.
The Lao PDR Inclusive Education Project 1993-2009: reflections on the impact of a national project aiming to support the inclusion of disabled students^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^The Lao People's Democratic Republic Inclusive Education Project started in 1993 and during a 16-year period, ending in May 2009, it aimed to support the participation of all children in school, with a particular focus on disabled students. The main strategy to enable this involved working to change the education system through the introduction of child-centred approaches to teaching and learning in 539 schools across the country. In this article, we consider the success of this approach, highlighting some of the achievements of the project and also the tensions involved in trying to facilitate the evolution of policy into practice across a national network of schools, referring to evidence collected and analysed during an evaluation of the project in 2008-2009. Our findings indicated that there was some evidence of these new approaches to teaching being used in schools and also that schools appeared to be performing well in significant areas including student enrolment, retention, grade completion and primary completion. There were also significant challenges which still needed to be met. These included a lack of provision for students with more complex needs, such as children with sensory loss, and significant numbers of disabled students who did not attend school.
Minority Inclusion, Self-Representation and Coalition-Building: The Participation of Minority Women in European Women's Networks^2011^TRANSFORMING GENDERED WELL-BEING IN EUROPE: THE IMPACT OF SOCIAL MOVEMENTS^None
Modeling Structural, Dyadic, and Individual Factors: The Inclusion and Exclusion Model of HIV Related Behavior^DEC 2010^AIDS AND BEHAVIOR^Changing HIV-related behaviors requires addressing the individual, dyadic, and structural influences that shape them. This supplement of AIDS &amp; Behavior presents frameworks that integrate these three influences on behavior. Concepts from these frameworks were selected to model the processes by which structural factors affect individual HIV-related behavior. In the Inclusion/Exclusion Model, material and symbolic inclusions and exclusions (sharing versus denying resources) regulate individuals' ability and motivation to detect, prevent, and treat HIV. Structural interventions create inclusions that increase one's ability or motivation to perform these behaviors or exclusions that hinder one's ability or motivation to execute counterproductive behaviors. The need to expand research regarding multilevel influences on HIV-related behavior is also discussed, particularly concerning further understanding of sustained behavior change and effective dissemination of evidence-based intervention strategies.
Can a regional government's social inclusion initiative contribute to the quest for health equity?^DEC 2010^HEALTH PROMOTION INTERNATIONAL^Despite decades of concern about reducing health inequity, the Commission on the Social Determinants of Health (CSDH) painted a picture of persistent and, in some cases, increasing health inequity. It also made a call for increased evaluation of interventions that might reduce inequities. This paper describes such an intervention-the Social Inclusion Initiative (SII) of the South Australian Government-that was documented for the Social Exclusion Knowledge Network of the CSDH. This initiative is designed to increase social inclusion by addressing key determinants of health inequity-in the study period these were education, homelessness and drug use. Our paper examines evidence from a rapid appraisal to determine whether a social inclusion initiative is a useful aspect of government action to reduce health inequity. It describes achievements in each specific area and the ways they can be expected to affect health equity. Our study highlighted four factors central to the successes achieved by the SII. These were the independent authority and influence of the leadership of the SII, the whole of government approach supported by an overarching strategic plan which sets clear goals for government and the clear and unambiguous support from the highest level of government. We conclude that a social inclusion approach can be valuable in the quest to reduce inequities and that further research on innovative social policy approaches is required to examine their likely impact on health equity.
Mental health care and the politics of inclusion: A social systems account of psychiatric deinstitutionalization^DEC 2010^THEORETICAL MEDICINE AND BIOETHICS^This paper provides an interpretation, based on the social systems theory of German sociologist Niklas Luhmann, of the recent paradigmatic shift of mental health care from an asylum-based model to a community-oriented network of services. The observed shift is described as the development of psychiatry as a function system of modern society and whose operative goal has moved from the medical and social management of a lower and marginalized group to the specialized medical and psychological care of the whole population. From this theoretical viewpoint, the wider deployment of the modern social order as a functionally differentiated system may be considered to be a consistent driving force for this process; it has made asylum psychiatry overly incompatible with prevailing social values (particularly with the normative and regulative principle of inclusion of all individuals in the different functional spheres of society and with the common patterns of participation in modern function systems) and has, in turn, required the availability of psychiatric care for a growing number of individuals. After presenting this account, some major challenges for the future of mental health care provision, such as the overburdening of services or the overt exclusion of a significant group of potential users, are identified and briefly discussed.
Knowledge network on inclusion^SEP 2010^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of support staff in promoting the social inclusion of persons with an intellectual disability^AUG 2010^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.941  </td>  <td>2.637</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Social Inclusion at Different Scales in the Urban Environment: Locating the Community to Empower^JUN 2010^URBAN STUDIES^As area-based initiatives emphasise community empowerment and social inclusion programmes focus on place, this article compares participation in two ICT programmes in UK cities which sought to empower communities at different scales. Recruitment was better in a neighbourhood-scale project, a scale that enabled access to settings of public familiarity and helping/coping networks. However, the factors that promoted social inclusion during recruitment favour defensive collective action. A city-wide project facilitated transformative social learning by relocalising community more widely as a problem-oriented operational network. The two approaches could be combined, starting at neighbourhood level and then rescaling to reveal different affordances of social networks and stimulate different dimensions of technology appropriation.
HIMALIS: Heterogeneity Inclusion and Mobility Adaptation through Locator 10 Separation in New Generation Network^MAR 2010^IEICE TRANSACTIONS ON COMMUNICATIONS^The current Internet is not capable of meeting the future communication requirements of society i e reliable connectivity in a ubiquitous networking environment The shortcomings of the Internet are due to the lack of support for mobility. multihoming, security and heterogeneous network layer protocols in the original design Therefore. to provide ubiquitous networking facilities to the society for future innovation. we have to redesign the future Internet which we call the New Generation Network In this paper. we present the Heterogeneity Inclusion and Mobility Adaptation through Locator ID Separation (HIMALIS) architecture for the New Generation Network The HIMALIS architecture Includes a new naming scheme for generating host names and IDs It also includes a logical control network to store and distribute bindings between host names. IDs. locators and other information useful for providing support for network operation and control The architecture uses such information to manage network dynamism (i.e. mobility, multihoming) and heterogeneity in network layer protocols We verify the basic functions of the architecture by implementing and test rug them using a test bed system
Putting Digital Literacy in Practice: How Schools Contribute to Digital Inclusion in the Network Society^2010^INFORMATION SOCIETY^In the sociology of childhood and youth, children have been conceptualized as passive subjects on hold, still in the process of becomingrather than in an effective state of being. In effect, children have been conceptualized as the subjects rather than the objects of the research process. This influence got carried over to digital divide research. The latest thinking in the field has started to define and understand children and young people as heterogeneous, nonpassive, autonomous, diverse, and versatile agents actively appropriating the Internet in meaningful contexts of their everyday lives. This article seeks to move the discourse forward via four parallel binary logistic regressions that assess diverse and socially mediated opportunities needed to learn basic digital skills from a representative sample of 6,602 primary and secondary students from 350 schools and high schools in Catalonia, Spain. Our research shows that the school appears to be playing a secondary role, as compared with children and young people's social practice in heterogenic contexts of everyday life, not only for Internet training but also for providing opportunities to develop and master basic digital skills.
Weaving Networks: An Educational Project for Digital Inclusion^2010^INFORMATION SOCIETY^In this article, the authors describe the development of a digital training project aimed at groups at risk of social exclusion in the community of Cantabria, Spain. This project is in keeping with national and international policies-especially those designed by the European Union-that seek to develop an information society accessible for all citizens. They describe the results of two-and-one-half years of training activities that aim to bring certain social groups into closer contact with information and communication technology (ICT). Although the training program is based on the notion that access to technologies, as well as certain uses that can be made of them, is linked to digital and social inclusion, the authors try to avoid what some have called myths and mistaken beliefs surrounding ICT, especially the idea that more and better technology necessarily produces a society that is more in touch, more socially committed, more just, and more democratic. They believe that the ideas and dilemmas that have arisen as a result of the design, development, and assessment of the digital training project can cast light on the meaning of teaching "with," "from," and "based on" ICT.
The Social Impact of Ict Provision: Preliminary Results of a Digital Inclusion Project^2010^BUSINESS TRANSFORMATION THROUGH INNOVATION AND KNOWLEDGE MANAGEMENT: AN ACADEMIC PERSPECTIVE, VOLS 1-2^This paper presents findings from an evaluation of a project that provides ICT infrastructure to residents on a social housing estate, including network ready computers, broadband internet and an ICT training hub. This digital inclusion initiative has made a considerable impact on residents, over 50% of whom are using a computer for the first time. Self reported behaviour and impact suggests that outcomes are significant and include employment search, productivity and access to education and training. These proximal outcomes are indicative of potentially larger and more significant distal impacts and benefits.
Towards the Convergence of Web 2.0 and Semantic Web for E-Inclusion^2010^COMPUTERS HELPING PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, PROCEEDINGS, PT 1^The paper discusses a research approach to achieve the "wider inclusion objectives" reported in the second part of the Riga declaration. The approach is based on the convergence of two forms of intelligence on the web, given by Web 2.0 and the Semantic Web. While Web 2.0 encompasses social phenomena, often undervalued in the field of e-Inclusion (exchange and collection of large amount of information), Semantic Web is designed for interlinking and reusing structured information. The paper outlines a software architecture for the exploitation of the above concepts and gives an example of a possible application built on top of the architecture, in the domain of inclusive e-Tourism, enlightening benefits that come by the adoption of the approach, with respect to current trip planning systems.
Contractualism and social inclusion: strands of policy emulation in UK and Australian local employment services^JAN 2010^POLICY AND POLITICS^Over the past decade, the dominance of 'new localism', 'partnerships' and 'social inclusion' in policy discourse in countries of the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD) has influenced Australian stated policy directions in employment services. In contrast to other OECD countries, however, Australian federal legislators have excluded local government in contractual service delivery and governance arrangements. In response, some Australian local governments draw on UK practice to guide social inclusion agendas and inclusive partnership models. There is irony in such use of policy transfer strategies given that the UK is currently reforming public employment services to emphasise the contractualism that typifies the Australian Job Network.
Students with Special Educational Needs-Social Inclusion or Marginalisation? Factors of Risk and Resilience in the Transition Between School and Early Adult Life^2010^SCANDINAVIAN JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH^This article is based on data from two national research projects in Norway dealing with upper secondary educational reforms that began in 1994. Together, the research projects represent a longitudinal study of prospective life course data from 1995 to 2003, covering approximately 500 students from the time they were receiving special education in upper secondary school to the age of 22. The analysis is based on theories of social networks, frame factors, risk and resilience, and life course transitions. It uses a typology of social marginalization based on the dimensions of network density and network size to capture the differences in framing opportunities and restrictions on the students' social network relationships in the spare time arena. The study addresses how such relationships in early adult life are affected by earlier school experiences, such as whether they attended special or mainstream classes, compared with personal factors and their family situation at the start of upper secondary school.
ATTITUDES OF HIGH SCHOOL STUDENTS TOWARD INCLUSION OF STUDENTS WITH MILD INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^2010^SPECIAL EDUCATION AND REHABILITATION - SCIENCE AND/OR PRACTICE: THEMATIC COLLECTION OF PAPERS^Attitudes are a combination of beliefs and feelings that are manifested through different forms of behavior (Noe, 2002); the importance of attitude in the life of individuals confirms its numerous functions. The overall aim of this study is to determine the attitudes of high school students towards the integration of children with mild intellectual disabilities in regular schools. The sample comprised 74 subjects, 37 females and 37 males, aged from 16 to 19 that attend vocational school in Pirot. Questionnaire to assess attitudes of high school students towards the integration of children with intellectual disablity is adapted (Furman, Buhrmester 1985) The Network of Relationships Inventory. The results show that there is a correlation between social interaction of students in the class and attitudes toward inclusion of students with intellectual disablity (p = 0.000). Gender affects whether students will socialize with students with intellectual disability (p = 0019) on excursion, too (p = 0.001). Female respondents showed a greater willingness than male subjects did, that agrees with the results of research Vignes and co-workers. (2009). The influence of parents and teachers on the attitudes of high school students toward inclusion of students with intellectual disbility is evident.
From the general inclusion for exclusive access? Some features of formal networks between enterprises and the state 1980-2005^2010^TIDSSKRIFT FOR SAMFUNNSFORSKNING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.321  </td>  <td>0.372</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The inclusion of aviation into the EU emission trading scheme - Impacts on competition between European and non-European network airlines^JAN 2010^TRANSPORTATION RESEARCH PART D-TRANSPORT AND ENVIRONMENT^In 2008, the European Commission, the European Parliament and the European Council agreed on including international aviation in the already existing European Union carbon market. From 2012, allowances will be required for all international flights landing at and departing from any airport in the EU. Domestic aviation will be subject to the same rules as international air traffic. Model-based empirical estimations presented in this paper indicate a diverse set of effects influencing competition between European and non-European aircraft operators. Initially, this paper provides an overview on recent political developments on EU as well as on International Civil Aviation Organisation level on the subject of emissions trading and aviation. Subsequently, our modelling approach and the main results concerning impacts on operating costs, ticket prices and cargo rates for European and non-European aircraft operators are presented and discussed. Finally, conclusions about the impacts on competition between European and non-European airlines are drawn. (C) 2009 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Stories of Inclusion?: Power, Privilege, and Difference in a Peace and Justice Network^NOV 2009^CONTEMPORARY SOCIOLOGY-A JOURNAL OF REVIEWS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.455  </td>  <td>0.755</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Pluralization or Assimilation? Effects of Multiple inclusion on the Integration of Immigrants^OCT 2009^ZEITSCHRIFT FUR SOZIOLOGIE^This contribution analyzes empirically the mechanisms and social conditions of the emergence of multiple integration and its effects on the social integration of immigrants. The analysis is based on a general theoretical model and uses data of the German Socio-Economic Panel (SOEP). Its background is the current debate between more pluralistic and more assimilationist approaches addressing the (mutual) impact of ethnic resources such as language, networks, and identification on immigrants' integration, especially with regard to their labor market chances. It reveals that multiple integration, including bilingualism, ethnically mixed networks, and hybrid identification, show no or even negative effects on integration in the host country and that ethnic segmentation always involves disadvantages. This applies, in particular, to processes on the labor market. At least in this respect, there is hardly any evidence supporting the hypotheses formulated by the advocates of the pluralistic position.
Systematic inclusion of mandatory interprofessional education in health professions curricula at Gunma University: a report of student self-assessment in a nine-year implementation^JUL 23 2009^HUMAN RESOURCES FOR HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.547  </td>  <td>3.376</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Young People, Online Networks, and Social Inclusion^JUL 2009^JOURNAL OF COMPUTER-MEDIATED COMMUNICATION^This paper examines the ways 9 teenage Australians-identified as being 'at risk' of social exclusion-are using online networks to participate in society. The research finds that online networks provided participants with valuable opportunities for social inclusion. These findings are contextualized in relation to current Australian Government education and social policies that, on the one hand, aspire to support young people's social inclusion, and on the other restrict their ability to use online networks because of safety and health concerns. This study contends that by defining and understanding the social value of young people's online network use we can move toward a policy framework that not only addresses potential online risks, but supports equitable digital inclusion for young people.
Maximizing community inclusion through mainstream communication services for adults with severe disabilities^JUN 2009^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SPEECH-LANGUAGE PATHOLOGY^Government policies in developed countries have emphasized the importance of community inclusion to improve the health and wellbeing of citizens. In order to achieve this, a reorientation of human services to include all people with disabilities has commenced with specialist disability services providing only limited supports. One vulnerable group of adult citizens are those with severe cognitive impairments. These citizens live either with their family or in small group homes supported by paid staff. Many of these people have little or no functional speech and are at an increased risk of social exclusion. This paper presents a discussion of the relevant literature underpinning the provision of mainstream speech-language pathology services to adults with severe cognitive disabilities. In particular we focus on practice considerations that might assist speech-language pathologists in providing effective and efficient services that support people with severe intellectual disability to live meaningful lives in the community. Five main considerations are discussed: (1) applying a holistic model to communication practice; (2) understanding terminology and the process of assessment; (3) considering the role of communication partners; (4) training communication partners; and (5) using communication supports to assist community inclusion.
Comparison of Distributions of Key Predictor Variables in CIREN and NASS-CDS Cases Meeting CIREN Inclusion Criteria^2009^TRAFFIC INJURY PREVENTION^Objective: The Crash Injury Research and Engineering Network (CIREN) database contains data from occupants who are seriously injured in motor vehicle crashes. Because of the number of injured occupants and the level of detail in CIREN, a number of previous studies have attempted to use CIREN data to estimate injury risk or relative risk by comparing the frequencies of CIREN occupants with an injury of interest to those without that injury. However, these comparisons provide little useful information because CIREN case occupants cannot provide the control and exposure information that is needed to appropriately estimate injury risk. One potential source of exposure/control information for CIREN is the database established by the National Automotive Sampling System-Crashworthiness Data System (NASS-CDS). However, using NASS-CDS for this purpose requires that NASS-CDS and CIREN cases are drawn from the same source population. The objective of this article is to assess whether this requirement is met. Methods: Occupants from NASS-CDS that meet CIREN inclusion criteria, termed CIREN-eligible NASS-CDS cases, were selected to represent the source population for CIREN. These CDS cases were compared to CIREN cases on a number of key variables that are used in many analyses of crash injury data. Comparisons were evaluated using chi-square tests. Results: The comparisons indicate that CIREN cases are similar to CIREN-eligible NASS-CDS cases on most variables, with some important exceptions. First, CIREN contains more frontal crashes than CIREN-eligible NASS-CDS. Second, there are fewer CIREN cases with two or more AIS 2 injuries and no AIS 3+ injuries than would be expected based on CIREN-eligible NASS-CDS. Finally, on average, occupants in CIREN have a greater number of AIS 3+ injuries, are less often belted in the front seat, and tend to be in higher severity crashes than occupants in CIREN eligible NASS-CDS. Discussion: These differences suggest that analyses aimed at estimating either relative risk of injury by comparing CIREN cases to base rates from NASS-CDS, or estimating risk of injury using control information from NASS-CDS, should be limited to a specific crash type and injury definition, and should only be performed for AIS 3+ injuries. In addition, analyses should account for the greater overall crash and injury severity of CIREN cases, at least in interpretation of the results.
SOFTWARE POLITICS IN BRAZIL Toward a political economy of digital inclusion^2009^INFORMATION COMMUNICATION &amp; SOCIETY^In this article, I examine free and open source software as a unique terrain of struggle over the politics of globalization, focusing on the Brazilian government's software strategy under the Lula administration. First, I locate this strategy in the historical context of the Brazilian government struggles for technological development and autonomy. I highlight how the Brazilian government used its power as a hierarchical organization to take advantage of the distinctive, networked political economy of free and open source software. I employ a post-structural political economy perspective to analyze the key role of discourse within the Brazilian software strategy. Second, I explore two ways that the Lula administration pursued its strategy of digital inclusion through an innovative approach to the politics of consumption. It used the power of government purchases to shift to free and open source systems, as well as pursuing a more ambitious project to democratize consumption of computers, free software and the Internet among Brazil's poor. I conclude by examining the implications of this software strategy for understanding and developing a political economy of digital inclusion.
Community Wireless Networks: Emerging Wireless Commons for Digital Inclusion^2009^2009 IEEE INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM ON TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIETY^Community wireless networks (CWNs) have emerged as collective actions where communities develop common telecommunication infrastructure for their use. These collective projects have gained widespread popularity as they serve as digital highways for community members to join the information society. This paper explores the role of CWNs in achieving digital inclusion. In particular, we used a survey-based instrument to measure the size and the capacity of a number of networks. We also explored other related variables such as service pricing, funding instruments and the life duration of the investigated CWNs to distinguish them from similar networks. This study provides useful theoretical accounts and analytical insights that we believe that can guide future studies and advance CWNs as a form of common projects. Also, it has the potential to help policy makers and community developers in promoting such collective projects.
Inclusion of a Second-Order Prior into Semi-Global Matching^2009^ADVANCES IN IMAGE AND VIDEO TECHNOLOGY, PROCEEDINGS^Today's stereo vision algorithms and Computing technology allow real-time 3D data analysis, for example for driver assistance systems. A recently developed Semi-Global Matching (SGM) approach by H. Hirschmuller became a popular choice due to performance and robustness. This paper evaluates different parameter settings for SGM, and its main contribution consists in suggesting to include a second order prior into the smoothness term of the energy function. It also proposes and tests a new cost function for SGM. Further more, some preprocessing (edge images) proved to be of great value for improving SGM stereo results oil real-world sequences, as previously already shown by S. Guan and R. Klette for belief propagation. There is also a performance gain for engineered stereo data (e.g.) as currently used on the Middlebury stereo website. However, the fact that results are. not as impressive as on the .enpeda. sequences indicates that optimizing for engineered data does not neccessarily improve real world stereo data analysis.
Engaging with teachers' knowledge: promoting inclusion in Zambian schools^2009^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^Current efforts to ensure that every child completes a full cycle of primary education are hampered by chronic poverty and prolonged conflict in the South. It is estimated that 75 million children of primary age are out of school and that one-third are disabled. This paper contrasts the exclusionary impact of the global digital and communication divide with the international rhetoric of Education for All. Access to information has increased in our brave new world, but inequitably. In this paper insights are explored from a study carried out by the Enabling Education Network in schools in Northern Zambia, in which reflective writing played a role in generating locally relevant teachers' knowledge. Although there was only minimal evidence of the benefits of the digital revolution, the Zambian teachers successfully developed a problem-based approach to including disabled children in education as part of their commitment to child rights.
International journal of telemedicine and applications^2009^International journal of telemedicine and applications^None
Social inclusion and learning networks: a 'wider notion of learning' or taking things in a different direction?^2009^RESEARCH PAPERS IN EDUCATION^This article has been produced from the work of a research project conducted in the context of a city-wide education service in the United Kingdom. This was the Liverpool Learning Networks Research Project, which began in July 2005. The researchers carried out semi-structured interviews with education practitioners - learning network coordinators - who have strategic responsibility for the development of school networks in Liverpool. The role of these practitioners represents a confluence of two significant agendas. The first is that of social inclusion, with 'the school' being seen as a key vehicle of policy delivery. The second is that of a shift towards the model of 'the school network', aimed at improving pupil learning. What emerges from the interviews is that social inclusion is central to these key practitioners' understanding of the learning networks for which they are responsible. Despite a strong local emphasis on 'learning', then, in the presentation of the learning networks, within the city the focus on what happens in the classroom has become blurred by a far wider, social notion of how learning should be understood. The authors argue that this represents a significant tension for how learning networks will actually develop. Whilst in a perfect world a focus upon pupil learning in the classroom on the one hand, and on child social welfare on the other, may complement one another, in reality this is not the case. In the real world of government priority, resource commitment and time-bound policy delivery, one or other focus will win out. The emphasis placed upon social inclusion by these senior education officers suggests that this is what will ultimately shape the direction and destination of these 'learning' networks. If so, the legacy of such networks may prove to be government-driven social reform rather than the pioneering of 'networked learning' that was their original promise.
PATHWAYS TO INCLUSION: INVOLVING PARENT TO EDUCATION^2009^SOCIETY, INTEGRATION, EDUCATION , PROCEEDINGS^None
DIGITAL TELEVISION AND BANKING INCLUSION IN BRAZIL: ALTERNATIVES TO ACCESS TECHNOLOGIES^2009^THIRD INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON DIGITAL SOCIETY: ICDS 2009, PROCEEDINGS^One of the main challenges of the Brazilian Government for the next 10 years will be the banking inclusion of the poorest portion of the population, which has a monthly family income of less than $200 Dollars. Only 25% of the economically active population have a bank account and 15% are digitally included. On the other hand more than 90% of Brazilian people have a TV, and only 12% are connected to the internet. These aspects have lead to the use of digital television as an innovative and effective way for banking inclusion, thus significantly improving statistics related to digital and social inclusion, allowing many people to be able to get micro credit programs and enjoy more benefits of been citizens. The Brazilian Digital Television System recently developed and established in some cities, would offer interactivity capabilities, thus promoting a progressive alteration of paradigm in the relationship involved between the user and the television system. For an adequate implantation of interactive applications, the use of several options available as last mile technologies for the return channel needs to be evaluated. Emphasizing the needs and specific characteristics of T-banking for people not connected to the internet, this article aims at discussing several possibilities of access technologies, involving power line communications, cellular networks, xDSL and others, for the sake of adequate communication when using the return channel of digital television system.
Rates of inclusion of teenagers and young adults in England into National Cancer Research Network clinical trials: Report from the National Cancer Research Institute (NCRI) Teenage and Young Adult Clinical Studies Development Group^DEC 9 2008^BRITISH JOURNAL OF CANCER^Poor inclusion rates into clinical trials for teenagers and young adults (TYA; aged 13 - 24 years) have been assumed but not systematically investigated in England. We analysed accrual rates (AR) from 1 April 2005 up to 31 March 2007 to National Cancer Research Network (NCRN) Phase III trials for the commonest tumour types occurring in TYA and children: leukaemia, lymphoma, brain and central nervous system, bone sarcomas and male germ cell tumours. AR for 2005 - 2007 were 43.2% for patients aged 10 - 14 years, 25.2% for patients aged 15 - 19 years, and 13.1% for patients aged 20 - 24 years in the tumour types analysed. Compared with accrual from 1 April 2005 to 31 March 2006, AR between 1 April 2006 and 31 March 2007 increased for those aged 10 - 14 and 15 - 19 years, but fell for those aged 20 - 24 years. AR varied considerably among cancer types. Despite four trials being available, patients over 16 years with central nervous system tumours were not recruited. Rates of participation in clinical trials in England from 2005 to 2007 were much lower for TYA older than 15 years compared with children and younger teenagers. The variations in open trials, trial age eligibility criteria and extent of trial activation in treatment centres in part explain this observation. Other possible influences, such as difficulties associated with the consent of TYA require further evaluation. Closer dialogue between those involved in planning and running trials for children and for adults is necessary to improve trial availability and recruitment. Further research is required to identify trends in trial availability and accrual for those tumours constituting the remaining 26% of TYA cancers.
Technologies visuelles et e-inclusion. Initiatives de sourds^DEC 2008^INNOVATION-THE EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SOCIAL SCIENCE RESEARCH^This article talks about the modalities and the stakes of c-inclusion through the case of deaf people. It explains the difficulties, often underestimated, of information and communication that deaf persons experience in their everyday life, even if they live, paradoxically, in a society saturated by information. It shows that, although they are excluded from much of what circulates on the internet networks, they appropriate the visual technologies of remote communication today. Through these media they try to build networks of information and exchange taking into account their ways of communication, exclusively visual. Several services of visio-interpretation are well developed in Europe, which aim to allow deaf people to access telephone communications and emergency services, and to improve their conditions of social participation. It ends by discussing the obstacles which persist in the sustainability and the democratization of these services, nevertheless intended to resolve a collective and shared problem of communication between deaf and hearing people.
Nonlinear transient dynamic response of elastic membranes with embedded rigid inclusions^OCT 2008^ENGINEERING ANALYSIS WITH BOUNDARY ELEMENTS^In this paper, the large amplitude transient dynamic response of membranes containing rigid inclusions is examined. These rigid inclusions significantly alter the membrane's stress and strain distributions, and therefore, create major difficulties in the system's analysis and design. The three coupled nonlinear equations in terms of the displacements governing the response of the membrane are solved using a boundary only method, which reduces the problem to the solution of three Poisson's quasistatic equations with fictitious time-dependent domain source densities under the same boundary conditions. The fictitious sources are represented by radial basis functions series and are established using a BEM-based procedure. A direct time-integration scheme is employed for the numerical solution of the equations of rigid body dynamics governing the constraint due to the surrounding membrane motion of the embedded inclusions. Membranes of various shapes are presented, which illustrate the merits of the proposed method and demonstrate its accuracy and efficiency. The method employed for the solution of the respective mathematical models is a boundary-only BEM having all the advantages of the pure BEM. (C) 2008 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Reducing the semantic gap in content-based image retrieval in mammography with relevance feedback and inclusion of expert knowledge^JUN 2008^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF COMPUTER ASSISTED RADIOLOGY AND SURGERY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.155  </td>  <td>2.148</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Community force: Ethnic networks for social inclusion^JUN-AUG 2008^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF PSYCHOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.608  </td>  <td>2.325</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Adult education, social inclusion and cultural diversity in regional communities^APR 2008^AUSTRALIAN JOURNAL OF ADULT LEARNING^This article presents the outcomes of recent research into adult education programs and experiences in the Shire of Campaspe, a region in northern Victoria. Research data of people from diverse cultural backgrounds reveal how individuals can utilise adult education as a space to explore their own social and cultural isolation in a regional context. The research reveals patterns Of migration, internal population mobility, social isolation and cultural identity within the context of this one regional shire. The article discerns the roles that adult education providers play in creating specific kinds of space for people to discover new social networks while interacting with informal and formal structures and processes of adult learning. Adult education programs and practices can play an important role in providing space for the exploration of social, cultural and economic experiences. However, individual adult education organisations manage their spaces and programs in such a way that excludes some people from social and economic activity crucial to the development of individual and community social capital. Adult learning policies, programs and practices in regional communities need to address the holistic nature of adult learning for people from culturally diverse backgrounds in order to contribute to the development of sustaining social capital for individuals, families and communities in Australian society.
Getting the complete picture: combining parental and child data to identify the barriers to social inclusion for children living in low socio-economic areas^MAR 2008^CHILD CARE HEALTH AND DEVELOPMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.918  </td>  <td>2.287</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Labour market experiences of young UK Bangladeshi men: Identity, inclusion and exclusion in inner-city London^2008^ETHNIC AND RACIAL STUDIES^Detailed qualitative data are used to explore the processes perpetuating labour market disadvantage among young UK-Bangladeshi men living in central London. Strong forces of inclusion within the Bangladeshi community are found to interact with forces of exclusion from 'mainstream' society to constrain aspirations and limit opportunities. Though diverse forms of young Bangladeshi masculinity are found, a common pattern is heavy dependency on intra-ethnic networks. Negative experiences of and isolation from 'mainstream' society further reinforce reliance on 'our own people'. However, acute ambivalence towards belonging to a dense Bangladeshi community exists, exemplified in the widespread denigration of the restaurant trade. Many respondents express the desire to 'break out' and access new experiences. The findings support current policy emphasis on 'connecting people to work' but highlight the more fundamental need to connect people across ethnic boundaries. The paper urges researchers to 'unpack' ethnicity - to consider carefully what ethnic identity implies in terms of access to resources and opportunities for different individuals in different contexts - in order better to understand the diversity of labour market outcomes and the persistence of disadvantage.
New Spaces for Inclusion? Lessons from the 'Three-Thirds' Partnerships in Wales^2008^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF URBAN AND REGIONAL RESEARCH^Multi-sector partnership working has become an increasingly important mode of governance across many Western European countries. It is seen as a means of overcoming social divisions, promoting more inclusive policymaking, and transforming governance systems. Partnership is perceived to be a more flexible form of governance, capable of resolving some of the complex policy and legitimation problems associated with more traditional statist approaches, and thus preferable for the delivery of public policy and services. However, as previous research has shown, there is an emerging 'partnership crisis' with partnerships often failing to be sufficiently inclusive of representative interests, leading to a lack of legitimacy, equity and effectiveness. This article explores the unique approach to addressing the lack of balanced and effective representation in partnerships developed by the Welsh Assembly Government. The Assembly has adopted a formal approach to structuring key partnerships on the basis of strict equality of representation across the public, private and voluntary sectors - the so-called 'three-thirds principle'. This approach is conceptualized as a form of metagovernance whereby formal influence over partnership structures is being used in an effort to create institutional spaces for inclusion. The analysis indicates that while such network design does achieve improvement in partnership legitimacy, on its own it does not increase partnership effectiveness which remains constrained by the prevailing emphasis upon narrow, managerialist implementation agendas.
Places of exclusion and inclusion: Asylum-seeker and refugee experiences of neighbourhoods in the UK^2008^JOURNAL OF ETHNIC AND MIGRATION STUDIES^This paper explores asylum-seekers' and refugees' experiences of place, social exclusion and social networks, based on a qualitative sociological study. It examines interviewees' constructions of neighbourhoods as excluding or including places and compares and contrasts parents' and children's accounts. Interviewees perceived social inclusion as a number of place-specific factors, including security, access to inclusive local resources and services, and migrants' ability to form supportive social networks. Particular emphasis was placed on social networks with people of the same ethnic or religious identity and other black and minority groups living locally, rather than social bridges with white and majority-ethnic communities. I suggest that parents' constructions of childhood reflect neighbourhood places; children are seen as vulnerable and in need of protection in 'excluding' neighbourhoods, and less vulnerable and relatively independent in 'including' ones. Children valued their independence and mobility within including neighbourhoods, and appeared to develop a sense of attachment to them, suggesting that they may integrate more quickly and fully within British society than their parents. The paper concludes that it is important to understand asylum-seekers' and refugees' experiences of social exclusion and inclusion in relation to their experiences of place.
Policy design for legitimacy: Expert knowledge, citizens, time and inclusion in the united kingdom's biotechnology sector^2008^PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION^More than ever, policy designers need to take legitimacy deficits seriously. To do so, they increasingly involve citizens in policy design processes and draw from a wider range of expertise. Where should they stop in terms of inclusiveness to citizens and expertise and for how long should they allow citizens and experts to be persuasive? These are the questions addressed in this article. Policy design legitimacy, the article argues, can be related to variations in designers and politicians' inclination to resort to output-oriented (expertise-based) versus input-oriented (citizen-centred) design processes. Input-oriented processes have a higher potential in terms of legitimacy deficit reduction than output-oriented processes, but they take longer, notably because they require the involvement of large numbers of people. In contrast, output-oriented processes have a slightly lower legitimacy potential, but can produce it faster. These propositions are illustrated by two policy design narratives drawn from the United Kingdom's biotechnology sector.
ON INCLUSION AND NETWORK GOVERNANCE: THE DEMOCRATIC DISCONNECT OF DUTCH ENERGY TRANSITIONS^2008^PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION^The coordination of policy networks, or network governance, poses threats and opportunities for democracy. Against the norms of liberal democracy, multi-actor partnerships do not fare well: they appear to lack responsiveness, public accountability and democratic legitimacy. But in terms of promoting deliberation and participation, networks could potentially deepen democracy. This paper injects some empirical insights into this debate by exploring network governance from the perspective of inclusion. It argues that any account of 'democratic' network governance must look beyond outputs, and consider the extent to which network arrangements include both 'functional' and 'descriptive' representatives of those potentially affected by decisions. An analysis of the inclusivity of network governance in recent Dutch energy reforms finds that partnerships are dominated by industry and government elites, at the expense of broader democratic engagement. A series of strategies are proposed for how to make network governance more accessible and accountable to affected publics.
INCLUSION AND ORDERING: THE COMPOUNDING EFFECTS OF TWO DISTINCT BUT RELATED STRUCTURAL POWER CONDITIONS^2008^SOCIAL BEHAVIOR AND PERSONALITY^A focal activity of network exchange theories is to discover structural conditions of power in exchange and, when more than one is present, to find their joint effect. In the 30 years since its inception, however, research in exchange networks has focused mostly on power conditions that are "connection types" and hence, until recently, only conditions of connection and their joint effects have been experimentally investigated. Here the compounding effects of a connection type (inclusion) and its "variant" (ordering) are investigated. A network position is "inclusively connected" when it must exchange with two or more others for benefits to come from any one. By contrast, ordering occurs when a series of exchanges must be completed in a given sequence. Resistance theory asserts that ordering is a variant (has similar but distinct effects) of inclusion and, when found together, the joint effect of the two is greater than when either is found separately. Predictions of the combined effects of the two structural power conditions of exchange are offered and investigated. Results suggest stronger effects than anticipated.
Contribution for learning of making class inclusion relations explicit^DEC 2007^ANNEE PSYCHOLOGIQUE^Knowledge acquisition depends on the construction of structured categories regarding a domain. In this study, we hypothesize that making knowledge organization explicit within a learning situation, through the use of semantic networks based on the class inclusion relation, can promote categorization at the relevant abstract level regarding the task and increase the quality of inferences due to properties inheritance. In order to test this hypothesis, 5(th) grade children were initiated to the manipulation of semantic networks regarding two domains from primary school education: the determiners and the quadrilaterals. Their knowledge was assessed through problem solving and multiple choice questionnaires. Their results were compared with the ones from children having studied the same contents in a classic manner. The results supported our hypothesis: the "network" group performed significantly better than the control group for both domains.
The limits of partnership: An exit-action strategy for local democratic inclusion^DEC 2007^POLITICAL STUDIES^The challenge of enhancing the `democratic anchorage' of partnerships has become a central concern in policy studies. Radical reform proposals designed to level the deliberative playing field include community veto powers and the appointment of neutral arbiters. Welcome as they would be, however, it is questionable whether such reforms would overcome power asymmetries in the partnership arena. A study of the local politics of social inclusion in two UK cities, Dundee and Hull, suggests that managerialism, driven by national governments, is eroding the prospects for partnership democratisation. But more significantly for the reformist agenda, public managers and community activists think in incompatible frames about the role of partnerships and in ways that are not understood by the other party. Non-communication undermines the prospects for an equitable democratic consensus. Insights from Bourdieu suggest that even in environments more favourable to equitable democratic discourse than those in Dundee and Hull, subtle manifestations of power in culture, discourse and bearing would undermine the potential for a Habermasian consensus between radically unequal actors. In a radical departure from the network governance paradigm, it is therefore argued that empowerment may depend less on enhanced network democracy than on strong independent community organisation capable of acting separately and coercively against governing institutions and elites - an exit-action strategy. These preliminary conclusions point to a substantial research agenda on the politics of the state-civil society nexus.
Enhanced prefix inclusion coding filter-encoding algorithm for packet classification with ternary content addressable memory^SEP 2007^IET COMPUTERS AND DIGITAL TECHNIQUES^Filter encoding can effectively enhance the efficiency of ternary content addressable memory (TCAM)-based packet classification. It can minimise the range expansion problem, reduce the TCAM space requirement and improve the lookup rate for IPv6. However, additional complexity will incur inevitably in the filter table update operations. Although the average update cost of the prefix inclusion coding (PIC) scheme is very low, the worst-case update cost can be significantly higher. Major modifications to the PIC scheme to improve its update performance are presented. The new coding scheme is called PIC with segmented domain. By dividing the field value domain into multiple segments, the mapping of field values to code points can be more structural and help avoid massive code-point relocation in the event of new insertions. Moreover, the simplified codeword lookup for the address fields can be implemented with embedded SRAM rather than with TCAM. Consequently, the lookup rate of the search engine can be improved to handle the OC-768 line rate.
Leaderless resistance and ideological inclusion: The case of the earth liberation front^FAL 2007^TERRORISM AND POLITICAL VIOLENCE^Leaderless resistance is a strategy of opposition that allows for and encourages individuals or small cells to engage in acts of political violence entirely independent of any hierarchy of leadership or network of support. This article examines the development of the leaderless resistance strategy by the radical right and more recently by the radical environmentalist movement. While both movements use leaderless resistance to avoid detection, infiltration, and prosecution by the state, environmental groups like the Earth Liberation Front (ELF) benefit additionally because of the ideological inclusiveness that leaderless resistance fosters. Historically, ideological cleavages have rendered radical environmental groups such as Earth First! less effective than they would have been otherwise. Using leaderless resistance, however, the ELF eliminates all ideology extraneous to the specific cause of halting the degradation of nature. This elimination enables the ELF to mobilize a greater number of "direct actions".
Broadband as an enabler for education and social inclusion^JUL-SEP 2007^JOURNAL OF THE INSTITUTE OF TELECOMMUNICATIONS PROFESSIONALS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.229  </td>  <td>0.106</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2017  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
On the inclusion of geographic information systems (GIS) in global navigation satellite systems (GNSS)^MAR 2007^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS^The latest innovation of the global navigation satellite systems (GNSS) technologies plays an important role in improving the quality and safety of modern life. Most of the applications evolved from the integration between GNSS, geographical information systems (GIS) and wireless communications and networking (WCN) systems. The wide spread applications that are using these technologies include: the automatic vehicle location (AVL), tracking systems, navigation systems, pedestrian navigation systems, intelligent transportation systems, precise positioning, and emergency callers, among others. The location-based services (LBS) are possible only by the combination of GNSS, GIS and WCN. The growing need for commercial LBS has forced cellular-phone and network manufacturers to concentrate on positioning solutions, which are even more precise than the regulatory mandates for positioning of emergency callers and other user services and applications. In this paper, we will present a literature review of the GNSS, the three satellite systems GPS, GLONASS and Galileo, which are aimed to support GNSS services, and a comparison between them and their role in creating a GIS. Copyright (C) 2006 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Ltd.
Albanian migration to Greece: Patterns and processes of inclusion and exclusion in the labour market^FEB 2007^EUROPEAN SOCIETIES^The Albanian case represents the most spectacular instance of East-West migration after the dismantling of the Iron Curtain. This paper examines the ways in which Albanians have been able to access employment in Greece and analyzes the processes through which the exclusion of Albanians in employment has occurred. In doing so, we acknowledge the multi-dimensionality of the concept and we look at what kind of inclusion different groups and individuals of Albanian origin achieve in the Greek society and why some migrants do better than others. We will identify three groups of migrants: those who have no contact with any networks of support, are unable to find a job and are in need of help; those who are at risk, fragile in economic terms, without access to social provisions or benefits; and finally those who after regularization have a relatively stable job, and access to social provisions and benefits.
The RUCA project and digital inclusion^2007^2007 LATIN AMERICAN NETWORK OPERATIONS AND MANAGEMENT SYMPOSIUM^The XO (OLPC's "one hundred dollar laptop") is under evaluation by the Brazilian Government as a possible educational tool and also as a means of promoting digital inclusion. The laptops would be distributed to school children to use during classes and to take home. The RUCA Project was created to validate the network capabilities of the XOs. In this paper we focus on one particular aspect of these tests, namely the feasibility of the XO as a digital inclusion aid device. The premise to be tested is the following. If children take their laptops home would they be able to communicate to each other and with the school? Will the novel 802.11s implementation (the first implementation of the IEEE draft) be successful in forming a mesh network to interconnect children in a low cost, infra-structure free environment? Will its performance suffice? Here, we present some answers that indicate that although further testing is still required, the results are encouraging.
Exploring equity and inclusion in the responses to AIDS^2007^AIDS CARE-PSYCHOLOGICAL AND SOCIO-MEDICAL ASPECTS OF AIDS/HIV^The HIV and AIDS epidemic feeds on, and worsens, unacceptable situations of poverty, gender inequity, social insecurity, limited access to healthcare and education, war, debt and macroeconomic and social instability. The number of people living with HIV and AIDS continues to increase in several regions, most markedly in sub-Saharan Africa, the Pacific, Eastern Europe and Central Asia. The persistent nature of the epidemic and its increasing incidence in less powerful, more economically marginalised communities signals a need for a critical review of past policy and practice, particularly where this has left unchanged or worsened the risk environments that lead to new infection. Available evidence suggests that the caring and consumption burdens of AIDS have largely been met by households, limiting the capacities for future caring and mitigation of impact. Social cohesion or the collective networking, action, trust and solidarity of society, plays a positive role in reducing risk and dealing with vulnerability but is itself negatively affected by AIDS. This paper introduces the programme of work reported in this supplement of AIDS Care with an analysis of background evidence of community responses to HIV and AIDS. It explores how interventions from state institutions and non-governmental organizations (NGOs) support and interact with these household, family and community responses. How far is risk prevention reliant on individuals' limited resources and power to act, while risk environments are left unchanged? How far are the impacts of AIDS borne by households and extended families, with weak solidarity support? Where are the examples of wider social responses that challenge the conditions that influence risk and that support household recovery? Through review of literature, this background paper sets out the questions that the studies reported in this supplement have, in various settings, sought to explore more deeply.
Learning from diverse contexts: Equity and inclusion in the responses to AIDS^2007^AIDS CARE-PSYCHOLOGICAL AND SOCIO-MEDICAL ASPECTS OF AIDS/HIV^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.105  </td>  <td>2.193</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Voice interfaces in art - An experimentation with web open standards as a model to increase web accessibility and digital inclusion^2007^Human-Computer Interaction - INTERACT 2007, Pt 2, Proceedings^The web has been largely mute and deaf but since the beginning of the 21st century this scenario is changing with the possibility of using intelligent voice interfaces on web systems. In this paper we present the Voice Mosaic - a system that allows voice interactions on the web through the telephone. Its voice interface uses speech recognition and synthesis solutions developed with VoiceXML, an open-standard in voice technologies adopted by the W3C. Voice Mosaic is an artwork that allows people to get in touch with the possibility of talking to the web, intending to cause awareness about it. Since the technology used in Voice Mosaic can be used to improve accessibility (for visual impaired people) and digital inclusion (Since the telephone is one of the cheapest devices in the world), dissolving borders and amplifying the pervasiveness, we believe that the concepts presented here can be useful to other developers.
ICT inclusion and gender: Tensions in narratives of network engineer training^JAN-FEB 2007^INFORMATION SOCIETY^Government, major information and communications technology (ICT) companies, and educational institutions in the United Kingdom currently claim that ICT skills training offers inclusion into the new economy. We focus on a private-public training initiative and its impact on the socially excluded, specifically lone women parents. Narrative data from four United Kingdom educational sites participating in this computer network engineer training program highlight a systemic paradox: that ICT skills development initiatives designed to support lone women parents are simultaneously working in opposition to broader policy goals such as work-life balance and ironically serve to reproduce the participants' classification as socially excluded. The assumptions underpinning the model of social inclusion driving the ICT skills training course are analyzed critically using the concepts of community of practice, classificatory systems, and marginalization. Our findings suggest that ICT training courses and initiatives should be accompanied by changes in pedagogic practice that accommodate the more wide-ranging needs of those targeted for inclusion, as well as changes in employment settings. We conclude by exploring the implications of this for government policy formation, business vendor qualifications, the design of ICT skills training initiatives, and our understanding of the role of ICT skills in overcoming the digital divide.
Neurobiological mechanisms for the regulation of mammalian sleep-wake behavior: Reinterpretation of historical evidence and inclusion of contemporary cellular and molecular evidence^2007^NEUROSCIENCE AND BIOBEHAVIORAL REVIEWS^At its most basic level, the function of mammalian sleep can be described as a restorative process of the brain and body; recently, however, progressive research has revealed a host of vital functions to which sleep is essential. Although many excellent reviews on sleep behavior have been published, none have incorporated contemporary studies examining the molecular mechanisms that govern the various stages of sleep. Utilizing a holistic approach, this review is focused on the basic mechanisms involved in the transition from wakefulness, initiation of sleep and the subsequent generation of slow-wave sleep and rapid eye movement (REM) sleep. Additionally, using recent molecular studies and experimental evidence that provides a direct link to sleep as a behavior, we have developed a new model, the cellular-molecular-network model, explaining the mechanisms responsible for regulating REM sleep. By analyzing the fundamental neurobiological mechanisms responsible for the generation and maintenance of sleep-wake behavior in mammals, we intend to provide a broader understanding of our present knowledge in the field of sleep research. (c) 2007 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
ORGANIZATIONAL CITIZENSHIP BEHAVIORS - Concept redefinition, inclusion, and reconceptualization^2007^REFINING FAMILIAR CONSTRUCTS: ALTERNATIVE VIEWS IN OB, HR, AND I/O^The literature concerning organizational citizenship behaviors (OCBs) has traditionally relied upon a broad definition which is the extant definition from the original conception of OCBs. In order to refocus the construct of OCBs, we explicate the need for inclusion of workplace deviance behaviors (WDBs) within the fold of behaviors that individuals perform within organizations toward some end. Specifically, we believe that WDBs are another type of behavior that employees embrace to align their perceptions of inequity within the firm, in the same manner as OCBs. Through application of equity theory, we argue that individuals are motivated to undertake OCBs/WDBs for other than their currently extended motivations. Moreover, we argue that the appropriate conceptualization of OCBs/WDBs falls in line with previous conceptualizations of political/support behavior in organizations. We discuss the manner in which this reconceptualization creates a new focus for OCB research, and suggest ways in which further work within the nomological network will lead to greater incremental contributions of the OCB literature in our understanding of organizational behavior broadly.
Pain drawing scoring is not improved by inclusion of patient-reported pain sensation^NOV 1 2006^SPINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.903  </td>  <td>3.616</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Does expansion mean inclusion in Nigerian higher education?^NOV-DEC 2006^WOMENS STUDIES INTERNATIONAL FORUM^The expansion of higher education in Nigeria has been astronomical since 1948 when the first university, University of Ibadan (UI), was established. This article explores gender equity issues relating to access, curriculum transformation and staff development within the faculties of technology and agriculture at the University of Ibadan. It concludes that while gender is not explicitly on the university's agenda, university life is a highly gendered experience. Women's access to the Faculty of Technology is hampered by poor preparation at lower levels of education, male dominance of time and space and societal expectations of appropriate work for women. Affirmative action is perceived as discriminatory and counterproductive. The Agriculture curriculum is not gender mainstreamed because of limited knowledge and expertise, bureaucracy in curriculum change, poor pedagogy and prevalent negative attitude to gender. For female staff, power relations symbolically construct and regulate their experiences of work. Exclusions, while covert, are attenuated by women's exposure to local and international networks and mentoring. There is a need to formulate, implement and evaluate gender equity policies to address gendered experiences of female staff at the university. (c) 2006 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Accessible support for family caregivers of seniors with chronic conditions: From isolation to inclusion^SUM 2006^CANADIAN JOURNAL ON AGING-REVUE CANADIENNE DU VIEILLISSEMENT^Accessible support programs can improve health outcomes for family caregivers of older relatives with a chronic condition. Over the course of 6 months, 27 experienced family caregivers provided weekly support via the telephone to 66 individuals, either new family caregivers of seniors recently diagnosed with stroke or newly vulnerable family caregivers (i.e., facing increasing demands from the deterioration of their senior relative's condition) of seniors with Alzheimer's disease. Qualitative data documented the perceived impact of the intervention, including increased satisfaction with support, coping skills, caregiving competence and confidence, and decreased caregiver burden and loneliness. Caregivers identified varied support processes that overcame support deficits in their social networks. These processes can facilitate replication in future research and inform practice, programs, and policies.
Women and ICT training: Inclusion or searegation in the new economy?^2006^SOCIAL INCLUSION: SOCIETAL AND ORGANIZATIONAL IMPLICATIONS FOR INFORMATION SYSTEMS^With the digital revolution narrated as the means for social cohesion in the globally competitive national economy, policy and corporate moves are afoot to increase the inclusion of women into the ICT arena, particularly those who have traditionally remained on the fringes of societal inclusion such as lone women parents. By equipping them with ICT skills, such as network engineering, and utilizing their "soft" relational expertise, greater employability and opportunity is seen as the route toward inclusion. Yet a tension emerges between policy and practice, where such women are finding it hard to gain work, for the ICT industry, renown for its long hours culture, is slow to implement government recommendations for greater work flexibility and their soft skills remain unrecognized, This paper positions this tension within a wider labor market background that focuses on part-time work, for a general lack of full-time flexibility means women with care responsibilities have a limited range of employment choice. Part-time employment is frequently reflective of dead-end jobs and a catalog of inequalities, where occupational segregation and discrimination point to the feminization of low-level ICT skills. This gendered relation to the labor market is hidden by the narrative of inclusion through ICT skills acquisition. Furthermore, the relational association reduces women and men to normative gendered identities, and rates which will do little to challenge existing stereotypes of technical expertise. The paper concludes that rather than inclusion, the possible result is further gendered inequalities and exclusion.
Financial inclusion, universal banking and post offices in Britain^SEP 2005^AREA^The causes and consequences of financial exclusion have become a policy concern in Britain in recent years. This paper analyses policy discourses around financial exclusion and considers the (social and economic) geographical issues surrounding one particular policy response - universal banking services. It examines the policy background which led to the introduction of these services, and the institutional role of the Post Office, before discussing their potential social and spatial consequences.
The inclusion of the non-European world in international society, 1870s-1920s: evidence from global networks^JUL 2005^GLOBAL NETWORKS-A JOURNAL OF TRANSNATIONAL AFFAIRS^This article is envisaged as a contribution to the historical sociology of globalization. In it I investigate the idea that from the 1870s peoples beyond Europe were increasingly included into international society. The discussion explores theoretical issues around intercultural engagement, arguing against those who see inclusion in terms of simple co-option into Western modernity, and in favour of a more subtle co-production of modern processes and forms of difference. Attention then moves on to examine historical evidence drawn from some knowledge networks involving Africa and India. Inclusion is seen in terms of a very complex and shifting set of engagements, conflicts and modes of cooperation, circumscribed by both racial and elite forms of discourse under the shadow of the growing political instability of empire. The methodology of interpersonal network analysis is also commended as a way of opening up debates about the long-term history of the dynamics and limits to the emergence of global public spheres.
The entangled geographies of social exclusion/inclusion for people with learning disabilities^JUN 2005^HEALTH &amp; PLACE^People with learning disabilities (PWLD) are one of the most marginalised groups in Western society. Social policies attempting to redress this situation focus on their 'reinclusion' into mainstream socio-spaces through engagement in 'normal' activities, primarily paid employment and independent living. Drawing on group interviews in Scotland, the paper develops a nuanced account of the lives of PWLD, exploring their experiences of exclusion and seeming 'inclusion', and also the alternative spaces and networks of inclusion developed by many PWLD. The paper argues that the situations and experiences of exclusion/inclusion are complex and 'entangled', shaped by the socio-spatial contexts within which PWLD live. The paper 'reimagines' social inclusion as a transformation of mainstream social spaces to incorporate PWLD, achieved through self-advocacy. (C) 2004 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Salt inclusions in polar ice core: Location and chemical form of water-soluble impurities^MAR 30 2005^EARTH AND PLANETARY SCIENCE LETTERS^Ice cores retrieved from ice sheets provide the most detailed records of climate over the past several hundred thousand years. For example, water-soluble impurities have been used as proxies for atmospheric chemistry. However, numerical models warned that the distributions of the trace constituents are significantly altered by rapid diffusion through liquid veins along triple junctions during ice sheet flow. Although these calculations assumed that the trace constituents are preferentially confined to grain boundaries and form a vein network, this assumption has not been confirmed experimentally. Using micro-Raman spectroscopy, here we show that most of the soluble impurities are confined as salt inclusions within grains. These inclusions are mainly composed of the sulfate salts Na2SO4 (.) 10H(2)O, MgSO(4)(.)12H(2)O, and CaSO4 (.) 2H(2)O. We also found that methanesulfonate salts and other complex salts exist only in the glacial-period ice. Our findings imply that these salts form within 185 m of the ice surface and then preserve their composition as the ice is pushed to greater depths. This means that depth profiles of the trace constituents should be preserved in deep ice cores as reliable proxies for past climate. (c) 2005 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Cyber inclusion through activity^2005^EDUCATION AND THE KNOWLEDGE SOCIETY: INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SUPPORTING HUMAN DEVELOPMENT^All individuals have the right to express themselves through an activity, in which one's potential can be developed and recognised. On the other hand everyone should contribute to the broad implementation and recognition of this particular right. In the cyber-inclusion project of the Centre of Information's Technologies (CTI) both technological development and inclusion of minorities, in particular handicapped people and people with marginalised lifestyles, are addressed. Three fundamental principles underpin the project process: integration, a three-dimensional approach to activities (requested, necessary and feasible) and adequate structures. The individual human being is the focus of concern.
Three degrees of inclusion: the emergence of self-organizing social beliefs^2005^Modeling Cooperative Behavior in the Social Sciences^Using the scientific definition of gossip, an ancient and ubiquitous phenomenon of the social networks, we present our preliminary study and its results on how to measure the networks based on dissemination of connections and information. We try to accurately calculate the gossip-effects in networks with our hypothesis of "three degrees of inclusion". Our preliminary study on the subject of "three degrees of inclusion" gives latency to a very important property of social networks. Observing the human communication of closely knit social groups we came to the conclusion that the human networks are based on not more than three degrees of links. Taking the strong human ties into account our research indicates that whoever is on the fourth degree rarely counts as an in-group member. Our close friend's close friends close friend - that is about the farthest - three steps - our network can reach out when it comes to telling a story or asking for a favor. Up to now no investigations have been performed to see whether the effects of gossip lead to the phase transition of the content of network's self-organizing communication. Our conclusion is that the gossip-effect must be considered as the prefactor of the news and opinions diffusion and dynamics at the social level.
Microfinance, the labour market and social inclusion: A tale of three cities^DEC 2004^SOCIAL POLICY &amp; ADMINISTRATION^Great hopes have been held out for microfinance and other community development finance institutions (CDFIs) in industrialized countries as an instrument of "financially sustainable welfare provision", following on from their success in many developing countries. Using interview data drawn from an exploratory sample of 45 clients, this paper examines the social and economic impact of three microfinance institutions in Glasgow, Sheffield and Belfast. The tentative conclusion is that most loans we examined do hit the target of the "financially excluded but bankable", and exert an impact on poverty and social exclusion through the labour market and through helping to build social networks which reduce interpersonal risk. Our initial estimate is that each loan studied here was responsible for about 0.67 exits from unemployment over the two years 2000-2. If this ratio holds good outside the sample (and we emphasize the limitations of small sample size), this could mean that in the absence of microfinance services, the national unemployment total would be higher by some 2.4 per cent (or 22,000 individuals). The loans we have examined also save about pound0.4 million on what would otherwise have been social security payments; grossed up again to all microfinance organizations, this implies an annual saving of about pound250 million (1.4 per cent) on the total social security budget. However, to achieve this optimal impact microfinance institutions need to diversify their product: for example by switching from business loans into consumption loans, micro-insurance, and equity, particularly in the rehabilitation of run-down council estates.
Expectations of organizational mobility, workplace social inclusion, and employee job performance^FEB 2004^JOURNAL OF ORGANIZATIONAL BEHAVIOR^Two new concepts, employees' Expectations of Organizational Mobility (EOM) and Workplace Social Inclusion (WSI), were developed in part from the burgeoning literature on social capital. Two independent tests of the hypotheses in two different organizations found that the greater employees' EOM, the lower their WSI, which in turn was associated with lower employee job performance ratings. Further, the mediating role of WSI was confirmed. Our findings support the arguments of those who have warned that employees' EOM, and implicitly the human resources philosophy of 'employability' that encourages such expectations, is associated with comparatively worse individual job performance via lower levels of employee WSI. The value of these concepts for current employability debates, for the use of subjective supervisory judgments in performance appraisal ratings and for researchers interested in organization-based communal social capital, is discussed. Copyright (C) 2004 John Wiley Sons, Ltd.
Inclusion of a high voltage DC-voltage source converter model in a Newton-Raphson power flow algorithm^NOV 2003^IEE PROCEEDINGS-GENERATION TRANSMISSION AND DISTRIBUTION^Models for high voltage DC-voltage source converter (HVDC-VSC) controllers suitable for direct incorporation into Newton-Raphson power flow algorithms are presented. The models are developed from first principles, starting with a simple VSC model and progressing to encompass the full HVDC-VSC link model. The applied modelling approach is modular in nature and in addition to the shunt-connected voltage source model, which may be used to represent a STATCOM, a series-connected voltage source model is also developed. This enables significant modelling flexibility since by suitably combining shunt and/or series voltage sources several VSC-based flexible AC transmission system (FACTS) controller models are realised quite straightforwardly, namely the back-to-back HVDC-VSC, the full HVDC-VSC link and the unified power flow controller. Attention is focused on the HVDC-VSC models. The models are implemented into an existing OOP power flow computer program written in C++ that incorporates a wide portfolio of FACTS models. The models are tested for reliability towards the convergence and accuracy of results using several power systems with varying degrees of operational complexity and power flow control requirements.
Peer relations across contexts: Individual-network homophily and network inclusion in and after school^SEP-OCT 2003^CHILD DEVELOPMENT^Peer relations across 2 contexts (in school and after school) were examined for 577 participants, approximately 12 years old, from 3 middle schools in Milan, Italy. The primary. research questions were: Do peer networks from different contexts uniquely contribute to explaining variance in individual behavior? Do measures of peer preference and peer network inclusion across contexts uniquely contribute to explaining individual depressive symptoms? Structural equation models showed that both the in-school and the after-school peer networks uniquely contributed to explaining variance in 2 types of individual problem behavior (in-school problem behavior, after-school delinquency), and that similarity with the 2 peer networks varied according to behaviors specific to each context and across gender. Finally, both in-school and after-school peer network inclusion contributed to explaining variance in depressive symptoms, after controlling for classroom peer preference.
A history of the action learning, action research, and process management association (ALARPM): From Brisbane (Australia) to the world through inclusion and networks^AUG 2003^SYSTEMIC PRACTICE AND ACTION RESEARCH^Action Learning, Action Research, and Process Management Association (ALARPM) is an organization of volunteers dedicated to the international expansion of action learning, action research, and process management, through world congresses. It has existed for over a dozen years now, despite significant stresses and strains, and has successfully conducted five world congresses with a sixth one in 2003. This history of ALARPM shows that a small group can set out to be international and inclusive from the beginning, so long as it also develops processes to sustain itself internally.
Isolation or inclusion: Creating safe spaces for lesbian and gay youth^JUL-SEP 2003^FAMILIES IN SOCIETY-THE JOURNAL OF CONTEMPORARY HUMAN SERVICES^This article demonstrates the use of action research to bring youth and adults together to address homophobia in their community. Two community-based organizations led an action research project, using student surveys, peer-to-peer interviews, student artwork, and artifacts of homophobia in schools. The research found that 94% of the students surveyed hear anti-gay epithets "frequently" or "sometimes' in their schools; 86% of students say that anti-gay harassment is "rarely" or "never" confronted by school officials; and nearly 1 in 10 (9%) of students have been physically harassed based on their real or perceived sexual orientation. This project culminated in an intergenerational conference during which participants developed a network to provide ongoing education, advocacy, and youth development around the problem of school-based homophobia.
Getting on the Net: The struggle for digital inclusion of the Navajo^SPR 2003^IEEE TECHNOLOGY AND SOCIETY MAGAZINE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.022  </td>  <td>1.047</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Individualised support and funding: building blocks for capacity building and inclusion^JAN 2003^DISABILITY &amp; SOCIETY^The paradigm in disability supports is shifting away from institutional services and professional control towards self-determination and community involvement of people with disabilities. The assumption that the best way to provide disability supports is for government to give money to agencies or services, rather than directly to people with disabilities and their support networks, is being challenged. This article reports on findings and themes from a Canadian study that investigated individualised funding projects from different parts of the world. Ten of fifteen of the most 'promising initiatives' were selected for more detailed study and analysis. Projects analysed were from Canada, the US, and Australia. Themes emerging from the study included the fact that values and principles mattered, a policy framework provided coherence and equity, infrastructure supports for individuals were separate from service system, the facilitator-broker role differed from case management, allocation of individualised funds was designed to be equitable and accountable to the funder and person, and a 'learn as you go' philosophy maximised positive outcomes. This research project demonstrates that individualised support and funding, when embedded in the new paradigm of disability and community, builds capacity of individuals, families, and communities.
Secure inclusion of phones into online e-meetings^2003^MANAGEMENT OF MULTIMEDIA NETWORKS AND SERVICES, PROCEEDINGS^Online Internet based e-meetings for synchronous communication is becoming more and more common and the need for secure communication is a strong requirement from both corporate and private users. At the same time not all users can always be available via the Internet and as phones (fixed and mobile) are still the dominant communication method there is a need for general inclusion of phones into online e-meetings, without compromising the security of the online session. This paper presents an architecture supporting three different scenarios for including normal phones into e-meetings, and at the same time keeping the security of the session intact. It is also shows how an e-meeting portal is used for simple inclusion of phones into e-meetings even if the inviting client is behind a NAT gateway or a firewall.
Partnership working in delivering social inclusion: organizational and gender dynamics^SEP-OCT 2002^JOURNAL OF EDUCATION POLICY^The paper reports on an in-depth evaluation of a Single Regeneration Fund Budget funded partnership based oil individual and community education as a means of promoting social inclusion. Partnership has become the preeminent mechanism for furthering the UK Government's social inclusion agenda. The paper focuses on the dynamics of partnership itself at management level. Bourdieu's concept of habitus is drawn upon it] thinking about some of the processes facilitating or hindering partnership working. In particular, the paper draws attention to gender dynamics in partnership working and the ways in which these interact with organizational and professional practices. The article postulates that connections established prior to the formal partnership constituted cultural capital, which was transferred to the partnership. In particular, it was found that gender networks and practices constitute an important source of skills and dispositions. This way of viewing partnership working contributes to debates about sustain ability, since it suggests that personal qualities that are essential to project success are a transferable resource and that there is a pool of cultural capital based oil previous]), existing social networks that may transcend organizational and professional boundaries. The paper suggests that practices and networks oil the ground may survive changes in both the language of public policy and models of implementation.
Preservation of a magnetization carried by magnetite-inclusions during amphibolite grade metamorphic conditions? An example from the Sarek Dykeswarm, Northern Swedish Caledonides^JUL 2002^GEOPHYSICAL JOURNAL INTERNATIONAL^An outcrop consisting of a 608 Myr old sheeted dyke complex and dyke-intruded metasediments has been investigated palaeomagnetically. It is located in the interior of a nappe the basal and upper parts of which suffered penetrative deformation and amphibolite grade metamorphism during the Caledonian orogeny. The only trace from the orogeny at the outcrop is a widely spaced network of brittle and ductile shear zones crosscutting dyke contacts. Foliated amphibolite consisting of hornblende, quartz, plagioclase, garnet and sphene occur locally within them. The opaque mineralogy of the dykes differs from that commonly found in continental dykes, with ilmenite and pyrrhotite being the major visible opaque phases, and there are indications that magnetite inclusions exsolved from silicates carry a primary remanence even though Ar-39-(40) Ar mica ages were reset at ca. 430 Myr during the orogeny. A secondary component carried by pyrrhotite is less prominent but falls on the Baltican APW path at 430 Myr. The inferred primary component has a large directional uncertainty, but indicates low palaeolatitudes for the Baltscandian margin during rifting.
Inclusion of human operator interaction in performance optimization of power distribution operations using knowledge-based methods^APR 28 2002^ELECTRIC POWER SYSTEMS RESEARCH^Conventional approaches for performance optimization of power distribution operations based solely on numerical methods do not employ the input of human operators in the decision making process. Knowledge-based methods, particularly those employing fuzzy logic, can be effectively used to obtain information from a human operator. A method is described for inclusion of human operator interaction in performance optimization of power distribution operations. The decision maker identifies system dependent parameters, defines operational policy, and offers a qualitative assessment of temperature. Fuzzy sets are used to model the temperature assessment provided by the operator. For each type of decision maker input, the paper describes the information required and how this information is used in performance optimization of power distribution operations. (C) 2002 Published by Elsevier Science B.V.
Development of categorization: Is late class inclusion failure explained by a lack of inhibition?^JAN-MAR 2002^ANNEE PSYCHOLOGIQUE^The present study is based Levine and Prueitt's (1989) neural network model which links categorization capacities to neural maturation of the frontal lobes. We studied Houde et Joyes's hypothesis (1995) that postulates that children fail in certain "modified" inclusion tasks at 8 to 12 years old due to lack of inhibition rather than lack of internal logic. A regression analysis shows that two inhibition tasks (the Trail Making test and the Stroop test) account for 50 % of the variance in class inclusion performances. Links between development of inhibitory processes and categorization capacities are discussed.
Digital inclusion, social exclusion and retailing: An analysis of data from the 1999 Scottish Household Survey.^2002^SOCIAL IMPLICATIONS OF INFORMATION AND COMMUNICATION TECHNOLOGY, PROCEEDINGS^Data from the. 1999 Scottish Household Survey is analysed to identify segments of the population who are 'socially excluded, and the rates of home ownership of PCs and of home internet access of these groups are analysed The data show that the excluded invariably fall on the wrong side of the digital divide, and are thus unable. to take advantage of recent developments in ICTs. The excluded who are faced with limited retail choice lack home access to ecommerce.
Two cultures of rights - The quest for inclusion and participation in modern America and Germany - Introduction^2002^TWO CULTURES OF RIGHTS: THE QUEST FOR <span class="hitHilite">INCLUSION</span> AND PARTICIPATION IN MODERN AMERICA AND GERMANY^None
Special schools, inclusion and the World Wide Web - the emerging research agenda^JUN 2001^BRITISH JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL TECHNOLOGY^A comprehensive survey of UK special schools and Pupil Referral Units (PRUs) has shown that the rapid increase in Internet use on the part of mainstream schools has not been mirrored in special education. Despite this situation, interviews with IT coordinators and Headteachers in special schools and PRUs indicate some of the reasons for creation of special school WWW homepages. The interview data indicates concerns relating to issues of separation and inclusion that have been increased by recent moves towards inclusion as a goal within the special education sector.
On the inclusion of channel's time dependence in a hidden Markov model for blind channel estimation^MAY 2001^IEEE TRANSACTIONS ON VEHICULAR TECHNOLOGY^In this paper, the theory of hidden Markov models (HMM) is applied to the problem of blind (without training sequences) channel estimation and data detection. Within a HMM framework, the Baum-Welch (BW) identification algorithm is frequently used to find out maximum-likelihood (ML) estimates of the corresponding model. However, such a procedure assumes the model (i.e., the channel response) to be static throughout the observation sequence. By means of introducing a parametric model for time-varying channel responses, a version of the algorithm, which is more appropriate for mobile channels [time-dependent Baum-Welch (TDBW)I is derived, Aiming to compare algorithm behavior, a set of computer simulations for a GSM scenario is provided. Results indicate that, in comparison to other Baum-Welch (BW versions of the algorithm, the TDBW approach attains a remarkable enhancement in performance. For that purpose, only a moderate increase in computational complexity is needed.
Inclusion of ECG and EEG analysis in neural network models^2001^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 23RD ANNUAL INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF THE IEEE ENGINEERING IN MEDICINE AND BIOLOGY SOCIETY, VOLS 1-4: BUILDING NEW BRIDGES AT THE FRONTIERS OF ENGINEERING AND MEDICINE^Evaluation of biomedical signals is important in the diagnosis of numerous diseases, chiefly in cardiology through the use of electrocardiograms, and to a more limited extent, in neurology through the use of electroencephalograms. While automated techniques exist for both ECG and EEG analysis, it is likely that additional information can be extracted from these signals through the use of new methods. A chaotic method for analysis of signal analysis variability is presented here that identifies the degree of variability in the signal over time. A second focus is to develop higher order decision models that can incorporate these results with other clinical parameters to represent a more comprehensive view of the disease state, using a neural network model.
An Access Ability Network programme facilitating inclusion^JUN-AUG 2000^JOURNAL OF INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.941  </td>  <td>2.637</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Beyond affirmative action: Toward a model of diversity and organizational inclusion^2000^ADMINISTRATION IN SOCIAL WORK^The demographic changes in the American population, coupled with civil rights legislation and affirmative action programs, have created an unprecedented diversity in the American workforce, and have made diversity management a central issue in human resource management. There is accumulating evidence indicating that, although present in greater numbers, people from diverse backgrounds are more likely to be excluded from information networks and decision making processes in organisations, both formal and informal. The author reviews theoretical and empirical linkages between diversity characteristics, inclusion-exclusion, and personal and organizational outcomes such as job satisfaction and organization commitment. She present a conceptual model that incorporates the notion of the inclusion-exclusion continuum into an overall model of diversity in the workplace and suggests specific propositions that are derived from the model. Finally, the author draws implications for future research and for practice with diverse organizations.
Journal of psychiatric and mental health nursing^2000-Jan^Journal of psychiatric and mental health nursing^None
From exclusion to inclusion: rethinking Johannesburg's central city^SEP 1999^ENVIRONMENT AND PLANNING A^In this paper I develop an alternative way of explaining the decline of the Johannesburg central city and of then looking to its present transformation and future potential. There has been a strongly predominant and blaming set of explanations based on crime and grime, poor service delivery, and lack of control of informal trading during the 1990s. These explanations and especially the conception of the future have relied on American models of inner-city development. It is argued that policymakers have been blinded to local economic potentials that do not exist in American cities. The point is critical owing to the restructuring of the central city's economy. The central city is no longer the metropolitan CBD; it is losing most of its business and financial services and many manufacturing enterprises. It is, however, developing trading networks throughout sub-Saharan Africa and backward-linked small manufacturing opportunities. A new and different economy appears to be emerging.
A fluid inclusion and stable isotope study of hydrothermal circulation in a transform zone: Western Blanco Depression, northeast Pacific^JUN 10 1999^JOURNAL OF GEOPHYSICAL RESEARCH-SOLID EARTH^The Blanco Trough (Juan de Fuca Ridge) exposes a continuous section of upper oceanic crust (basalts and diabases) that has been hydrothermally altered in a transform fault environment. Microthermometric measurements on fluid inclusions and stable oxygen isotope compositions of whole rocks and secondary minerals from pillow lava and diabase units were performed to determine the evolution of hydrothermal fluids. A few law delta(18)O values (down to +4.8 parts per thousand) for diabase, and temperatures from 280 to 350 degrees C obtained from fluid inclusions in quartz, attest to an early high temperature stage of hydrothermal circulation close to the ridge axis. A dense fracture network has maintained moderate temperature hydrothermal circulation (about 200 degrees C) rooted down to the top of the diabase unit. Oxygen isotope profiles in two reference sections reveal that the upper part of the oceanic crust exposed in the Blanco Trough is significantly O-18-enriched (+6.6 parts per thousand) relative to its mantle source (5.7 +/- 0.2 parts per thousand). We propose that extensive off-axis tectonic activity linked to the transform zone favored fluid circulation in crust at maximum temperatures of about 200 degrees C. The low-temperature wa,ter-rock interactions (T &lt; 200 degrees C) were more pervasive in the Blanco crust, despite being 6 times younger than the crust at Hole,504B, which evolved far from any influence of transform fault activity. Transform faults, which are common in slow-spreading ridge environments, may therefore significantly affect the hydrothermal activity, which contributes to the regulation of the chemical and isotope composition of seawater.
Dilemmas of peer assistance in a bilingual full inclusion classroom^JAN 1999^ELEMENTARY SCHOOL JOURNAL^In this ethnographic study of a second-grade full inclusion classroom, I examined spontaneous, unstructured peer assistance interactions between 22 general education and 11 special education students during small-group and independent work periods. Data sources included field notes from 9 months of participant observation, transcripts of audio and video recordings, and interviews with teachers and students. Qualitative and quantitative analyses of helping interactions revealed that helping exchanges in academic contexts were complicated by students' social agendas, particularly their desire to achieve mastery, display competence, establish their place in the classroom social network, and save face. The complex peer social worlds of the classroom affected special education students' access to curricular content. Examples of classroom interaction involving 3 focal special education students are given. Implications for classroom practice include the need for more active teacher involvement in understanding and monitoring students' helping interactions,the creation of learning structures that allow all students to display competence regularly, and direct instruction in the social and Linguistic skills necessary for fuller participation in peer assistance.
Composite curve theory with inclusion of chemical reactions^NOV-DEC 1998^ENERGY CONVERSION AND MANAGEMENT^The present paper proposes a way to introduce chemical reactions in composite curves, in such a way that the irreversibility's generated by the chemical reaction are expressed as equivalent thermal diffusion. The heat of reaction is considered to be released at a "reversible reaction temperature" and the diffusion between this reversible temperature and the actual temperature generates the actual exergy destruction. Corresponding hot and cold curve contributions result in the composite curves, which visualizes the exergy destruction and the chemical pinches which are present in the exchanger and reactor network. The concept is illustrated through an application on chemical recuperation in a gas turbine cycle. (C) 1998 Elsevier Science Ltd. All rights reserved.
Hub-and-spoke networks and the inclusion of environmental costs on airport pricing^SEP 1998^TRANSPORTATION RESEARCH PART D-TRANSPORT AND ENVIRONMENT^Previous studies into hub airports have tended to concentrate on the economic dimensions, such as market power, airline fares and barriers to entry. Airline hubbing has considerably altered airport economics: it increases the number of flights into and out of a major airport and it increases externalities such as airside and landside congestion, aircraft noise and emissions. The principal contribution of our paper is to focus on the environmental externalities associated with extensive hubbing. Such externalities are equally relevant to other large airports. We first present a conceptual spatial model which addresses the environmental impacts related to extensive hubbing: increase in environmental costs,and spatial redistribution of environmental externalities. Then, we formally address the conceptual problem by proposing a model of airline economics, Schmalensee's model (1977, Bell Journal of Economics 8, 565-576) is adapted to allow for a monopolist airline to determine the optimal network and, to set prices and the number of flights. Finally, the paper explores the effect of charging the airline for these externalities through an 'enviromnental' tax when it operates a huband-spoke network. We examine two scenarios, a passenger-related tax and an aircraft-related tax and show the extent to which prices and the number of flights are affected by the tax. (C) 1998 Elsevier Science Ltd. All rights reserved.
Managing diversity as a proxy for requisite variety - Risks in identity-conscious inclusion and pressures to conform^DEC 1997^JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT INQUIRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.986  </td>  <td>2.058</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The Florida Inclusion Network survey analysis and implications^1997^SYSTEM OF CARE FOR CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH: EXPANDING THE RESEARCH BASE, ANNUAL RESEARCH CONFERENCE, PROCEEDINGS^None
EXCLUSION, INCLUSION, AND COMPOUND CONNECTION IN EXCHANGE NETWORKS^JUN 1995^SOCIAL PSYCHOLOGY QUARTERLY^Elementary theory predicts that the distribution of power will vary as the type of connection varies.  Previous research supporting that prediction has shown that power in unilateral monopolies is centralized when the central position is connected exclusively and decentralized when the central position is connected inclusively.  Here we extend the theory to networks with compound inclusion-exclusion connections.  The theory predicts that exclusion will overwhelm inclusion and that power will be centralized as it is in purely exclusionary structures.  Preliminary experimental support is offered.
THE EFFECT OF KNOWLEDGE AND CONTEXT IN THE ELICITATION OF INFERENCES IN CLASS-INCLUSION REASONING^JUN 1993^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF COGNITIVE PSYCHOLOGY^Two experiments were carried out with adult subjects to investigate the conditions of production of inferences in a problem-solving task involving reasoning about class inclusion. We tested the hypothesis that the production of appropriate inferences is facilitated whenever pieces of information are stored in memory that can be matched at least in part with the conclusion resulting from the inference. In Experiment 1, problems involving the same inferential pattern but belonging to three different domains were compared. The inclusion relations were of the type ''is a kind of'' (semantic domain), ''more than'' (being 8 years old is being more than 7 years old: logico-mathematical domain) or ''what I have received on a given day is a part of what I have in the evening'' (possession domain). In the semantic domain, the critical inference may be facilitated by the semantic network of concepts stored in memory. In the logico-mathematical domain, there is no information that corresponds to the critical inference, so that inferences have to be elaborated merely by use of general knowledge about the meaning of the relation. The possession domain is an intermediate case, since the inference corresponds to knowledge about relations in the possession domain. The results clearly support a memory-cueing hypothesis: There is a marked order of difficulty ranging from the logico-mathematical domain (most difficult) to the semantic domain (least difficult). In Experiment 2, equivalent problems using the same conceptual information were compared: The critical inference involved scanning a series of numbers either in direct order (more than 7 is 8, 9, 10) or in reverse order (8, 9, 10 is more than 7). The number of correct solutions was higher and the response latency much shorter for those problems in which the critical inference was of the type ''more than 7 is 8, 9 or 10''.
PROCESSES OF BRINE GENERATION AND CIRCULATION IN THE OCEANIC-CRUST - FLUID INCLUSION EVIDENCE FROM THE TROODOS OPHIOLITE, CYPRUS^JUN 10 1992^JOURNAL OF GEOPHYSICAL RESEARCH-SOLID EARTH^Detailed temporal, thermal, and compositional data on aqueous fluid inclusions from a suite of plutonic and diabase samples from the Troodos ophiolite, Cyprus provide the first documentation that generation of high-temperature brines may be common at depth in thc oceanic crust. Anastomosing arrays of fluid inclusions in rocks of the upper intrusive sequence record episodic fracturing events. The earliest fracturing event, at temperatures &gt;450-600-degrees-C resulted in entrapment of brine-rich aqueous fluids with salinities of 36-61 wt % NaCl equivalent. Homogenization of the brine inclusions by halite dissolution, the virtual absence of vapor-rich fluid inclusions throughout the upper level plutonic sequence, and the restriction of brine inclusions to the most evolved plutonic rocks suggests that exsolution of brines off of the late stage gabbro and plagiogranite melts played a significant role in generating the quartz-hosted, high-salinity inclusions. Cooling of the fluids during pulses of fluid migration associated with episodic fracturing events, resulted in entrapment of the brines in the deep-seated, high-temperature portion of the hydrothermal system. In localized areas, the high-temperature brines (NaCl+/-KCl+/-CaCl2) caused extreme alteration of the plagiogranite bodies and in the formation of podiform epidosites. Arrays of low-temperature, low-salinity fluid inclusions, which in some samples crosscut fractures dominated by brine inclusions, indicate downward propagation of a cracking front subsequent to collapse of the high-temperature magmatic system, resulting in penetration of seawaterlike fluids into the plutonic sequence at temperatures &gt;200-400-degrees-C. Hydration reactions under greenschist facies conditions, or limited mixing with brine-rich fluids, may have resulted in salinity variations from 70% below to 200% above seawater concentrations. Temperatures and compositions of the low-salinity inclusions are similar to those found in stockwork systems beneath Troodos ore deposits and to those of fluids exiting active submarine hydrothermal vents at mid-ocean ridge spreading centers. The low-temperature fracture networks may represent an extensive deep-seated feeder system which coalesced to form zones of concentrated hydrothermal upflow.
FLUID PERCOLATIONS IN A FAULT ZONE - A STUDY OF FLUID INCLUSION PLANES IN THE ST-SYLVESTRE GRANITE, NORTHWEST MASSIF-CENTRAL, FRANCE^NOV 20 1990^TECTONOPHYSICS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.764  </td>  <td>3.326</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
ON THE INCLUSION OF INORGANIC CHEMICAL-REACTIVITY IN HIGH-SCHOOL CHEMISTRY - THE REACTIVITY NETWORK^MAR 1989^JOURNAL OF CHEMICAL EDUCATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.763  </td>  <td>1.745</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
INCLUSION OF FILTER MODULATION IN SYNTHETIC-DISCRIMINANT-FUNCTION CONSTRUCTION^JAN 15 1989^APPLIED OPTICS^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.973  </td>  <td>1.88</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
THE POLYNOMIAL EQUIVALENCE OF PROBLEMS OF SEARCH FOR CUTS MINIMAL WITH RESPECT TO SIZE AND TO INCLUSION^SEP-OCT 1987^SOVIET JOURNAL OF COMPUTER AND SYSTEMS SCIENCES^None
INCLUSION OF DEAF WITHIN COMMUNICATION NETWORKS^1974^AMERICAN ANNALS OF THE DEAF^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.638  </td>  <td>0.964</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Green care farm as a new tool for inclusion of older people with various challenges in the super-aged community^MAY 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF GERIATRIC PSYCHIATRY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.141  </td>  <td>3.349</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Comparison of perennial ryegrass, Lolium perenne L., ploidy and white clover, Trifolium repens L., inclusion for herbage production, utilization and nutritive value^DEC 2018^GRASS AND FORAGE SCIENCE^Increasing herbage dry-matter (DM) production and utilization on-farm improves efficiency and sustainability. The objective of this study was to investigate the effect of perennial ryegrass, Lolium perenne L., ploidy and white clover, Trifolium repens L., inclusion on herbage DM production and utilization in an intensive animal grazing system, with high nitrogen (N) inputs (250 kg N ha(-1)) and a high stocking rate (2.75 livestock units ha(-1)). The study was a 2 x 2 factorial design, consisting of diploid and tetraploid cultivars sown as grass-only and grass-white clover to give four sward treatments (diploid-only, tetraploid-only, diploid-white clover, tetraploid-white clover). These were evaluated at each grazing occasion (8-10 per year) for 3 years (2014-2016). Tetraploid-white and grass-white clover swards had a lower sward density (-9 and -8 kg DM cm(-1), respectively) and perennial ryegrass tiller density (-820 and -1,436 tillers m(-2), respectively) leading to lower postgrazing sward heights (-0.15 and -0.41 cm, respectively), and maintained a superior nutritive value when compared with diploid-only and grass-only swards respectively. White clover inclusion resulted in higher productivity characterized by increased herbage DM production (+1,468 kg DM ha(-1)), improved nutritive value and increased utilization across the three grazing seasons. Varying sward composition with perennial ryegrass ploidy led to improved nutritive value and favourable grazing characteristics in tetraploid swards.
Influence of Escherichia coli inclusion and soybean hulls based diets on ruminal biomethane and carbon dioxide productions in sheep^AUG 10 2018^JOURNAL OF CLEANER PRODUCTION^In livestock production, ruminal fermentation leads to significant loss of digestible feed energy and increase methane (CH4) and carbon dioxide (CO2) productions. These gases are the major sources of greenhouse gases that cause environmental degradation and climate change. The present study aimed at investigating the sustainable control of CH4 and CO2 production from ruminal fermentation by evaluating ruminal inclusion of Escherichia coli (E. coli) on diets containing different levels of soybean hulls (SH) replacing corn grains (CG). Three different levels of mixed ration were prepared; CG was replaced with SH at three different levels (per kg dry matter (DM)): 0 g (control), 75 g (SH 75), and 150 g (SH 150). The E. coli was used at four doses: 0,10, 20 and 40 mu L/g DM of substrate. The SH rations had decreased linear and quadratic (P &lt; 0.05) effects on asymptotic gas production (GP). Interactions occurred between SH ration and E. coli doses (P &lt; 0.05) on the fractional rate of GP. E. coli at all doses did not produce any effect on the CH4 production parameters. However, the control had the highest CH4 production at 40 mu L/g DM E. coli addition compared to other SH rations and their respective E. coli doses. SH ration linearly (P= 0.006) decreased asymptotic CO2 production. The study established that SH ration and E. coli doses had no effect on the CH4 production; however, they had a decreased effect on asymptotic GP. This study demonstrated that inclusion of SH 150 ration at different E. coli doses reduced asymptotic CO2 production without effect on CH4 production and this may be useful for the sustainable mitigation of CO2 production from livestock production. (C) 2018 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Social inclusion of landless farmers in extension services in Delta State, Nigeria: Implications for agricultural development^JAN 2018^OPEN AGRICULTURE^This study considered the level of inclusion of landless farmers in extension services in Delta State, Nigeria. A sample size of 355 landless farmers who were randomly selected formed the respondents used for this study. The results show that they had a mean age of 45 years and were mostly females who were also mostly married with little level of formal education as their highest level of formal education was secondary education. They had a mean household size of 7 persons and average farming experience of 11.5 years with mean farm size of 2 ha and very many of them did not subscribe to farmer's groups. They were mostly (70.70%) indigenes of the communities where they resided. Their level of social inclusion in agricultural extension benefits was poor (inclusion index = 0.45). They had an average crop output of 9000kg annually. Their level of social inclusion in agricultural extension services influenced their level of outputs. Their level of social inclusion was significantly influenced by their socioeconomic attributes of age, gender, marital status, and level of formal education, household size, farming experiences, group membership and indigene status. It was concluded that the landless farmers were socially excluded from agricultural extension services. It is recommended that extension agents should change their attitudes towards this class of farmers; and extension agents should persuasively convince the farmers to subscribe to membership of their relevant farmers' groups.
Conceptual models underlying economic analysis of animal health and welfare with the inclusion of three components: people, products and resources^APR 2017^REVUE SCIENTIFIQUE ET TECHNIQUE-OFFICE INTERNATIONAL DES EPIZOOTIES^Infectious animal diseases can spill across farm boundaries, so effective management requires coordinated responses. Costs and benefits from the management of infectious diseases are such that those who make the decisions have weak incentives to act, the levels of goods and services produced from animal agriculture are probably smaller than is socially optimal and resources are likely wasted. This work provides an overview of the existing literature on conceptual economic models in animal disease management, paying particular attention to inadequate incentives to make the required biosecurity efforts. A disease transmission model follows, emphasising policy and management issues which need to be addressed to enhance the benefits that consumers and producers obtain from animal protein markets. The article concludes with comments and suggestions on tackling infectious disease as a public good, and on directions for future research.
Effect of high inclusion of rendered animal by-product ingredients on growth, digestibility and economic performances in climbing perch Anabas testudineus^MAR 2017^AQUACULTURE RESEARCH^A 70-day growth trail was conducted to investigate the effects of inclusion of high levels of meat and bone meal (MBM) and protein concentrate (PC) on growth, digestibility and economic performances of climbing perch, Anabas testudineus. Four isonitrogenous diets were formulated by lowering the level of dietary fishmeal protein at 0 (D-1, control), 70 (D-2), 85 (D-3) and 100% (D-4) with a mixture of MBM and PC protein (1:1). Triplicate groups of 300 fish (mean weight of 0.80g) stocked in each 40m(2) pond and fed the respective test diets. A digestibility trial was conducted after the growth trial in indoor glass aquarium. The result showed that growth parameters were significantly decreased (P&lt;0.05) with fishmeal replacement levels. However, significant differences were not found in feed conversion ratio and survival of fish. No difference was also found in protein efficiency ratio among D1, D2 and D3. Similar to growth parameters, total fish production was highest in D1, intermediate in D2 and D3; and lowest in D4. Apparent digestibility coefficients of dry matter, protein and lipid were highest (P&lt;0.05) in D1 and lowest in D4. The economic analysis revealed that the benefit cost ratio was ranked by D-3 (1.81), D-2 (1.71), D-1 (1.66) and D-4 (1.46) respectively. Upon considering the overall performances and unavailability of finite protein sources, it can be concluded that 70-85% fishmeal could be replaced with a mixture of MBM and PC (1:1) in practical diets for climbing perch.
Combatting Social Exclusion: "Safe Space" and the Dynamics of Inclusion at a Homeless Farming Site^2017^JOURNAL OF POVERTY^This study assessed how discrimination and antihomeless ordinances contribute to exclusion, and the meanings and functions of "safe space" among 25 women and men associated with a farming training site who were currently or formerly unhoused. Respondents reported widespread exclusion and interpersonal and institutional discrimination, with the farm identified as a "safe space" from the pervasive stigmatization and surveillance that characterized interactions in the broader community. However, in constructing the farm as a "safe space," some respondents distanced themselves from unhoused people who were unaffiliated with the farm. Implications for reducing exclusion and fostering "safe spaces" among people experiencing homelessness are discussed.
Financial inclusion and agricultural commercialization in Ghana: an empirical investigation^2017^AGRICULTURAL FINANCE REVIEW^None
STRATEGIES TO INCREASE FARMERS' FINANCIAL INCLUSION^OCT 2016^SOUTH EAST ASIAN JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT^This research aims to determine the level of interest by farmers in using the services of formal financial institutions, especially digital financial services (DFS). The methods of the research were descriptive statistics and SEM analysis. The majority of respondents (50%) farmed an average area of land less than 0.5 hectares, 26% of respondents an average of 0.75-1 hectares and 24% of respondents an average of 0.5-0.75 hectares of land. Based on the status of land ownership, as many as 76% of respondents owned the property itself, 19% had a "lease" arrangement and 5% used state owned "arable" land. A total of 27% of the farmers were interested in using DFS while 34% were not. The lack of intereset was due to practical uses, enjoyment of cash and lack of knowledge. The reason for interest in DFS included practicality, speed, and security of use. Results from the SEM model indicate a significant and positive influence of Access to Usage, significant and negative influence of DFS to Access, significant and positive influence of DFS to Interest, significant and positive of Interest to Desire, and a significant and positive Desire to Access.
ON THE METHOD OF MULTIVARIATE FACTOR ANALYSIS, THE INCLUSION OF SMALL-SCALE PEASANT ECONOMY OF WESTERN SIBERIA AT THE TURN OF THE 20TH CENTURY IN MARKET RELATIONS^AUG 2016^TOMSK STATE UNIVERSITY JOURNAL^The paper used factor analysis to sample typical farms of farming and livestock specialization of v. Baltinskaya, v. NovoPorosskaya, Oyashinskaya volost of Tomsk uezd, in Tomsk Province by the materials of the Tomsk Provincial Agricultural Census 1901. Such farms were gradually included in the commodity-money relations on the basis of small-scale market. At the turn of the 20th century, Western Siberia entered the process of agricultural modernization. Siberian peasants, based on traditional family values, actively joined the all-Russian capitalist market. Gradually the material and technical base of farms, the level of marketability changed, new economic and industrial links were formed. Traditional economic relations gradually gave way to the commodity-market relations. The internal economic structure of farms gradually developed and acquired new socio-cultural traits. System analysis allows identifying the level and extent of involvement of farms in agrarian relations, exploring their economic nature. Mathematical methods play a significant role in the structure of system analysis. A study of the internal structure of farms in the West Siberian region can be based on mathematical methods such as correlation, regression and factor analysis. Correlation analysis gives the degree of connection of various components of peasant farms; regression reflects the shape and form of dependence of major economic components. Factor analysis reveals the inner structure of farms in more detail. In this article, factor analysis is applied to study the above-mentioned selected farms. Factor analysis was made on a random sample of data array of 183 farming and cattle-breeding farms. Factor analysis is based on the pair regression-correlation analysis. Pairs with the largest possible correlation coefficient were grouped into parameters. Depending on how the parameters grouped, each factor received a certain name. Thus, the internal structure of farms in the West Siberian region of the late 19th - early 20th centuries reflected their involvement in the economic relations of two economic subsystems. The traditional, family-consumer system formed the basis, the core of economic relations. However, the impact of commodity-capitalist relations stimulated the formation of an adaptive subsystem of farms and their gradual entry into the commodity market, through small-scale farming.
Precise oxygen and hydrogen isotope determination in nanoliter quantities of speleothem inclusion water by cavity ring-down spectroscopic techniques^JAN 1 2016^GEOCHIMICA ET COSMOCHIMICA ACTA^Speleothem inclusion-water isotope compositions are a promising new climatic proxy, but their applicability is limited by their low content in water and by analytical challenges. We have developed a precise and accurate isotopic technique that is based on cavity ring-down spectroscopy (CRDS). This method features a newly developed crushing apparatus, a refined sample extraction line, careful evaluation of the water/carbonate adsorption effect. After crushing chipped speleothem in a newly-developed crushing device, released inclusion water is purified and mixed with a limited amount of nitrogen gas in the extraction line for CRDS measurement. We have measured 50-260 nL of inclusion water from 77 to 286 mg of stalagmite deposits sampled from Gyokusen Cave, Okinawa Island, Japan. The small sample size requirement demonstrates that our analytical technique can offer high-resolution inclusion water-based paleoclimate reconstructions. The 1 sigma reproducibility for different stalagmites ranges from +/- 0.05 to 0.61 parts per thousand for delta O-18 and +/- 0.0 to 2.9 parts per thousand for delta D. The delta D vs. delta O-18 plot for inclusion water from modern stalagmites is consistent with the local meteoric water line. The 1000 ln alpha values based on calcite and fluid inclusion measurements from decades-old stalagmites are in agreement with the data from present-day farmed calcite experiment. Combination of coeval carbonate and fluid inclusion data suggests that past temperatures at 9-10 thousand years ago (ka) and 26 ka were 3.4 +/- 0.7 degrees C and 8.2 +/- 2.4 degrees C colder than at present, respectively. (C) 2015 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd.
Social inclusion around family farming. Approaches for the Argentine case (2003-2015)^JAN-MAR 2016^QUESTION^None
Exploring the effects of inclusion of dietary fresh Azolla on the performance of White Pekin broiler ducks^NOV 2015^VETERINARY WORLD^None
Identification of Multi-inclusion Statistically Similar Representative Volume Element for Advanced High Strength Steels by Using Data Farming Approach^2015^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTATIONAL SCIENCE, ICCS 2015 COMPUTATIONAL SCIENCE AT THE GATES OF NATURE^Statistically Similar Representative Volume Element (SSRVE) is used to simplify computational domain for microstructure representation of material in multiscale modelling. The procedure of SSRVE creation is based on optimization loop which allows to find the highest similarity between SSRVE and an original material microstructure. The objective function in this optimization is built upon computationally intensive numerical methods, including simulations of virtual material deformation, which is very time consuming. To avoid such long lasting calculations we propose to use the data farming approach to identification of SSRVE for Advanced High Strength Steels (AHSS) characterized by multiphase microstructure. The optimization method is based on a nature inspired approach which facilitates distribution and parallelization. The concept of SSRVE creation as well as the software architecture of the proposed solution is described in the paper in details. It is followed by examples of the results obtained for the identification of SSRVE parameters for DP steels which are widely exploited in modern automotive industry. Possible directions for further development as well as possible industrial applications are described in the conclusions.
Fate of Tylosin A and Its Effect on Anaerobic Digestion Using Two Tylosin Inclusion Methods^OCT 2014^ENVIRONMENTAL PROGRESS &amp; SUSTAINABLE ENERGY^This study examined the fate and effects of tylosin (TYL) on anaerobic digestion of swine wastewater at two concentrations of tylosin A (TYLA) using manure collected from swine fed with TYLA (TYLFED) or direct addition of TYLA (TYLADD) to antibiotic-free swine manure, to examine whether there are differences between the two TYL addition methods on methane production and other fermentation parameters. TYLA and tylosin D (TYLD) concentrations, pH, Chemical oxygen demand (COD), Total nitrogen (TN), and diversity of methanogenic archaea population were parameters used for this study. The results showed that concentrations of TYLA and TYLD in the TYLFED treatment were higher (P &lt; 0.05) than those in the TYLADD treatment. Methane production in the TYLFEDH and TYLFEDL was reduced by 35.52% and 37.06%, respectively, compared with the control during the 7 days addition period; but for TYLADDH and TYLADDL, the decrease (P &lt; 0.05) was only 12.98% and 7.84%, respectively. The diversity index of methanogenic archaea in the TYLFED treatment were lower than that in the control and the TYLADD on Day 4, but no difference (P &gt; 0.05) between the control and the TYLADD treatment was observed. pH, COD, and TN were not affected by treatment. Our results showed clear differences in the rate of methane inhibition by the two antibiotic inclusion methods; been higher for the TYLFED treatment than the TYLADD treatment. Since the former method resembles more under actual farm conditions, we suggested that studies on effects of antibiotic residues on anaerobic fermentation should adopt such an approach. (C) 2013 American Institute of Chemical Engineers Environ Prog, 33: 808-813, 2014
Bridging the gap: using farms to enhance social inclusion of people with chronic mental disorders^OCT 2013^ACTA PSYCHIATRICA SCANDINAVICA^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.694  </td>  <td>5.507</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Diversity and Inclusion Standards: Forget the Chicken and the Egg, Let's Build the Farm First!^SEP 2013^INDUSTRIAL AND ORGANIZATIONAL PSYCHOLOGY-PERSPECTIVES ON SCIENCE AND PRACTICE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  5.25  </td>  <td>2.269</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The inclusion of differentially assessed lands in urban growth model calibration: a comparison of two approaches using SLEUTH^2012^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF GEOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION SCIENCE^This research sought to understand the role that differentially assessed lands (lands in the United States given tax breaks in return for their guarantee to remain in agriculture) play in influencing urban growth. Our method was to calibrate the SLEUTH urban growth model under two different conditions. The first used an excluded layer that ignored such lands, effectively rendering them available for development. The second treated those lands as totally excluded from development. Our hypothesis was that excluding those lands would yield better metrics of fit with past data. Our results validate our hypothesis since two different metrics that evaluate goodness of fit both yielded higher values when differentially assessed lands are treated as excluded. This suggests that, at least in our study area, differential assessment, which protects farm and ranch lands for tenuous periods of time, has indeed allowed farmland to resist urban development. Including differentially assessed lands also yielded very different calibrated coefficients of growth as the model tried to account for the same growth patterns over two very different excluded areas. Excluded layer design can greatly affect model behavior. Since differentially assessed lands are quite common through the United States and are often ignored in urban growth modeling, the findings of this research can assist other urban growth modelers in designing excluded layers that result in more accurate model calibration and thus forecasting.
INTENSIFICATION OF COTTON-WHEAT SYSTEM TO COTTON-POTATO-WHEAT SYSTEM THROUGH INCLUSION OF POTATO IN NORTHWESTERN PLAINS^APR-JUN 2011^Indian Journal of Plant Physiology^A field experiment was conducted at Project Directorate for Farming Systems Research Modipuram, Meerut during 2005-07 for the evaluation of cotton, potato and wheat genotypes in system mode for intensification and profitability of cotton-wheat system. Highest seed-cotton yield was recorded in LHH 144 (2.5 t ha(-1)) followed by Ankur 2534 (2.4 t ha(-1)), while lowest was in CNH 36 (2.0 t ha(-1)). Seed-cotton yield was highly correlated with biomass (r=0.884), boll numbers harvested (r=0.785) and boll weight (r=0.888) as observed in LHH 144, Ankur 2534 and Ankur 651. Photosynthesis (Pn, mu mole m(-2) s(-1)) and photosynthetic water use efficiency (PWUE, mmole CO2 mole(-1) H2O) was higher in cotton hybrids (26-28 and 2.7-3.1, respectively) than varieties (24-25 and 2.5-2.6, respectively). Among potato genotypes, Kufri Pukhraj had significantly higher tuber yield and tuber numbers (22.5 t ha(-1) and 366 x 1000 ha(-1), respectively) than Kufri Surya (17.3 t ha(-1) and 287 x 1000 ha(-1), respectively). Tuber dry matter content, on the other hand, was invariably higher in Kufri Surya (20.2%) than Kufri Pukhraj (17.7%). This was due to higher rate of Pn in Kufri Surya (20.0) at all the dates of plantings than Kufri Pukhraj (17.8). Late sowing of wheat by 30 and 45 days after harvest of potato significantly reduced yield (7-22%) as compared to normal sown wheat (5.3 t ha(-1)). This was largely due to reduction in biomass (11-18%), LAI (4-18%) and shoot length (3-16%). The reduction in yield was more in PBW 343 (22%) than PBW 373 (7-16%). Among different cotton-potato based systems, WEY and net returns (NR) were significantly higher with Ankur 2534 (19.03 t ha(-1) and 101.7 x 1000 Rs ha(-1), respectively) and Ankur 651 (18.94 t ha(-1) and 101.0 x 1000 Rs ha(-1), respectively) cotton hybrids. Similarly in potato, higher WEY and NR were observed with Kufri Pukhraj (19.63 t ha(-1), and 108.1 x 1000 Rs ha(-1), respectively) than Kufri Surya (17.31 t ha(-1), and 85.9 x 1000 Rs ha(-1), respectively). The results indicate that early maturing cotton genotypes (Ankur 651, Ankur 2534 and LHH 144) and potato genotypes (Kufri Pukhraj and Kufri Surya) could provide opportunities for further intensification and enhancing net returns of cotton-wheat system by inclusion of potato in northwestern plains in system mode.
Inclusion of the variability of diffuse pollutions in LCA for agriculture: the case of slurry application techniques^MAY 2010^JOURNAL OF CLEANER PRODUCTION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  6.395  </td>  <td>7.051</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
First report of erythrocytic inclusion body syndrome (EIBS) in chinook salmon Oncorhynchus tshawytscha in Alaska, USA^JUN 29 2007^DISEASES OF AQUATIC ORGANISMS^Juvenile seawater-reared chinook salmon Oncorhynchus tshawytscha at a hatchery on Baranoff Island, Alaska, USA, sustained chronic mortality associated with anemia and mixed infections by various obligate and opportunistic pathogens including a cytoplasmic erythrocytic virus resembling the agent of erythrocytic inclusion body syndrome (EIBS). This is the first case report of EIBS in Alaska and is a range extension of the disease.
Feasibility of inclusion of mustard (Brassica juncea) genotypes in intercropping and sequential cropping systems with sugarcane (Saccharum officinarum)^APR 1999^INDIAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL SCIENCES^The field experiment was conducted for 2 consecutive cropping seasons (1994-96 and 1995-97) to study the effect of different genotypes of Indian mustard [Brassica juncea (L.) Czernj &amp; Cosson] as intercrop/sequential crop on yield and quality of sugarcane (Saccharum officinarum L.). Sole autumn cane produced highest number of millable canes (134 500/ha), highest individual cane weight (911.6 g) and sugarcane yield (82 tonnes/ha) and these were significantly higher compared to all the other treatments. Intercropping of different genotypes of mustard produced higher number of millable canes, better growth, higher cane yield, cane equivalent yield, commercial cane sugar equivalent and net profit over the sequential cropping system. Juice quality was not significantly affected by the various intercropping/sequential cropping treatments. Intercropping of sugarcane with 'Bio 417' mustard (1 : 1 row) produced highest cane equivalent yield (99.75 tonnes/ha) and net profit (Rs 50 648/ha).
The inclusion of synthetic amino acids and the protein level in two feeding systems for broilers^DEC 1998^CUBAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURAL SCIENCE^Two feeding systems (triphasic and monophasic) with three crude protein (CP) levels (high, medium and low) with or without the addition of synthetic amino acids (SAA) dl-methionine and 1-lysine in maize-soybean diets, were evaluated using 2160 broilers of both sexes of the E-24 commercial hybrid, which were distributed according to a completely randomized design with a 2 x 3 x 2 factorial arrangement. In both the triphasic and monophasic systems, the protein level worsened the feed intake/gain ratio (2.39, 2.44 and 2.46) throughout the fattening stage. However, the inclusion of SAA improved this indicator at both the starting (1.93, 2.14 and 2.09 vs. 1.81, 1.79 and 1.76) and growth stages (2.33, 2.50 and 2.39 vs. 2.22, 2.16 and 2.29), while this did nor occur in the finishing stage, in which it provoked an impairment in the main economical indicators. This suggests that the inclusion of SAA is not justified in the finishing stage. There was an interaction between the feeding system used and the inclusion of SAA, where the triphasic system proved to be the most efficient. Also, the cost per Cuban peso produced decreases between 0.02-0.05, with respect to the monophasic system. It is Suggested that it is possible to attain better economical advantages with an adequate strategy from the use of SAA and the triphasic feeding system, taking into account not only the productive but also the economic benefits, thereby contributing to make broiler production more sustainable.
INCLUSION OF ALFALFA (MEDICAGO-SATIVA L) IN CROP ROTATIONS IN THE EASTERN CORN BELT - SOME ENVIRONMENTAL AND ECONOMIC-IMPLICATIONS^1991^JOURNAL OF SUSTAINABLE AGRICULTURE^This article examines the inclusion of alfalfa in crop rotations on farms with high and low productivity soils in the Eastern Corn Belt.  For each soil type, five cases (government program, market prices, planting one-fourth of farm to alfalfa, and hay yield and price sensitivity) were analyzed with a linear programming model and input use was estimated.  Net farm income was largest with the government program on both soils.  Compared to the government program, planting one-fourth of the farm to alfalfa on the high and low productivity soils reduced commercial nitrogen fertilizer and herbicide use, and potential environmental degradation.  However, planting alfalfa also reduced net farm income.
Peer Interactions in Preschool Inclusive Classrooms: The Roles of Pragmatic Language and Self-Regulation^JUL 2019^EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN^Drawing from a social network perspective, we examined the extent to which children with and without disabilities play with each other in preschool inclusive classrooms and identified malleable child characteristics that would support children forming these cross-status play interactions. A total of 200 children with disabilities and 301 children without disabilities participated in this study (M-age = 52.39 months, SDage = 6.13). Results showed that children with and without disabilities did not differ in the extent to which they formed cross-status play interactions after pragmatic language and self-regulation were taken into account. However, typically developing children were more likely to form same-status play interactions than children with disabilities. Children's cross-status play interactions were predicted by self-regulation ability, which was fully mediated by their pragmatic language. The impact of pragmatic language on the formation of cross-status play interaction was greater for children with disabilities than their typically developing peers.
Effective questioning and feedback for learners with autism in an inclusive classroom^JUN 21 2019^COGENT EDUCATION^There is limited research regarding how Assessment for Learning (AfL) can support mainstream classrooms that have students with special needs. In current literature, it is assumed that AfL functions in similar ways across different contexts. Studies on how AfL practices can accommodate mainstream and special educational students in the same classroom are very limited. The present study sets out to investigate AfL practices in the context of mainstream classes that include high-functioning students with autism spectrum disorder (ASD), focusing specifically on questioning techniques and teacher feedback. Though these strategies are associated with positive learning outcomes, learners with ASD may face difficulty in engaging in such questioning and feedback dialogue because of various challenges (e.g., atypical attentional networks). This qualitative instrumental case study involved observing six mainstream teachers from five schools during lessons and separately interviewing the teachers and the students with ASD. The study found that these teachers used approaches that focused on three considerations: addressing the cognitive needs of students (e.g. precise and direct questions); their socio-emotional needs (e.g. affirmative feedback); and supporting structures (e.g. visual cues). The study expands our current limited understanding of AfL in inclusive classrooms and highlights the implications for classroom practice.
Hybrid leadership councils: envisioning inclusive and resilient governance^MAY 22 2019^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF FUTURES RESEARCH^To address future challenges of planetary decision-making on key ecological and social issues in an increasingly nationalistic world, we propose a new global governance model of technocratic ascendancy that can be integrated with quasi-democratic norms. Our model proposes the creation of a series of self-organized Hybrid Leadership Assemblies (HLA) led by Hybrid Leadership Councils (HLC) and supported by a number of more specialized Issue Action Committees (IACs) in five key issue areas: Environmental Protection and Climate Change Management, Security from Armed Conflict, Fighting Poverty and Inequality, Managing Population Growth, and Women's Inclusion. Inspired by the popular environmental slogan, Think global, act local, our proposed governance model makes a revived subsidiarity principle central to its re-imagination of global governance as a non-hierarchical system of organization. In addition to creating opportunities to approach challenges at multiple levels of governance, our broadly participative model also makes innovative networking across different groups, levels of governance, and issues integral to solving complex socio-ecological problems.
Promoting alignment between innovation policy and inclusive development in South Africa^MAY 4 2019^DEVELOPMENT SOUTHERN AFRICA^Innovation for inclusive development (IID) is widely promoted as a policy objective in the global South, but the challenge is that there is little design and implementation of context-appropriate instruments and incentives. One critical foundation is network alignment - that innovation policy should be aligned with the goals and strategies of government departments responsible for promoting inclusive development (Von Tunzelmann, N, 2007. Approaching network alignment. Draft Paper for the U-Know Consortium: Understanding the relationship between knowledge and competitiveness in the enlarging European Union). The paper contributes by using qualitative analysis software to analyse the nature of shared policy goals and instruments in South Africa, and assess how these can be aligned with each other and with the goals of IID. Three main spaces for policy intervention are identified, to promote IID in a way that goes beyond the aspirational and the rhetorical. Such analysis of formal policy does not take into account the political will, capabilities and resources for implementation, but it does provide a systematic evidence base to effect strategic change.
Meeting to transgress The role of faculty learning communities in shaping more inclusive organizational cultures^APR 15 2019^EQUALITY DIVERSITY AND INCLUSION^None
THE TEACHING CONCEPTION IN AN INCLUSIVE CHILD EDUCATION EXPERIENCE: A CASE STUDY^APR 2019^REVISTA IBERO-AMERICANA DE ESTUDOS EM EDUCACAO^With the effectiveness of inclusive child education, the conditions necessary for children to fully develop are made available, as is the formation of a new generation, free of prejudgments over the other. In this context, through a case study, the present research had as general objective to investigate if the pedagogical work contributes to the inclusive education of a student with the Cri du Chat syndrome. For this, a semi-structured interview was performed with a pedagogue, from the municipal teaching network, in a city in the interior of Sao Paulo. The data were analyzed according to the content analysis. It is concluded that teacher training for inclusive education is still very precarious, which means that teachers are unable to act in order to ensure inclusion in the classroom.
An inclusive, online Delphi process for setting targets for best practice implementation for spinal cord injury^APR 2019^JOURNAL OF EVALUATION IN CLINICAL PRACTICE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.536  </td>  <td>1.658</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Strategies for inclusive place making^MAR 4 2019^JOURNAL OF PLACE MANAGEMENT AND DEVELOPMENT^None
Inclusive sustainability within favela upgrading and incremental housing: The case of Rocinha in Rio de Janeiro^MAR 2019^SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT^This paper addresses two different urban phenomena that currently take place in Rocinha, the most prominent favela (slum) of Rio de Janeiro, with more than 100 000 inhabitants. On the one hand, that of the houses' expansion typically accomplished through constructions on the rooftop (the upper slab), operations locally known as the construcao de laje (upper slab construction). On the other hand, new urban spaces as a result of public resettlement operations consisting of the clearing of tangled webs of narrow, dark and unhealthy alleys that crisscross up and down the favela. As an example, we will take the case of the 4th Street operation, a multidimensional process of de-densification that involved heavy demolition, the removal of many houses and relocation of the dwellers. This urban renewal was carried out with resources from a federal programme and conducted by the state government, but with the involvement of different local actors, including local associations and community activists. The study focuses on the social sustainability issues underlying the private and public process, analysing the roles played by the different stakeholders and their interactions. The collection of data and subsequent analysis comprises diverse methods including literature review, examination of architectural and urban projects, surveys, interviews with architects and other municipal and private technicians, as well as inquiries to the householders. These interviews and inquiries revealed the favela's dwellers' perception regarding the two-year process and, in particular, the role played by the different actors involved. The conclusions highlight the social networks that arose and consolidated during the slum upgrading process and analyse the interactions among the members of those networks.
Our Homes: An inclusive study about what moving house is like for people with intellectual disabilities in Ireland^MAR 2019^BRITISH JOURNAL OF LEARNING DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.5  </td>  <td>0.985</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The challenge of inclusive coproduction: The importance of situated rituals and emotional inclusivity in the coproduction of health research projects^MAR 2019^SOCIAL POLICY &amp; ADMINISTRATION^Previous studies highlight that coproduced research initiatives are influenced by how individuals interact together and that group inclusivity amongst diverse members is crucial. However, it is not fully understood how inclusivity is sustained over time, particularly through routine encounters. Our study examines how coproduction occurs through routine and ritualistic patterns of everyday practices, which have the potential to facilitate sustainable and inclusive research initiatives. Using ethnographic data with four applied health research projects, we explored how everyday rituals generate and sustain inclusivity. Informed by interactional ritual change theory, we identify two types of interlinked inclusivity: relational, individuals routinely engaging together; and emotional, the feeling of being included. The process of producing and maintaining both types requires ongoing reflexivity from members. Groups with sustained inclusivity build interpersonal momentum through situated practices that enable them to mitigate external pressures and internal disagreements. Where groups experience a breakdown in inclusivity, they also experience a loss of momentum that makes them vulnerable to disintegration and collapse. Building and sustaining inclusivity are worked out through everyday interactions and operate as a feedback loop that sustains the cohesiveness of the network and supports coproduction of knowledge.
Building an inclusive cycling "movement": Exploring the charity-led mobilisation of recreational cycling in communities across Merseyside, England^FEB 2019^SPORT MANAGEMENT REVIEW^In this article, the authors examined the charity-led implementation of an inclusive cycling programme across Merseyside in the North West of England. The project itself is delivered via a network of cycling 'hubs' that the charity has set up and run typically in deprived communities. Using resource mobilisation theory, the authors specifically examined how the Cycling Projects charity mobilises a raft of diverse resources from the financial to the human, and from the cultural to the physical, to drive and sustain its Pedal Away product. To do this, the authors utilise qualitative data captured from 15 in-depth semi-structured interviews undertaken with stakeholders both internal and external to the charity, as well as focus group data yielded from programme participants (n = 32). The findings illustrate how the charity is able to garner and exchange resources from its partners and funders, and the ways in which it mobilises both participants and personnel from within the communities it serves. As an original contribution to the sport management field, the authors demonstrate both the value and applicability of resource mobilisation theory as a theoretical framework by which to understand how a non-profit organisation derives the resources it requires in order to deliver a network of community embedded recreational cycling programmes. Crown Copyright (C) 2018 Published by Elsevier Ltd on behalf of Sport Management Association of Australia and New Zealand. All rights reserved.
THEORY AND PRACTICE OF MODERN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^2019^INTERNATIONAL SCIENTIFIC AND PRACTICAL CONFERENCE CONTEMPORARY ISSUES OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF RUSSIA: CHALLENGES AND OPPORTUNITIES^The theory and practice of modern inclusive education is an intensively developing region. Modern inclusive education is increasingly aware of itself as an education in which axiological aspects are leading. Solving spiritual and moral dilemmas and preventing the emergence of new problems and barriers allows to harmonize relations between individuals with HIA and persons without HIA, not only to optimize and improve the success of interaction and relations. Solving spiritual and moral dilemmas and preventing the emergence of new problems and barriers allows to experiencing and understanding of people, to harmonize relations between their social effectiveness and self-efficacy, not only to achieve self-fulfillment and social success, but also to improve society as a whole. The improvement of society begins there when people build mutual aid, mutual service, freedom and respect for the dignity, weaknesses and success of everyone. In Russia, the education of students with disabilities can be organized jointly with other students, as well as in individual classes, groups or in separate organizations that carry out educational activities, and the state undertakes to provide training for pedagogical personnel who have special professional approaches and methods of teaching and upbringing students with disabilities. Thus, the problem of forming readiness for the implementation of inclusive education of students with disabilities, the professional training of teachers at the present time requires the solution at the theoretical, methodological and practical levels. (c) 2019 Published by Future Academy www.FutureAcademy.org.UK
Potential of Rural Areas for Implementation of Social Inclusive Activities^2019^SOCIOLOGIA^The paper is focused on appreciation of natural potential and social networks in rural areas through social services. This issue is researched on the case of formalised social inclusive activities. Using secondary analysis was created original set of information about these activities within rural municipalities in the Czech Republic. The results of primary research show, that high natural potential is reflected by rural inhabitants. However, this potential is not often connected with realisation of social inclusive activities. If local actors realise these activities, it is within localities where local communities dispose with higher sociocultural potential - especially bridging social capital.
CBE life sciences education^2019-06^CBE life sciences education^None
INNOVATE TO MAKE IT HAPPEN: HOW WE ARE STRENGTHENING SUPPORT NETWORKS FOR INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^DEC 2018^REVISTA ON LINE DE POLITICA E GESTAO EDUCACIONAL^Facing the challenges of implementing the National Policy on Special Education, in the perspective of Inclusive Education (PNEEPEI / MEC, 2018) we have put forward and are developing in these 10 years innovative proposals for the training of teachers of regular and special education. The autonomous nature of initiatives to be presented in this article brings innovations aligned with the PNEEPEI's intention regarding the autonomy of the learner/teacher. Such initiatives have shown encouraging and consistent results when comes to reaching a large number of professionals interested in this subject and can be an alternative to meet the needs of bringing the concepts, practices that support inclusive education to the most distant points in our country.
NETWORK COMMUNITIES AS AN EXPRESSION OF INCLUSIVE CULTURE OF PARTICIPATION IN POLITICAL PROTESTS: THE SUNFLOWER MOVEMENT CASE STUDY^NOV 2018^COMMUNICATION TODAY^This article offers an analysis of the ways creation of a community influences the activity of users expressed in their network behaviour. It has been assumed that a varied choice of used tools and channels of communication characterising societies with a high level of technological development simultaneously influences fragmentation of network communication processes. Inclusive culture of participation becomes limited, which is the result of the degree of engagement of users which influence participation in a virtual community. This leads to their differentiation in relation to content and choice of the used channels during network communication. Another factor limiting participation is also communication activity of administrators of a virtual community who impose the dominating content of messages. The research results are a part of scientific research concerning the role of leaders in network communication as well as the creation of network communities that accompany political protests and demonstrations.
REINTERPRETING DYSLEXIA. A DIFFERENTIATING PROPOSAL FOR AN INCLUSIVE NEURODIDACTICS^SEP-DEC 2018^REVISTA IBEROAMERICANA DE EDUCACION^None
Diversity and creativity in cross-national teams: The role of team knowledge sharing and inclusive climate^SEP 2018^JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT &amp; ORGANIZATION^Diversity literature has demonstrated negative effects of surface-level diversity and positive effects of deep-level diversity. How do two types of diversity among cross national team members influence team knowledge sharing and team creativity? The purpose of this study is to explore conditions that leverage the positive and restrain the negative effects of team diversity on team knowledge sharing, which leads to team creativity. We expect inclusive climate as the significant condition and knowledge sharing as the profound intervening mechanism between team diversity and team creativity relationship. We tested the hypotheses with data from a sample of 60 cross-national research teams from several universities in China. The results support the hypothesized relationships among inclusive climate, team knowledge sharing, and team creativity. Our findings contribute to the advancement of team diversity and team creativity literature, and their theoretical and practical implications are discussed.
Towards an inclusive circular economy: Quantifying the spatial flows of e-waste through the informal sector in China^AUG 2018^RESOURCES CONSERVATION AND RECYCLING^China has built a territory-based formal e-waste recycling system as a response to the global e-waste challenge. This system created a division of labor between the informal sector and formal recycling plants by providing a subsidy to the latter to buy waste products collected by the former. Using provincial data of formal e-waste recycling plants in China in 2014, this paper quantifies the contribution of the informal sector to e-waste transportation at the national level. Despite the intention to plan a regional self-sufficient system for e-waste recycling at the provincial level, we find that significant interprovincial flows exist due to the complex market transactions within the informal collection network, which reveals the deep conflicts between market mechanism and public intervention in the evolvement of e-waste governance structure. We built a spatial interaction model to depict the interregional flows of e-waste that can quantitatively illustrate the change of spatial pattern of this network due to the introduction of the formal WEEE regulation in China. In conclusion, we discuss the policy implications for optimizing regional allocation of the e-waste recycling capacity as well as for improving the transparency of the reverse logistic system to include the informal sector in the future.
A network-based frequency analysis of Inclusive Wealth to track sustainable development in world countries^JUL 15 2018^JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL MANAGEMENT^Using human (HC), natural (NC), and produced (PC) capital from Inclusive Wealth as representatives of the triple bottom line of sustainability and utilizing elements of network science, we introduce a Network-based Frequency Analysis (NFA) method to track sustainable development in world countries from 1990 to 2014. The method compares every country with every other and links them when values are close. The country with the most links becomes the main trend, and the performance of every other country is assessed based on its 'orbital' distance from the main trend. Orbital speeds are then calculated to evaluate country-specific dynamic trends. Overall, we find an optimistic trend for HC only, indicating positive impacts of global initiatives aiming towards socio-economic development in developing countries like the Millennium Development Goals and 'Agenda 21'. However, we also find that the relative performance of most countries has not changed significantly in this period, regardless of their gradual development. Specifically, we measure a decrease in produced and natural capital for most countries, despite an increase in GDP, suggesting unsustainable development. Furthermore, we develop a technique to cluster countries and project the results to 2050, and we find a significant decrease in NC for nearly all countries, suggesting an alarming depletion of natural resources worldwide. (C) 2018 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
New Research Network on inclusive Early Childhood Education Research^JUL 2018^FRUHE BILDUNG^None
Innovation Capacity-Building and Inclusive Development in Informal Settings: A Comparative Analysis of two Interactive Learning Spaces in South Africa and Malawi^JUL 2018^JOURNAL OF INTERNATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^The extent to which innovation can contribute to improving the livelihoods of marginalised communities in informal settings is greatly influenced by the social spaces' created for interactive learning and problem-solving, i.e. interactive learning spaces. This paper addresses an important issue: How do different models of inclusion influence the outcomes of innovation capacity-building interventions? With the use of a network-institutional approach, the paper analyses and compares two projectsin South Africa and Malawiaimed at improving the livelihoods of small-scale farmers through introducing new farming practices and organisational arrangements. The research raises important questions for assessing the impact of innovation for inclusive development. Copyright (c) 2016 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Ltd.
Guidelines for the National Policy of Special Education in the Perspective of Inclusive Education^JUN 2018^REVISTA DE CIENCIAS HUMANAS DA UNIVERSIDADE DE TAUBATE^The article addresses the National Policy on Special Education in the perspective of inclusive education. At the outset, it emphasizes the organization of the attendance to the students included in the regular network of education and on the curriculum proposed there in National territory. Then, he leaves for the Municipal instance, where he presents the Guidelines for a municipal policy of Education of the disabled person in Nova Iguacu; The Standards for Special Education and Specialized Educational Assistance; Besides the School Regiment and the Municipal Education Plan of the City of Nova Iguacu. Concluding emphasizes the importance of being put into practice in schools all the legislation conquered.
Inclusive dyslexia-friendly collaborative online learning environment: Malaysia case study^MAY 2018^EDUCATION AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES^Currently available web page accessibility guidelines focus more on reading and writing, with inadequate attention to other aspects of online learning such as computer-mediated communication. This study aims to explore the engagement of Malaysia secondary school students with dyslexia and students without dyslexia on various synchronous and asynchronous communication interaction technologies in an online collaborative learning environment. Multiple case within subject qualitative study was employed to investigate the engagement of students using a semi structured interview guideline. The findings revealed that (1) text chat is unsuitable for learning discussion for all learners, (2) forum affords self-paced and organized formal discussion for most learners and (3) video conferencing is suitable for interactive face-to-face, verbal discussion for most learners.
Inequality and collaboration patterns in Canadian nanotechnology: implications for pro-poor and gender-inclusive policy^MAY 2018^SCIENTOMETRICS^Policymakers and scholars are increasingly concerned with how nanotechnology can reduce inequalities and provide benefits for disadvantaged and poor communities. This paper simultaneously addresses two concerns related to nanotechnology and equity: the lack of research and development focused on nanotechnology applications that benefit developing nations (pro-poor R&amp;D) and the lack of women in nanotechnology fields. The paper focuses on Canada, an affluent country committed to both pro-poor and gender responsive policies. Social network analysis is used to examine the relationship between gender and collaboration patterns of authors and inventors whose work is related to pro-poor applications of nanotechnology. Findings reveal that female first-authored papers have a lower citation rate and are published in higher ranked journals compared to those papers first-authored by men. Nevertheless, when women are last or corresponding authors, their papers receive equal or higher citation rates and are published in lower or similar ranked journals. Women are as, or more, collaborative as their male peers in their co-authorship and co-inventorship networks. While the majority of male authors and male inventors collaborate exclusively with men, those involved in a mixed-gender team outperform male-only teams. Women, as both authors and inventors, are involved in more gender-balanced collaboration teams. The study calls for development and implementation of gender-related policies in Canada to increase the prevalence of female scientists in collaboration networks, and to support the participation of women in pro-poor areas.
Understanding inclusive STEM high schools as opportunity structures for underrepresented students: Critical components^MAY 2018^JOURNAL OF RESEARCH IN SCIENCE TEACHING^Inclusive STEM high schools (ISHSs) can be viewed as opportunity structures for students underrepresented in STEM. By opportunity structures, we mean an education that provides not only access to high quality STEM curriculum and instruction or opportunity to learn, but also the capacity to create learning environments where students can build STEM social capital and the dispositions, knowledge, skills, and networks to be successful in STEM college majors and careers. This is a cross-case analysis of case studies that describe the design and implementation of eight exemplar ISHSs. Beginning with 10 hypothesized critical components, we found evidence for all 10, but present in unique patterns of prominence, depending on the school context. Further inductive analysis located an additional four emergent critical components that complete the picture of how these successful ISHSs were able to achieve their goals. Importantly, across schools, four components stood out as foundational: a flexible and autonomous administrative structure; a college-preparatory, STEM-focused curriculum for all; well-prepared STEM teachers and professionalized teaching staffs; and supports for students in underrepresented groups. Although many of the critical components found in the ISHSs are also found in the school reform literature, these schools also had characteristics unique to STEM education. This paper is important in understanding STEM high schools as opportunity structures and as a school reform alternative that can help solve equity and social mobility gaps in STEM.
Support and Collaboration Networks for Improving Inclusive Education^APR-JUN 2018^PROFESORADO-REVISTA DE CURRICULUM Y FORMACION DE PROFESORADO^Every person has the right to receive an inclusive, equitable and quality education, this, therefore, establishes the need for schools and their catchment area communities to engage in continuous and collaborative reflection-action processes in order to improve and achieve these goals. In this work we present a research project developed in the Region of Murcia over the last few years (2012-2016) aimed at promoting inclusive educational processes in compulsory education. The overall aim of the article is to present the results of the aforementioned project and, at the same time, demonstrate the potential offered by the creation of support and collaboration networks between educational centers located in the same geographic area. With this purpose in mind, we describe and analyze the work carried out by these partnerships with the goal of changing and developing their inclusion improvement plans. Using participatory action research (PAR) methodology, four Infant and Primary schools and one Secondary school (130 teachers) formed a network. The implementation of the different stages (analysis of the existing situation, identification of the processes that influence the inclusion and exclusion of students, the design and development of improvement plans and evaluation) has enabled significant improvements in each of the centers. From the perspective of inclusive education the conclusions highlight the advantages that derive from networking.
Supporting local institutions for inclusive green growth: Developing an Evidence Gap Map^MAR 2018^NJAS-WAGENINGEN JOURNAL OF LIFE SCIENCES^We conduct a structured search of the academic literature that assesses the impact of development interventions that aim to build and strengthen local-level institutions to facilitate Inclusive Green Growth. Inclusive Green Growth extends the standard growth perspective to include welfare enhancements both the poor ('inclusive') and for future ('green') generations. We restrict our search to studies in the domain of agriculture and poverty alleviation in the developing world. We access ten online databases and various working paper series and focus on summarising evidence from quantitative studies that use rigorous evaluation methods. Together, this yields 158 studies. We then retain 66 studies that contain a credible counterfactual. We visualize the interventions and outcomes in an Evidence Gap Map, highlighting both the available evidence and remaining knowledge gaps. Most studies suggest that strengthening local institutions can improve the delivery and targeting of public services and overall satisfaction with local governance. There are however, clear limitations and knowledge gaps highlighting priorities for future work. Few studies assess impacts on final outcomes such as household income or agricultural productivity and no studies assess inclusive and green outcomes jointly. We discuss the key benefits of a structured literature search and Evidence Gap Map for policy-makers and development practitioners and illustrate how it serves as a knowledge repository and identifies where evidence is lacking, thus setting the agenda for future work.
Inclusive Elliptical Curve Cryptography (IECC) for Wireless Sensor Network Efficient Operations^MAR 2018^WIRELESS PERSONAL COMMUNICATIONS^Wireless sensor networks are the most vulnerable to all the wireless devices due to the massive damage caused by disrupting these networks. A good number of attacks have been launched in the wireless networks which are prevalent in the antagonist world. However, the most difficult of all the attacks is the identification and prevention of the replication of nodes. The time it takes to identify and isolate a cloned/replicated node is usually greater than any other attack detection techniques due to the similar id and features replicated by the attacker. Elliptical curve cryptography is well known for providing security in wireless networks. This paper explores a property of the ECC that is designed into a full pledged IECC protocol for keeping away replicated nodes from attacking the WSNs and MWSNs. In terms of application, the focus is to secure an industrial area using the IECC mechanism for efficient remote monitoring. Simulation analysis shows that the IECC performs well in static WSN and MWSNs over the existing baseline protocols.
Inclusive development of urban water services in Jakarta: The role of groundwater^MAR 2018^HABITAT INTERNATIONAL^This paper applies the perspective of inclusive development to the development goals past and present for increasing access to urban water supply. We do so in order to call attention to the importance of ecological sustainability in meeting targets related to equity of access in cities of the global south. We argue that in cities where the majority of urban water circulates outside a formally operated centralized piped systems, inequities in access are grounded in conditions of deep ecological vulnerability. We examine this relationship between environment and equity of access in the context of Jakarta, Indonesia, where failure to address contamination and over abstraction of groundwater has exacerbated inequalities in access to water within and beyond the centralized piped network. We first present research results from in-depth interviews with key informants and secondary data to document the role of shallow sub-surface and deep contained aquifer groundwater within urban water services and causes and implications of declining groundwater quality. We then explore the uneven impact of this degradation through a comparative case study of water access strategies in two low-income settlements. Survey results reveal the significance of shallow sub-surface groundwater services for the poorest residents, and negative impacts of declining groundwater quality on equity in terms of cost and volume of consumption between income groups. We conclude that for urban water services to be inclusive, environmental and social priorities need to extend beyond piped water. (C) 2016 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd.
Virtual currency as an inclusive monetary innovation for the unbanked poor^MAR-APR 2018^ELECTRONIC COMMERCE RESEARCH AND APPLICATIONS^The narrative about the future of money in developing countries is dominated by international financial institutions (IFIs) and their affiliates, multinational payment service providers, mobile network operators and academia. Most have reduced the future of money or monetary needs of the unbanked to the eradication of cash by digitization. In contrast to this techno-centric narrative, in this article, I situate the future of money in a new sociotechnical model which I refer to as the quantity, quality and public authority deficit (QPAD) hypothesis. It recognizes three disadvantages (or deficits) from the use of money: quantitative limits, which relates to the fact that its capacity to act as medium of exchange, is conditional on its availability; a qualitative deficit, involving the failure to embody attributes of transacting parties (identity, reputation etc.); and a public authority deficit, represented by weak central authority involvement in addressing the monetary needs of the unbanked poor. On this basis, any future inclusive monetary innovations which do not address these three deficits will most likely be unsuccessful. These ideas are based on findings from a participatory ethnographic study that draws on a sociology of scientific knowledge framework (Mackenzie, 1996; Pinch and Bijker, 1984; Spinardi, 2008) to evaluate technological properties of the Edinburgh local exchange trading scheme (LETS)-issued virtual currency. This currency is compared and contrasted with the properties of government-issued money. (C) 2018 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
Sustainable Queuing-Network Design for Airport Security Based on the Monte Carlo Method^FEB 2018^SUSTAINABILITY^The design of airport queuing networks is a significant research field currently for researchers. Many factors must to be considered in order to achieve the optimized strategies, including the passenger flow volume, boarding time, and boarding order of passengers. Optimizing these factors lead to the sustainable development of the queuing network, which currently faces a few difficulties. In particular, the high variance in checkpoint lines can be extremely costly to passengers as they arrive unduly early or possibly miss their scheduled flights. In this article, the Monte Carlo method is used to design the queuing network so as to achieve sustainable development. Thereafter, a network diagram is used to determine the critical working point, and design a structurally and functionally sustainable network. Finally, a case study for a sustainable queuing-network design in the airport is conducted to verify the efficiency of the proposed model. Specifically, three sustainable queuing-network design solutions are proposed, all of which not only maintain the same standards of security, but also increase checkpoint throughput and reduce passenger waiting time variance.
Inclusive Innovation in Biohacker Spaces: The Role of Systems and Networks^FEB 2018^TECHNOLOGY INNOVATION MANAGEMENT REVIEW^In this article, we examine the development of biohacker spaces and their impact on innovation systems through the lens of inclusive innovation. Examining issues associated with people, activities, outcomes, and governance, we observe that biohacker spaces offer an alternative approach to biotechnological research outside the orthodox walls of academia, industry, and government. We explain that harnessing the full innovative potential of these spaces depends on flexible legal and regulatory systems, including appropriate biosafety regulations and intellectual property policies and practices, and organic, community-based social and financial networking.
The problem of management and implementation of innovative models of network interaction in inclusive education of persons with disabilities^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATION AND INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES^The authors raised the problem of accessibility of quality education of students with disabilities. The model of organization and management of network interaction is presented. The need to build management, cooperation and network interaction of educational organizations of all levels is explained by the high demand for the efforts of leading specialists, scientists, methodologists and practitioners in order to improve the quality and accessibility of General education for people with special educational needs. The model of network interaction in inclusive education contributes to: activation of participation of educational organizations in solving specific educational problems of teaching children with disabilities inclusive. It is increasing the efficiency of the use of methodological resources. The model of network interaction in inclusive education expanding opportunities for training, pedagogical skills and psychological and pedagogical competence of teaching staff. It is improving management of educational processes and organizations, raising the level of social and human capital.
Communicating across tourism silos for inclusive sustainable partnerships^2018^JOURNAL OF SUSTAINABLE TOURISM^Overcoming traditional tourism silos to develop long-term relationships with stakeholders is essential for transformational change. Adopting broader networks connects researchers to pertinent issues facing society, develops reciprocal capacities for learning, and creates inclusive sustainable partnerships. As critical tourism scholars and not-for-profit employees, we illustrate the journey of how we engaged collaboratively with diverse stakeholders, from businesses, not-for-profits and the university, to tackle issues of economic disadvantage and social exclusion. Critical hospitality and dialogue theory were adopted to provide a framework for the processes of collaboration, research, networking, and advocacy work for inclusive sustainable spaces. Drawing on our involvement with co-founding a collaborative research network, the Network for Community Hospitality, and analysis of data from two Ketso workshops and interviews with 41 network members, we present reflections on setting up and facilitating the network. In addition, two examples of collaborative Network activities are presented to illustrate the techniques and dialogic communication processes for doing critical hospitality. The article thereby contributes by providing empirically informed and reflexive understandings into the experiences of working and communicating within long-term inclusive partnerships with diverse stakeholders to create traction for positive social sustainable change.
Using Design Thinking to Develop New Methods of Inclusive Exhibition Making^2018^TRANSFORMING OUR WORLD THROUGH DESIGN, DIVERSITY AND EDUCATION^Museums and galleries are now making significant developments in the area of inclusion and awareness of disability rights. There have been noticeable advances in the design of cultural, physical and digital spaces, which provide wider access to a museum's physical and intellectual resources, for individuals of diverse ages and abilities. However, responses have varied in consistency, efficacy, and legacy. This year-long design research project, in partnership with the Wellcome Collection and the Helen Hamlyn Centre for Design, Royal College of Art, develops a working set of tools that can be used by museums to improve accessibility in a more permanent and reiterative manner, with a view towards gathering and sharing relevant data, and design responses, within a broad network of museums and cultural institutions. This paper outlines recent approaches by relevant experts in the field and outlines a new approach to incorporating inclusive design within the process of exhibition creation. It uses co-design methods to provide a set of principled guidelines that respond to all relevant stakeholders. These guidelines are predicated on the understanding that establishing empathetic links between exhibition-makers and exhibition audience members is essential, resulting in a positive collaboration, combining the skills of museum professionals with the lived experience of people with disabilities. A central goal of the research is to explore how design issues surrounding access can be framed as an essential and positive component of the design process, and, more importantly, an opportunity for innovation, not simply an obligatory requirement. This paper comprises the observations of a current research project of a 12 month project, commencing in September 2017 and concluding in September 2018.
Towards an inclusive digital literacy framework for digital India^2018^EDUCATION AND TRAINING^None
Implementing grassroots inclusive change through a cultural audit^2018^QUALITATIVE RESEARCH IN ORGANIZATIONS AND MANAGEMENT^None
A Dementia Cafe as a Bridgehead for Community-Inclusive Care: Qualitative Analysis of Observations by On-the-Job Training Participants in a Dementia Cafe^2018^DEMENTIA AND GERIATRIC COGNITIVE DISORDERS^Background/Aims: Dementia cafes are becoming widespread as a new approach to dementia care, but their operational procedures and significance have not been adequately studied. Methods: On-the-job training (OJT) for professionals planning to operate a dementia cafe in the future was conducted in a pioneering dementia cafe in Japan. The reports of OJT trainees' observations and learning were analyzed qualitatively. Results: Reports could be summarized in up to 9 themes: 2 related to the atmosphere and significance of the cafe, 3 related to the guests, such as people with dementia and their families, and 4 related to the cafe staff. Discussion: The results of the present study identified the elements that make up dementia cafes and their significance and suggest that dementia cafes could be a new type of community resource for dementia care in the future. (C) 2018 S. Karger AG, Basel
INCLUSIVE WEBSITES CAPABLE OF AUTOMATICALLY DETECTING PEOPLE WITH BLINDNESS^2018^12TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE (INTED)^None
'All for One, One for All': communicative processes of co-creation of place brands through inclusive and horizontal stakeholder collaborative networks^2018^COMMUNICATION &amp; SOCIETY-SPAIN^This paper examines stakeholder communication and interaction dynamics in place branding processes in order to inform alternative participatory place branding models. The paper draws from critical communications and branding theory to argue that place brand identities are the result of mediated messages in the public sphere. Consequently, place branding processes need to be observed as communicative exchanges. Through a case study of Australia's southern and only island state of Tasmania, the research employs participatory action research combined with the method of sociological intervention to explore stakeholders' communicative interaction patterns and engagement in place branding processes. Participants representing formal and informal stakeholders engaged in communicating meaning about places were invited to participate in a series of interviews and focus group discussions that allowed a unique self-reflective process and analysis of practices and power-geometries. The proposed quasi-real scenario led to an understanding of the impediments for communication and to scoping alternative modes of engagement towards effective stakeholder communication to support the development of resilient place brand identities. The findings of the exploration contribute to theoretical development of the field by providing an analysis of the nature of stakeholder interactions and communication patterns, impediments and opportunities for greater communication and collaboration towards a common purpose. On a practical level, the study can also inform the development of participatory models of place brand development. Finally, the method proposed here can serve as a practical tool to foster stakeholder engagement in processes of co-creation of place brand identities.
USING INFORMATION AND COMMUNICATION TECHNOLOGIES FOR PROVIDING ACCESSIBILITY AND DEVELOPMENT OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^2018^INFORMATION TECHNOLOGIES AND LEARNING TOOLS^Information and communication technologies as support for the inclusive education are one of the effective tools for the development, education and training of students with special educational needs. The article deals with assistive hardware and software tools that compensate some of the natural functions of the child's body. The possibilities of modern Microsoft, Google, Facebook and Youtube platforms have been described that make it possible to improve the fulfilment of educational tasks via the settings of keyboard shortcuts, virtual keyboard, word prediction functions, sound signals or screen indicators. The article also highlights the potential of messengers, social networks and e-mails as the most modern and adapted communicators for addressing teaching and educational needs of schoolchildren. The Viber and Facebook instant messaging programs have also been described and were found to be the most widespread means of communication in Ukraine having functions of voice and video calls with the interface adapted to maximize screen readability, allowing to create constructive dialogue between teachers, parents or schoolchildren with special educational needs. The use of ICT in inclusive education for didactic purposes have been presented practically by the LearningApps.org service. Examples of setting objectives for children with mild and moderate mental retardation have been presented, in particular: for pupils who suffer from autistic disorders, for schoolchildren who have problems with auditory or visual perception of information. Providing education through the suggested resource allows to carry out remedial work with children with special educational needs that intensifies their perception and attention, improves their memory and stimulates their motivation for educational activities. Introduction of information and communication technologies encompassing their three aspects - compensatory, communication and didactic purposes - makes it possible to adjust educational programmes and contribute effectively to the development of pupils according to their individuality.
ATTENDING DIVERSITY FROM THE TEACHING OF SOCIAL SCIENCES: AN INCLUSIVE APPROACH^JAN-JUN 2018^ENSAYOS-REVISTA DE LA FACULTAD DE EDUCACION DE ALBACETE^Attention to the diversity of students in the school is one of the main concerns existing today in the educational world. On the other hand, the teaching of social sciences can become a backbone of the curriculum in the different stages of education where social problems become a promoter agent of motivation and student learning. In this way, through a literature review it is concluded that working on research projects from the teaching of the social sciences allows to advocate for an integrated curriculum allowing the development of an education based on inclusive principles such as collaboration, the construction of support networks, bet for an inclusive leadership and the development of educational policies that promote meeting the needs and demands of the citizens of our society.
Exploring the conditions for inclusive port development: the case of Indonesia^2018^MARITIME POLICY &amp; MANAGEMENT^Governments around the world are adopting inclusive growth agendas. The ambition to align economic growth ambitions with broader-based social benefits is increasingly embraced by corporations to limit the negative externalities' and enhance the positive externalities' of their operations. Therefore, micro-level corporate strategies and macro-level national ambitions meet at the meso-level of networks and clusters. This requires societal spheres to collaborate and search for alternative governance constellations. In this discourse, port development is only recently receiving attention. In March 2018, ports around the world signed the World Ports Sustainability Program declaration, which aims to contribute to the sustainable development goals (SDGs), whilst a number of national port (master) plans have started to include social along with environmental standards. Extant studies on partnering and stakeholder inclusion in port development are proliferating but are primarily aimed at environmental rather than social (inclusion) issues. This paper adopts an exploratory research design to consider conditions for inclusive port development. A novel taxonomy considers port development as a driver for inclusive growth, where partnerships are the missing link between micro-level business strategies and macro-level effects in the port region and economy at large. This paper shows the first findings and delineates areas for further research.
THE RELATIONSHIP OF EDUCATION, HEALTH AND SOCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICIES TO THE CHALLENGES OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^JAN-JUN 2018^PERSPECTIVAS EM DIALOGO-REVISTA DE EDUCACAO E SOCIEDADE^The recognition of inclusive education as a right challenges public policy managers and operators. Ensuring such special education in regular schools implies the incorporation of new pieces of knowledge and practices, which transcend our educational dimension and comprise health, family, and social development issues. This study is based on the assumption that the effectiveness of school inclusion requires a continuous network articulation, with emphasis on the intersectorality between the education, health, and social work policies. The purpose hereof is to identify effectiveness features of the Right Assurance System as an intersectoral practice in the care of disabled children and teenagers. We performed a field research with forms to evaluate the service access of the local networks: child education centers; schools; high schools; health units; social work and special school reference centers. Forty-six families and 119 professionals took part in the research. We identified that: not every service keeps records on disabled children and teenagers; there is an unawareness of the territorial division and their service spaces; there is not an agreement in the use of intersectoral communication standard instruments, as well as the absence of network meetings to protect the public under evaluation; and network articulation through family practices. We performed quantitative and qualitative analyses on the results based on the intersectorality assumption. It still is a challenge for education and all other basic policies to overcome the management sectoral model and validate the network articulation assumed for the implementation of the right to inclusive education and full protection of disabled children and teenagers.
"You have to do something beyond containing": developing inclusive systems in a partnership of primary schools^2018^EMOTIONAL AND BEHAVIOURAL DIFFICULTIES^Reducing fixed term exclusions (FTE) in primary schools is a difficult proposition. This research discusses how a partnership of primary schools developed more inclusive systems to support students previously given FTEs for disciplinary purposes. Longitudinal data from interviews and documentary sources trace the development of an approach amongst primary schools with previously high levels of FTE. The process of developing a model of transferred inclusion (TI) within the partnership led to schools changing practices around behaviour management, thus developing more inclusive systems. The paper elaborates on partnership work around the TI project that opened up discussion and questioning of practice around behaviour, leading to schools thinking about their systemic practice. The benefits of TI, therefore, were a prompt for development, rather than just an intervention to reduce exclusions. Changes in practice supported through the TI process lead to claims that substantive change would not have happened without the TI project.
The Remote Labs as an Effective Tool of Inclusive Engineering Education^2018^2018 XIVTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON PERSPECTIVE TECHNOLOGIES AND METHODS IN MEMS DESIGN (MEMSTECH)^In this paper the experience of Remote Laboratories development, implementation and usage for engineers training is presented. The structure of GOLDi network that unites partner universities from Germany, Ukraine, Armenia and Georgia is given. The possibilities of REIoT complex for study of Embedded systems design and Internet of Things technologies are described. Presented remote tools can be used for internationalization and improvement of inclusive engineering education.
Developing Inclusive Higher Education: The Network Approach^2018^PSIKHOLOGICHESKAYA NAUKA I OBRAZOVANIE-PSYCHOLOGICAL SCIENCE AND EDUCATION^None
'So, how does one define a friendship?': Identifying friendship among students using AAC in inclusive education settings^2018^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SPECIAL NEEDS EDUCATION^The characteristics of friendships among children who use augmentative and alternative communication (AAC) are not well understood. Research on friendships among children without disabilities has identified similarity to each other as a key characteristic among friends. The aim of this study was to identify and describe the friendships between students using AAC and fellow students in Norwegian mainstream public schools. Participants were students using AAC in first to fourth class, fellow students, parents, and staff. Data were analysed using a constructive grounded theory approach. The participants provided diverse reports about the friendships, although all students using AAC reported having friendships at school. The friendships were described by parents and staff as superficial and students using AAC were seldom perceived as playmates by fellow students. The results indicated that friendships between students using AAC and fellow students were often unilateral. The results are discussed along with the implications for future research.
Who works in a working region? Inclusive innovation in the new manufacturing economy^2018^REGIONAL STUDIES^Scholars have documented economic gains for regions that promote manufacturing through co-location of innovation and production activities. But it is unclear whether the production jobs created in this new context remain inclusive of workers with limited formal education. This paper compares US states that specialize in biopharmaceuticals to understand who participates in a so-called working region. While some state policy-makers have privileged scientific and design occupations at the expense of the production workforce, regional actors in North Carolina have increased employment in design and development while growing their biopharmaceutical production base, aligning innovation and equity goals in the process.
An inclusive Research Education Community (iREC): Impact of the SEA-PHAGES program on research outcomes and student learning^DEC 19 2017^PROCEEDINGS OF THE NATIONAL ACADEMY OF SCIENCES OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA^Engaging undergraduate students in scientific research promises substantial benefits, but it is not accessible to all students and is rarely implemented early in college education, when it will have the greatest impact. An inclusive Research Education Community (iREC) provides a centralized scientific and administrative infrastructure enabling engagement of large numbers of students at different types of institutions. The Science Education Alliance-Phage Hunters Advancing Genomics and Evolutionary Science (SEA-PHAGES) is an iREC that promotes engagement and continued involvement in science among beginning undergraduate students. The SEA-PHAGES students show strong gains correlated with persistence relative to those in traditional laboratory courses regardless of academic, ethnic, gender, and socioeconomic profiles. This persistent involvement in science is reflected in key measures, including project ownership, scientific community values, science identity, and scientific networking.
Inclusive technologies, selective traditions: a socio-material case study of crowdfunded book publishing^DEC 2017^JOURNAL OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY^The number and scale of crowdfunding platforms has increased dramatically in recent years, arguably more so than any other open phenomenon. This increase has allowed several crowdfunding websites to capture significant public attention, e.g. Kickstarter, Indiegogo. Yet, the growth of these specialist websites is only one aspect of the increasing popularity of crowdfunding technologies. Another, less-commonly discussed development is the propagation and integration of crowdfunding technologies into novel hybrid or proprietary production contexts, such as t-shirts (e.g. Threadless) or video games (e.g. Star Citizen). Such integrations are to be expected as crowdfunding technologies grow and evolve. However, they also present new challenges for managers and system designers, as the manner in which different features of crowdfunding technologies are enacted becomes decreasingly predictable the more their application domains diverge. This study performs a socio-material case study of Unbound, an innovative book publisher based in the UK. Unbound uses crowdfunding technologies to help authors raise the funding necessary to publish their books. However, once this funding has been reached, Unbound assumes more typical publisher responsibilities, such as editing, printing, binding, shipping, and promoting these books. Findings from Unbound identify four categories of socio-material practices in this hybrid model, each of which contains multiple sub-practices enacting different material features. This includes practices for fundraising, practices for maintaining traditional publishing standards, practices for creative contribution by backers, and practices for motivations. Further, tensions are observed for each of these categories of practices, due to the conflicting demands for inclusivity and selectivity associated with crowdfunding and publishing, respectively.
Social capital, interactive governance and coastal protection: The effectiveness of mangrove ecosystem-based strategies in promoting inclusive development in Demak, Indonesia^DEC 1 2017^OCEAN &amp; COASTAL MANAGEMENT^While there is considerable literature on coastal adaptation, there is less scholarly attention for how social capital, interactive governance, and ecosystem-based approaches can be combined to promote inclusive development. Hence, this paper examines contemporary efforts to protect coasts in Demak, northern Java, Indonesia, which are threatened by coastal erosion induced flooding, through large-scale planting of mangroves. We argue that the success of such ecosystem-based approaches depends on wide-spread civil society participation. Our analysis of the structure of bonding, bridging and linking capital in Demak reveals that although some local groups may lack bonding and bridging capital, their ability to acquire linking capital enables them to monopolise resources from the state and international NGOs for mangrove plantings; this negatively effects the cohesion of the coastal protection program and therefore its effectiveness and inclusiveness as mangrove groups protect their own areas. The paper shows that an understanding of the social capital of different local groups can enable a better understanding of how to engage them in ecosystem based governance. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Struggles for inclusive development in small-scale fisheries in Paraty, Southeastern Coast of Brazil^DEC 1 2017^OCEAN &amp; COASTAL MANAGEMENT^This article discusses challenges in fostering participation of marginalized actors in coastal fisheries governance in Brazil. Recent changes in the institutional architecture of fisheries governance have opened new spaces for the participation of small-scale fishers to influence setting of the policy agenda, management practices, and monitoring strategies. However, the participation of local users has been opposed by conservationist policies, which limit their access to fishing grounds. Small-scale fishers' involvement has been characterized by tensions between participatory spaces provided within bureaucratic structures and claimed participatory spaces built from below. This article analyzes fisheries governance in the municipality of Paraty, Southeastern Coast of Brazil, with a focus on three institutional innovations implemented by the government to promote social participation - Fishing Accords, Terms of Agreement, and Management Councils of Protected Areas. Although these innovations are important for the recognition of small-scale fisheries as compatible with conservation policies, problems such as low institutional capacity, power imbalance, limits of decentralized governance, and lack of long-term financial resources remain as challenges for the consolidation of an inclusive development model for coastal fisheries in Brazil. (C) 2017 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Managing the NSW coastal zone: Restructuring governance for inclusive development^DEC 1 2017^OCEAN &amp; COASTAL MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.595  </td>  <td>3.043</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
An innovative concept on inclusive economic participation: The governance of inclusive economic participation sites in Flemish cities^DEC 2017^LOCAL ECONOMY^Presently, the numerous initiatives within Flanders (Belgium) that focus on an (more) inclusive economic participation are often poorly coordinated and physically dispersed in nature. As such, there exist considerable thresholds for socially deprived urban citizens to actually find, use and benefit from these initiatives. Together with some Flemish cities and social enterprises, a multidisciplinary research team of the University of Antwerp has therefore launched the innovative concept of inclusive economic participation sites. In view of the actual use of these inclusive economic participation sites by Flemish policy makers, the research team has started to specify relevant governance items and requirements for the creation, development and exploitation of these inclusive economic participation sites. Inductive inspiration is found within two explorative research projects consisting of 25 inclusive economic participation sites related practices and six focus group debates with social and economic policy experts (i.e. inclusive economic participation-Reference-Platforms). As such, the researchers inductively uncover seven strategic and four spatial governance requirements as well as one strategic-spatial interaction governance requirement. All requirements are defined, explained and illustrated within the article.
Togetherness, teamwork and challenges: "Reflections on building an inclusive research network"^DEC 2017^BRITISH JOURNAL OF LEARNING DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.5  </td>  <td>0.985</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The Finnish Citizens' Initiative: Towards Inclusive Agenda-setting?^DEC 2017^SCANDINAVIAN POLITICAL STUDIES^This article examines whether the Citizens' Initiative (CI) in Finland has enhanced inclusion in processes of political agenda-setting. Democratic innovations such as CIs have been proposed as a solution to the challenges facing Western democracies. CIs are expected to increase political inclusion by allowing citizens to set the political agenda and by mobilising otherwise marginalised or passive citizens. However, the empirical evidence on this proposition remains scarce. This study examines the impact of the CI in Finland on political inclusion. It relies on the Civic Voluntarism Model (CVM) to determine whether the CI mobilises citizens who otherwise tend to be less involved in political matters and thereby enhances inclusiveness. The data come from the Finnish National Election Study 2015 (FNES2015), which is a cross-sectional representative survey conducted in the wake of the national parliamentary elections in April 2015. Logistic regression models are used in the article to examine the relative importance of socioeconomic resources and civic skills, psychological political engagement and recruitment networks. The results show that while users have many of the familiar traits of political activists, the CI also activates marginalised groups. Most importantly, young citizens are likely to support CIs and the Internet constitutes a central recruitment network. In this sense, the CI has helped increase democratic inclusiveness.
Affording inclusive dyslexia-friendly online text reading^NOV 2017^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN THE INFORMATION SOCIETY^To date, guidelines for designing inclusive dyslexia-friendly online learning environments, which take into consideration both learners with and without dyslexia, are still scarce. As web text is one of the extensively used elements in online learning, this study aims to derive practical guidelines on this aspect by exploring the experience of learners with dyslexia and learners without dyslexia when using different online reading affordances. The study employed a within-subjects qualitative study and key patterns that emerged from the data collected via observations and interviews were interpreted based on two important aspects of learning experience, which were perceived learning and engagement. The study reveals that (1) the direct application of Printed Text on the web should be carefully considered, (2) existing web accessibility guidelines (limit to guidelines examined in this study) are appropriate and (3) the use of a Screen Reader for online reading should not be made compulsory and be available as an option instead. The comparison between the experience of learners with and without dyslexia in this study has yielded insights into affordances that are perceived positively by both groups of learners. As learners with dyslexia form a significant minority of the online learning population, the inclusive dyslexia-friendly guidelines derived from this study would better inform the future implementation of online reading affordances that acknowledge differences and similarities between online learners.
Global interaction as a learning path towards inclusive journalism^OCT 1 2017^JOURNAL OF APPLIED JOURNALISM &amp; MEDIA STUDIES^Journalism faces new and serious challenges against a backdrop of attacks on the political notion of an inclusive and pluralist society, an idea based on internationally and locally accepted fundamental rights frameworks. These frameworks build on recognition, respect and inclusion of difference, based on individual or collective rights and a critical stand towards the construction of difference. The immediacy and potentially global reach of digital communication has dramatically changed the information order and given the concept of inclusiveness new meanings. Journalists will have to cope in new ways with extended networks feeding into their understanding of inclusive society. In 2013, four journalism schools in New Zealand and the Nordic countries launched a joint project linked to the EU initiative 'Promoting the drivers for inclusive &amp; sustainable growth'. This article offers a policy centred elaboration of inclusiveness and university teaching aimed to raise awareness and sensitivity towards diversities, power and reporting. Collaborative forms of inclusive pedagogy with multimodal qualities are presented. Perspectives of combining personal mobility and net-based pedagogical tools that establish a genuinely interactive relation between the teacher-as-student and student-as-teacher in online learning environments for education of journalists are discussed against our first experiences from this joint development work.
Will you be my friend? A multilevel network analysis of friendships of students with and without special educational needs backgrounds in inclusive classrooms^SEP 2017^ZEITSCHRIFT FUR ERZIEHUNGSWISSENSCHAFT^The objective of this study was to determine the relationship between having a special educational needs background (SEN) and the likelihood of having friends in inclusive classes. We assumed that a combination of individual, dyadic and contextual variables can sufficiently explain the relation between a SEN diagnosis and the likelihood of friendship. Data analysis was based on a cross-sectional sample of students (N = 1241) in second and third grade primary-school classes. To address the different levels adequately, the present study improves upon previous research in two ways: First, the sociometric data were analyzed with the p2 model, a specialized multilevel network model. Second, the study focused solely on friendships and emphasized the concept's unique features with respect to inclusive education. Data analysis indicated that students with SEN had a decreased probability of becoming friends with their classmates compared to students without SEN. Even when individual, dyadic, and contextual variables were included into the model, the association between a SEN diagnosis and the likelihood of friendship persisted. The implications of the results are discussed with respect to their implications for inclusive teaching practice.
Critically Reviewing How We Do Research into Inclusive Education: Four Projects with an Educational and Social Approach^AUG 2017^REVISTA INTERUNIVERSITARIA DE FORMACION DEL PROFESORADO-RIFOP^This paper offers a reflective and analytical approach concerning the conceptual and epistemological bases that four ongoing pieces of research share. The studies agree on their interest in understanding and promoting processes and projects for research and improvement developed by networks and teams with a clear inclusive purpose. The work supports the need to critically review the bases upon which research that addresses processes of inclusion is considered and projected and takes the position of a participatory research model, based on the joint construction of the contributions of actors, disciplines and various sources of knowledge.
PACTS OF A POLITICAL RATIONALITY, SUPPORTIVE PRACTICES IN INCLUSIVE SCHOOLS: MODES OF TEACHER SUBJECTIVATION^JUL-SEP 2017^ETD EDUCACAO TEMATICA DIGITAL^In the intersection between Inclusive Education and Special Education, this paper aims to problematize the ideal model of teacher produced by means of supportive practices in the process of teacher education in Special Education in Brazil. In order to achieve this aim, the materiality of research includes textbooks related to the National Network of Continuing Teacher Education in Special Education. From the Foucauldian studies in Education, an analytical exercise was developed around the materiality of the research, with the use of the "governmentality" tool. Given the data produced, it is concluded that the very neoliberal political rationality that serves as a reference for bio-politics and promotes teacher self-entrepreneurship also operates in the production of supportive practices in inclusive schools to ensure the success of inclusive education. Teaching as a supportive practice becomes the ideal model to inclusive school.
Integrated agricultural landscape management: Case study on inclusive innovation processes, monitoring and evaluation in the Mbeya Region, Tanzania^JUN 2017^OUTLOOK ON AGRICULTURE^Integrated landscape management is a process for achieving multiple objectives related to agricultural production, ecosystem conservation, and sustainable natural resource management. These multiple livelihood functions are important features of an agricultural landscape in Mbeya, Tanzania. Due to environmental damage caused by agricultural expansion and charcoal burning, a process called integrated agricultural landscape management (IALM) was implemented to address this problem. This encompassed the identification and involvement of a range of key landscape actors and processes like awareness creation and joint problem analysis, solution framing, learning, planning and implementation of actions, and monitoring and evaluation. A multistakeholder innovation platform was formed for creating a coordination mechanism, common understanding, vision and goals, and networking. Fifty IALM ideas were identified and six selected by the stakeholders. Outcomes of using the IALM process included policy recommendations, joint learning, and innovative actions and were codeveloped, implemented, monitored, and evaluated with the local communities.
Inclusive Masculinity and Facebook Photographs Among Early Emerging Adults at a British University^MAY 2017^JOURNAL OF ADOLESCENT RESEARCH^Central to debates about the construction of masculinity in sociology is the influence of culture and what constitutes acceptable displays of masculinity. This article adopts a novel approach in examining this question. It adopts a summative content analysis, combined with a semiotic analysis, of 1,100 Facebook photographs, in order to explore the underlying meanings within the photos and the performances of masculinity. Facebook photographs from 44, straight, White, male, early emerging adults attending the same university are used as a representation of an individual's ideal self. These are then analyzed in order to determine the behaviors endorsed by peer culture. It was found that the sample overwhelmingly adopted inclusive behaviors (including homosocial tactility, dancing, and kissing each other), and inclusive masculinity theory was utilized to contextualize participants' constructions of masculinity. Thus, this research shows that emerging adult males at this university construct their masculine identities away from previous orthodox archetypes. It is argued that the reducing importance of gendered behavior patterns may represent an adoption of what are perceived as wider cultural norms and act as a symbol of adulthood to these early emerging adults.
Inclusive management of ex-servicemen in India: Satisfaction of air force veterans from resettlement facilities with special reference to Tamil Nadu^MAR 2017^IIMB MANAGEMENT REVIEW^Resettlement of ex-servicemen of army, navy, and air force in India is an important management function of the resettlement framework, which includes the government and other stakeholders. The resettlement network extends various facilities to ex-servicemen and their families. However, the efficacy of existing systems to ensure inclusive management of the resettlement facilities is yet to be proved. This study finds that the satisfaction of ex-servicemen is around average for the resettlement facilities, which needs to be progressed towards overall effectiveness. The present bureaucratic resettlement environment needs to be revamped for scientifically managing the satisfaction of ex-servicemen with the resettlement services. (C) 2017 Production and hosting by Elsevier Ltd on behalf of Indian Institute of Management Bangalore.
EXPRESSIVE TOUCH AND THE ATTITUDE OF CARE: THE CASE FOR LGBT-INCLUSIVE INTAKE IN AGING NETWORK SERVICES^SPR 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF FEMINIST APPROACHES TO BIOETHICS^This article uses the work of Eva Feder Kittay and Maurice Merleau-Ponty to advocate for LGBT-inclusive intake questions across aging network services. I argue that care providers need to know their charge's sexual orientation and/or gender identity because caring touch is responsive, meaning that the care provider understands how her touch will be perceived and can change her actions accordingly. Information about a charge's sexual orientation and/or gender identity is one important way to furnish the care provider with the information she needs to calibrate effectively the expressive impact of her touch.
Social Experiences of Children With Disabilities in Inclusive Portuguese Preschool Settings^MAR 2017^JOURNAL OF EARLY INTERVENTION^Based on peer sociometric reports, we examined how number of friendships, social acceptance, and characteristics of social networks vary as a function of disability profile. We also investigated teachers' awareness of the sociometric status of young children with disabilities. Participants were 86 children with disabilities (63 boys) enrolled in inclusive preschool classrooms of the Metropolitan Area of Lisbon, Portugal (M-age = 67.33 months, SD = 10.54). Findings suggest that children with severe or sociobehavioral disabilities may be at increased risk of social rejection and isolation, having fewer friends and lower social network centrality than children with mild disabilities. Low agreement between teachers' classifications of the social status of children with disabilities and classifications based on peer nominations raises concerns about their awareness of processes of social rejection and neglect. Findings highlight the need for interventions to support positive social experiences at the dyadic and group levels in Portuguese inclusive preschool classrooms.
Vulnerable publics and digital empowerment: The challenge of an e-inclusive society^JAN-FEB 2017^PROFESIONAL DE LA INFORMACION^The fight against poverty and social exclusion is, to a greater or lesser extent, a constant feature in European strategies for economic growth and employment generation and is featured in related research frameworks andprograms. At present, the concepts of exclusion and inclusion include access to and use of information and communication technologies and networks. Due to its relevance and increasing weight in social policies, it is necessary to make progress in the definition and application of concepts such as exclusion, vulnerability, and empowerment within the framework of digital societies. The investment and dedication of resources to conduct research into the social sciences and humanities is, therefore, a fundamental necessity.
A Self-Assessment Framework for Inclusive Schools Supporting Assistive Technology Users^2017^HARNESSING THE POWER OF TECHNOLOGY TO IMPROVE LIVES^In order to support schools to assess their performance in supporting children with disabilities in their ICT and ICT-AT needs, a self-assessment framework was developed by a task force of partners and associate partners of the ENTELIS project. The self-assessment tool aims to help educational establishments that welcome learners with disabilities to assess their current outcomes and to plan improvements in supporting these students in increasing digital literacy and developing digital skills. This includes the use of mainstream Information and Communication Technology (ICT) and specially designed digital Assistive Technologies (ICT-AT). This can only successfully happen if schools fully embrace an inclusive approach to education. In this paper the authors describe the development of the framework and the further steps for its use.
Using CSCL to Conceptualize Disability Toward Inclusive Education Design^2017^25TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTERS IN EDUCATION (ICCE 2017): TECHNOLOGY AND INNOVATION: COMPUTER-BASED EDUCATIONAL SYSTEMS FOR THE 21ST CENTURY^This paper presents a framework and design activity to support pre-service PSEs (PSEs) in conceptualizing disability and inclusive education using representations within a computer-supported collaborative learning (CSCL) environment. PSEs often only receive limited or cursory training about disability and how to design for inclusive education. Discourses focus on diagnoses and prescriptive support strategies, which can limit PSEs' ability to effectively support students' needs. I argue PSEs need opportunities to engage with their epistemological and ontological commitments to disability before advancing to considerations for design. Moreover, how PSEs identify in relation to disability can impact their agency in supporting students' needs and how they shape social structures of how disability and inclusion is manifested in their contexts. Framed by Dewey's notion of an aesthetic experience, I propose a design activity where PSEs develop and exercise metarepresentational competencies to individually and collaboratively create, critique, and interpret external representations, such as drawings, imagery, or models of disability and inclusive education. Such representations can be mapped to a digital network and used as mediating artifacts toward collaborative conceptualization of disability. Furthermore, PSEs can draw upon the network to refine, manipulate, and create new representations of possibilities of inclusive education. The network affords the ability for PSEs to democratize their learning and situate their representations, identities, agency, and social structures to see how they collide, converge, and diverge. As noted by CSCL scholars, meaning making does not occur inside the mind and requires external social negotiation of ideas. Combining representational design with CSCL offers a powerful way for PSEs to create socioculturally informed conceptualizations of disability and consider implications for inclusive education design.
THE PEDAGOGICAL VARIATION MODEL: ALL-INCLUSIVE, HOLISTIC E-PARADIGM TO PROMOTE REDUCTION IN ONLINE ATTRITION RATES, THEREBY INCREASING RETENTION RATES^2017^10TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI2017)^When various significant transactional and transformational leadership strategies for e-learning and e-teaching are offered in an all-inclusive, holistic online environment, opportunities for both e-learners and e-teachers emerge to select the most appropriate approach for creating environments that are conducive in unleashing innovative ideas for problem-solving in the 21st Century. Arguably, this approach promotes the reduction in online attrition rates, thereby increasing retention rates. Two contrasting approaches, namely constructivist environments versus instructivist environments are considered in the research paper. Rogers (2013) recognised that an in-depth insight to pedagogical leadership for e-moderators, (i.e. online teachers) is paramount to successful e-learning. Garrison (2011) noted the absence of pedagogical leadership, since "the teacher's scholarly leadership, a legitimate and important authoritative, essential teaching responsibility has been either ignored or downgraded, in online learning environments", suggesting that attrition rates should decrease with an increase of retention rates Thus, the research problem addressed this gap in knowledge on pedagogical leadership in online teaching, by developing a model, the Pedagogical Variation Model (PVM) for online teachers, based on e-moderator leadership qualities (Rogers, 2004, 2005/2011) for teaching and learning in asynchronous discussion forums. The PVM (Rogers 2013) uses one Boston 2 x 2 Matrix format in an analysis to capture online teacher leadership strategies namely leadership variables as: (i) transactional (i.e. task-giving) and (ii) transformational (i.e. empowering) Another Boston 2 x 2 Matrix format is used in an analysis to capture online e-learner behaviour variables, namely (i) collaborative (i.e. sharing and exchanging ideas) and (ii) capacity for knowledge construction (i.e. creative thinking). Models are useful tools to better understand not only learning processed of students but also for educators to explore new dimensions in their teaching. This is the central aim in the evaluation of the PVM in a collaborative research project with the Faculty of Education, Kuwait University, directed by Dr. Fayiz Aldhafeeri. (2014). An online questionnaire (Rogers 2013), translated into Arabic, was distributed amongst under-graduates and post-graduates in The Faculty of Education. The responses were translated into English for analysis. This collaborative research revealed that whilst a constructivist learning environment (e-learner centred) was recognised by a minority of respondents, the majority of respondents from both samples under-graduate and postgraduate, preferred an instructivist e-moderator approach. Whilst no generalisation of the results can be made due to the samples being less than thirty respondents, nevertheless the outcome reveals that and instructivist (i.e. respect for teacher-centred learning) remains a preferred learning environment The research rationale is broached with insights into different pedagogical concepts that have shaped the research design, including:(i) the paradoxical nature of two diametrically opposing pedagogies, namely instructivist (high teacher visibility) and constructivist (low teacher visibility) pedagogies, and (ii) pedagogical leadership in asynchronous learning networks..
CULTURAL COMPONENT OF INCLUSIVE LEARNING^2017^10TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI2017)^None
LOOK&amp;SPEAK UP TO ICF - CONCLUSION OF AN INTERDISCIPLINARY QUALITATIVE RESEARCH ON INCLUSIVE LEARNING EFFECTIVENESS OF EYE TRACKING SYSTEMS FOR PUPILS WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, IN VENETO, ACCORDING TO ICF PERSPECTIVE^2017^10TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI2017)^None
DEVELOPING AN INCLUSIVE EDUCATIONAL ENVIRONMENT IN A UNIVERSITY CONTEXT^2017^INTED2017: 11TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^None
Shape from Shading by Model Inclusive Learning Method with Simultaneous Estimation of Parameters^2017^ARTIFICIAL NEURAL NETWORKS AND MACHINE LEARNING, PT II^The problem of recovering shape from shading is important in computer vision and robotics. It is essentially an ill-posed problem and several studies have been done. In this paper, we present a versatile method of solving the problem by neural networks. The proposed method introduces the concept of the model inclusive learning with simultaneous estimation of unknown parameters. In the method a mathematical model, which we call 'image-formation model', expressing the process that the image is formed from an object surface, is introduced and is included in the learning loop of a neural network. The neural network is trained so as to recover the shape with simultaneously estimating unknown parameters in the image-formation model. The performance of the proposed method is demonstrated through experiments.
The use of ICTs as resources to work with inclusive education: ratings given by mexican and spanish students^2017^BORDON-REVISTA DE PEDAGOGIA^INTRODUCTION. This research work aims at determining the evaluation of seven Web 2.0 as useful tools to work on inclusive education. It focuses on the use of social networks, blog and/or edublog, forums, WebQuest, wiki, virtual learning environments, online office applications; for the development of their presence, participation and progress as strategies that involve an inclusive educational context considering that both inclusion and ICT are fundamental to education in this century. METHOD. The fundamental objective is to study the evaluation given by 213 university students (Spanish and Mexican) of programs related to the Educational Sciences on several Web 2.0 tools as resources that promote the basic principles of inclusive education, for which a quantitative methodology will be used through an ex post facto design. RESULTS. The main results of this study indicate that Spanish students evaluated Web 2.0 tools, blog and/or edublog, WebQuest and wiki more positively to promote strategies of inclusive educational environments than the Mexican students surveyed. By contrast, the latter used more social networks that the former for academic purposes. DISCUSSION. The outcomes of this research point out the differences of the university education systems of Mexico and Spain, in consideration of the ratings given to the principles of inclusive education through the use of ICTs, as well as knowledge and both personal and academic use of the seven 2.0 resources studied. The use of blogs and/or edublogs as a methodological and technological resource for promoting principles of inclusive education were the resources with the highest ratings for both Spanish and Mexican students.
Resource Support for Educational Organizations in the Implementation Of Inclusive Education (the Experience of the Educational Organizations of the New Moscow District)^2017^CLINICAL PSYCHOLOGY AND SPECIAL EDUCATION^The article presents data of applied social and psychological research of resourcing inclusive practices in an educational organization. The theoretical part defines methodological grounds for facilitating specialized educational environment to students with physical limitations. It offers an analysis of characteristics of necessary recourses. Various international networking models of inclusive education are discussed. The empirical part is dedicated to a study facilitating specialized educational environments to students with disabilities as a managerial resource in the context implementation of the inclusive practices. It describes the details of activities carried out by the members of the network and concludes that such a multi-component model can be applied to facilitate specialized educational conditions for students with disabilities. Summarized the results of the event, held on the basis of educational organizations of the Troitsk and Novomoskovsk administrative districts. The results of this study can be relevant for the inclusive education system in Russia because of the significance of the resource deficit problem in educational organizations at the current stage of development of the Russian education system.
EMOTIONAL SKILLS AND TEACHERS TRAINING FOR INCLUSIVE EDUCATION IN NETWORK SOCIETY^2017^CONTEXTOS EDUCATIVOS-REVISTA DE EDUCACION^None
TEACHER TRAINING IN HIGHER EDUCATION FOR INCLUSIVE PEDAGOGY^2017^INTED2017: 11TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^Being a teacher of higher education represents a great challenge to a social / academic / scientific context dominated by multiple challenges: interdisciplinarity and transdisciplinarity, access to science and technology, networking, globalization discourse, responsibility to contribute to overcoming social contradictions, in general the development of capacities to face a world in permanent change. In this context attention to diversity and inclusion is particularly important. With this premise a research was undertaken with the objective of making a theoretical proposal to guide the teacher training in higher education within the framework of inclusive pedagogy. It is interesting that the teacher assumes a critical attitude in his own formation and practice, seeking not only to focus on the advance of the knowledge of his specific discipline. This is important but not sufficient, he must also assume the perspective of integral formation: ethics, pedagogical, scientific, human and contextual. The methodology developed was qualitative and dialogic, interviews were conducted in depth to educational specialists for inclusion. From these results were formed two focus groups with teachers and students to validate the findings built. The results are organized in four significant themes: one, the educational conception that guides the formation in higher education; two, the formation of the teacher of higher education; three, diversity and inclusive pedagogy; finally, a body of theoretical guidelines that direct the teacher education in the context of inclusive pedagogy. It was concluded that teacher training systems should conceive the teacher as an active, creative, and responsible person of the constructions that he elaborates and validates in networks of knowledge and shared learning. In order to face the challenges of inclusion from its space and commitment, he must be able to communicate in multiple ways in processes, respect differences, attend diversity, and promote integral human development.
Community resistance and the inclusive city: Devising strategies in SAo Paulo^2017^JOURNAL OF URBAN AFFAIRS^The global call for inclusive cities suggests that all residents should have equal access to the benefits of urban life. Across cities, however, displacement and lack of affordable housing segregate urban residents and limit their access to power, resources, and opportunities. Though social movement literature has long assessed how movements influence officials for reform from the outside, scholars of governance argue that civil society must act from the inside to achieve political and territorial inclusion. Here I ask whether movements confronting removals in SAo Paulo implement direct strategies and, if so, what are the factors that shape why movements choose direct over indirect strategies. I find that an ideology based on rights encourages direct strategies, but a radical perspective or a weak relationship with the state instead pushes movements toward activities that promote indirect influence. Networking across movements is key for increasing the capacity of movements to access new democratic institutions.
A New Model for Inclusive Sports? An Evaluation of Participants' Experiences of Mixed Ability Rugby^2017^SOCIAL INCLUSION^Sport has been recognised as a potential catalyst for social inclusion. The Mixed Ability Model represents an innovative approach to inclusive sport by encouraging disabled and non-disabled players to interact in a mainstream club environment. However, research around the impacts of the Model is currently lacking. This paper aims to contribute empirical data to this gap by evaluating participants' experiences of Mixed Ability Rugby and highlighting implications for future initiatives. Primary qualitative data were collected within two Mixed Ability Rugby teams in the UK and Italy through online questionnaires and focus groups. Data were analysed using Simplican et al.'s (2015) model of social inclusion. Data show that Mixed Ability Rugby has significant potential for achieving inclusionary outcomes. Positive social impacts, reported by all participants, regardless of (dis) ability, include enhanced social networks, an increase in social capital, personal development and fundamental perception shifts. Factors relevant to the Mixed Ability Model are identified that enhance these impacts and inclusionary outcomes. The mainstream setting was reportedly the most important, with further aspects including a supportive club environment and promotion of self-advocacy. A 'Wheel of Inclusion' is developed that provides a useful basis for evaluating current inclusive sport initiatives and for designing new ones.
Southern Federal University as a Center for the Development of Inclusive Education in the Region^2017^PSIKHOLOGICHESKAYA NAUKA I OBRAZOVANIE^The article provides an overview of best practices for inclusive education in higher educational institutions of the country, in terms of assessing its role in the development of inclusion in the regions. Cluster approach is proposed as the main approach to the development of regional inclusive education. The article describes the experience of organizing inclusive education in the Southern Federal University as a basic educational institution of higher education and as a cluster-forming educational organization that provides learning environment for persons with disabilities at all levels of education. The article also reveals the purpose and objectives of the university in the organization and implementation of quality inclusive education as a key development strategy. We analyze the actual state of inclusive education system at the university, which allows us to identify and describe the main activities of the Southern Federal University that ensure the establishment and development of inclusive education system both within the university and in the Rostov region in general. This also provides the opportunity to describe the current experience that may be incorporated in other institutions of higher education thus ensuring the effectiveness of formation of inclusive education system.
AN INCLUSIVE ANALYSIS OF DETERMINANTS OF INTERNATIONAL MIGRATION. THE CASE OF EUROPEAN RICH AND POOR COUNTRIES^2017^TECHNOLOGICAL AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT OF ECONOMY^This work aims to integrate defragmented migration perspectives in order to better understand and explain reasons of contemporaneous migration. Accordingly, international migration flows are explained with various socio-economic determinants which address different sources of migration, reinforced by the best-known theories and conceptual frameworks. A panel data analysis is performed at the level of rich and poor countries of the European Union to measure migration flows from the year 2000 until 2013. The results provide evidence indicating that there are some structural similarities and discrepancies between European rich and poor countries. These similarities (or discrepancies) make them responding similarly to certain economic conditions and changes. Thus, the association of earnings, inequalities (measured by the Gini Index) and poverty line could be positive or negative depending on wealth level of countries. Moreover, unemployment is a supply-push factor, but its importance is much higher in rich countries, diminishing in poorer countries. Economic freedom has a very strong positive effect on migration for all countries, but its relevance turned out to be the highest in the group of the poorest countries. Also, the association between Foreign Direct Investment and migration is negative, but it is more significant in the case of poorer countries.
IPBES, an inclusive institution? Challenging the integration of stakeholders in a science-policy interface^2017^ECOLOGY AND SOCIETY^The International Platform for Biodiversity and Ecosystem Services (IPBES) was launched in 2012. Its objective is to strengthen the science-policy interface for the conservation and sustainable use of biodiversity, long-term human well-being, and sustainable development. Nonstate Actors (NSAs) participated in the inception of the platform and are also assumed to play a key role in its coming assessments and reports. In order to encourage NSAs to participate and self-organize, an institutional process has been led by the Secretariat in collaboration with two main organizations: Diversitas-International Council for Science (ICSU) and the International Union for Conservation of Nature (IUCN). We look at the construction of this stakeholder participation process and its effectiveness. To what degree is the stakeholder engagement effective and what are the different forms of involvement? What methods are used by the IPBES's Secretariat and its mandated organizations to encourage stakeholder participation in the Platform? A social network analysis survey revealed four categories of actors in the group of stakeholders: organizers, connected, closely-knit, and peripheral. The ethnographic approach analyzed the way in which the IPBES secretariat organized the stakeholders' days, managed them, and controlled them. Thanks to these two methods, we analyzed the relational structure of the group of stakeholders and their contours of involvement and showed that these two dimensions can combine in a different way. The idea of a group of stakeholders, promoted by IPBES, is accompanied by a leadership/participation model that tends to enroll the stakeholders involved but may conversely marginalize some dissenting voices.
Educating for an Inclusive World: Lessons Learned From A Globally Networked Human Rights and Disability Course for Social Work and Law Students^2017^JOURNAL OF TEACHING IN SOCIAL WORK^This article examines an innovative model of online international education regarding disability through a human rights perspective piloted through a collaboration between Universidad LaSalle, Mexico, and University at Buffalo, United States. The course is organized around a pressing global human rights and development issue. Its objective is to promote effective practice with persons with disabilities through cross-national, cross-disciplinary, human-rights based education; strengthen students' sense of global engagement; and foster cross-cultural expertise and competence with diversity. The implications for effective professional education in law and social work are discussed. The article also examines pedagogical strategies and presents case study materials, identifies key disability rights themes common to both nations and cultures, and explores how distance learning technology is implemented in the course. A preliminary assessment of this newly piloted approach is also presented, based on data from students, as well as the implications for teaching and practice.
Building inclusive nations in the age of migration^2017^IDENTITIES-GLOBAL STUDIES IN CULTURE AND POWER^Nation and diversity are often cast in oppositional terms. The present joint intervention explores the limits and possibilities of what we call inclusive nation', i.e. a nation which embraces rather than expunging diversity. To reflect on this idea, the Loughborough University Nationalism Network (LUNN) organized a symposium, bringing together both academics and relevant stakeholders, to explore both theoretically and practically the feasibility of the inclusive nation. For reason of space, here we present only the theoretical views of academics. While Billig and Yuval-Davis highlight the inherent exclusive thrust of nationalism, Kaufmann and Hearn suggest two distinct ways to move away the traditional understanding of nationalism as a site of singularity, oppression and exclusion. A final rejoinder by Nyhagen pushes the debate further interrogating the boundaries of national belonging.
A Policy-Relevant Instrumental Case Study of an Inclusive STEM-Focused High School: Manor New Tech High^JAN 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATION IN MATHEMATICS SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^This instrumental case study of Manor New Tech High (MNTH) provides insight and understanding of a trend in U.S. education to create new STEM schools and increase the achievement of students underrepresented in STEM. MNTH was an inclusive, STEM-focused high school, in Manor, Texas. The creation of the school was stimulated by a statewide Texas STEM education policy initiative, seed money from private foundations, and local community support. MNTH was chosen for this study because of its diverse student population and reputation as a successful, innovative STEM school. The case provides an in-depth look at the school's design, implementation, and outcome dimensions, in context. Ten candidate critical components framed the study and illuminate opportunity structures for MNTH students as they learned STEM and built social capital. MNTH implemented a project-based learning instructional environment, ubiquitous integration of technology, and a strong STEM curriculum. Teachers collaborated to create innovative curriculum and instruction, led by an energetic, well-connected principal. A robust network of student supports helped to ensure that students attained the skills and confidence in STEM and for college admission. The positive school culture promoted a sense of family, and the STEM focus enabled acquisition of 21st century skills.
Belonging to higher education: inclusive education for students with intellectual disabilities^2017^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF SPECIAL NEEDS EDUCATION^The college experience in Iceland has traditionally been reserved for those who have passed the matriculation examination and meet the admission requirements of higher educational institutions. Since 2007, the University of Iceland has offered a Vocational Diploma Programme for people with intellectual disabilities in inclusive settings. The purpose of this article is to describe the diploma programme as well as exploring students' sense of belonging to the college community. The diploma programme is located at the School of Education and students trained to work at pre-primary schools, after school clubs and within the field of disability such as self-advocacy. Inclusion has been achievable by adapting the general curriculum and learning outcomes to individual needs, flexible teaching methods and the cooperation between academic faculty members, programme coordinators, student mentors and the diploma students themselves. The diploma students receive academic and social support from student mentors who are other undergraduate students at the School of Education. The collaboration with student mentors has proven to be valuable, expanded diploma students' social networks and contributed to a sense of belonging. Regardless of various attitudinal and structural hindrances, there is much evidence that the diploma students are not only tolerated but welcomed at the School of Education and belong to the college community.
The Interaction of Participants of Inclusive Corporate Ecosystems^2017^III INTERNATIONAL SCIENTIFIC SYMPOSIUM ON LIFELONG WELLBEING IN THE WORLD (WELLSO 2016)^It is proved that deep shifts in inter-organizational and interpersonal interactions in the sphere of appearance of co-opetition, which is a symbiosis of competition and cooperation, influenced by the dramatic aggravation of the entire spectrum of social problems, occur. It is indicated that it is impossible to achieve overall economic and social well-being without solving these problems. It is proved that the convergence of competition and cooperation rests on a fundamental basis, due to the synergistic nature of these universal social and economic organizations of human lives. It is shown that desire of subjects to take an active part in solving social problems serves as an important impetus to the formation of co-opetitive networks of cooperation, business in particular. These include corporate ecosystems and inclusive business models. It is shown that the latter specifically involve different social groups in the implementation of socially-oriented programs. This paper considers three structures, where the realization of inclusive business processes like individual effort, the alliance and the multilateral platforms may occur. It is noted that in conditions of limited resources, social partnership is more preferable, especially in the form of meaningful alliance of business and non-profit organizations. It is emphasized that the model of a multilateral platform for scaling social projects can be used. As part of the practical implementation, the author's project of the social network, consolidating the efforts of the business, non-profit organizations and individuals to help those in need of the treatment of various diseases, is presented. (C) 2017 Published by Future Academy www.FutureAcademy.org.uk
SICS: A Social Network based Information System for the Inclusive Community^2017^PROCEEDINGS 2017 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTATIONAL SCIENCE AND COMPUTATIONAL INTELLIGENCE (CSCI)^In this paper, we present an information system based on a social network architecture for the Inclusive Community, called SICS. The scope of proposing such a system is to promote social and health care integration, strengthen territorial networks, and facilitate communication among social workers, fragile people and resources (i.e., volunteers, etc.). The paper outlines the methodological considerations with regard to information management, modelling and design of data related to the SICS, and describes the related underlying data model. The implemented system is composed of a web based back-end and three Apps for, respectively, the assisted person, community social workers and volunteers, and messaging. SICS is designed and developed within the INSPIRE project and is used to achieve its required goals.
Free Talk Zone: Inclusive Pedagogy to Encourage Women in Computer Science^2017^PROCEEDINGS 2017 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTATIONAL SCIENCE AND COMPUTATIONAL INTELLIGENCE (CSCI)^This study, strives to understand the low retention and facilitate mechanisms to encourage the retention of women in the department of computer science at the University of Minnesota, Duluth. Two interventions attempt to address the concern for the reason why women quit CS field-one, women are more inclined to solve real world problems either in the scientific or social field that can benefit humanity; and two, women are dependent on social networking and more inclined to share their feelings with others when compared to men. We verified both hypotheses by creating a Facebook discussion group among consented students in the introductory courses and replacing the traditional assignments with the ones that are designed closer to real-life problem in Fall 2015. By the end of the semester, we surveyed our participants to examine the effect of the two interventions. According to the results we got from our research, we can conclude that both building the online discussion platform and using more practical examples will help increase women's interest in studying computer science. A feedback mechanism was developed to help us continue our research in the future following these interventions, and improve our approach by the implementing the feedback.
An Inclusive Comparison in LAN Environment between Conventional and Hybrid Methods for Spectral Amplitude Coding Optical CDMA Systems^DEC 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF ADVANCED COMPUTER SCIENCE AND APPLICATIONS^In this paper, performance analysis of conventional spectral amplitude coding (CSAC) with hybrid (HSAC) for OCDMA system is investigated in local area network (LAN) environment. The CSAC is built based on arithmetic sequence with simple algebraic ways. The HSAC technique is used in which spectral amplitude coding (SAC) combined with wavelength division multiplexing (WDM) to effectively reduce multiple access interference (MAI) and mitigate the influence of phase induced intensity noise (PIIN) arising in photodetecting process. The main idea is to construct the code sequences in SAC domain then repeat it diagonally in the wavelength domain as groups which maintains the same cardinality of a given code weight. Results show that HSAC outperforms CSAC when the number of active users is high due to its better correlation properties. It has been shown that the HSAC can suppress intensity noise effectively and improve the bandwidth utilization significantly up to 4.2 nm.
A systematic review on multi-device inclusive environments^NOV 2016^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN THE INFORMATION SOCIETY^The challenge of designing universal access to knowledge demands considerations on multi-device interaction. A systematic review of inclusive environments built from multiple devices was conducted based on studies published during the period of 2002-2013. The search strategy combined manual and automatic searches from which 8889 studies were identified; 34 studies were found proposing software tools for building multi-device inclusive environments (0.38 % of the original sample). Thus, this study analyzes the ways academic and industrial communities have developed tools for building inclusive environments. The main findings of this review are: (1) an urgent need for the recognition of accessibility as an important non-functional requirement; (2) a need for taking into account the social conditions of users, such as illiteracy and people living in underserved communities; and (3) the identification of new research questions in the context of multi-device inclusive environments.
Completing Our Streets: The Transition to Safe and Inclusive Transportation Networks^OCT 2016^JOURNAL OF URBAN TECHNOLOGY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.25  </td>  <td>3.681</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
The role of governance in mobile phones for inclusive human development in Sub-Saharan Africa^SEP-OCT 2016^TECHNOVATION^This study assesses the synergy effects of governance in mobile phone penetration for inclusive human development in Sub-Saharan Africa with data for the period 2000-2012. It employs a battery of interactive estimation techniques, namely: Fixed effects, Generalised Method of Moments and Tobit regressions. Concepts of political (voice and accountability and political stability/no violence), economic (government effectiveness and regulation quality) and institutional (corruption-control and rule of law) governance are employed. The following findings are established. The previously apparent positive correlation between mobile phones and inclusive development can be extended to a positive effect. Although political governance is overwhelmingly not significant across estimated models, the average effects from economic governance are higher relative to institutional governance. On the interactions between mobile phones and governance variables, while none are apparent in Fixed effects regressions, there are significant synergy effects in Generalised Method of Moments and Tobit estimations, notably, from: regulation quality in the former and political stability, voice and accountability and rule of law in the latter. There is consistent evidence of convergence in inclusive human development. Policy implications are discussed. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Innovation for inclusive development in Southeast Asia: the roles of regional coordination mechanisms^SEP 2016^PACIFIC REVIEW^In the past, studies on inclusive development involve mainly the perspective of equitable distribution of economic and societal outputs. This study, however, takes a different approach and analyses the potential roles of regional coordination mechanisms (RCMs), specifically universities and research council's networks within Southeast Asia, in disseminating the innovation-related activities for inclusive development or Innovation for Inclusive Development (IID). The literature on innovation intermediaries within the realm of innovation systems studies was used to establish the framework of the study. The findings indicate that RCMs have a huge potential role to play. However, due to a number of reasons, including lack of funding support, lack of attention and commitment to IID, weak engagement with industry and non-governmental organisations, the implementation of the IID activities was rather poor. As a whole, the study argues that current approaches are not well positioned and it is fragmented preventing the effective use of RCMs despite their potentials for IID efforts. The study attributes this to the systemic failures in the regional coordinating systems. In enhancing the role of RCMs in IID, this study recommends the promotion of IID platform, the leveraging of non-government organisations and industry as well as energising the Southeast Asia engagement in promoting IID.
The success of the Uttarakhand Cluster: a case study of organisational change towards disability inclusive development^AUG 2 2016^BMC HEALTH SERVICES RESEARCH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.932  </td>  <td>2.636</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Cocreation and Evaluation of Inclusive and Accessible Open Educational Resources: A Mapping Toward the IMS Caliper^AUG 2016^IEEE REVISTA IBEROAMERICANA DE TECNOLOGIAS DEL APRENDIZAJE-IEEE RITA^The aim of this paper is to introduce a model to cocreate and evaluate inclusive and accessible open educational resources (IA-OERs) toward the perspective of the IMS caliper analytics framework. The model was applied by 72 teachers of primary and secondary schools who cocreated and evaluated IA-OERs in the context of the validation phase of the inclusive learning project. The evaluation of the IA-OERs covered two aspects: Web accessibility and quality. Moreover, an accessibility dashboard was developed to display the graphics of the results obtained from the Web accessibility evaluation.
COMMUNITY PERSPECTIVE IN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION Development of collaborative-participative work dynamics in mutual support teams (mst)^JUN-NOV 2016^PRISMA SOCIAL^None
Modern Settlements in Special Needs Education: Segregated Versus Inclusive Education^JUN 2016^SCIENCE AS CULTURE^In the history of special needs education, the distinction between human nature and its social environment has been a controversial matter. The controversy regards whether special needs are primarily caused by the child's psycho-medical body or by cultural concepts of normality and deviance. Settlements of this controversy govern whether the pupil or the educational institution becomes the main point of intervention. In Denmark, the particularities of settlements can be identified by juxtaposing the introduction of intelligence testing in the 1930s with the contemporary policy agenda of inclusion. With intelligence testing, special needs education was to service children whose needs were seen as part of their human nature. Inclusion, in turn, assumes special needs to be stigmatizing cultural labels that need to be abandoned by changing school cultures. Drawing on actor-network theory we can approach such settlements as a product of a modern division between human nature and social environment. Although both these settlements depend on a distinction between human nature and social environment, this distinction generates practical tensions for each settlement.
Inclusive approaches to urban climate adaptation planning and implementation in the Global South^APR 2 2016^CLIMATE POLICY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.797  </td>  <td>4.073</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Sustainable development of Philippine coastal resources: Subsidiarity in ethnoecology through inclusive participatory education^APR 2016^INTERNATIONAL REVIEW OF EDUCATION^The Philippines is an archipelago of more than 7,100 islands, with a population of over 100 million people dependent upon marine resources which are characterised by a decline in both biodiversity and abundance. The resultant large sector of fisherfolk is generally impoverished with limited education, which makes coastal adult education and lifelong learning a national priority. This article considers the Filipino fisherfolk community as a culture to identify potential input strategies regarding education development for marine science concepts. In a study piloting cultural consensus theory applications with a well-established fisherfolk organisation, the authors focus on the lack of dialogue engaging Philippine fisherfolk with standards of international marine science, bioregional resource partitioning and reflexive in-country education development. Cross-cultural strategies considered in this paper include exploring paraprofessional approaches to adult education, accommodating several dialects/languages and drawing on international science concepts. While earlier adult education initiatives aimed at fisherfolk may have had limited success in part due to a lack of cultural context, this pilot study is innovative in that it applies an existing Filipino form of social artistry to fisherfolk identity, expression and communication. Siningbayan [Sining = art, bayan = nation or town], or art whose canvas is society evolved through the Philippine history of organic networking and participation. Results confirm that a structured ethnoecological research design combined with Siningbayan appear effective for identifying education and curriculum specifics both for the fisherfolk sector of Filipino society and for professional marine science; their common goal being improved resource management. The authors place particular emphasis on subsidiarity, considering how best to transfer information to individual fisherfolk and their communities, as well as exploring their scaled-up role in leadership, organisational and professional development.
Has the Internet Fostered Inclusive Innovation in the Developing World?^FEB 2016^WORLD DEVELOPMENT^The adoption of the Internet has been widespread across countries, making much more information available and thus facilitating knowledge diffusion among businesses to boost their innovation performance. However, differences in firms' capabilities to use this newly available knowledge could create a new "digital divide" instead. Using 50,013 firm observations covering 117 developing and emerging countries over the 2006-11 period, this paper tests for knowledge spillover effects from industries' adoption of the Internet on firms' productivity and innovation performance. We test for heterogeneous spillover impacts on groups of firms that are commonly less engaged in innovation and on films with different productivity levels. Our specification regresses firm productivity and innovation performance - i.e., their investment in equipment and ownership of quality certificates and patents on industries' use of the Internet. Spillover effects are identified by controlling for firms' own investment in Internet technology, industry and country-year fixed effects as well as extensive firm-level controls. Our results show that industries' use of the Internet positively affects the average firm's productivity and its investment in equipment. We also identify modest impacts of industries' use of the Internet on the likelihood that firms obtain quality certificates and patents. On average, we find that the returns to productivity are larger for firms that commonly engage less in innovation, including single-plant establishments, non-exporters, and firms located in small agglomerations. However, results from quantile regressions show that only the most productive firms reap productivity gains from Internet-enabled knowledge access. Firms with productivity levels below the 50th percentile do not benefit much. The spillover effects from industries' adoption of the Internet identified in our work justify public policies aimed at fostering industries' use of the Internet. However, since we show that only firms with adequate absorptive capabilities benefit from the widespread Internet adoption, policy support should also focus on facilitating firms' access to networks and strengthening their capacities to use them. (C) 2015 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
EVALUATION INFORMATION ON INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^2016^REVISTA IBERO-AMERICANA DE ESTUDOS EM EDUCACAO^This work seeks to understand how has been articulated the proposal of inclusive education and evaluation within the school, but precisely with the instrument portfolio termed as instrument of formative assessment with students with intellectual disabilities of elementary school I in a public school from Sao Paulo state. The research of which originates from the present study is in progress. The proposed work consisted in carrying out a qualitative study of empirical nature, in line with the interpretative critical hermeneutics. In this approach the research involved two analysis procedures: document analysis and critical interpretative analysis of the productions of the students with intellectual disabilities in formative assessment through portfolios in the everyday life of the school. Among the material already studied about the assessment can verify that is relevant for the opportunity to discuss various aspects and ways of formative assessment as a tool that can facilitate and enrich the action of inclusive schools proposal of Municipal Public Network in the form of collaborative partnership, which can encourage the improvement of the teaching practice with action-reflection-action.
CREATING INCLUSIVE EDUCATIONAL ENVIRONMENT IN MODERN EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTIONS^2016^SCIENCE AND EDUCATION^It is emphasized in the paper that the idea of inclusive education reflects one of the major democratic ideas - all the children are important and active members of the society. Inclusive education involves creating educational environment which corresponds to the requirements and capabilities of every child regardless of his/her special needs. In this context, contemporary interpretation of the concept of inclusive educational environment is represented in the paper; its structural components are characterized: space and subject, content and methodical, communicative and organizational. The attention is paid to the necessity for using environmental approach to teaching children with special needs as well as to a number of requirements facilitating specific organization and implementation of this process. Specific environmental resources providing availability and optimization of different types of child activity are specified. In the process of creating inclusive educational environment, some restrictions are possible to arise (regulatory, financial and economic, organization and methodical, sociocultural). In that context, the criteria of analyzing inclusive educational environment are offered: the level of architectural access; the state of special facilities necessary for obtaining education by children with special needs; personnel required for implementing the general education programmes; experience in network cooperation of organizations performing educational activity for organizing inclusive practice. The author has noticed the lack of special skilled workforce for implementing the conception of inclusive education at educational institutions. It has been concluded that inclusive educational environment as a kind of educational environment which provides all the participants of educational process with opportunities for effective self-development. Implementation of the environmental approach in inclusive education will make it possible to highlight some new keypoints on the issues of teaching and educating children with special educational needs, to provide further creative development.
Inclusive cities for intercultural communities. European experiences^2016^2ND INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM NEW METROPOLITAN PERSPECTIVES - STRATEGIC PLANNING, SPATIAL PLANNING, ECONOMIC PROGRAMS AND DECISION SUPPORT TOOLS, THROUGH THE IMPLEMENTATION OF HORIZON/EUROPE2020, (ISTH2020)^None
Cloud Computing in European Schools - The Impact on Inclusive Education^2016^COMPUTERS HELPING PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, ICCHP 2016, PT I^Cloud Computing can be a key driver for innovation and transformation in learning and teaching. The School on the Cloud network, consisting of 57 partners from multiple disciplines in 18 European countries, aims to explore this technology to find new dynamic ways of delivering education. One key result published thus far analyses 59 existing good-practice case studies exploring the impact of the Cloud on personalized learning for pupils with special needs. It also discusses how teachers can use new technologies as a value added component in inclusive education.
Sustainable Urban Regeneration Policy Making: Inclusive Participation Practice^2016^COMPUTATIONAL SCIENCE AND ITS APPLICATIONS - ICCSA 2016, PT III^In physical and economic planning at both urban and regional scale, the role of participation is a key element of the planning process. Participation is often linked to organization forms (we call it "structures of participation") that find a heterogeneous applications in the Urban Center model. This work analyses the first results of Project CAST (Active Citizenship for Sustainable Development of Territory), especially those related to the neighbourhood of Poggio Tre Galli in Potenza (Italy), where the test of a traditional/technological participatory approach has allowed the development of urban regeneration scenarios characterized by an inclusive approach "Citizens centred". This is an operative contribution in terms of Inclusive Smart Planning, and so of evolutionary 2.0 approaches oriented to an inclusive and participative urban management through ICT tools. A singular feature of the ICT platform developed during the project CAST is the integration of management tools and streaming analysis of the main social networks with a SDI. The experience, described both in quantitative terms and as a strategic design of urban regeneration at neighbourhood scale, shows from one hand the request of bottom-up contributions, especially from institutions (i.e. Municipality), on the other hand, the need to test effective solutions to balance the commitment to manage and configure complex information systems according to quality results. Research perspectives look at the definition of web-assisted procedures for the participation in urban and territorial government choices that can reinforce bottom-up practices such as DSS, starting from ICT tools tested during the project CAST.
A GOOD EXAMPLE OF PARENT ADVOCACY FOR RIGHTS IN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION IN CHINA^2016^FRONTIERS OF LAW IN CHINA^While children with disabilities experience exclusion and segregation in education, parents' involvement has been very limited due to the lack of parent support in China. Negative attitudes toward disability in an environment deeply influenced by the individual model of disability thinking makes it crucial for parents to advocate for their children's rights in inclusive education through collaborative and organized efforts. This article examines barriers obstructing disabled children's rights in pursuing inclusive education, barriers parents face to advocate for their children, and the development of parent support. The author argues that equal and inclusive education for all has a broader social impact beyond disability rights to eliminate barriers and pursue dignity for all. In doing so, the author reveals existing structural inequalities facing inclusive education, encourages the momentum for future changes, and utilizes a good example of parent advocacy for a deeper and meaningful policy advancement to overcome discrimination on the basis of disability that causes segregation and exclusion in education. Recommendations include strategies for the construction of a support network for parents to play their important roles in advancing the rights of their disabled children in inclusive education.
THE BUILDING OF AN INCLUSIVE CULTURE IN REGULAR SCHOOL: AN ACTION DEVELOPED BY THE MANAGEMENT TEAM^JAN-APR 2016^ECCOS-REVISTA CIENTIFICA^The educational inclusion of people with special educational needs has been a challenge for Brazilian schools. In general, teachers have been challenged to review their practices without having the other school actors feeling themselves committed to the process of inclusion. This article is the result of a collaborative research involving teachers and students of the Universidade Federal do Reconcavo da Bahia and the management team of an elementary school in Amargosa city, Bahia. This research was supported by the FAPESB, and it sought to contribute to building an inclusive culture that favored the inclusion of disabled people in the partner school. The results point to the management team as an articulator in the construction of inclusive culture in schools through the development of actions to support inclusive teaching practices, establishment of networks to support inclusion and development of educational activities involving the school community.
Beamforming for Millimeter Wave Communications: An Inclusive Survey^2016^IEEE COMMUNICATIONS SURVEYS AND TUTORIALS^The remarkable growth of wireless data traffic in recent times has driven the need to explore suitable regions in the radio spectrum to meet the projected requirements. In pursuance of this, millimeter wave communications have received considerable attention in the research fraternity. Due to the high path and penetration losses at millimeter wavelengths, antenna beamforming assumes a pivotal role in establishing and maintaining a robust communication link. Beamforming for millimeter wave communications poses a multitude of diverse challenges due to the large channel bandwidth, unique channel characteristics, and hardware constraints. In this paper, we track the evolution and advancements in antenna beamforming for millimeter wave communications in the context of the distinct requirements for indoor and outdoor communication scenarios. We expand the scope of discussion by including the developments in radio frequency system design and implementation for millimeter wave beamforming. We explore the suitability of millimeter wave beamforming methods, both, existing and proposed till midyear 2015, and identify the exciting new prospects unfolding in this domain.
Inclusive perspectives or in-depth learning? A longitudinal case study of past debates and future directions in knowledge management for development^2016^JOURNAL OF KNOWLEDGE MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  4.604  </td>  <td>4.488</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
MODERN CHALLENGES OF THE RUSSIAN HIGHER SCHOOL AND INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^2016^ICERI2016: 9TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^The paper is devoted to the implementation of inclusive education in the Russian higher school. It is presented that reforming of Russian education is readily bound to introduce and realize educational programs for an inclusive form, however is problematic. The reasons of development of an inclusive form of education in Russia are analyzed. The first reason consists in social policy of the state in education of disabled people is focused on ideas of the world community and the national doctrine of formation of the Russian Federation which proclaim the principle of equal opportunities of education for all. The second reason is in the number of the people having restrictions of physical health on the reasons of deterioration in the financial position, ecology, wars and the conflicts, significantly does not change that demands padding initiatives for creation of conditions of their education. The third reason consists in poor development of a state policy in the field of regulation of professional education of the physically disabled person. It is shown that inclusive education develops in connection with various options of professional self-determination which relies on development of idea of equal opportunities of the person in the course of professional realization. In this paper special attention to a new course of policy in the field of inclusive education in the Russian Federation is paid. During the Soviet and Post-Soviet periods higher education for people with disabilities and physically disabled people had no extensive network. At the beginning of the 90th of the XX century social and economic transformation of society resulted in need of reforming of higher education of disabled people as Basic Element of social security of this group of persons by increase of their competitiveness in labor market. The modern federal laws in which uniform approach to social and educational policy - recognition and exercise of the right for education, work, social protection and rehabilitation is realized are analyzed. According to federal laws the system of Russian education has to function not only as educational, but also as social and rehabilitation institute that is problematic for exercise in practice. One of tasks of the higher school is creation and development of sociocultural infrastructure in educational institution in interrelation with institutes of employment, health care, culture and rest. In the submitted paper it is shown that the Russian policy passed a way from segregation to expansion of access to education, widening participation, integration, a mainstreaming, inclusion in the field of education of physically disabled people owing to what first of all the organizational design of the social sphere changed. Example of it are the educational and research and methodical centers of professional rehabilitation of persons with disability, for example, in Bauman Moscow State Technical University. The purpose of establishing these centers is to provide opportunities for higher education in a wide range of areas and specialisations of University studies in accordance with individual rehabilitation program. In this paper becomes conclusions that there is a deinstitutionalization of the closed establishments, development of the integrated education is bound to coeducation of people with routine process and people with special needs, and also with increase in access for physically disabled people to the sphere of employment.
'Charlie Is So Cool Like': Authenticity, Popularity and Inclusive Masculinity on YouTube^DEC 2015^SOCIOLOGY-THE JOURNAL OF THE BRITISH SOCIOLOGICAL ASSOCIATION^On the world's most utilised video-sharing social networking site, YouTube, Charlie McDonnell (Charlieissocoollike), Dan Howell (Danisnotonfire) and Jack and Finn Harries (JacksGap) are Britain's most popular video-bloggers (vloggers). With more than two million regular subscribers to each of their channels, along with millions of casual viewers, they represent a new form of authentic online celebrity. These young men, whose YouTube careers began as teenagers, do not espouse a traditional form of masculinity; they are not sporty, macho or even expressly concerned with being perceived as heterosexual. Instead, they present a softer masculinity, eschewing the homophobia, misogyny and aggression attributed to boys of previous generations. These behaviours are theorised using Anderson's Inclusive Masculinity Theory. Drawing on analysis of 115 video-blogs (vlogs), along with an in-depth interview with Charlie McDonnell, this article examines how these young men developed and exhibit their inclusive masculinities and attitudes, which we postulate are a reflection of dominant youth culture.
Creating conversations: an inclusive approach to the international networking of knowledge about education^OCT 2015^JOURNAL OF RESEARCH IN SPECIAL EDUCATIONAL NEEDS^Networking has been central to human communication and social engagement for centuries, but has changed dramatically with the advent of new technology. However, the practice of networking has received little academic attention and tends to be undertheorised. This paper considers the impact of the global digital and communication divide, and the contested nature of inclusive education, on the task of promoting information sharing internationally. A summative case study is presented of a network, established to support the documentation of promising practice on inclusive education in countries with limited access to information and material resources. The case study uses autoethnographic methods to identify key principles for the development of an inclusive network. The significance of this paper is in its proposition of a working model of inclusive networking, which has potential to be developed into a theory.
A Never Ending Journey: Inclusive Education Is a Principle of Practice, Not an End Game^SEP 2015^RESEARCH AND PRACTICE FOR PERSONS WITH SEVERE DISABILITIES^A team from Schoolwide Integrated Framework for Transformation (SWIFT), a federally funded technical assistance project focused on creating cascading, aligned systems for inclusive education, conducted a series of focus groups and interviews with school administrators, general and special educators, and related service providers in six schools across the United States. Six themes merged from the study that highlighted the importance of defining inclusive education as well as building the capacity of people to understand and implement the components of a system of inclusive education. These themes suggest that leadership for inclusive education requires attention to the structures and processes used to signal that inclusive education is an undergirding principle of practice. Equally important is the development of relationships among students, teachers, and families that cement the structures. Networking, planning and organizing, using time and space strategically, and connecting schools with their communities were all aspects of capacity building. In addition, data revealed the importance of paying attention to the context of inclusive education within schools and in their surrounding communities. Further, enthusiastic support from and communication with families emerged as an important theme.
"I Think I'm Reaching My Potential": Students' Self-Determination Experiences in an Inclusive High School^AUG 2015^CAREER DEVELOPMENT AND TRANSITION FOR EXCEPTIONAL INDIVIDUALS^Through a 5-year qualitative case study of an inclusive high school, we examined students' experiences of self-determination. We conducted analyses of multiple interviews with students, parents, teachers, guidance staff, and administrators using grounded theory methods and guided by self-determination conceptual frameworks. Explicit expectations for student agency, a network of caring autonomy-supportive adults, and integrated academic supports emerged as primary features of the students' school experiences. We describe the participants' perspectives about the school structures that supported those experiences and highlight three students who represented a range of responses to the school's model of inclusive learning supports. Implications for fostering self-determination of adolescents with disabilities within general education school settings are considered.
Social media and senior citizen advocacy: an inclusive tool to resist ageism?^JUL 3 2015^POLITICS GROUPS AND IDENTITIES^With population aging, interest groups demand that governments act to prevent a perceived financial crisis. Senior citizens remain frustrated in their efforts to influence the response of policy-makers. In an effort to strengthen their voice, one group of senior citizens, engaged in a participatory action research project, questioned how online social media could be used in their advocacy efforts. This query led to an examination of the literature with the primary objective of determining what is known about the use of social media by senior citizens for the purposes of social advocacy. The outcomes of the review revealed that very few studies specifically examined this question. Senior citizen online roles were depicted as consumers of health information or socializers with family and friends. Ageist assumptions informed the design of computer hardware, online formats and norms for social engagement. Senior citizens have concerns about the trustworthiness of social networking sites and while social media can exclude senior citizens from public debate, the authors conclude that the pressing issue is to focus on age-friendly design and supports. With these in place, social media can provide a venue for senior citizens to challenge ageism and influence public policy discourses.
Being researchers for the first time: reflections on the development of an inclusive research group^JUN 2015^BRITISH JOURNAL OF LEARNING DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.5  </td>  <td>0.985</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
TOGETHER WE LEARN BETTER: ENABLING INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^MAY 2015^MIER-JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL STUDIES TRENDS AND PRACTICES^The inclusive classrooms create students who are comfortable with differences, skilled at confronting challenging issues, and aware of their interconnectedness. Schools are increasingly acknowledging the heterogeneity of their student populations and the need to respond thoughtfully and responsibly to differences in the classroom. It's understandable that educators often feel overwhelmed by growing demands for inclusion, multi cultural education, multiple intelligence, and differentiated instruction to deal with the growing diversity. School communities must be inclusive of all children, and openly recognize the unique contributions that children who have a disability make to community life. It is essential that inclusive education be supported to maintain and strengthen the personal relationships and social networks of children who have a disability. Each child's support must be individualized and flexible, while remaining relevant to its particular needs at the time. This paper appears to directly contradict the understanding of inclusive education as a concept, which is all about embracing diversity in the classroom.
Co-producing inclusive city-wide sanitation strategies: lessons from Chinhoyi, Zimbabwe^APR 2015^ENVIRONMENT AND URBANIZATION^This paper explores how communities in Chinhoyi, Zimbabwe have used community-led mapping and enumerations((1)) to build partnerships with local government to support the development and co-production of innovative pro-poor city-wide sanitation strategies as part of the SHARE City-Wide Sanitation Project. This action research project is being conducted in four cities across sub-Saharan Africa: Chinhoyi (Zimbabwe), Kitwe (Zambia), Blantyre (Malawi) and Dar es Salaam (Tanzania). This programme of work responds to the failure of conventional approaches to urban sanitation to meet the needs of low-income urban communities in sub-Saharan Africa. Over three years it has supported Shack/Slum Dwellers International affiliates to develop and test pro-poor sanitation strategies that can be adopted and driven by networks of community organizations and residents' associations, and supported by public authorities and private providers.
Designing culturally inclusive affordance networks into the curriculum^FEB 17 2015^TEACHING IN HIGHER EDUCATION^This study addresses the challenges concerning the internationalisation of higher education, with a particular focus on designing new international programmes. It presents a case study of a novel international study programme: the MA in Media Education at the Faculty of Education at the University of Lapland, Finland. The study looks into its curriculum as an affordance network and asks: How do the planned and experienced curricula respond to and support cultural inclusion? The results shed light on the risks of transforming existing domestic degree programmes into 'international' programmes. The core curriculum design challenges found in this study stem from the fact that the meaning of internationalisation has been defined 'from within'; from the existing structures and expectations of the programme and from the host institution. We suggest that more attention should be paid to students' life-worlds and the entire multicultural ecosystem that builds on the affordances inscribed in the curriculum.
Civic Engagement in Britain: The Role of Religion and Inclusive Values^FEB 2015^EUROPEAN SOCIOLOGICAL REVIEW^The relationship between religion and volunteering is well documented (Putnam and Campbell, 2010; Ruiter and De Graaf, 2006), and a prevalent hypothesis for the association is that the effect of religion is mediated through religious social networks. However, research on this relationship has largely been conducted on majority Christian populations in the United States and Europe. In this study, we use two data sets, the European Values Study (1999-2008) and the Ethnic Minority British Election Survey (2010) to examine this relationship in Britain on the general population and ethnic minority population, respectively. The results suggest that religion increases volunteering primarily through bonding rather than bridging social networks. We also find that in non-Christian religions, solitary and collective religious rituals may both have an effect on civic participation, but whereas the effect of service attendance is mediated through bonding social networks, the effect of prayer is mediated more through bridging networks. Finally, values of individual autonomy and generalized trust are associated with non-religious, but not religious, participation, suggesting an alternative secular ethos of civic engagement.
Becoming an inclusive teacher at the interface of school and teacher education^2015^5th ICEEPSY International Conference on Education &amp; Educational Psychology^The aim of this study is to assess how the pedagogical solutions of the inclusive teaching practice in class teachers' adult education programme support the development to become an inclusive teacher. What kind of interpretations do the students make of inclusion and inclusive school? How does the participation in school community with reflective support by teacher education community enhance inclusive professional orientation? The research material consists of qualitative network material written by 22 adult students: teaching practice plans, reflective practice stories and teaching practice feedback. The analytical approach was thematic text analysis. Inclusion was interpreted as pupils' right to study with their peers but also as a professional challenge or ideal. The social exclusion was elicited only in a few stories. The meta-consciousness of developing an inclusive school was sparse. The experiences gained from the school's communities of practice combined with the theoretical and reflective tools offered by teacher education community formed meaningful learning. (C) 2015 The Authors. Published by Elsevier Ltd.
Towards an approach for an accessible and inclusive Virtual Education using ESVI-AL project results^2015^INTERACTIVE TECHNOLOGY AND SMART EDUCATION^None
Model Inclusive Learning for Shape from Shading with Simultaneously Estimating Illumination Directions^2015^NEURAL INFORMATION PROCESSING, PT I^The problem of recovering shape from shading is important in computer vision and robotics and several studies have been done. We already proposed a versatile method of solving the problem by model inclusive learning of neural networks. The method is versatile in the sense that it can solve the problem in various circumstances. Almost all of the methods of recovering shape from shading proposed so far assume that illumination conditions are known a priori. It is, however, very difficult to identify them exactly. This paper discusses a method to solve the problem. We propose a model inclusive learning of neural networks which makes it possible to recover shape with simultaneously estimating illumination directions. The performance of the proposed method is demonstrated through some experiments.
Inclusive Education and Teacher Training in a Municipal Public Network^2015^COMUNICACOES^This study presents a survey in the municipal public school system, in a district of the metropolitan area of Porto Alegre. The aim was to understand the reconfiguration process of propositions linking special education and regular education of students with disabilities, considering aspects of teacher training. Under the view of those involved in the process, the research reports this transition moment with regard to aspects of teacher training. Therefore, a qualitative study was made based on data collected through semi-structured interviews and desk research. Both strategies helped to reflect on the public policies for special education, both nationally and locally. Ball's (2009) policy cycle approach made it possible to understand the nuances and nets established in the interpretive redefinition of national texts and the production of local policies with regard to teacher training. In this respect, the study showed that there was an axis change in the management of this process, in the training audience, and also the thematic approaches proposed, considering the needs imposed by the inclusion of students with disabilities in mainstream classes of regular schools.
E-Inclusive Society in Malaysia: Ameliorating the e-Disadvantage Communities^2015^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 15TH EUROPEAN CONFERENCE ON EGOVERNMENT^The government's agenda towards an e-inclusive society in Malaysia are not without challenges; one of which is the digital divide. The empirical evidence from a cross-sectional investigation showed that 52.2% of the sample population are without internet access. Consequently, the impact and effect of non-internet access will be a paradox in attaining e-society. By understanding the impacts of the e-disadvantagedamong rural communities and the poor, policymakers can develop a strategy for an inclusive society that leverages technology to support access for socio-economic assistance at the federal, state, and local levels. This can further democratize the government-to-citizen relationship and accountability for the government's Economic Transformation Program (ETP). Lastly, suggestions for policymakers as well as for future research to deeply understand this research gap on democratizing e-government system and information access will be described.
A Web-Based Knowledge Hub for Special and Inclusive Education^2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EMERGING TECHNOLOGIES IN LEARNING^The need of a common environment where to share information and knowledge is of particular interest in the field of special education not only to support the access to a large amount of available information (along with the ability to derive value from this information) but also to foster synergistic actions involving different special education operators. In this paper we present the results of a research aimed at defining a Web-based environment for special education providing, to operators of the field, personalized information and digital assets covering both their expressed and latent information needs. Offered personalization features are based on the definition and the implementation of a hybrid recommender system based on a mix of cognitive and collaborative approaches, the first based on the similarities among digital objects, the latter leveraging on similarities among user profiles. By combining these two approaches the system is able to provide meaningful but not obvious recommendations with a fair level of serendipity. The encouraging results of an experimentation with real users are also reported.
Social Exclusion in Inclusive Classrooms:A Question of Viewpoint?^2015^PSYCHOLOGIE IN ERZIEHUNG UND UNTERRICHT^The present study compares different measures of social inclusion of children with special educational needs (SEN). We review common measures for social inclusion and hypothesize that the type of measure of social inclusion has a significant impact on the relationship between SEN and social inclusion. Further, we assume that more diverse classrooms are related to higher social acceptance. We elicited social networks of 439 primary school children in integrative classrooms with structured interviews. Results showed that differences in social inclusion between children with low, moderate and high SEN and students without SEN depended on the type of measure. We conclude that the measurement of social inclusion should capture a holistic view of a child's social relationships. In addition, contextual conditions of the classroom should be considered such that the focus of the evaluation is not whether a child fits into a classroom, but whether the classroom is accommodating the child.
THE ROLE OF UNIVERSITIES IN THE PURSUIT OF LOCAL COMMUNITY EMPOWERMENT, SUSTAINABLE, SMART AND INCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT IN RESILIENT COMMUNITIES - A COMPARISON ANALYSIS OF POST-CONFLICT CROATIA AND KOSOVO^2015^ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT: 9TH INTERNATIONAL SCIENTIFIC CONFERENCE^None
Students' Perspectives on LGBTQ-Inclusive Curriculum^2015^EQUITY &amp; EXCELLENCE IN EDUCATION^Implementing curriculum that is inclusive of lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, and questioning (LGBTQ) people has the potential to create an equitable learning environment. In order to learn more about students' experiences of LGBTQ-inclusive curriculum, 26 high school students with diverse racial/ethnic, sexual, and gender identities were recruited from the Gay Straight Alliance (GSA) Network in California. Students participated in focus groups conducted by telephone by GSA staff, sharing their experiences of LGBTQ-inclusive curriculum in school. Qualitative coding methods, including grounded theory, were used to identify themes and interpret students' responses. Data revealed that LGBTQ-inclusive curriculum was most often taught in social sciences and humanities courses as stand-alone lessons. LGBTQ-inclusive curriculum rarely met standards of social justice education, though opportunities for critical conversations about systemic oppression regularly emerged. For instance, teachers often failed to intervene in LGBTQ bullying and missed teachable moments conducive to inclusive curriculum. Some students learned positive LGBTQ lessons and highlighted the ways such curriculum reflected their identities and created a supportive school climate. Implications for equitable education are discussed.
methodological and organizational strategies for improving school inclusive^JAN-JUN 2015^ETIC NET-REVISTA CIENTIFICA ELECTRONICA DE EDUCACION Y COMUNICACION EN LA SOCIEDAD DEL CONOCIMIENTO^The boom that the term inclusion is getting today is changing the philosophy of work in schools. However, teachers now need to adapt to changes that occur to meet the needs associated with this model of education, and training relevant thereof, both initial and ongoing. They also discussed elements that favor this type of school, divided into the methodological level, cooperative learning and project work, and organizational learning community, interactive groups and networks of schools. In addition, a review of research is done about the introduction of these elements in the inclusive school.
Toward an inclusive understanding of technology intelligence: a literature review^2015^FORESIGHT^None
A HOLISTIC, INCLUSIVE LEARNING INTERVENTION FOR PREVENTING EARLY SCHOOL LEAVING AND FOSTERING FAMILY, SCHOOL AND COMMUNITY INVOLVEMENT^2015^INTED2015: 9TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^This paper presents the LINC intervention that aims at addressing Early School Leaving (ESL) before the ESL warning signs are already visible calling for mitigation measures. LINC suggests responses that can be better described as preventive. The focus is on early and continuous intervention for fighting ESL starting early on, in primary education, and continuing throughout lower secondary school. LINC intervention focuses on building a supportive school community environment for learners with the participation of teachers, parents, and families that enhances school community bonds, fosters engagement of all players, and links education to real-life. A set of ten learning activities that draw upon principles of inclusive learning and community-building approaches are also used to enhance the home-school partnership. Evaluation activities will take place in an on-going manner involving teachers, parents and students in several educational sites in Greece, France, Sweden and the Czech Republic.
Citizen Negotiation: Toward a More Inclusive Process^2015^INTERNATIONAL NEGOTIATION-A JOURNAL OF THEORY AND PRACTICE^Negotiation is becoming a more inclusive activity. More and different types of actors are taking part at national and international levels to resolve conflicts and seek agreement. At a national level, non-governmental organizations and individual citizens are partaking in mass demonstrations that often evolve into negotiation. At the international level, NGOs working through issue networks have been participating more and more in formal negotiations with state parties. By reviewing several cases at these different levels, this article identifies useful questions for future research focusing on the sources of legitimacy and power of these new actors and how they are changing the organization, structure, process and outcomes of negotiation.
Investigating the Application of the Motivation-Opportunity-Ability Model to Reveal Factors Which Facilitate or Inhibit Inclusive Engagement Within Local Community Festivals^OCT 2014^SCANDINAVIAN JOURNAL OF HOSPITALITY AND TOURISM^Currently there is limited understanding, agreement, and research within the phenomena of community engagement and participation in local community festivals and events. This article aims to contribute to this growing, but limited, debate by justifying the adaption and integration of the Motivation-Opportunity-Ability (MOA) model, and proposing a combination of primary data collection and analysis methods, to reveal and understand the factors that either inhibit or facilitate local community engagement in festivals and events. The rationale of this conceptual article is to determine how sustainability can be defined and achieved within local community festivals and events, by developing sustainable and inclusive community networks where the local population is actively engaged within the creation of events. The article begins by exploring the literature surrounding communities, community festivals and events, and community engagement. The article then moves on to discuss the MOA model and its adaption and application to event studies. It builds on concepts discussed by Jepson, Clarke, and Ragsdell [(2012, June 13-15). Investigating the use of the Motivation-Opportunity-Ability (MOA) Model to reveal the factors which facilitate or inhibit inclusive engagement within local community festivals. Global events congress: Conference proceedings, Stavanger, Norway] that support the creation of inclusive community festivals and events through inclusive participation within the planning and decision-making process. The article then moves on to explore the methodological concerns triggered by this model, such as the need to be adaptable and flexible across a multifaceted community event with regard to collecting primary data whilst maintaining integrity and validity during analysis. Finally, the article comments on the overall suitability of the MOA model to capture primary data and draw conclusions about best practice for community engagement in local festivals and events.
Making sense of inclusive education in the Pacific region: Networking as a way forward^AUG 2014^CHILDHOOD-A GLOBAL JOURNAL OF CHILD RESEARCH^This article is based on material collected in researching the viability of a regional network focused on the inclusion of children with disabilities in education in the Pacific region. It discusses the importance of balancing the international vision of a rights-based approach to education with indigenous inclusive values in the small and scattered Pacific island populations. A case study is analysed of the development of community-based inclusive education in Samoa by a national non-governmental organisation in collaboration with various government ministries, and finally, the potential of networking in generating new, contextually relevant knowledge about inclusive education is debated.
The sheltered workshop counselor: Inclusive Research Network in Finland^JUL 2014^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Home and independence: a study by the inclusive research network^JUL 2014^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Using video-recording for research training: the experience of the inclusive research network^JUL 2014^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Health rights pamphlets: critical literacy and inclusive citizenship, South Africa^JUN 2014^HEALTH PROMOTION INTERNATIONAL^The Ottawa Charter recognizes the importance of strengthening community action for health and developing personal skills. At the same time, a rights-based approach to health includes the right to information, participation and accountability. The Learning Network for Health and Human Rights is a research and learning collaboration between Civil Society Organisations (CSOs) and universities in the Western Cape, South Africa. For the purposes of this article, a CSO is understood to be any organization that is outside of the state and private market sector. As part of a wider programme of action research, the learning network developed six pamphlets aimed at enhancing individual and collective skills to support action related to the implementation of the right to health. The research reported here analyses how the pamphlets, coupled with directed training, strengthened skills, promoted critical literacy and supported inclusive citizenship. Eighteen semi-structured interviews and eight focus groups were conducted with 59 participants from eight CSOs, their members, beneficiaries and communities. The success of the pamphlets was found to be attributed to the role they played in a wider training programme, requested by the CSOs and developed jointly by CSOs and university-based researchers. Community action on the right to health is contingent on personal as well as collective skills development. Understanding of the right to health and skills for participation and accountability were extended in breadth and depth, which enabled inclusive citizenship.
Addressing universal access in social networks: an inclusive search mechanism^JUN 2014^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN THE INFORMATION SOCIETY^Social network services (SNSs) have brought new possibilities and challenges to the design of software environments that respect people's cultural differences. These systems may represent an opportunity for social and digital inclusion. However, search mechanisms in these systems impose serious barriers for people in the process of acquiring digital literacy. One of the barriers is the difficulty of using the adequate terms/keywords to perform content searches. This paper presents an approach to allow ordinary, non-technology proficient people to access the content of a network through the use of search parameters that make sense to them. The proposal is grounded on Semantic Web technologies (Web ontology) combined with Organizational Semiotics concepts and methods to identify the users' profile and language. A case study was conducted with the search mechanism integrated into a SNS, and a preliminary evaluation reveals the advantages and drawbacks of the approach.
Accessible Computing for Sustainable and Inclusive Development^2014^2014 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON COMPUTING FOR SUSTAINABLE GLOBAL DEVELOPMENT (INDIACOM)^Sustainability computing is crucial in the present day scenario for sustainable and inclusive development. Two significant areas of this field are 1311) and accessibility. In this paper, web accessibility is explored for CwSNs (Children with Special Needs) and with respect to technologies for students with mild learning disability. Web accessibility guidelines are presented. Three example accessible websites are compared with respect to their accessibility support. A couple of special education learning s/w tools Sebran and GCompris which are peculiar to CwSNs are compared too.
Supporting schools to create an inclusive environment for refugee students^2014^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^In a context of increasing numbers of refugees and asylum seekers globally, recognition of the importance of the school environment for promoting successful settlement outcomes and inclusion for refugee-background young people is growing. Yet schools may be poorly equipped to recognise and respond to the multiple challenges faced by children and young people who must learn a new language while grappling with unfamiliar educational and social systems. Refugee-background students often have minimal or significantly disrupted formal education prior to arrival in their new country. Young people, and sometimes their families, may lack literacy in first languages and many are coping with the impacts of trauma associated with forced displacement. Evidence for effective interventions in schools that promote an inclusive learning environment is scarce. This paper presents the results of an evaluation of the School Support Programme operating in schools in Victoria, Australia. The programme is provided to networks of schools in a region and facilitates partnerships between schools and agencies and provides a holistic model for a whole-school approach focused on the learning, social and emotional needs of refugee-background students. The evaluation concluded that the programme provides an appropriate and feasible model that supports the capacity of schools to provide an inclusive education for this group.
Present Status and Road Map to Achieve Inclusive and Holistic Care for Dementia in a Japanese Community: Analysis Using the Delphi Method^2014^DEMENTIA AND GERIATRIC COGNITIVE DISORDERS^Background/Aims: Dementia is a priority issue in the public health realm. However, few reports address problems of dementia in the real world or provide comprehensive road maps to solve these problems. Methods: Nine groups of questions covering 4 topics were discussed using the Delphi method, relating to (1) current achievements and challenges regarding inclusive and holistic care in the community, (2) patients who are at a high risk of being excluded from care, (3) suggestions for a road map for the establishment of better and more inclusive medical and social care, and (4) unmet needs of patients with dementia. Results: In total, 477 opinions were obtained. Family issues, psychological/behavioral symptoms, and complications secondary to physical disorders are main factors for being excluded from care. To create a road map for care we have to address the topics of reaffirming care principles, multi-disciplinary coalitions, and education for stakeholders. Conclusion: Further effective collaboration to promote dementia care is required. (C) 2014 S. Karger AG, Basel
"Planet School": Blended Learning for Inclusive Classrooms^2014^COMPUTERS HELPING PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, ICCHP 2014, PT II^"Planet School" is currently the most important blended learning platform in Germany. The multimedia content of the popular website is developed especially for teachers by the public service broadcasters WDR and SWR. However, as it stands today, "Planet School" is neither accessible by all students, nor does it meet the needs of the entire student population. This paper presents both the results of the evaluation of the learning platform in inclusive classrooms and first recommendations on how to offer variable content for students with special needs. The revised version of "Planet School" shall address different types of learners and offer accessible and usable materials, including movies, television broadcasts, interactive and multimedia content for students with very different prerequisites for learning. The paper has implications for application-oriented research in the field of e-inclusion and blended learning, for the development of multimedia content by broadcasters and others as well as for the use of multimedia in inclusive classrooms.
INTRODUCING THE INCLUSIVE LEARNING HANDBOOK: AN OER FOR TEACHERS AND POLICY MAKERS^2014^EDULEARN14: 6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^Approximately 15% of the world's population live with some form of disability. Facing a wide range of barriers, including access to information, education, healthcare and a lack of job opportunities, persons living with disabilities struggle every day to be integrated into society. In recent decades, the use of ICT for educational purposes has increased, and the spread of network technologies has caused e-learning practices to evolve significantly. Virtual Learning Environments (VLE), other technologies such as e-portfolio and mobile learning are all used extensively now as a means of 'delivering' parts of the curriculum and supporting student learning. E-learning has become an essential tool for the teaching of large numbers of diverse students. The authors of this paper are members of an EC-funded Leonardo Da Vinci project called "Inclusive Learning". They lead a work package whose main aim is to integrate Accessibility Guidelines developed by partners' previous projects and from other sources, in order to develop an on-line OER. These guidelines will help teachers adopt pedagogical methodologies that address learning needs of people with disabilities. The OER aims to help teachers provide as many learning options and accessible variations of the content they can to their students. By providing a range of teaching materials, for example, using video, audio, text, subtitles or sign language, more learners are encouraged and motivated to remain engaged with the learning process.
DO BYOD (BRING-YOUR-OWN-DEVICE) TECHNOLOGIES SUPPORT INCLUSIVE VIRTUAL CLASSROOMS?^2014^ICERI2014: 7TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION^School represents the natural place of growth not only for the amount of information that it is able to convey, but even also because this it is a social place environment in which students acquire rules, habits and self-confidence, and learn to manage conflicts and to cooperate. In this situation, Web 2.0 and the creation of a virtual classroom can ensure the right to education while fulfilling the need for continuity and normality, decreasing the risk of interference with individual development, isolation and social and cognitive implosion. An experimental triennial project named TRIS (Network Technologies and Socio-educational Inclusion) is underway within this framework, aimed at experimenting innovative technological and methodological solutions for the educational inclusion of homebound students. In this paper we explore how, on the basis of a model of inclusion crossing three dimensions (technological equipment, BYOD adoption and teaching approach), an inclusive educational process was promoted before the beginning of the experimentation.
BRIDGING THE LANGUAGE LEARNING GAP: DEVELOPING INCLUSIVE LEARNING ENVIRONMENTS WITH DIGITAL TECHNOLOGY^2014^INTED2014: 8TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^A booming economy marked the popular use of computing, mobile and networked technologies such as computers, smartphones, tablets and social media in the homes, educational institutions and workplaces of emerging cities in China. Undergraduate students studying in these Chinese cities are increasingly exposed to digital technologies like billboard advertisements, electronic toys, radio, television, smartphones, mobile TV, social media, online games and more. However, students from rural areas have limited access and exposure to digital technologies and often have limited proficiency in literacy skills, media literacy skills and social skills. In general, most students had little or no experience with digital technology in the process of learning a foreign language. In this case study, I investigated how technology (smartphones, video and laptops) is used as a tool to support the language learning process and help to create an inclusive learning environment for my undergraduate English for Specific Purposes curriculum. During a eight-week study period, students engagement in a variety of multimedia technology in the creation of oral and written output in English were recorded in the form of photographs and videos. Pre- and post-student surveys, scores in spoken and written English assessments and teacher observations were also used to capture the students' experiences in learning English. The use of technology in developing an inclusive language learning environment may be adapted for other similar settings.
Europeanization and the inclusive strategies of executive actors^DEC 1 2013^JOURNAL OF EUROPEAN PUBLIC POLICY^In Europeanized policy domains, executive actors are considered especially powerful because they are directly responsible for international negotiations. However, in order to avoid failing in the ratification process, they are also highly dependent on the support of domestic, non-state actors. We argue that in Europeanized decision-making processes, state actors are not passively lobbied, but actively seek collaboration with - and support from - domestic actors. We apply stochastic actor-based modelling for network dynamics to collaboration data on two successive bilateral agreements on the free movement of persons between Switzerland and the European Union (EU). Results confirm our hypotheses that state actors are not passively lobbied, but actively look for collaboration with other actors, and especially with potential veto players and euro-sceptical actors from both the conservative Right and the Left.
Conceptual shift of pipeline programs and inclusive programming: An in-depth look at diversity through the lens of academic excellence^SEP 8 2013^ABSTRACTS OF PAPERS OF THE AMERICAN CHEMICAL SOCIETY^None
Praxis and reflexivity for interprofessional education: towards an inclusive theoretical framework for learning^SEP 2013^JOURNAL OF INTERPROFESSIONAL CARE^While there is growing evidence of theoretical perspectives adopted in interprofessional education, learning theories tend to foreground the individual, focusing on psycho-social aspects of individual differences and professional identity to the detriment of considering social-structural factors at work in social practices. Conversely socially situated practice is criticised for being context-specific, making it difficult to draw generalisable conclusions for improving interprofessional education. This article builds on a theoretical framework derived from earlier research, drawing on the dynamics of Dewey's experiential learning theory and Archer's critical realist social theory, to make a case for a meta-theoretical framework enabling social-constructivist and situated learning theories to be interlinked and integrated through praxis and reflexivity. Our current analysis is grounded in an interprofessional curriculum initiative mediated by a virtual community peopled by health and social care users. Student perceptions, captured through quantitative and qualitative data, suggest three major disruptive themes, creating opportunities for congruence and disjuncture and generating a model of zones of interlinked praxis associated with professional differences and identity, pedagogic strategies and technology-mediated approaches. This model contributes to a framework for understanding the complexity of interprofessional learning and offers bridges between individual and structural factors for engaging with the enablements and constraints at work in communities of practice and networks for interprofessional education.
Mutual Liking, Enjoyment, and Shared Interactions in the Closest Relationships between Children with Developmental Disabilities and Peers in Inclusive School Settings^AUG 2013^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENTAL AND PHYSICAL DISABILITIES^Typically analysis of the characteristics of friendships is made on the basis of nomination of a friend or best friend, with the assumption that this nomination reflects actual friendship. While it is possible that this assumption may be valid in typically developing children, this may not be the case for relationships for students with developmental disabilities. The relationships of 16 students with developmental disabilities in grades 1 through 6 and their three closest peers were examined to determine if dyads engaged in behaviors associated with defining components of friendship (i.e. shared interaction, mutual enjoyment, mutual liking) from literature on typically developing children. Interviews were conducted with target students, as well as with their peers, parents and teachers. Interview data indicated that the majority of dyads engaged at least sometimes in behaviors related to each of the defining components of friendship and reported behaviors associated with these components were typically reported as mutual. Additionally, voluntary peer nomination of friends at the beginning of interviews corresponded well with the presence of characteristics of friendship but this was less so when peers needed to be asked directly whether a child with a disability was a friend.
Human resource development for inclusive procurement by intermediation: a situated learning theory application^JUN 1 2013^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF HUMAN RESOURCE MANAGEMENT^This paper fills an important gap in the human resource development (HRD) literature by considering the role that NGO intermediation initiatives can play in bringing together and developing corporate procurement officials (CPOs) and ethnic minority business owner-managers (EMBOs) supplying goods and services. It has been suggested that such initiatives hold great promise in helping ethnic minority businesses escape from their disadvantageous sectoral concentration in the UK. Using situated learning theory as an application lens, the main aim of this paper is to demonstrate how nurturing communities of practice of CPOs and EMBOs and facilitating their interaction can help their professional development and their approaches to procuring and supplying, respectively. The paper reports on the authors' experience with an action research programme encompassing two intermediation initiatives of this kind. The lessons drawn from this study are useful for all those concerned with HRD for inclusive procurement; intermediaries promoting inclusive procurement, large procurers who are willing to engage with supplier diversity and ethnic minority suppliers who wish to access corporate procurement systems and break-out'.
Creative Entrepreneurship and Urban Vitality as Key Determinants for a Smart, Sustainable and Inclusive Development^2013^VISION 2020: INNOVATION, DEVELOPMENT SUSTAINABILITY, AND ECONOMIC GROWTH, VOLS 1-3^The main paper's objective is to highlight the necessity to implement the topic of creative economy in Romania. It regards mostly the creative communities and urban economics &amp; policies. The paper is aimed at describing the state of creative communities &amp; creative cities in Romania. City-regions and urban policies need a more relational understanding about internal and external dynamics. Hence there is a need for a relational, constructivist understanding of space. E.g. cross-border regions: cannot be taken for granted, outcome of a process of social construction. Furthermore, in the case of remote and sparsely populated areas triple and quadruple helix partnerships may play a key role in mobilizing the local resources and connecting different networks in a productive manner for regional development allowing for sustainable development (Aldea-Partanen. A., 2011). One of the main challenges for the creative communities and for the creative industry sector is how to encourage a long-term and sustainable development of the new type of innovative and creative businesses, mostly within creative cities and creative communities. Quality of life, atmosphere, culture and heritage increasingly determine the competitiveness of metropolitan areas. There is difficult to identifying creative workers, called by Richard Florida as creative class (Florida, 2004) due to their diversity (understood in a complex sense, in terms of cultural diversity that is more relevant for creative communities than ethnic, religion or other way to look traditionally for diversity). The topics of urban economics and especially ones dedicated to creative communities are more and more relevant to the policy development not only on the regional (mezzo) level but also at the microeconomics and macroeconomic levels. This paper will focus on the regional level, highlighting the importance of urban economics for an emergent country like Romania.
Shape from Shading by Model Inclusive Learning-Simultaneous Estimation of Reflection Parameters^2013^2013 IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON SYSTEMS, MAN, AND CYBERNETICS (SMC 2013)^None
The Amsterdam Metropolitan Area challenge: opportunities for inclusive coproduction in city-region governance^2013^ENVIRONMENT AND PLANNING C-GOVERNMENT AND POLICY^The city-regional level has gained importance in various planning systems as a result of the continuous need to solve strategic planning issues that transcend political and jurisdictional boundaries. Governance through voluntary policy networks gained importance as a way to make policy objective delivery at this city-regional level more effective and efficient. However, the multilevel organized accountability of policy networks with different logics and rationalities challenges policy implementation processes. This paper develops a framework to analyze and understand how the structure of voluntary city-regional policy networks affects the effectiveness, efficiency, and democratic legitimacy of these networks and the policies they create. Using the case of the Amsterdam Metropolitan Area as an example, we show that city-region governance needs to involve not only government interests but also interests of market players and NGOs to become effective, efficient, and legitimate and that national policy interference is to a large extent incompatible with it.
Travelling together: participatory research methods for disability inclusive road development in Papua New Guinea^JAN 2013^JOURNAL OF TRANSPORT GEOGRAPHY^Investment in road infrastructure is a recognised approach to poverty reduction in developing countries, through improving community access to essential services, social networks and economic opportunities. But in both developing and developed contexts, very few road projects involve community consultation in road planning. Road planning and assessment rarely differentiate impacts on the lives of those who are most marginalised from economic and social development, such as people with disabilities. This article provides an example of inexpensive and replicable methods that were used in partnership with a national disabled people's organisation to undertake participatory research in Papua New Guinea on inclusive road development. Four participatory methods - focus group discussions, interviews with road decision-makers, walkabouts, and photo elicitation - are described and evaluated. (c) 2012 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
CONTEMPORARY VIEW ON INITIAL UNIVERSITY PREPARATION OF SPEECH LANGUAGE THERAPISTS IN THE PERSPECTIVE OF INCLUSIVE ENVIRONMENT AND SYMPTOMATIC SPEECH DISORDERS^2013^6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI 2013)^None
Inclusive Protected Area Management in the Amazon: The Importance of Social Networks over Ecological Knowledge^DEC 2012^SUSTAINABILITY^In the Amacayacu National Park in Colombia, which partially overlaps with Indigenous territories, several elements of an inclusive protected area management model have been implemented since the 1990s. In particular, a dialogue between scientific researchers, indigenous people and park staff has been promoted for the co-production of biological and cultural knowledge for decision-making. This paper, based on a four-year ethnographic study of the park, shows how knowledge products about different components of the socio-ecosystem neither were efficiently obtained nor were of much importance in park management activities. Rather, the knowledge pertinent to park staff in planning and management is the know-how required for the maintenance and mobilization of multi-scale social-ecological networks. We argue that the dominant models for protected area management-both top-down and inclusive models-underestimate the sociopolitical realm in which research is expected to take place, over-emphasize ecological knowledge as necessary for management and hold a too strong belief in decision-making as a rational, organized response to diagnosis of the PA, rather than acknowledging that thick complexity needs a different form of action. Co-production of knowledge is crucial for governance, but mainly not for the reasons for which it is promoted.
Inclusive Networks for Building BOP Markets^SEP 2012^BUSINESS &amp; SOCIETY^The idea that business can play a role in alleviating poverty has caught the imagination of academics and practitioners alike. An emerging consensus points to the critical importance of partnerships in market initiatives addressed to the base of the pyramid (BOP). But despite the calls for cross sector partnerships in BOP initiatives, our collective understanding of how these actually work has not advanced proportionally. This study attempts to address this issue by examining the dynamics at play in nine networks that integrated the BOP with mainstream markets in nine developing nations of North, Central, and South America. Our field-based analysis generated a number of tentative propositions structured around three broad issue-areas: alliance formation (drivers that compelled companies to engage in strategic partnerships), alliance implementation (choice of governance mechanisms, resources for enhancing trust and reciprocity between partners, and conflict-resolution mechanisms), and performance outcome (the extent to which an organization's commitment to an alliance impacted its performance and its societal context).
Ethnic Diversity and European's Generalised Trust: How Inclusive Immigration Policy Can Aid a Positive Association^AUG 31 2012^SOCIOLOGICAL RESEARCH ONLINE^The present article contributes to the discussions of the link as between diversity and social capital levels by focusing on the process linking diversity and trust. We look at country-level policies rather than individual communities and evaluate how policies can influence the relationship between diversity and generalised trust. We analyse Eurobarometer data (2004) using multilevel analysis. We find a positive effect of diversity on trust, controlling for potentially confounding effect at the individual and country level. Furthermore, we find that the inclusiveness of national policies towards migrants matters. More inclusive policies as measured by the migrant integration policy index (Mipex) counterbalance potentially negative effects of increasing diversity. The findings show that while local place is crucial as the locus where diverse ethnic groups interact, countries remain important policy contexts influencing and framing interactions with immigrants. For Europe, there is nothing inevitable about a negative impact of increasing diversity on building cohesive, trusting societies. We conclude by locating our findings within a wider critical literature.
Innovation for Inclusive Growth: Towards a Theoretical Framework and a Research Agenda^JUN 2012^JOURNAL OF MANAGEMENT STUDIES^Inclusive innovation, which we define as innovation that benefits the disenfranchised, is a process as well as a performance outcome. Consideration of inclusive innovation points to inequalities that may arise in the development and commercialization of innovations, and also acknowledges the inequalities that may occur as a result of value creation and capture. We outline opportunities for the development of theory and empirical research around this construct in the fields of entrepreneurship, strategy, and marketing. We aim for a synthesis in views of inclusive innovation and call for future research that deals directly with value creation and the distributional consequences of innovation.
Using Social Capital to Construct a Conceptual International Classification of Functioning, Disability, and Health Children and Youth Version-Based Framework for Stronger Inclusive Education Policies in Europe^FEB 2012^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF PHYSICAL MEDICINE &amp; REHABILITATION^Inclusive education is part of social inclusion; therefore, social capital can be linked to an inclusive education policy and practice. This association is explored in this article, and a practical measure is proposed. Specifically, the World Health Organization's International Classification of Functioning, Disability and Health Children and Youth Version (ICF-CY) is proposed as the link between social capital and inclusive education. By mapping participation and trust indicators of social capital to the ICF-CY and by using the Matrix to Analyse Functioning in Education Systems (MAFES) to analyze the functioning of inclusive education policies and systems, a measure for stronger inclusive education policies is proposed. Such a tool can be used for policy planning and monitoring to ensure better inclusive education environments. In conclusion, combining enhanced social capital linked to stronger inclusive education policies, by using the ICF-CY, can lead to better health and well-being for all.
Don't pull me out!? Preliminary findings of a systematic review of qualitative evidence on experiences of pupils with special educational needs in inclusive education^2012^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION &amp; EDUCATIONAL PSYCHOLOGY (ICEEPSY 2012)^None
E LEARNING PROCESS AND OUTCOMES IN DEVELOPING A EUROPEAN PROFESSIONAL'S NETWORK IN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^2012^LEVERAGING TECHNOLOGY FOR LEARNING, VOL I^None
Fostering inclusive growth through e-Governance Embedded Rural Telecenters (EGERT) in India^JAN 2012^GOVERNMENT INFORMATION QUARTERLY^In the recent years, two significant changes have taken place in an effort to address rural poor: Businesses have started recognizing potential of rural markets and governments have started using telecenters for providing G2C services to rural citizens. In India, the national and sub-national governments have supported businesses to establish telecenters in rural areas to provide information technology enabled services. However, the focus so far has been mostly on B2C services and viability of telecenters is being questioned. We argue that sustainability of these centers can be enhanced considerably if government services are embedded. Also, designing these telecenters with embedded G2C services would significantly improve effectiveness of their delivery and strengthen government information network, to foster inclusive growth. (C) 2011 Elsevier Inc. All rights reserved.
Sociological Issues of Inclusive Web Design The German Web 2.0 Accessibility Survey^2012^COMPUTERS HELPING PEOPLE WITH SPECIAL NEEDS, PT I^The German BIENE award (Barrierefreies Internet Eroffnet Neue Einsichten / Accessible Internet Provides New Insights), a best practice competition for accessible websites organized by the social association "Aktion Mensch" and the endowment "Digitale Chancen" enters into a new competitive phase. For the 2010 competition 224 web pages have been checked for their barrier free accessibility. Web applications that facilitate interactive sharing of user generated content are of particular importance, when it comes to Web 2.0 technologies. In this respect it soon turned out, that Web 2.0 services cannot only be made accessible by applying common design guidelines and ad-hoc adap-tations. In addition to conventional software ergonomic verification procedures, accessibility validation has to rely on sociological reasoning about unique Web 2.0 entities and corresponding usage obstacles. Empirically these considerations have been conceptualized by an online survey amongst 671 respondents with all kinds of different disabilities, carried out by "Aktion Mensch".
Experiences in creating Inclusive Information and Communications Technologies (IICT) Democratizing Software Development in Social Development^2012^AFRICAN CONFERENCE ON SOFTWARE ENGINEERING AND APPLIED COMPUTING (ACSEAC 2012)^Crowdsourcing, citizen journalism and social networks are Information and Communications Technologies (ICT) that have ushered in civil society's participation in the ICT equation. However, the participation of civil society has been limited to creating content and, to some extent, capturing data about events around the community. An area that has been neglected is the inclusion of these new players in the software development life cycle. Democratizing software development by including civil society in the software development life cycle will increase the variety of software applications and generate more buy-in of applications that improve livelihoods. Such an approach will lead to the emergence of Inclusive Information and Communication Technologies (IICT). The challenges that arise when developing IICTs include, inter alia, ownership of IICT, computer illiteracy of beneficiary communities, balkanized nature of communities in place and the well-known challenge of the communication gap between software developers and user communities. My approach to addressing these challenges was to develop the Integrated Development Spatial Planning Framework (IDSPF), a systems development methodology that seeks to demystify software development for grassroots communities by using participatory techniques that are familiar to stakeholders who implement socio economic development projects.
The All-inclusive System in the Representation of Lexical Knowledge^2012^TRADITIE/ INOVATIE - IDENTITATE/ ALTERITATE: PARADIGME IN EVOLUTIA LIMBII SI CULTURII ROMANE^Lexicography is a domain of activity that must keep pace with the needs of the users. Nowadays, when there is a diversified range of users, from the traditional kind (looking up a printed dictionary) to the engineer specialized in the natural language processing, a new way of representing lexical knowledge has emerged: the semantic network, the most widely known type of it being the wordnet. Its advantage is that it makes such knowledge accessible both to humans and to machines. In a wordnet content words are organized in synsets according to their meanings: each word occurs as many times as many meanings it has. Synsets are interlinked by semantic relations of various types (hypo/hyperonymy, meronymy/holonymy, troponymy, cause, etc.). Word forms can be further linked by lexical relations (synonymy, antonymy, derivational relations). Semantic relations are conceptual, thus have cross-lingual validity, while lexical relations are language specific. A language resource such as a wordnet can be seen as a repository of more resources: as synsets are associated a gloss, a wordnet can be looked up as an explanatory dictionary; from it one can extract various semantic relations dictionaries or even a derivational dictionary. Once such resources are created for various languages and they are aligned (i.e. the corresponding synsets in the different languages are clearly marked and the semantic relations between them are considered to be the same), one can extract from them multilingual dictionaries in which the interlingual correspondences are marked at the word sense level, not at the word level. A wordnet is extremely valuable for natural language processing: it is like a thesaurus, from which the semantic and lexical relations between semantically disambiguated words can be easily exploited in various tasks (such as question answering, information retrieval, and others) involving the expansion of the key words inserted by a user or calculating the semantic similarity between words.
Inclusive Constitutional Comparison: Reflections on India's Sodomy Decision^FAL 2011^AMERICAN JOURNAL OF COMPARATIVE LAW^Recent years have witnessed an outpouring of literature evaluating whether judges should refer to foreign law in resolving domestic legal disputes. A range of theories now posit constitutional comparison, outlining its benefits and highlighting its promise. Yet the support for such a practice is deeply qualified; comparative scholars narrowly limit the nations that should be considered while performing comparative study. This essay in comparative law theory reflects upon India's recent sodomy decision, Naz Foundation v. Government of NCT of Delhi, to evaluate which countries should be part of the comparative law project. In Naz, the Delhi High Court decriminalized homosexuality while referring extensively to a range of unlikely foreign sources, such as decisions from Nepal and Fiji. Assessing the role that such references may have played, this essay considers how Naz calls on us to revisit the boundary question in comparative constitutional law by revealing the network effect of judicial decisions. Drawing on the distinction between content-independent and content-dependent reasons, this essay illustrates the nature of force that foreign law may exert and demonstrates why an inclusive approach towards constitutional comparison may not only be beneficial but perhaps necessary. Such an approach holds the greatest promise of responding to concerns like cherry-picking, and gives our work an opportunity to be not merely comparative but truly global.
Inclusive social tagging and its support in Web 2.0 services^JUL 2011^COMPUTERS IN HUMAN BEHAVIOR^This paper investigates the Web 2.0 phenomenon of social tagging in the context of existing approaches to semantic data structuring. Social tagging is embedded into the space spanned by current structuring approaches like taxonomies, meta-data, and ontologies in order to identify its semantic and pragmatic foundations. Thereby, we use the Inclusive Universal Access paradigm to assess social tagging with respect to socio-technical criteria for inclusive and barrier-free provision and usage of web services. As a result of this analysis we propose a concept we chose to call "Inclusive Social Tagging". We subsequently use the requirements set forth by this concept to assess the tagging functionality of currently popular Web 2.0 services. We found that these services differ significantly in their implementation of tagging functionality, and we did not discover any service providing full compliance with Inclusive Social Tagging requirements. (C) 2010 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Looking across communicative genres: a call for inclusive indicators of interdisciplinarity^FEB 2011^SCIENTOMETRICS^Disciplines vary in the types of communicative genres they use to disseminate knowledge and citing patterns used within these genres. However, citation analyses have predominately relied on the references and citations of one type of communicative genre. It is argued that this is particularly problematic for studies of interdisciplinarity, where analyses bias the disciplines that communicate using the genre under investigation. This may lead to inaccurate or incomplete results in terms of fully understanding the interrelationships between disciplines. This study analyzes a set of 15,870 references from 97 US dissertations, in order to demonstrate the difference in discipline and author rankings, based on the genre under investigation. This work encourages future work that takes into account multiple citing and cited works, especially where indicators of interdisciplinarity are used for the allocation of resources or ranking of scholars.
Formal Semantics and Implementation of BPMN 2.0 Inclusive Gateways^2011^WEB SERVICES AND FORMAL METHODS^We present the first direct formalization of the semantics of inclusive gateways as described in the Business Process Modeling Notation (BPMN) 2.0 Beta 1 specification. The formal semantics is given fora minimal subset of BPMN 2.0 containing just the inclusive and exclusive gateways and the start and stop events. By focusing on this subset we achieve a simple graph model that highlights the particular non-local features of the inclusive gateway semantics. We sketch two ways of implementing the semantics using algorithms based on incrementally updated data structures and also discuss distributed communication-based implementations of the two algorithms.
Versatile Neural Network Method for Recovering Shape from Shading by Model Inclusive Learning^2011^2011 INTERNATIONAL JOINT CONFERENCE ON NEURAL NETWORKS (IJCNN)^The problem of recovering shape from shading is important in computer vision and robotics. In this paper, we propose a versatile method of solving the problem by neural networks. We introduce a mathematical model, which we call 'image-formation model', expressing the process that the image is formed from an object surface. We formulate the problem as a model inclusive learning problem of neural networks and propose a method to solve it. In the proposed learning method, the image-formation model is included in the learning loop of neural networks. The proposed method is versatile in the sense that it can solve the problem in various circumstances. The effectiveness of the proposed method is shown through experiments performed in various circumstances.
Free, Social, and Inclusive: Appropriation and Resistance of New Media Technologies in Brazil^2011^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF COMMUNICATION^This article analyzes how new media are being appropriated within the Brazilian society. Exploring a range of new media practices-from the use of social network sites, microblogging, gaming, music, video production, and digital photography to youth media programs, LAN houses, and online communities-this article examines changes in the production, consumption, and distribution of new media in Brazil. Specifically, it explores different orientations around new media technology as they emerge in relation to government policies, (new) media industries and ordinary citizens interested in social interaction, entertainment, and information-gathering through new media technologies. I further reveal how three key concepts dominate attitudes and values around new media technologies: free, inclusive, and social. Connecting these values to theories of appropriation in the Latin American region, I conclude by exploring how new media practices reflect, produce, and reproduce Brazilian cultural norms among Brazilians.
The inclusive research network: an emancipatory method of conducting research^SEP 2010^JOURNAL OF APPLIED RESEARCH IN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.769  </td>  <td>2.575</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Geometrically Parameterized Circuit Models of Printed Circuit Board Traces Inclusive of Antenna Coupling^MAY 2010^IEEE TRANSACTIONS ON ELECTROMAGNETIC COMPATIBILITY^This paper presents a systematic methodology for the characterization of mutual couplings between antennas and printed circuit board (PCB) traces in modern mobile devices. The main approach is based on the assumption that the interfering fields produced by the antennas are not perturbed significantly by the PCB traces. The one-way coupling can thus be computed using the theory of field-excited transmission lines. The incident field patterns excited by each antenna are computed via a single preliminary full-wave analysis. We adopt a generalized scattering formulation for the electromagnetic system. Some ports define the terminals of the PCB traces, the other "electromagnetic" ports correspond to the antennas feed points. The main achievement of this paper is a parameterization scheme for this generalized scattering form in terms of the trace-routing path. This parameterization further approximates the frequency dependence of each response in terms of rational functions, enabling the direct synthesis of path-dependent macromodels in an SPICE environment. Fast optimization, what-if, and sensitivity analyses can thus be performed directly via transient SPICE runs, possibly including realistic (transistor-level or behavioral) models for driver and receiver circuits.
AN INNOVATIVE MODEL FOR INCLUSIVE AND EFFECTIVE EDUCATION IN RURAL INDIA^2010^3RD INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE OF EDUCATION, RESEARCH AND INNOVATION (ICERI2010)^None
The effectiveness of a preparatory students programme on promoting peer acceptance of students with physical disabilities in inclusive schools of Tehran^2010^EDUCATIONAL STUDIES^This study investigates the effectiveness of a preparatory programme on the acceptance of students with physical disabilities by their peers in inclusive schools in Tehran. The classrooms which had students with physical disabilities were included in this study. Two hundred and twenty-one third- to fifth-grade students (116 girls and 105 boys) were selected randomly and were placed in experimental and control groups. The Acceptance Scale (Form B) established by Voeltz was used to measure peer acceptance. Data were collected from two groups before and after applying the preparatory programme. The data were analysed by t-test for independent groups and two-way ANOVA. The results showed increase of acceptance in experimental group. Also in comparing the level of acceptance in girls and boys, the results indicated that the acceptance in girls were more than boys.
What Is the Issue with Internet Acceptance among Elderly Citizens? Theory Development and Policy Recommendations for Inclusive E-Government^2010^ELECTRONIC GOVERNMENT^Digital divide is still a big topic in information systems and e-government research. In the past, several tracks and workshops on this topic existed. As information technology and especially the internet become more and more important governments cannot ignore the fact that elderly citizens are excluded from the benefits related to internet usage. Although e-Inclusion programmes and initiatives changed over the years and, moreover, although the amount of e-Inclusion literature is constantly growing, there is still no thorough understanding of potential factors influencing private internet usage. Hence, in this study we identify important influencing factors based on the literature on technology acceptance and digital divide. We develop a model based on these factors and test it against comprehensive survey data (n=192). Our theoretical model is able to explain more than 70% of the variation in private Internet usage. We derive policy recommendations based on the results and discuss implications for future research.
Developing inclusive education systems: the role of organisational cultures and leadership^2010^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Including all children in education is the major challenge facing educational systems around the world, in both developing and developed countries. Drawing on research evidence and ideas from a range of international literature, this paper argues that leadership practice is a crucial element in gearing education systems towards inclusive values and bringing about sustainable change. In so doing, the paper considers the organisational conditions that are needed in order to bring about such developments, focusing in particular on the role of leadership in fostering inclusive cultures.
INCLUSIVE EDUCATION - ILLUSION, REALITY AND PRACTICE^2010^SPECIAL EDUCATION AND REHABILITATION - SCIENCE AND/OR PRACTICE: THEMATIC COLLECTION OF PAPERS^None
Estimation Method of Motion Fields from Images by Model Inclusive Learning of Neural Networks^2009^ARTIFICIAL NEURAL NETWORKS - ICANN 2009, PT II^The problem of estimating motion fields from image sequences is essential for robot vision and so on. This paper discusses a method for estimating an entire continuous motion-vector field from a given set of image-sequence data. One promising method to realize accurate and efficient estimations is to fuse different estimation methods. We propose a neural network-based method to estimate motion-vector fields. The proposed method fuses two conventional methods, the correlation method and the differential method by model inclusive learning, which enables approximation results to possess inherent property of vector fields. It is shown through experiments that the proposed method makes it possible to estimate motion fields more accurately.
Towards a Socially-constructed Meaning for Inclusive Social Network Systems^2009^INFORMATION SYSTEMS IN THE CHANGING ERA: THEORY AND PRACTICE^Information and Communication Technology has the potential of benefiting citizens, allowing access to knowledge, communication and collaboration, and thus promoting the process of the constitution of a fairer society. The design of systems that make sense to the users' community and that respect their diversity demands socio-technical views and increased knowledge of the involved parties. We have adopted Organizational Semiotics and Participatory Design as theoretical and methodological frames of reference to face this challenge in the design of Inclusive Social Network System for the Brazilian context. This paper presents the way we are using some artifacts adapted from Problem Articulation Method to clarify concepts and prospect solutions. Results of this clarification fed the Semantic Analysis Method from which we present and discuss an Ontology Chart for the domain.
Designing Inclusive Social Networks: A Participatory Approach^2009^ONLINE COMMUNITIES AND SOCIAL COMPUTING, PROCEEDINGS^The Brazilian society is characterized by vast differences with regard to socio-economics, culture as well as access to technology and knowledge. In this scenario, Information and Communication Technology, especially hypermedia systems, could benefit citizen, allowing access to knowledge, communication and collaboration. Current social networks systems were not conceived to address the challenges of an inclusive society. In this paper, we discuss some relevant design issues, elicited from a participatory approach, to the design of such systems. The exploratory design process starts with the elicitation of the different views among users, designers and developers, passes through design concepts definition and gets to a first approximation to a user interfaces design.
Disability studies and inclusive education - implications for theory, research, and practice^2008^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^This paper serves as a broad introduction to Disabilities Studies in Education (DSE). The emergence of DSE over the last decade has resulted in a vibrant area of academic scholarship as well as a critical forum for social/educational advocacy and activism. First, the authors trace the roots of DSE in the growth of disability studies (DS) within the UK and the USA. Second, they describe the formation of international networks dedicated to DSE. Third, they chart the evolution of DSE's conceptual framework, complete with tenets and examples, carefully crafted over time by a community of scholars. Fourth, they comment upon twelve papers selected for this special double issue of the International Journal of Inclusive Education, highlighting the contribution of each toward both advancing and elucidating the tenets within the conceptual framework of DSE. Finally, the authors close with reflections on the significance of DSE, contemplating what it offers theorists, researchers, and practitioners, as well as highlighting future possibilities.
Building Inclusive Libraries to Bridge the Digital Divide^2008^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 3RD INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON E-LEARNING^None
An inclusive fitness analysis of altruism on a cyclical network^NOV 2007^JOURNAL OF EVOLUTIONARY BIOLOGY^A recent model studies the evolution of cooperation on a network, and concludes with a result connecting the benefits and costs of interactions and the number of neighbours. Here, an inclusive fitness analysis is conducted of the only case solved analytically, of a cycle, and the identical result is obtained. This brings the result within a biologically familiar framework. It is notable that the benefits and costs in the inclusive fitness framework need to be derived, and are not the benefits and costs that are the parameters in the original model. The relatedness is a quadratic function of position in a cycle of size N: an individual is related by 1 to itself, by (N - 5)/(N + 1) to an immediate neighbour, and by very close to -1/2 to the most distant individuals. The inclusive fitness analysis explains hitherto puzzling features of the results.
Fostering disability-inclusive HIV/AIDS programs in northeast India: a participatory study^JUN 26 2007^BMC PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.567  </td>  <td>3.275</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Policymaking in the age of Internet: Is the Internet tending to make policy networks more or less inclusive?^APR 2007^JOURNAL OF PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION RESEARCH AND THEORY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.407  </td>  <td>5.394</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Accessible Interface for Multimedia Presentation in Inclusive Education^2007^ITICSE 2007: 12TH ANNUAL CONFERENCE ON INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY IN COMPUTER SCIENCE EDUCATION: <span class="hitHilite">INCLUSIVE</span> EDUCATION IN COMPUTER SCIENCE^Among the technological solutions to achieve an inclusive education, the educative electronic accessible resources providing content adaptability is an alternative which reduces discrimination. It also favors the inclusion with right equalities which can be used by Students regardless of their specific need and use contexts. Following this line of adaptability of contents on the web, a practical case [1] has been launched: an accessible interface of a Multimedia resource with caption and audio description that offers the user the control over the decision of which sound and/or visual alternatives he wants to be introduced to. This resource has been designed with Universal Design criteria which are found in the Inclusive Design methodological framework.
Engaging Student Programmers as Inclusive Designers^2007^ITICSE 2007: 12TH ANNUAL CONFERENCE ON INNOVATION &amp; TECHNOLOGY IN COMPUTER SCIENCE EDUCATION^While awareness of accessibility standards and guidelines can help students learn to produce accessible web pages, overcoming real-world accessibility issues often requires creativity and flexibility. One way to develop these skills is to engage student programmers in design practice. This poster describes an undergraduate web programming course that used pedagogical techniques drawn from architecture and industrial design education to enable students to empathize with users with disabilities and to creatively address accessibility issues. Evaluative feedback from students indicates that this approach is effective in encouraging accessible design practices.
Ways of knowing and inclusive management practices^DEC 2006^PUBLIC ADMINISTRATION REVIEW^The authors engage structural and agentic perspectives to examine opportunities for deliberation and the purposeful role of managers in creating those opportunities. Drawing on actor-network theory as a way of understanding the process of structuring knowledge, this essay focuses on the continuous enactment and reenactment of networks of human and nonhuman actants and the associations that connect them. This thinking is applied to policy issues, which the authors propose should he understood as ways of knowing. The fluidity of such ways of knowing provides opportunities for public managers to use the inclusive practices associated with boundary experiences, boundary objects, and boundary organizations to facilitate deliberation.
Developing inclusive partnerships: user-defined outcomes, networking and knowledge - a case study^SEP 2006^HEALTH &amp; SOCIAL CARE IN THE COMMUNITY^Two major developments have been associated with the reorientation of United Kingdom health and social care policy and provision in recent years, placing a new emphasis on: quality and 'outcome' measures; and service user (and public and patient) involvement. These issues have become central to health and social care, representing expressions of the shift in political and ideological interest in public policy. However, these two strands of development have tended to be treated as discrete discourses and have developed separately in policy. Nevertheless, it can hardly be assumed that what policy makers, service planners, providers and purchasers would value and prioritise as good quality would necessarily coincide with what service users would want. Developing effective partnership working needs to go beyond considerations of organisations and professional groupings, and fully involve service users as one of the key stakeholders. This paper describes the findings of three projects undertaken by Shaping Our Lives. These studies confirmed that service-user concepts of outcomes and quality may differ significantly from those currently employed; moreover, service users are able to offer a complex and sophisticated model of what outcome measures might look like if they were centrally involved in their definition and application. Nevertheless, service users currently have little impact in defining and influencing quality outcomes. The projects also highlight the importance of networking and knowledge sharing for service users and user organisations in their ability to influence policy definitions of quality, and a number of the barriers and obstacles which undermine this process. The paper concludes with two proposals which, considered together, offer the basis for taking forward effective and inclusive partnerships and developing measures for quality consistent with the rights and preferences of service users themselves. They are an essential complement to broader efforts and strategies to develop effective partnerships in health and social care.
Who do students with mild disabilities nominate as cool in inclusive general education classrooms?^FEB 2006^JOURNAL OF SCHOOL PSYCHOLOGY^Examined the nominations that elementary students with mild disabilities made for peers they perceived as cool. The total sample was comprised of 948 students (496 girls, 452 boys) from the metropolitan Chicago area and North Carolina and included 107 (11.3%) students with mild disabilities. Overall, students with mild disabilities nominated prosocial and athletic peers who affiliate with students with mild disabilities. However, aggressive boys who are central in the social network were highly likely to view aggressive peers as cool. Results are discussed in relation to implications for social interventions for students with mild disabilities. (c) 2005 Society for the Study of School Psychology. Published by Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
The corporate brand association base - A conceptual model for the creation of inclusive brand architecture^2006^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF MARKETING^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.716  </td>  <td>2.549</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Social integration of students with autism in inclusive settings^MAR 2005^EDUCATION AND TRAINING IN DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^Students with autism are increasingly being placed in general education "inclusion" settings for the purpose of improved social integration. This article presents information on the social integration Of ten students with autism in elementary inclusive settings. The purposes were to describe three social integration constructs of students with autism in inclusive classrooms, including their acceptance (social preference), visibility (social impact), and membership in a peer group (social network affiliation) and to identify the extent to which severity of autism characteristics contributed to these social integration constructs. Results suggest students with autism in inclusive settings are as accepted, visible, and members of peer groups, as well as both their peers without disabilities and those with other disabilities. Post hoc observations revealed further factors that may impact these constructs as well.
All about PSY DREAM. Psychiatric drug registration, evaluation &amp; all-inclusive monitoring^JAN-MAR 2005^EPIDEMIOLOGIA E PSICHIATRIA SOCIALE-AN INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL FOR EPIDEMIOLOGY AND PSYCHIATRIC SCIENCES^Aims - In this article the author - board-member of the European Network of (ex-) Users and Survivors of Psychiatry (ENUSP) -explains, what is needed to guarantee a minimal level of involvement of users and survivors of psychiatry into issues relating to psychiatric drugs. Methods - He reflects demands of their organisations, and compares these demands with the current involvement level. Considering the concrete circumstances in psychiatry, he reflects the risks and dangers of the administered drugs -especially the widely used neuroleptics -for example enhanced breast cancer risk in women, suicidal effects, receptor changes, tardive dyskinesia and other toxic reactions. Results - Considering the unique situation of psychiatric patients to receive treatment in general without informed consent and in a violent way or through bullying and threat, he argues for to provide their involvement in all aspects of psychiatric drug issues -especially registration and monitoring, for example by their involvement in creating and running a suicide register. And he argues for involvement in ethics committees, licensing processes and providing guidelines and decision making about effectiveness and reimbursement of costs. Conclusions - As first steps towards these aims he proposes independent and user-controlled research, independent and user-controlled education and independent and user-controlled information about the effects of psychiatric drugs.
Neuroscience and behavioral physiology^2003-Oct^Neuroscience and behavioral physiology^None
Social capital, inclusive networks, and economic performance^APR 2003^JOURNAL OF ECONOMIC BEHAVIOR &amp; ORGANIZATION^Empirical studies show that the relationship between social capital and economic performance is ambiguous. The paper points to the potential trade-off between the sustainability of self-enforcement and the magnitude of gains from trade in social networks as an explanation. Based on an infinitely repeated multi-player prisoners' dilemma it is shown how self-enforcement of cooperation within a network is influenced by its inclusiveness, its communication capacity, and the complexity of the exchange setting. The paper shows that inclusive social capital can combine both low enforcement costs and high gains from trade even in a complex exchange setting. (C) 2002 Elsevier Science B.V. All rights reserved.
School-wide supports for inclusive education: Restructuring for effectiveness^2003^Reimagining Practice: Researching Change, Vol 1^Restructuring/school reform efforts have received much attention (Lipsky &amp; Gartner, 1997; Sailor, 1991; 2002; Sizer, 1992; Villa &amp; Thousand, 2000). The goal of restructuring is to improve education for All children. Specific efforts are needed, however, to effectively include students with disabilities and those whose behavior challenges the system. Inclusive Education and Positive Behavior Support are models of effective educational practices for meeting the needs of ALL students in the general education school environment. Inclusive Education and Positive Behavior Support are driven by similar values and the same broad outcome goals i.e., successful participation in inclusive environments, rich social networks and improved quality of life. This paper will provide an overview of Inclusive Education and Positive Behavior Support, effective strategies for implementation of each at the school level and a discussion of elements critical to both in order to effectively support ALL students in positive inclusive schools.
Knowledge interaction towards inclusive learning: Promoting systems of innovation and competence building^SEP 2002^TECHNOLOGICAL FORECASTING AND SOCIAL CHANGE^This paper draws on recent conceptual approaches to economic growth, in which the accumulation of knowledge is the fundamental driving force behind growth. This fact is reflected in the trend in developed economies towards an increasing investment in advanced technology, R&amp;D, education, and culture. Concepts such as learning ability, creativity, and sustained flexibility gain greater importance as guiding principles for the conduct of individuals, institutions, nations, and regions. It is thus legitimate to question the traditional way of viewing the role that contemporary institutions play in the process of economic development and to argue for the need to promote systems of innovation and competence building based on learning and knowledge networks. This broad concept has motivated the work behind the present work, which reviews the strongest themes of the 4th International Conference on Technology Policy and Innovation (ICTPI), which was held in Curitiba, Parani, Brazil, in August of 2000. Under the broad designation of "learning and knowledge networks," the conference brought together a range of experts to discuss technology, policy, and management in a context much influenced by a dynamics of change and a necessary balance between the creation and diffusion of knowledge. While the idea of inclusive development developed in previous conferences entails a process of shared prosperity across the globe following local specific conditions, it is crucial to understand the dynamics of the process of knowledge accumulation, which drives a learning society. Thus, this special issue includes a set of extended contributions to the Curitiba conference that are largely grounded on empirical experiences of different regional and national contexts. The aim of this introductory paper is to set the stage for these contributions, with an original contribution on possible views for the learning society. (C) 2002 Published by Elsevier Science Inc.
Institutional networks for inclusive coastal management in Trinidad and Tobago^JUN 2002^ENVIRONMENT AND PLANNING A^The authors consider the role of institutional networks in integrated and inclusive coastal-zone management in Trinidad and Tobago. Drawing on theories of social institutions, a framework for understanding the institutional prerequisites for participatory management is developed. In this framework, distinction is made between institutions at the community, formal-organisational, and national regulatory levels and the means by which institutions adapt to and learn about new issues in terms of networks of dependence and exchange are characterised. The immediate networks between actors (their spaces of dependence) are augmented by wider networks between institutions at various scales (their spaces of exchange). This framework is applied to a case study of resource management in Trinidad and Tobago. Semistructured interviews with key government urban and economic planners, fisheries regulators, and other agents in Trinidad and Tobago, and a participatory workshop for resource managers, are used to identify the perceived opportunities and constraints relating to integrated and inclusive resource management within the social institutions. The findings are analysed through an exploration of the spaces of dependence and exchange that exist in the various social networks at the different institutional scales. The prescriptive relevance of this approach is in the demonstration of the nature of change required in social institutions at all scales to facilitate integrated and inclusive resource management.
The all-inclusive, totally functional, super-connected, scientific information machine^2002^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2002 INTERNATIONAL CHEMICAL INFORMATION CONFERENCE^None
Inclusive and exclusive social capital in the small-firm sector in developing countries^JUN 2001^JOURNAL OF INSTITUTIONAL AND THEORETICAL ECONOMICS-ZEITSCHRIFT FUR DIE GESAMTE STAATSWISSENSCHAFT^This article explores the role of social capital created by social network membership in the small-firm sector in developing countries. Some empirical studies find that social capital hampers economic performance by creating market segmentation and inducing rent-seeking activities. Other studies conclude that social capital is an important prerequisite for productive interaction among small firms. This paper develops a concept of social capital governance which distinguishes between inclusive and exclusive social capital. It argues that inclusive social capital furthers economic performance while exclusive social capital may not. Two case studies are included.
Inclusive modeling tool for homodyne crosstalk in optical networks^JUN 2001^OPTICAL ENGINEERING^Coherent homodyne crosstalk in optical systems is examined. A general approach is introduced to theoretically model the crosstalk of single and multiple interferers in DFB and FP laser systems with a finite modulation extinction ratio, with PIN and APD receivers, in external modulation systems. The theoretical results of this model are verified experimentally and are compared with other theoretical models. In addition, the trade off between modulation extinction ratio and crosstalk tolerance is investigated and optimized. The general mathematical model is implemented in a computer simulator program, creating an inclusive and pragmatic engineering tool. This computer simulator dramatically improves the design of next generation crossconnects, switched and routers. (C) 2001 Society of Photo-Optical instrumentation Engineers.
Social support in inclusive schools: Student and teacher perspectives^SPR 2001^EXCEPTIONAL CHILDREN^This article investigates student and teacher perceptions regarding, social support at school. Thirty students with learning disabilities (LD) in inclusive third- to fifth-grade classrooms were interviewed about their social networks, perceived loneliness, social support, and intervention preferences for social problems encountered at school. Sixty general and special educators working with students with LD also were interviewed about their roles, strategies used, and preferred interventions in providing social support to students. Findings suggest that while students with LD feel part of a social network, many report school-related loneliness. General and special educators use similar strategies to support students. Results suggest a discrepancy between students' and teachers' choices of preferred social support strategies. Implications for enhancing social support are discussed.
Courseware accessibility: Recommendations for inclusive design^2001^IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON ADVANCED LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES, PROCEEDINGS^Providing educational opportunities within online environments, while beneficial, also has the potential to exclude a significant portion of the population. The learning and/or physically disabled may be prevented from accessing online learning environments due to problems both in the design of the technology itself, and with the pedagogy directing the use of this technology. This paper presents an overview of the results of research into courseware accessibility. Recommendations for inclusive design are presented within disability-specific requirements for accessible courseware.
The inclusive workplace: An ecosystems approach to diversity management^JUL 2000^SOCIAL WORK^This article's main argument is that organizations need to expand their notion of diversity to include not only the organization itself, but also the larger systems that constitute its environment. The concept of "the inclusive workplace," introduced here, refers to a work organization that is not only accepting and using the diversity of its own work force, but also is active in the community, participates in state and federal programs to include working poor people, and collaborates across cultural and national boundaries with a focus on global mutual interests. Using an ecosystems perspective, the article outlines a value-based model and a practice-based model of the inclusive workplace as they pertain to the different organizational levels, from the micro to the macro. Finally, implications for the social work profession are drawn with specific case examples for each system level.
Social impacts - Internet filter effectiveness - Testing over- and underinclusive blocking decisions of four popular web filters^SUM 2000^SOCIAL SCIENCE COMPUTER REVIEW^Tn the wake of the Littleton, Colorado, shooting tragedy, public attention has again been focused on the problem of potentially harmful Internet content. Many parents and legislators have proposed that commercially available filtering software is the best way to keep children away from the "red light districts of cyberspace" while also protecting the First Amendment. Civil libertarians and others, however, have noted that Internet content filters do not work as advertised, failing to block much dangerous material and also unjustly blocking benign content. The aim of this article is to assess these competing claims by rigorously testing the effectiveness of four popular filtering programs: CYBERsitter, Cyber Patrol, Net Nanny, and Surf Watch. The findings of this study suggest that current support for filtering software should be reconsidered.
Source-limited inclusive routing: A new paradigm for multicast communication^JAN 2000^NETWORKS^In this paper, we study a combination of the multicast communication problem and the maximum disjoint paths problem. Specifically, we are given a directed tree T rooted at r, and we want to send a message from r to a subset of nodes in T. We accomplish this via a multicast schedule which consists of a number of time steps in which informed nodes deliver the message to uninformed nodes until all destinations have received the message. In each time step, any informed node a may forward the message to one of its uninformed descendant nodes d via the unique directed path, or dipath, p from s to d in ditree T. A multicast schedule is called edge-disjoint if the dipaths used in any time step do not share any edges. We call a multicast schedule a node-disjoint schedule if the dipaths used in any time step are node-disjoint. We show that directed trees can be used to represent source-limited inclusive routing, a realistic class of routing schemes used in popular direct network systems. We then show that node-disjoint multicast schedules in directed trees can be used to closely approximate optimal edge-disjoint multicast schedules. In addition, we show that node-disjoint multicast in directed trees can be reduced to an equivalent broadcast problem in directed trees. We describe an O(n(2)) greedy algorithm (GA) for performing node-disjoint broadcast in directed trees. The greatest advantages of the GA algorithm are its simplicity and its optimal performance in popular topologies such as meshes, tori, and hypercubes. We also describe an O(n(3)) algorithm that always produces minimum-length node-disjoint broadcast schedules for directed tree topologies, which can be easily transformed into an algorithm that produces edge-disjoint multicast schedules that are no more than twice the length of an optimal edge-disjoint multicast schedule for an arbitrary topology. (C) 2000 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Inc.
Accessible Friendships, Inclusive Friendships, Reciprocated Friendships As Related to Social and Emotional Loneliness in Greece and the USA^1999^EUROPEAN PSYCHOLOGIST^The participants, 128 Greek and 137 USA university women, listed the number of accessible friends-individuals who could be called upon to socialize in five different events-and the number of inclusive friends-those who would invite the subject to participate in the five events. Subjects completed the Revised Self-Monitoring Scale and Interpersonal Control Scale as well as three loneliness scales. Hypotheses were derived from suggestions of stronger collectivist norms in Greece than in the United States, meaning that friendship networks should be smaller but more reciprocated in Greece, and a lack of reciprocation should have greater effects upon loneliness in Greece than in the United States. The hypotheses were generally supported: The lack of a best friend was related to loneliness in Greece but not in the United States, and the lack of reciprocity between accessible and inclusive friendships was also more strongly related to loneliness in Greece. Perceived interpersonal control scores, but not self-monitoring scores, were significantly (negatively) related to loneliness in both countries.
Sociology of science as a means to a more authentic, inclusive science education^MAY 1998^JOURNAL OF RESEARCH IN SCIENCE TEACHING^In this article, we argue that insights from scholarship in the sociology of science can provide a powerful basis for making science education more authentic and inclusive. Drawing on recent work in the sociology of science, we describe how adopting sociological ideas as integral components of science curricula and instruction can provide opportunities for students that a traditional approach cannot. We focus on three insights from sociology-social networking, peer review, and skepticism-to demonstrate how sociological understandings can inform and improve the content, structure, and pedagogy of science classrooms. We argue that shifts in the balance of power and authority that result from explicit attention to these aspects of the nature of science offer a more authentic science education for all. (C) 1998 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Inc.
Inclusive management^1998^INTERNET RESEARCH-ELECTRONIC NETWORKING APPLICATIONS AND POLICY^Discusses the use of a corporate Internet in a geographically-spread consulting firm, James Martin &amp; Co., to share ideas, vision, client information and results. Illustrates with examples. Applications include a quarterly Employee Attitude Survey and regular discussion forums. Proposes that a well designed corporate intranet is a highly effective method of making intangible vision and mission pledges more tangible.
The inclusive intranet: Linking into legacy systems^JAN 1997^ASLIB PROCEEDINGS^No less than any other means of communicating and presenting information, an Intranet must be geared to organizational objectives through proper information management procedures. For smaller organizations, an Intranet need not comprise all of the standard components, and cart utilize complementary technologies to incorporate legacy documentation systems at minimal cost and effort. The importance of gaining management commitment should not be underestimated, and an evolutionary approach can be the key to success.
Women's networks and the European Union: Towards an inclusive approach?^DEC 1996^JOURNAL OF COMMON MARKET STUDIES^This article fails into two parts: the application of policy network analysis (PNA) to UK women's networking activities; and exploration of the extent to which these activities are focused upon the European Union (EU) policy process. Evidence from three sources - trades union and local government equality officers, and women's voluntary organizations - demonstrates that women's networking is widespread, intense, politically oriented and inclusive. However, the concepts of PNA are found to exclude much of women's political activity and are here adapted to produce a more inclusive model. In terms of their focus, women's networks remain overwhelmingly oriented toward the UK policy process even where issues fall within EU competence. Impediments to more effective EU-focused networking are discussed.
SUPPORT NETWORKS FOR INCLUSIVE SCHOOLING - INTERDEPENDENT INTEGRATED EDUCATION - STAINBACK,W, STAINBACK,S^DEC 1993^EDUCATION AND TRAINING IN MENTAL RETARDATION AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.892  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2004  </th>  </tr> </table> 
SUPPORT NETWORKS FOR INCLUSIVE SCHOOLING - INTERDEPENDENT INTEGRATED EDUCATION^OCT 1992^SYSTEMS PRACTICE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.114  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  1999  </th>  </tr> </table> 
SUPPORT NETWORKS FOR INCLUSIVE SCHOOLING - HARRIS,KC^FAL 1992^JOURNAL FOR THE EDUCATION OF THE GIFTED^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.032  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2004  </th>  </tr> </table> 
DELAY IN DEVELOPMENT AND INCLUSION: THE OPINION OF PROFESSIONALS OF THE NURSERY^APR 2019^REVISTA IBERO-AMERICANA DE ESTUDOS EM EDUCACAO^The objective of this research was to verify the the opinion of professional who works on children's education institutions about the function of nursery in relation to developmental difference of children at this stage. An interview were answered for 17 professional of an institution linked to the Municipal Department of Education of a medium-sized city in the Paulista countryside. The results shows that the nursery, receiving very young children, is a propitious place to identify the the developmental difference and favorable to offer intentional activities hat can improve the quality of the baby's full development. The resulting difficulties of the inappropriate formation should be considerate to the nursery allow all the child to enjoy a stimulate ambiance who comply the fundamental right of quality education.
PEDAGOGICAL WORK FOR STUDENTS WHO ARE THE TARGET-AUDIENCE OF SPECIAL EDUCATION: INVESTIGATING INCLUSION IN CHILDREN'S EDUCATION^2016^REVISTA IBERO-AMERICANA DE ESTUDOS EM EDUCACAO^The performance of the teacher of childhood education with the students of special education target public has assumed relevance in the inclusive educational context, since the mediation of this teacher, as well as the adoption of methodologies consistent with this perspective, this educational stage is crucial for ensuring access, retention and participation of those students in school from the beginning of their schooling process. Subsidized by such ideas, this study aimed to investigate, in the regular classroom, how is the teacher's practices in the children's education, to the students of special education target public with a view to the appropriation of the curriculum by that public. Observations were carried out in four classrooms of teachers that were acting in childhood education classes, which were counting with students of special education target public registered in in four schools in two cities in the countryside of Sao Paulo. The results of this study demonstrated how these students were included in the developed activities, as well how the teachers used their teaching practice to attend to all students, and particularly those who found themselves characterized as special education target public.
Family Support and Community Context as Moderators of the Disabled Inclusion^2016^SOCIAL INCLUSION AND EQUAL OPPORTUNITIES (SIEO 2016)^This article reports results from a qualitative study conducted in 2015 in Timi. Country, Romania, consisting in interviews with 24 people with disabilities both from cities and countryside regarding problematic aspects of disability, family and community factors likely to influence the disabled person's status on social and employment inclusion. The 24 respondents provided strong evidence that family and community factors have a greater impact on their inability to social and labour market inclusion. This article focused on two main domains, which were derived from the qualitative data using a research approach named "Institutional Ethnography". These domains illustrate the pervasive impact of poor family relations, housing, community, infrastructure conditions and financial concerns on disabled individuals' chances of labour market integration and overall well-being.
Tele-classroom consultation: promoting an inclusive approach to supporting the needs of educators, families and early years learners on the autism spectrum in rural and remote areas in contextually responsive ways^None^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Many students on the autism spectrum attend mainstream schools and face challenges coping with the demands of this complex environment. Education in rural and remote locations poses additional challenges due to limited access to additional resourcing, specialised support, and services. This case study describes a problem-solving, collaborative approach providing rural and remote educators with additional direct support and services tailored to meet the individualised and complex learning needs of students on the autism spectrum in the classroom. The Tele-Classroom Consultative (TCC) approach involved a multidisciplinary team working face-to-face and remotely with the school community to deliver a cost-efficient professional support service. Data from semi-structured interviews with the teacher, parent, and school principal were analysed using the Index for Inclusion as a framework to show how the TCC approach enabled educators to implement inclusive approaches in rural and remote settings. Findings indicate that this method has potential for schools in rural and remote locations to meet the needs of all students, including those on the autism spectrum.
Effects of Farmers' Participation in Inclusive Finance on Their Vulnerability to Poverty: Evidence from Qinba Poverty-Stricken Area in China^APR 9 2019^EMERGING MARKETS FINANCE AND TRADE^China's new poverty alleviation strategy has been focusing on the 14 undeveloped poverty-stricken areas including Qinba, which faces frequent natural disasters, fragile ecological environment, and high incidence of poverty. With the government initiation, farmers in Qinba have participated in inclusive financial services. Based on 587 rural household field survey data in Qinba area, this article examines farmers' participation level in inclusive finance. It uses the VEP model to measure the vulnerability to poverty. Then it empirically analyzes the effects of farmers' participation in inclusive finance on their vulnerability to poverty. The study finds that: first, inclusive finance impacts farmers' risk coping ability, thus affecting the vulnerability to poverty. Second, farmers' participation level of savings, micro-credit, and commercial insurance is 48.55%, 17.89%, and 12.44%, respectively. Third, farmers' participation in savings and commercial insurance reduces their vulnerability by 0.05 and 0.126, while micro-credit does a not have a significantly positive impact. Last, it puts forward the policy implications.
Teachers as change agents in making teaching inclusive in some selected rural schools of Limpopo Province, South Africa: implications for teacher education^APR 3 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^This paper reports on teachers as change agents to implement inclusive education in some rural secondary schools in South Africa. The study followed a qualitative case study research methodology. Eight teachers were recruited to form part of the study through a purposive sampling strategy. Data were collected through interviews, observations and document analysis. The study found that: (a) teachers were resilient in the face of lack of resources to implement inclusive education, (b) teachers did their best despite lack of capacity to implement inclusive education, (c) teachers showed the willingness to effect change, and (d) when they collaborated with others, they achieved more. These findings have at least four implications for teacher education: One that institutions should train teachers to survive with meagre resources. Two, professional development initiatives should be planned to capacitate teachers on inclusive education. Three, teacher education institutions should develop programmes that include models of teacher agency such as the one displayed by these teachers. Four, teacher education should develop programmes that teach teachers how to collaborate with parents and other stakeholders to make inclusive education possible.
Inclusive Financial Development and Multidimensional Poverty Reduction: An Empirical Assessment from Rural China^APR 1 2019^SUSTAINABILITY^Inclusive finance is often considered to be a critical element that makes growth inclusive, as access to finance can enable the poor to lift themselves from income poverty. However, can it play such a role when the poor are in multidimensional poverty? Why does financial exclusion and poverty still exist in countries with vigorous development of inclusive finance? We build an evolutionary game model to analyze the equilibrium strategies of inclusive financial institutions and the poor in poverty reduction activities to find the answers. As there is a high incidence of poverty and serious financial exclusion in rural areas of China, we test the poverty reduction effectiveness of inclusive financial development on the poor with different labor capacity in rural China from 2010 to 2016 based on survey data of China Family Panel Studies and relevant statistics collected from 21 provinces. Our study finds there are differences in poverty alleviation effects of inclusive financial development among the poor with different labor capacities; if financial institutions target the service precisely to the working-age population in rural areas, they will achieve the dual goals of maintaining institutional sustainable development and alleviating poverty; And the development of inclusive finance in aspects of permeability, usability, and utility can significantly reduce multidimensional poverty. Therefore, to further improve the multidimensional poverty reduction performance and stimulate the endogenous motivation of the poor, it is necessary to strengthen the support for financial resources served to the working-age population, and to improve the development of rural inclusive finance in aspects of quality and affordability.
The challenges of geographical inclusive education in rural Bangladesh^JAN 2 2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^This paper considers the challenges of promoting inclusive education in geographically isolated rural communities in Bangladesh. Inclusion is explored from both government and non-government (NGO) providers, and identifies challenges and opportunities for implementing inclusive practices. Challenges for implementing inclusion are linked to poverty, gender inequality, ethnicity, remoteness, language barriers, issues for children with disabilities, and the negative impact of climate (e.g. monsoonal flooding, landslides, and other natural calamities that beset Bangladesh on a regular basis) as well as the current humanitarian crisis with the Rohingya children now in Bangladesh. While there is sometimes a mismatch between government policy and the literature on inclusion in relation to practical implementation at the local level, opportunities for inclusion come with the dedication and passion of educators who provide teacher training about inclusive education, assistive technologies (Braille materials, hearing aids, etc.), multi-lingual education (MLE) materials, and advocacy by reaching out to parents and community members. Findings indicate that characteristics such as culture, the development of local resources, and the climate of the local context need to be considered in developing relevant inclusive policy to enact effective geographical inclusive practices in rural Bangladeshi communities.
PREPARATION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT MASTER PLAN FOR ADMINISTRATIVE RAYON BASED ON SUSTAINABLE AND INCLUSIVE DEVELOPMENT PRINCIPLES^2019^ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL DEVELOPMENT^Algorithmic sequence on preparation and implementation of agricultural development Master Plan for administrative rayon comprises the followings: a) preparation of the agricultural development strategic plan; b) identification of agricultural reform model; c) support or creation of the inclusive development potential; d) risk preclusion, mitigation or management; e) formation of principles of internal relations for sustainable development ensuring; f) cluster formation as institutional step for inclusive development ensuring; g) mapping of land use and consolidation plans and crop rotation schemes; h) identification of yield/productivity increase and efficient resource utilization ways. Such approach could increase welfare of rural population and productive resource utilization.
Are SHGs catalysts of inclusive sustainable rural development? Impact assessment of SKDRDP interventions in India^2019^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT AND WORLD ECOLOGY^The objective of this study is to analyse whether self-help groups (SHGs) play catalyst role in the inclusive and sustainable development of rural poor. This has been empirically examined in Indian scenario with a specific case of SHGs promoted by Shri Kshetra Dharmasthala Rural Development Project (SKDRDP), using secondary and primary data. A sample survey of 419 SKDRDP-promoted SHG members was conducted in Dakshina Kannada and Madikeri districts of Karnataka state in India. The data collected are analysed by adopting factor analysis technique. The results exhibit that SKDRDP-promoted SHGs contribute significantly to reforms in the society, enhance the capability of rural poor, and enable economic well-being and financial inclusion of the poor. Thus, SHG activities enable inclusive and sustainable rural development. The results have significant implications to the policymakers, non-government organisations, and local government organisations of underdeveloped economies.
DRIVING INCLUSIVE GROWTH THROUGH RURAL FINANCIAL INTERMEDIATION: A STUDY OF THE MICROFINANCE MODEL IN NIGERIA^2019^PROCEEDINGS OF INTCESS 2019- 6TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND SOCIAL SCIENCES^The microfinance banking model was formally introduced in Nigeria in December 2005 to drive inclusive participation of all economic units towards achieving rapid economic growth. The policy thrust of this banking model was to improve access of micro entrepreneurs and low income households to microcredit and other financial services necessary for the expansion and modernization of their operations. The rationale for a paradigm shift from conventional to the microfinance model for integrating this segment of the economic strata into mainstream economy is the uniqueness of their operations which include smallness of loans and savings, de-emphasis on collateral as a condition for credit delivery, and the simple nature of their operations. The study was designed to estimate growth implications of the intermediation activities of microfinance banks in Nigeria between 1992 and 2016. Data were collected from the statistical bulletin, a publication of the Central Bank of Nigeria. Model estimation was based on the technique of the autoregressive distributed lag (ARDL). Traditional intermediation functions of microfinance banks (deposit mobilization and credit creation) were adopted as explanatory variables while inflation and asset base were introduced as controlled variables. The results show that microfinance banks' deposits play active role in economic growth in Nigeria. This is an indication that microfinance banks are effectively mobilizing rural deposits, an activity that helps to track rural commercial transactions thereby enhancing tax collection by the government and in the process growing the national income. The result further shows that microfinance banks' loans and advances did not support economic growth within the context of our study. Poor credit administration and management may largely account for the negative impact of MFBs loans on growth by turning these institutions into conduits for channeling deposits in non-bankable business proposals. It was further observed that lagged values of GDP significantly promote output growth in the present period. There is also evidence that investment in microfinance bank assets was an impediment to growth during the period under review, an indication of heavy investments in unproductive assets. Finally, growth was also shown to be enhanced by the general price level. Based on the above findings, we conclude that rural financial intermediation, an essential component of financial inclusion, is significant for enhanced economic growth. This paper advocates prudent allocation and efficient management of microfinance banks' loans and advances as well as asset investments in order to optimize the benefits of financial inclusion.
Rural Transformation and Changing Rural-Urban Connections in a Dynamic Region in Tanzania: Perspectives on Processes of Inclusive Development^JAN 2019^EUROPEAN JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT RESEARCH^Changing rural-urban connections are made evident in the patterns and dynamics of rural transformations. This study investigates these transformations by presenting data from a particularly dynamic area: Njombe Region in the Southern Highlands of Tanzania. By taking its empirical point of departure in the development of Njombe Town and its rural hinterland, this paper illustrates how such transformations are manifested in this region and how they influence the livelihoods of rural dwellers, including mobility patterns, livelihood diversification and socio-economic mobility. We argue that, even in dynamic regions with apparently positive levels of development and emerging opportunities, local spatial variations and differences in household characteristics and strategies influence the degree to which people can benefit from the positive aspects of changing and increased links between rural and urban areas. Transformations of rural areas have the potential to increase inequalities and encourage processes of transformation that are not entirely inclusive.
Restoring Rupa lake fisheries and rural livelihoods through rights-based inclusive governance^2019^FAO Fisheries and Aquaculture Technical Paper^This paper presents a case study of the Rupa Lake watershed, where a bottom-up approach to fisheries management was adopted through the formation of the Rupa Lake Restoration and Fisheries Cooperative. The cooperative introduced a fisheries management system based on participation, engagement and inclusiveness that helped restore the lake and its fisheries. The system was designed to be inclusive and to distribute benefits among communities living both up- and downstream from the lake, thus helping ensure the necessary buy-in and behaviour change across diverse stakeholder groups. To collect data on cooperative's contribution to lake and fisheries restoration, and socioeconomic changes in the area, we employed a range of social research methods such as Focus Group Discussion (FGD), Key Informant Surveys (KIS), Direct Observations and review of secondary information. At the core of the discussions we contextualized the human rights-based approach (HRBA) to development and Voluntary Guidelines for Securing Sustainable Small-Scale Fisheries connecting Food Security and Poverty Eradication (SSF Guidelines). Results indicate that households were satisfied with the efforts of the cooperative in promoting lake restoration, increasing fishery production and fishing incomes, and in supporting development activities including education and loans to modernize traditional farming methods in catchment areas. A majority of respondents agreed that inclusive rights-based governance contributed to socio-economic improvements, implying that such an approach to sustainable development for fisheries can be applied elsewhere. The results also confirm that the HRBA and democratic practices adopted by the cooperative succeeded in engaging the people and ensuring the benefits were shared among them. In summary, the keys to success of the cooperative include inclusion and fair representation, empowerment of marginalized communities, transparent governance, and equity in benefit- and burden-sharing. However, some grievances were also reported by certain communities. Thus, potential conflict is likely in the future if proactive management and governance are not properly pursued.
Landscape, Architecture and Environmental Regeneration: A Research by Design Approach for Inclusive Tourism in a Rural Village in China^JAN 1 2019^SUSTAINABILITY^This paper presents project-based research focusing on regeneration for sustainable tourism in a rural village in China, namely Dongjingyu Village, Yuyang Township, Ji County. The research by design approach was applied, introducing to the Chinese context the concept of landscape services, with a particular focus on tradition and the evolution of historical landscape element (HLE) categories and types, whose value is determined by a qualifying relationship between human beings and the environment. The aim was to regenerate and transform the village for uses that are suitable to contemporary ways of coexistence between villagers and the growing tourism industry. Although there are partial limitations to the application of participatory methodologies in the Chinese context, the authors opted for a methodological approach based on research by design in order to foster dialogue and create awareness for both government authorities and citizens regarding potential design solutions, which were determined based on landscape patterns and not only land use. Two outcomes were achieved: (1) the research working package might lead to experimental actions, including changes to land-use models, administration capabilities and considerations of feasibility; and (2) the entire work package can be applied to and implemented in other rural villages in China. Moving beyond environmental scenarios, the outcomes provide evidence that participation and social inclusion might have a deeper and more positive impact on rural village regeneration.
The Exclusive Nature of Inclusive Productive Employment in the Rural Areas of Northern Ethiopia^DEC 2018^WORK EMPLOYMENT AND SOCIETY^Inclusiveness, with its emphasis on productive employment, has become central in development policy. From this perspective, unwaged-work is condemned for not being sufficiently productive; that is, for failing to lift incomes above a poverty threshold. However, insights from the sociology of work reveal a range of unwaged activities that are potentially highly productive in their contribution to self-reliance. The article explores whether these activities are undermined by the promotion of inclusiveness. The case study takes place in Tigray, Ethiopia. Through semi-structured interviews, the activities of different households were classified according to a typology of work based on the work of Gorz, Illich, Wheelock, Taylor, Williams and others. Results show the heterogeneous character of work and shed light on the meaning of productivity. The article ends with a discussion on the risk that inclusiveness may be achieved by replacing activities 'that count' with activities 'that can be counted'.
The role of emerging technologies in inclusive innovation: the case of nanotechnology in South Africa^OCT 2018^SCIENCE AND PUBLIC POLICY^Inclusive innovation seeks to understand how new technologies can provide benefits for the poor and marginalized. However, the role emerging technologies might play in inclusive innovation is not well understood. We synthesize inclusive innovation frameworks with work on equity and emerging technologies by examining the South African National Nanotechnology Strategy. Through document analysis and interviews, we find that some nanotechnology projects address problems of poor communities. The future nanotechnology workforce also reflects South Africa's diversity. Nanotechnology research supports existing businesses and has helped create some new firms, which might increase employment. Overall, the effort created nanotechnology innovation that is somewhat inclusive in its intent, impact, process, and structure. However, innovation could be more inclusive and just by focusing more on technology transfer systems for disadvantaged communities and on rural development. The case illustrates that combining inclusive innovation and equity frameworks provides more specific policy pathways and deeper understanding of justice.
THE CONTINUOUS FORMATION OF TEACHERS FOR AN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION IN RURAL AREA COLOMBIA^OCT-DEC 2018^REVISTA CONRADO^Given the imperatives of economic, social and political development, related to the continuous training of teachers in the rural area, it is necessary, in the Colombian context and in the framework of existing normative documents, to support the requirements that condition such training, from the potentialities and needs manifested in the attention to diversity in rural conditions, in the work with the multigrade and in the orientation to family and community work. Hence the direction of this work towards the proposal of requirements for the continuous training of teachers for an inclusive education in rural area Colombia from the theoretical-methodological and empirical systematization of the criteria related to the definitions of the term continuous training, principles that are assumed, the characteristics and models, as bases of professional and human development of teachers in the rural area of Colombia to respond to the problems posed by the scientific and technological advancement and the objectives of the 2030 Agenda for Sustainable Development.
Recent finance advances in information technology for inclusive development: a systematic review^OCT 2018^NETNOMICS^The overarching question tackled in this paper is: to what degree has financial development contributed to providing opportunities of human development for those on low-incomes and by which information technology mechanisms? We systematically review about 180 recently published papers to provide recent information technology advances in finance for inclusive development. Retained financial innovations are structured along three themes. They are: (i) the rural-urban divide, (ii) women empowerment and (iii) human capital in terms of skills and training The financial instruments are articulated with case studies, innovations and investment strategies with particular emphasis, inter alia on: informal finance, microfinance, mobile banking, crowdfunding, microinsurance, Islamic finance, remittances, Payment for Environmental Services (PES) and the Diaspora Investment in Agriculture (DIA) initiative.
Assessing local-scale inclusive wealth: a case study of Sado Island, Japan^SEP 2018^SUSTAINABILITY SCIENCE^Present trends of urbanization are accompanied by increasing demographic and economic shrinkage of rural regions. In countries such as Japan, these rural regions trail behind metropolitan counterparts according to GDP, the conventional measure used to guide governmental policies. Yet, past research suggests that these regions may be undervalued. Further, the Inclusive Wealth Index (IWI), largely only used at the national level, may be able to capture aspects previously missed. As such, our study attempts to highlight the wealth of rural regions by comparing the inclusive wealth of Sado Island and Japan between 1990 and 2014. Minor methodological modifications were made according to data availability at the local level and to improve the accuracy of human capital estimations. Results captured the ongoing shrinkage of Sado and demonstrate the distinct potential of the IWI as a stock measure. Sado's per capita wealth was about 10% lower than the national averages, but its natural capital was about threefold national averages. Supplementary estimations of the natural capital of fisheries and cultivated forests suggest that inclusion of additional factors in the evaluation would further increase the relative valuation of rural regions. We discuss implications of our estimations for wellbeing, and conclude with a critical appraisal of the IWI calculation towards policy implementation of the index.
Indigenous peoples, the city and inclusive urban development policies in Latin America: Lessons from Bolivia and Ecuador^JUL 2018^DEVELOPMENT POLICY REVIEW^The historical construction of indigeneity as essentially rural policy category represents a key cause for the ongoing exclusion of urban indigenous peoples and blocks progress in delivering Agenda 2030 in Latin American cities. Even in Bolivia and Ecuador, where urban indigeneity is recognized through constitutional reforms, there are obstacles to the delivery of policies shaped to urban indigenous interests. By reviewing experiences from these countries, this article highlights that policy delivery problems are a result of multiple factors, including (1) rural constructions of indigeneity, (2) conflicting development priorities, and (3) difficulties in promoting universal rights while simultaneously guaranteeing indigenous rights. The article concludes with policy recommendations for more inclusive urban development approaches which leave no indigenous person behind.
A modified Continuous Quality Improvement approach to improve culturally and socially inclusive care within rural health services^JUN 2018^AUSTRALIAN JOURNAL OF RURAL HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.037  </td>  <td>1.249</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
ATTITUDE OF TEACHER TRAINEES TOWARDS INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^MAY 2018^MIER-JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL STUDIES TRENDS AND PRACTICES^Globally schools are becoming more inclusive in practice to provide meaningful learning experiences to students with disabilities in the least restrictive environment. Research has documented that teachers with positive attitudes toward inclusion are more likely to modify their instruction and curriculum to meet individual needs of students and have a more positive approach to inclusion. It is the responsibility of teacher training programmes to prepare teachers who can meet expectations of implementing inclusive education programme effectively. The present study was aimed to explore the views of teacher trainees undergoing two-year Bachelor of Education (B. Ed.) programme about inclusion and their readiness to teach in inclusive classrooms. In this study, the Scale of Teachers' Attitudes Toward Inclusive Classrooms (STATIC) was used to collect data and 300 teacher trainees studying in their second year of the teacher training programme in two colleges of education in Jammu city were included in the study. The results indicated that generally, teacher trainees had a positive attitude toward inclusion in schools. The findings highlight that there was a significant difference in attitude towards inclusion between urban and rural teacher trainees. However, there was no significant difference in the attitude towards inclusion among the sub-groups of teacher trainees on the basis of qualification, previous awareness about inclusion or familiarity with the disability in the family. Some suggestions and recommendations for improvement of teacher education programmes vis-a-vis inclusion have also been given.
THE PREPARATION OF THE TEACHER OF THE SUBURBAN AREAS, PREMISE FOR AN INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^APR-JUN 2018^REVISTA UNIVERSIDAD Y SOCIEDAD^Education systems around the world face the challenge of providing children and young people with quality education, which means responding to the diversity of the present needs of all learners, from an inclusive education, which means equality, dignity, in particular, it is necessary to focus on comprehensive educational care for schoolchildren with learning disorders in the first cycle of primary education, as they form part of a heterogeneity of schoolchildren who, due to their characteristics, require the creation of conditions and resources for Comprehensive training. The work presented is derived from the introduction of results of a doctoral thesis that has a level of application in the High school Immaculate located in the suburban area Ulloa in which a system of continuous training of teaching and teaching managers is required, which demonstrates during their pedagogical practice knowledge, skills and attitudes to face this challenge. In this sense the work aims to: propose some considerations in relation to Inclusive Education as content of the preparation of the teachers of the rural area in Ulloa, Valle Colombia.
Systemic Thinking and Practice Toward Facilitating Inclusive Education: Reflections on a Case of Co-Generated Knowledge and Action in South Africa^APR 2018^SYSTEMIC PRACTICE AND ACTION RESEARCH^This article offers our reflections around a case of facilitating systemic thinking and practice in which the first author of the article (Tlale) interacted with research participants/participant researchers with the intention of strengthening systemic thought and action toward fostering inclusive education in the setting (a rural school in the Eastern Cape in South Africa). We reflect upon the process and also how our engagement was perceived by participants, as expressed in feedback received from them. We point to how Tlale introduced the idea of systemic thinking (to teachers, school management team, school governing body, and a district officer for the district) as tied to the possibility of acting to generate transformation toward a more inclusive educational context for the benefit of the learners at the school in question, thus acting as a systemic mediator on their behalf.
Educational quality thresholds in the diffusion of knowledge with mobile phones for inclusive human development in sub-Saharan Africa^APR 2018^TECHNOLOGICAL FORECASTING AND SOCIAL CHANGE^The study investigates critical masses or thresholds of educational quality at which the diffusion of information with mobile phones enhances inclusive human development. The empirical evidence is based on simultaneity robust Fixed Effects regressions with data from 49 Sub-Saharan African countries for the period 2000-2012. The following findings are established: (1) There are positive marginal and net effects on inclusive development from the interaction between mobile phones and educational quality, (2) Between 10 and 27 pupils per teacher is needed in primary education in order for mobile phones to enhance inclusive human development, (3) From a comparative dimension: (i) English Common law countries enjoy higher net effects compared to their French Civil law counterparts, (ii) positive net effects are more obvious in politically stable (vis-a-vis politically unstable) countries, (iii) positive net impacts are also more apparent in resource-poor (vis-a-vis resource-rich) countries, (iv) low income (vis-a-vis higher income) countries have a higher net effect on inclusive development, (v) landlocked (vis-a-vis unlandlocked) countries experience higher net effects and (iv) Islam-dominated countries have a slightly higher net impact compared to their Christian-oriented counterparts.
Framing inclusive innovation within the discourse of development: Insights from case studies in India^FEB 2018^RESEARCH POLICY^The concept of 'inclusive innovation' for development has become increasingly prominent in both academic and policy discourses, raising important questions as to how this is being framed. Results from case studies conducted in India suggest inclusive innovation to be interpretively flexible and. contested. One case presents a grassroots framing emphasising social and political empowerment, rooted in community self-sufficiency, autonomy and traditional belief systems. In contrast, the other cases co-opt the language of inclusion to present a predominantly market-based framing, heavily emphasising market readiness and participation. This framing is transforming rural social practices (including the organisation of space and time, the meaning of production and the role of women), introducing the potential for market dependency.
Dilemma and Path Analysis of the Development of Inclusive Finance in Rural Areas in Hubei Province^2018^INTERNATIONAL SYMPOSIUM 2018 - SOCIAL SCIENCE MANAGEMENT AND INNOVATION^The development of inclusive finance was explicitly proposed in the Third Plenary Session of the 18th Central Committee of the CPC, and Hubei province gradually established the inclusive financial system in line with national policies and constantly promoted financial reform. There are still many problems in the development of rural inclusive finance in Hubei province due to its weak foundation and complex situation. This paper analyzes these problems and the path of the inclusive finance in rural areas in Hubei province.
Inclusive kindergarten leadership in a rural setting^2018^EDUCATIONAL ADMINISTRATION INNOVATION FOR SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT^The aim of this study is to establish: (1) an overview of a principal's transformational leadership and teachers' pedagogic competence in a rural inclusive kindergarten; (2) the effect of a principal's transformational leadership on teachers' pedagogic competence in an inclusive kindergarten in a rural setting. The research method implemented in the present study is a descriptive one, using a quantitative approach. The primary data is collected through questionnaire, while secondary data is gathered using interviews and observation. Respondents for this study were the principal, teachers, staff, and students' parents of an inclusive kindergarten in a rural area. The result of the study showed that there was a positive and significant correlation between the principal's transformational leadership and the teachers' pedagogic competence. It implies that transformational leadership is an effective leadership style in managing an inclusive kindergarten in a rural setting.
Inclusive Competitiveness (R) at Temple Engineering^2018^2018 WORLD ENGINEERING EDUCATION FORUM - GLOBAL ENGINEERING DEANS COUNCIL (WEEF-GEDC)^In today's economy, institutions of higher learning play important roles in driving economic engines. Added to this are their responsibilities in creating social and environmental infrastructures in which everyone will thrive. Consequently, Temple Engineering's Center for Inclusive Competitiveness has developed a strategic plan to produce clearer opportunities for inclusive economic mobility through sustainability related industries across Pennsylvania. Pennsylvania's economy is lagging, in spite of extraordinary natural resources in energy, agriculture and health industries. Ranked #26 for economic growth and #43 for employment (USNews 2017), the Commonwealth is struggling to produce enough talent and entrepreneurs able to build technology enriched urban centers while simultaneously supporting strong rural agriculture across PA. Temple Engineering offers a bridge between rural and urban communities by tying economic growth to engineering infrastructure that improve social and humanitarian outcomes. This paper will present our strategies for engaging diverse faculty, students, community leaders, economic development experts and industry partners in our approach to engineering education for urban sustainability and social justice. The Center is expected to intensify recruitment and retainment of students from urban community as partners.
CommunalAudit, a guide for municipalities in Austria to foster inclusive and sustainable development^2018^STUDIES IN AGRICULTURAL ECONOMICS^Municipalities in Austria have been exploring ways to adopt inclusive and sustainable development approaches based on the built environment. It is a fact that the tasks of municipalities are becoming more and more comprehensive, while the resources available are not increasing to the same extent. However, the sustainable provision of municipal public services must remain a key component in strengthening rural areas. One way is to conduct a CommunalAudit. In addition to the identification of optimisation and development options, the CommunalAudit tool serves as a basis for inter-communal cooperation. Moreover, it enables municipalities to look at their finances and entire infrastructure in an objective and systematic way and to compare them with those of others. Between 2008 and 2013, the CommunalAudit was one of the measures within the Rural Development Programme in Austria. This contribution (a) explores the implementation of CommunalAudit in Austria, (b) highlights the benefits and drawbacks for municipalities and citizenry, and (c) looks at the former's further development.
Evaluation of the Development of Rural Inclusive Finance: A Case Study of Baoding, Hebei province^2018^2018 4TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON ECONOMICS, MANAGEMENT AND HUMANITIES SCIENCE (ECOMHS 2018)^"Inclusive Finance", means that everyone has financial needs to access high-quality financial services at the right price in a timely and convenient manner with dignity. This paper uses IFI index method to evaluate the development level of rural inclusive finance in various counties of Baoding, Hebei province in 2016, and finds that rural inclusive finance in each country has a low level of development, banks and other financial institutions have few branches and product types, the farmers in that area have conservative financial concepts and rural financial service facilities are not perfect. In response to these problems, it is proposed to increase the development of inclusive finance; encourage financial innovation; establish financial concepts and cultivate financial needs; improve broadband coverage and accelerate the popularization of information.
Assessment of financial inclusive policy in Indian economy^2018^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF ETHICS AND SYSTEMS^None
School leadership towards the modeling of an inclusive school culture and high expectations^JAN-JUN 2018^REVISTA DE INVESTIGACION EDUCATIVA DE LA ESCUELA DE GRADUADOS EN EDUCACION^The modeling of an inclusive school culture and high expectations, constitute an important challenge for educational leadership in vulnerable contexts. This article approaches the study carried out in a school of a semi-rural commune in Chile. The research type is qualitative, it aims to describe the strategies implemented by the management team of a school that belongs to the public educational system. The analysis results and interpretation of the information show that the practices launched by the management team are still at an incipient level to create a culture of high expectations and the educational response to diversity is restricted, as the inclusion continues to be associated only to students with special educational needs. It is needed to strengthen the training of management teams in the capacities development to support and mobilize inclusive teaching practices and high expectations.
Exclusions in inclusive programs: state-sponsored sustainable development initiatives amongst the Kurichya in Kerala, India^DEC 2017^AGRICULTURE AND HUMAN VALUES^We critically discuss the impact of sustainable development initiatives in Kerala, India, on biodiversity and on women farmers in the matrilineal Adivasi community of the Kurichya-tribe in Wayanad. By contextualizing development programs regarding the specifically gendered access to land, division of labor, distribution of knowledge and decision-making power, we situate our analysis within the theoretical framework of feminist political ecology. We first outline women's gaining of social and political space in local self-government institutions (Panchayath) and then critically discuss the impacts of women's farming groups (Joint Liability Groups: JLGs). Decentralization and development programs have aimed at empowering women and reducing poverty through improved food security. However, little success has materialized, as patriarchal power structures concerning decision-making processes as well as control over the most valuable resources (land and rice) and traditional knowledge have been maintained. Whereas women's self-help groups (Kudumbasree) in Kerala have enhanced their position, women's farming groups (JLGs), by contrast, have brought little betterment. In some cases they have even downsized women's management and knowledge of resources related to agriculture and do not integrate or enhance Kurichya women's knowledge. As some women are now introducing high-yielding rice seeds and fertilizer and as it is impossible for them to control land and get access to traditional rice seeds-the domain of men-we contest the notion of women being considered the preservers of agrobiodiversity. We argue, rather, that the construction and transformation of ecological traditional knowledge is highly dependent on the gendered multi-scaled power structures of state and community.
Decalege of Inclusive Models of the Older Adult Population in Rural Public Policies: A comparison based on demand in Ecuador^NOV 2017^METHAODOS-REVISTA DE CIENCIAS SOCIALES^In this paper, we analyze the performance of the Ecuadorian model of inclusive care for the elderly population. Specifically, in an rural area of the coast, and through a concrete provincial demand. That maintains very specific rural characteristics. His older population is very demanding, which require appropriate responses in provincial Public policies. All this in a new Administrative model (Sumak kawsay). The new model of management requires Best practices and appropriate testing models, observing potentially applicable foreign systems, such as the Spanish case. These models barely meet the decolonial demands. Hence, any comparison must take a position on the demand and model. In this case, rural inclusion in Ecuador.
Inclusive wealth of regions: the case of Japan^NOV 2017^SUSTAINABILITY SCIENCE^The Inclusive Wealth Index (IWI) is a stock-based comprehensive indicator used to evaluate sustainability based on the wealth of nations, including a finer scale that considers the wealth of regions, in which these indicators are required for governance in the administrative regional hierarchies to achieve Sustainable Development Goals. However, few studies have applied the measure to finer-scale wealth relative to the national level. In this paper, we fill the gap by examining the IWI in all prefectures in Japan, where sustainability is increasingly being lost as a result of depopulation, an aging population, and the excessive burden of environmental regulations. We determined that all regions in Japan maintained sustainability from 1991 to 2000. Then, regional sustainability was lost in 8 prefectures from 2001 to 2005 and in 28 prefectures from 2006 to 2010. This trend is consistent with those found in previous studies, though more severe. The decreasing wealth growth is caused by the increasing damage to health capital, mainly in rural areas, whereas produced capital has had positive effects but has not mitigated the damage. Finally, we illustrate how this index can be applied to evaluate projects in response to the intense debate in regional public policy for rural sustainability through a case study of seawalls as a recovery project in the wake of the Great East Japan earthquake.
From Awareness to Action: Teacher Attitude and Implementation of LGBT-Inclusive Curriculum in the English Language Arts Classroom^NOV 1 2017^SAGE OPEN^This survey research describes English language arts teachers' comfort levels in integrating literature with lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender (LGBT) themes or characters into their curricula and classroom practices. Significant relationships were found between teachers' age, comfort, awareness of resources, and implementation levels. Although younger teachers had higher comfort levels with LGBT texts, they displayed lower resource awareness levels and static implementation rates. In addition, comfort, awareness, and implementation of LGBT curriculum materials were also correlated with teacher location and with strength of religious belief, with rural teachers and strongly religious teachers displaying lower comfort and implementation levels. Availability of supportive resources such as gay-straight alliances (GSAs) and library holdings, as well as teachers' awareness of these resources, is also examined. Specific barriers rural teachers encounter when implementing LGBT-inclusive literature/curriculum are identified. A call for future research and professional development is extended.
Longitudinal Analysis of Nut-Inclusive Diets and Body Mass Index Among Overweight and Obese African American Women Living in Rural Alabama and Mississippi, 2011-2013^SEP 2017^PREVENTING CHRONIC DISEASE^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.038  </td>  <td>2.844</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Universal access to clean cooking energy and the need for an inclusive policy: evidence from analysis of cooking fuel use in Odisha and Tamil Nadu^SEP 2017^DECISION^This paper briefly maps the existing policies on clean cooking fuel and examines the achievements to increase the coverage of clean energy for cooking in India and emphasizes the need to go beyond the 'price' and 'income' criteria in targeting universal access to clean fuel for cooking. By undertaking a comparative analysis of cooking fuel use patterns across two states, differentiated in terms of key economic parameters, this paper highlights policies that aimed at clean fuel switching in India need to pay attention to social groups, gender and location (rural/urban) to make clean cooking fuel policies more inclusive in order to realize the target of universal access to clean cooking energy. The analysis was carried out across expenditure categories, social groups and female-headed households. The results show wide disparity in clean cooking fuel use across the states as well as across different expenditure categories, social groups and female-headed households and geographical locations within states. The data source for the analysis is the National Sample Survey Organisation and Census.
Does Institutional Linkage of Bank-MFI Foster Inclusive Financial Development Even in the Presence of MFI Frauds?^JUL 2017^SCOTTISH JOURNAL OF POLITICAL ECONOMY^Growing reports indicate the presence of frauds in microfinance institutions (MFIs), as it can occur in any organization in countries where there are weak institutions, weak rule of law, and fraudulent behavior of MFI officers for personal gain. While there are increasing calls to launch financial governance of these NGO MFIs, there are concerns as to whether frauds of this nature can damage MFIs' contributions to the credit market, particularly in the bank-linkage program where the NGO MFIs act as third party intermediary. The purpose of this study was to analyze the collusion decisions faced by MFIs and their impact on the bank-linkage program, which has been offered as a solution to help overcome adverse selection and moral hazard problems in the credit market by harnessing local information via MFIs. Our results show that even when there is a chance of collusion between MFI and the borrower, the linkage between MFI and bank can still increase the probability that the borrower puts in full effort, and therefore decreases the probabilities of both credit rationing and strategic default. Such linkage in financing viable projects can make micro-financing more effective in achieving inclusive financial development and thereby poverty reduction in rural areas.
Profile and functions of psychopedagogue in the context of an inclusive school^JUN 2017^REVISTA DE EDUCACION INCLUSIVA^The psychopedagogic praxis is considered another action in the centre for promoting the school change. In this qualitative study case, which was carried out in a clustered rural center (CRA), we expect to apprehend the psychopedagogic functions, to confirm the approach intervention and to verify the incidence degree in the centre in favor of the inclusion. The results allow an orientation towards clinic approach on account of the community demands, the expert role that has been assigned to himself and the deficient perception towards the NEE. Even so, there are some elements in favor of the inclusive school.
Does MGNREGS Promote Inclusive Growth? What do Evidence Indicate?^JUN 2017^ASIAN JOURNAL OF AGRICULTURE AND DEVELOPMENT^The Mahatma Gandhi National Rural Employment Guarantee Scheme (MGNREGS) in India seeks to provide a specified number of days of employment at a specified wage rate to interested rural households, and ensures equal wages between male and female workers. MGNREGS will benefit wage seekers directly by providing assured employment and pay, which will enhance their purchasing power; and indirectly by increasing the rural market wage rate. The nature of work of some employment opportunities under MGNREGS will likely improve the infrastructure at both community and individual levels, mostly of small-scale and marginal farmers, which is expected to improve the income levels of the poor. Using evidence from Andhra Pradesh before its bifurcation, the present study sought to determine if MGNREGS promotes inclusive growth. The empirical study used both primary and secondary data. The analyses reveal that MGNREGS promotes inclusive growth by augmenting open-market wages, reducing gender wage differentials, increasing the proportion of Scheduled Castes among the participating households, improving the employment and income levels of wage seekers, and deriving substantial benefits compared to government expenditure on the Scheme.
Community-Based Monitoring and Protected Areas: Towards an Inclusive Model^MAY-JUN 2017^SUSTAINABLE DEVELOPMENT^Operational, financial and conceptual issues hinder protected area (PA) conservation goals, particularly in mega-diverse countries where highly impoverished human communities live within their boundaries. We (a) highlight the relevance of community-based biological monitoring for linking local communities with PAs to enhance their functionality, achieve conservation objectives and promote social development, (b) pinpoint key elements for establishing community-based biological monitoring programs and (c) propose an inclusive model for PAs where the active participation of communities is essential. Through community-based biological monitoring, PAs enhance the performance of species monitoring, surveillance, development and operation of management plans, local communities' engagement in conservation, and research activities. In turn, communities increase their knowledge on local natural resources, and acquire abilities needed to identify and quantify them, and ultimately lead to more informed decisions regarding their management and conservation. It is essential to consider PAs and local communities as a unit to achieve an integrated conservation approach. Copyright (C) 2016 John Wiley &amp; Sons, Ltd and ERP Environment
Data capture and communication during transfers to definitive care in an inclusive trauma system^MAY 2017^INJURY-INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF THE CARE OF THE INJURED^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.834  </td>  <td>2.216</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Teaching in the Cracks: Using Familiar Pedagogy to Advance LGBTQ-Inclusive Curriculum^MAY-JUN 2017^JOURNAL OF ADOLESCENT &amp; ADULT LITERACY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.25  </td>  <td>1.523</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Enhancing Climate Change Resilience Through Microfinance: Redefining the Climate Finance Paradigm to Promote Inclusive Growth in Africa^MAR 2017^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPING SOCIETIES^Poverty, inequality, unemployment, and unsustainable resource consumption are prevalent in Africa due to a lack of inclusive growth. The impacts of climate change are also considered to have hindered progress on achieving the Millennium Development Goals. Through literature reviews and policy analyses, this article presents suggestions on how inclusive growth can be attained in the post-2015 development agenda, and also presents a framework to enable microfinance institutions to promote both inclusive growth, and climate change mitigation and adaptation. The article shows that microfinance can support the mobilization of resources for climate change programs; hence, financial inclusion should be incorporated in climate change policies.
Monitoring inclusive education in Chile: Differences between urban and rural areas^MAR 2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL DEVELOPMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.406  </td>  <td>1.637</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Sustainable biodiversity stewardship and inclusive development in South Africa: a novel package for a sustainable future^FEB 2017^CURRENT OPINION IN ENVIRONMENTAL SUSTAINABILITY^Sustainable biodiversity stewardship (SBS) is needed on private lands in order to promote inclusive development (ID). Managing private land for conservation and landscape functionality can be costly, therefore, fiscal incentives like income tax deductions and property rates exclusions can help encourage biodiversity stewardship and thereby contribute to meeting the social and ecological goals of inclusive development. The experience of South Africa shows that such fiscal incentives can ensure that private landowners protect ecosystems, improve water yields, mitigate fire and flood risks, and promote landscape-scale connectivity. Furthermore, it can contribute to broader socio-economic goals such as rural development, inclusion of marginalized or disadvantaged communities and create green jobs. This paper reports that many private landowners have entered into agreements for biodiversity stewardship.
The redevelopment of peri-urban villages in the context of path-dependent land institution change and its impact on Chinese inclusive urbanization: The case of Nanhai, China^FEB 2017^CITIES^Following nearly three decades of urban sprawl, China's urbanization has entered a new era of land redevelopment that encompasses built-up land in villages in a manner that is unprecedented. Village redevelopment involves both dramatic institutional change and governance restructuring. The extant literature on this redevelopment focuses primarily on top-down initiatives launched by urban governments, paying little attention to villages' responses as actual landholders. Through a case study of village redevelopment in Nanhai, this paper examines villages' behaviour during periods of institutional change and their interactions with urban governments to shape final outcomes. Institutional uncertainty emerges during path-dependent institutional change, as revealed through the absence of effectively executed planning control and unclearly defined profit sharing. As a result, villages and urban governments sign incomplete contracts for entire redevelopment plans. Such agreements result in disordered competition for land rents that take the form of villages 'holding up' the government that has previously made a commitment to the village pursuant to the contracts. Villages maximize their profits and attenuate the" government's role in ensuring public revenue, whereas government compromises related to development control challenge the capacity of limited public governance. The government's concessions related to profit distribution result in increased inequality between more prosperous villages and other groups, such as migrant populations and remote rural villages. Research findings contribute to a comprehensive understanding of newly created governance in redevelopment and call for a critical evaluation of existing urban renewal policies to ensure that urbanization is an inclusive process. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Inclusive Development and the Asymmetric State: Big Projects and Local Communities in the Brazilian Amazon^2017^JOURNAL OF DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^In 2003, the Workers' Party took federal office in Brazil on an agenda of social inclusion and popular participation. This paper explores attempts to implement that agenda in big infrastructure projects in the Amazon: the BR-163 road and the Belo Monte dam. We argue that overlapping inequalities (between social groups, within the bureaucracy and between territorial centre and periphery) result in uneven state capacities for implementing projects in the Amazon. This framework helps explain why the government has moved much faster in building infrastructure than in implementing participatory social and environmental programmes that would benefit affected local communities.
REDD plus as "inclusive' neoliberal conservation: the case of Lindi, Tanzania^2017^JOURNAL OF EASTERN AFRICAN STUDIES^In recent years, market-based conservation has emerged as the panacea' to the environmental crises we face today. A prominent example of this trend is REDD+, which turns terrestrial carbon in the global South into fictitious commodities that can be sold for profit. In this paper, we conceptualise REDD+ as a form of inclusive' neoliberal conservation, highlighting how neoliberalism has embraced notions of good governance, local ownership, social safeguards and active citizenship when promoting global conservation markets. While demonstrating the genuine efforts by project proponents to practice inclusion', we highlight their limits due to larger structural inequalities and demonstrate how the commodification of carbon inevitably causes new forms of inclusion and exclusion to local forest users. Based on ethnographic fieldwork in two forest-dependent villages in the Lindi Region of Tanzania, where two different REDD+ projects were underway, we show how material and discursive powers shaped inclusive' strategies to market forest-carbon. We then locate these strategies, concerned with the commodification of forest-carbon, within a historical field of power struggles and local politics over forest resources, strongly evidenced in contestations around establishing community-based forest management. We argue that a sharp disjuncture operated between the inclusive' strategies to market forest-carbon and the historical dimensions and power relations within the area; resulting in new forms of inclusions and exclusions, both in and outside rural villages.
BRIDGING THE DIGITAL DIVIDE THROUGH PARTICIPATORY ACTION RESEARCH AND INCLUSIVE COMMUNICATION SYSTEMS^2017^INTED2017: 11TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^None
Prospects of Green entrepreneurship as a driver for sustainable and inclusive economic growth in rural Ghana^2017^ENTERPRISE AND COMPETITIVE ENVIRONMENT^None
The Measures and Effect Analysis of China Postal Savings Bank in Developing Inclusive Finance-Taking Sichuan Branch as an Example^2017^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2017 INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION MANAGEMENT (ICEDEM 2017)^As one of the major agriculture-related banks, Postal Savings Bank of China has adhered to the market positioning of serving agriculture, rural areas and farmers, serving small and micro-enterprises and serving the community and actively innovating in science and technology Products, continue to provide financial support for rural economic development. This paper discusses the post office bank of China in the process of inclusive finance development, a series of policy measures, and made great achievements. However, in the development of inclusive finance still exist some problems in the process, aiming at these problems this paper put forward the feasible countermeasures and Suggestions, for example, we should Strengthen the construction of risk control and management system to enhance anti-risk ability, strengthen the construction of information equipment, strengthen the training and management of postal savings professionals, implement differentiated management, in order to promote inclusive financial development process.
Research on System Construction of Inclusive Supervision of Rural Finance in China^2017^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2017 5TH INTERNATIONAL EDUCATION, ECONOMICS, SOCIAL SCIENCE, ARTS, SPORTS AND MANAGEMENT ENGINEERING CONFERENCE (IEESASM 2017)^The current financial supervision system has caused serious financial exclusion in rural areas, and restricted the development of rural economy and finance in China. We should rethink the development of rural finance from the perspective of inclusive supervision and promote the innovative development of rural finance in China. This paper discusses the concept, characteristics and necessity of inclusive supervision of rural finance and gives the admittance mechanism, regulation mechanism and coordination mechanism of inclusive financial supervision to provide some references for the relative researchers.
ICT and pupils of rural areas: between the digital gap and inclusive education^2017^BORDON-REVISTA DE PEDAGOGIA^INTRODUCTION. This article discusses the relationship between ICT and pupils living in rural areas. Our work aims to verify whether ICT are contributing to inclusive education for students more isolated of the global context and minimizing some of the disadvantages of rural schools or, otherwise whether these contribute to perpetuate the digital divide. We show both socio-demographic factors of the rural environment of Castile and Leon where the study is contextualized, as the binomial ICT-rural school. METHOD. This research is based on qualitative methodology (36 personal interviews and 4 focus groups) with the participation of different stakeholders in the educational community studied: f/mothers, teachers, headteachers, presidents of fathers and mothers' association and students. RESULTS. The data obtained show that students in rural schools would perform an even greater use of ICT than their urban counterparts. However, differences remain in rural areas between predominantly rural areas and intermediate rural areas. Therefore, the geographic gap adds to the digital divide in some of the most predominantly rural areas but not all, showing that there is still no equal educational opportunities for rural students. The main variable would be the relationship between each teacher and ICT. DISCUSSION. The digital divide is still present in some rural areas and their schools, despite significant improvements in equipment in recent years. Unlike previous lustrums, the main line of intervention would not focus much on material aspects but the teacher, which will have the responsibility to minimize the digital divide, heading towards a more inclusive education and Social Justice for rural students.
Internet penetration, Inclusive Financial Development and the Growth in Per Capita Income^2017^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2017 9TH INTERNATIONAL ECONOMICS, MANAGEMENT AND EDUCATION TECHNOLOGY CONFERENCE (IEMETC 2017)^The emergence of internet finance provides the inclusive finance with a broader connotation and more abundant development approaches. In this article, we use the panel data of the 31 provinces in Chinese mainland from 2010 to 2014 to calculate the inclusive finance development indexes in various regions, and apply the fixed effects regression model of panel data to empirically analyze the influence of internet and inclusive finance development on the per capita income level. Researches show that the development of internet and inclusive finance can improve the per capita income level effectively. In the control variables, local per capita public finance expenditure and per capita fixed investments are also positively related to the per capita income level. China shall continue to play the positive role of internet technology and closely be integrated with the inclusive finance so as to jointly improve the per capita income level in urban and rural areas.
Urban Poverty: Trends, Assessment, and Inclusive Planning as a Solution^2017^FROM POVERTY, INEQUALITY TO SMART CITY^None
INCLUSIVE AND INTERCULTURAL EDUCATION IN RURAL AND URBAN AREAS OF DIFFICULT ACCESS^2017^CADERNOS EDUCACAO TECNOLOGIA E SOCIEDADE^None
COMPARATIVE STUDY ON THE IDENTIFICATION OF TEACHERS' NEED FOR INCLUSIVE EDUCATION TRAINING^2017^EDU WORLD 7TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE^Inclusive education is one of the components of today's education defined by its inter-and transdisciplinary features. Observing the implicit demand to train teachers for inclusive education in Romania, this study aims to raise awareness of this need and verify its intensity in teachers. The general hypothesis of the observational study states that as teachers climb the steps of the educational system, their need to prepare for inclusive education diminishes. The method used was the questionnaire-based inquiry. The questionnaire comprised 18 items with open and closed questions. The sample consisted of a total of 400 teachers, 100 for each of the 3 stages of the pre-university educational system (preschool, primary, middle education, respectively 50 from the urban and 50 from the rural environment in each category) and 50 teachers each from high-school and the university educational system. The recorded data and conclusions of the study could constitute an analysis of the needs for future research-development projects. They will allow the creation of inclusive education modules/programs in the university environment. (C) 2017 Published by Future Academy
Could Practicum Placements in Contrasting Contexts Support the Preparation of Pre-Service Teachers for an Envisaged Inclusive Education System? A South African study^2017^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF DISABILITY DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION^In contexts where inclusive education is nascent, teacher educators face the challenge of preparing pre-service teachers for a system that does not yet exist. While this might be possible through university-based coursework, difficulties arise when so few sites that model inclusive pedagogies are available for practicum placements. This article investigates whether practicum placements in contrasting contexts may prepare pre-service teachers for teaching in an envisaged inclusive education system. We analyse the reflections of South African pre-service teachers who have conducted practicum sessions in two contrasting contexts, neither of which offered ideal models of inclusion. We explore the extent to which moving between contexts enabled pre-service teachers to develop orientations towards teaching and learning that Black-Hawkins and Florian identify as essential for promoting and sustaining inclusive pedagogic practices. With reservations, we conclude that practicum placements over contrasting contexts potentially support the preparation of pre-service teachers for inclusive education.
Inclusive institutions and economic growth: comparative perspective and policy implications for China^2017^CHINA ECONOMIC JOURNAL^This paper examines the empirical relationship between the presence of inclusive institutions and the pattern of economic growth in a cross-country setting. We find evidence that the presence of inclusive institutions, indicated by political democracy, positively affects consumption share. In turn, the increase of the latter in the preceding year is associated with a significantly higher rate of total factor productivity (TFP) growth. The link from democracy to TFP growth via consumption is stronger for countries of higher levels of income. These findings suggest that institutional inclusiveness may have become increasingly important for economic growth when the level of income rises. We also provide preliminary evidence that consumption may have facilitated productivity growth via the channels of increasing innovations and reducing social conflicts. The findings shed lights on the structural transformations toward a more inclusive and sustainable model of growth in China today.
An ecologically and socially inclusive model of agritourism to support smallholder livelihoods in the South Pacific^2017^ASIA PACIFIC JOURNAL OF TOURISM RESEARCH^The neglect and marginalisation of smallholders in economic and development policy contributes to increasing vulnerability of rural communities. Underinvestment in agriculture, climate change impacts and growing competition for land and water places further pressure on smallholders. In this context, this paper examines the current focus in the South Pacific on strengthening the linkages between tourism and agriculture through agritourism. The paper seeks to merge multiple discourses, by firstly reviewing the development model that is driving tourism and linkages to agriculture in the South Pacific. Secondly, agritourism as it is conceptualised in the tourism literature and thirdly sustainable tourism discourse, to identify economic activities within agritourism that contribute to enhancing smallholders' livelihoods in the South Pacific. An ecologically and socially inclusive model of agritourism is put forward based on principles of sustainable tourism and agroecology - referred to as agroecological tourism. Agroecological tourism strengthens the linkages between tourism and agriculture while fostering sustainability principles.
INCLUSIVE PRACTICE FOR SPECIAL EDUCATIONAL NEED CARE IN BUCARAMANGA'S RURAL AREA^OCT-DEC 2016^PRAXIS &amp; SABER^The article considers a practical process of care for students with special educational needs, resulting from an inter-institutional research project, through which the Autonomous University of Bucaramanga's specialized knowledge on disabilities and special education was integrated with innovative practices implemented by a rural institution in the Metropolitan area of Bucaramanga. Based on the description of three international models for theorizing and analyzing disabilities and special needs, we proposed an integral care and inclusion procedure. This procedure is characterized by six stages of integral and active education thought for students with both physical and motor special needs.
Promoting inclusive development in Ghana: disabled people's and other stakeholders' perspectives^OCT 2016^DEVELOPMENT IN PRACTICE^This article highlights barriers to inclusive development from the perspective of disabled people, as well as staff of NGOs and government agencies. A qualitative study was conducted between August 2011 and September 2012, and in September 2013, in rural and urban areas in Greater Accra and Eastern regions in Ghana. The research shows that inaccessible public infrastructure and services, negative attitudes of service providers, little political will, limited capacity of development agencies, and lack of multi-agency coordination in the disability development sector were barriers to disabled people's inclusion and participation in development processes. Cet article met en relief les barrieres qui entravent le developpement inclusif du point de vue des personnes handicapees, ainsi que des membres du personnel d'ONG et d'agences gouvernementales. Une etude qualitative a ete menee d'aout 2011 a septembre 2012, puis en septembre 2013, dans des zones rurales et urbaines du Grand Accra et des regions orientales du Ghana. Ces recherches montrent que les infrastructures et services publics inaccessibles, les attitudes negatives des prestataires de services, la volonte politique reduite, les capacites limitees des agences de developpement et le manque de coordination multi-organisations dans le secteur de developpement relatif aux personnes handicapees constituent des barrieres entravant l'inclusion et la participation des personnes aux processus de developpement. A partir de considerar la perspectiva de las personas minusvalidas, el personal de varias ong y las oficinas gubernamentales, el presente articulo da cuenta de las barreras que impiden el desarrollo incluyente en Ghana. En el periodo comprendido entre agosto de 2011 y septiembre de 2012, y luego durante septiembre de 2013, en los espacios rurales y urbanos de la region de Gran Acra y en las regiones orientales de Ghana se llevo a cabo un estudio cualitativo a partir del cual se concluyo que la inaccesibilidad a la infraestructura y a los servicios publicos, asi como las actitudes negativas de los proveedores de servicios, la escasa voluntad politica, la poca capacidad de las agencias para el desarrollo y su falta de coordinacion en el sector de apoyo a los minusvalidos, constituyen barreras que impiden la integracion y la participacion de este sector en los procesos de desarrollo.
Inclusive Education and Mental Health Preservation for Students^AUG 2016^IRANIAN JOURNAL OF PUBLIC HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.225  </td>  <td>1.436</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Teachers' understandings of curriculum adaptations for learners with learning difficulties in primary schools in Botswana: issues and challenges of inclusive education^JUL 2016^JOURNAL OF RESEARCH IN SPECIAL EDUCATIONAL NEEDS^This paper derives from research carried out in a number of Botswana primary schools on teachers' understanding of curriculum adaptations for learners who experience learning difficulties (LD) as part of implementing inclusive education. Teachers' understanding play a crucial role in how they make curriculum accessible for learners with LD during the teaching and learning processes. Interviews with 12 teachers and classroom observations were conducted in six primary schools in urban, semi-urban and rural areas. The data was analysed using qualitative procedures, and results of the study revealed that teachers' understanding of curriculum adaptations seemed embedded within the concept of remedial education where learners with LD are assisted outside the scheduled time of the lesson. The results also showed that teachers' main focus on completing the set curriculum in preparation for examinations compromised curriculum access of learners with LD in general education classrooms.
Biofuel imaginaries: The emerging politics surrounding 'inclusive' private sector development in Madagascar^JUN 2016^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^Biofuels are just one of a host of bioeconomy initiatives which promise to deliver 'inclusive' sustainable development through innovations in bio-based products and services in the global south. Yet to critics, biofuels are seen as prime drivers in a global 'land grab,' rainforest clearance, and the dispossession of farmers. Responding to these concerns, firms in Madagascar have shifted production away from large plantations to small-scale production of the more 'environmentally-friendly' biofuel crop Jatropha curcas. Using a political ecology lens and building upon critical discourse analysis found in cultural political economy, I analyse perspectives of on the material effects and emerging politics surrounding a case of a British-biofuel start-up firm in the northwest Madagascar. I demonstrate that access to biofuel land and labour is dependent upon the inclusion of Malagasy in rural development projects. However, rather than delivering on the promises of biofuels, jatropha has largely emerged as a failed development strategy. This article examines the unaccounted for power that varied and diverse actors derive by promoting the inclusion of individuals and groups to share in benefits, and the material consequences of private sector development in the global south. (C) 2016 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
\ The idealism of education policies and the realities in schools: the implementation of inclusive education in South Africa^MAY 3 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Inclusive education as a global movement emerged over the past 30 years to ensure quality mainstream education for all learners. Since 1994 the newly democratic South Africa also had expectations as well as the political will to change education by adjusting legislation and policies. However, the vision of a truly inclusive education system in South Africa has been difficult to achieve and results regarding the implementation of inclusive education remain questionable. There has been a growing realisation that the advent of democracy was not in itself a sufficient condition for the elimination of historical and structural inequalities in education with as recurring theme the dissonance between the government's socio-political imperative for change and economic realities. This article focuses on the development of policy and guidelines on inclusive education in dynamic interaction with the complexity of realities in South African schools with a special focus on the policy recommendations regarding the development of full-service schools. The constant comparative analysis of the two phased case study of a full-service school in a rural town revealed interesting results illustrating the complexities regarding the implementation of inclusive education and the challenges and opportunities in bridging the gap between the idealism of policies and the realities in schools.
From attitudes to practice: utilising inclusive teaching strategies inKenyan primary schools^APR 2 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^The purpose of this paper is to provide evidence of Kenyan primary school teachers using inclusive teaching strategies in a rural setting with many known barriers to the development of a sustainable inclusive education system. This qualitative study examines teachers' uses of inclusive teaching strategies in primary schools following a series of teacher trainings, classroom observations, individual semi-structured teacher conferences, reflective lesson plans, and pre- and post-questionnaires. Moving beyond legal mandates and attitudinal assessments, the outcomes of this study demonstrate that in a short time, and among a small sample of teachers, administrators, and Ministry officials, a culturally responsive approach to implementing inclusive learning strategies proved beneficial for meeting the needs of diverse primary school students in western Kenya.
The answers are out there! Developing an inclusive approach to collaboration^APR-JUN 2016^RURAL AND REMOTE HEALTH^Professional isolation is a recurring issue in the delivery of rural and remote health care. However, collaboration is now more feasible with developments in technology and connectivity. At an international scale, collaboration offers clear opportunities for good ideas and great work to be shared across distances and boundaries that previously precluded this. This article reflects a presentation given to the Rethinking Remote conference in Inverness (Scotland) in May 2016. A number of factors with regard to infrastructure and engagement are considered, along with ways in which the opportunities of collaboration between individuals and large centres can be optimised. Social media and increased connectivity pave the way for easier access to great practice across international sites that share similar challenges.
An attempt at implementing a holistic inclusive development model: Insights from Malaysia's land settlement scheme^APR 2016^ASIA PACIFIC VIEWPOINT^This paper examines the influences of Malaysia's Federation Land Development Authority (FELDA) scheme in fostering inclusive rural development. Based on the model of holistic inclusive development, the paper investigates the performance of FELDA from four perspectives: social development, industrialisation, modernisation and basic needs. The main findings of the study indicate that, to a large extent, the scheme has successfully stimulated both the social and economic development of the community. Nonetheless, establishing a strong trust, social cohesion and rapport between the public authorities and community remain the main challenges in determining the success of this state-led agenda. Moreover, keeping traditional values in the modern system will be the key principle for the sustainability of the programme if plans are made to adopt the scheme in other regions.
Developing Educators for Inclusive Classrooms through a Rural School-University Partnership^MAR 2016^RURAL SPECIAL EDUCATION QUARTERLY^This narrative illustrates a school-university partnership's attempt to prepare inclusive educators for working in inclusive classrooms. This partnership, located in a rural school located in the southeastern United States, consisted of collaboration between a variety of stakeholders, including school-and university-based educators and district partners committed to preparing a context for pre-service teacher and in-service teacher learning. The narrative shares how the partnership's initiatives assisted in developing pre-service teachers as inclusive educators, enhanced in-service teachers' capacity to teach in inclusive classrooms, created pre-service teacher interest in working in rural schools, and improved student outcomes.
Rural Secondary Educators' Perceptions of Their Efficacy in the Inclusive Classroom^MAR 2016^RURAL SPECIAL EDUCATION QUARTERLY^The purpose of this study was to compare the differences in rural secondary special and general education teachers' perceptions of their efficacy in teaching students in an inclusive classroom. The sample consisted of 148 rural secondary general education and 32 special education teachers. The researchers used an independent-samples t test to determine if there was a difference in the efficacy of student engagement for general and special education teachers. Results indicated there was a significant difference in the efficacy of student engagement for general and special education teachers. The researchers completed further examination using stepwise multiple regression analysis to determine the extent to which teacher characteristics predict efficacy in student engagement. Implications of the findings for policy and practice in rural schools are also discussed.
Moving beyond a destructive past to a decolonised and inclusive future: The role of ubuntu-style education in providing culturally relevant pedagogy for Namibia^FEB 2016^INTERNATIONAL REVIEW OF EDUCATION^Namibia has one of the most dehumanising and destructive colonial pasts of any nation in Africa, or, for that matter, the world. Before colonisation, the area now known as Namibia was home to diverse cultural groups. The successive colonial regimes of Germany and South Africa inflicted genocide, brutality and apartheid on the region. Namibia finally fought for and won its independence in 1990 - over three decades after Ghana became the first independent sub-Saharan nation in 1957. Today, Namibia strives to leave behind its troubled past and harness the power of education to provide greater equality of opportunity and quality of life for all of its citizens. The concept of ubuntu, with its emphasis on inclusiveness, equity and equality, is central to Namibia's pursuit of this goal. Significant challenges stand in its way, including extreme poverty, an emerging economy struggling with drought and a competitive world market, and a populace with multiple mother tongues and cultural traditions. After a brief summary of Namibia's colonial past, this study examines these challenges, noting that the same factors that provide Namibia with a rich and diverse cultural tapestry also pose great difficulties for educators determined to provide equitable education for all. Current inequities in Namibian education are assessed, with a particular focus on the divide between urban and rural Namibia and between the four major ethnic and cultural groupings: the White Afrikaans speakers, the Black African majority, the Coloured population, and the Basters. The study concludes by suggesting multiple ways in which education could be brought closer into line with ubuntu values. The author argues that the very same factors that currently pose challenges to the quality and equity of Namibian education (ethnicity, urban/rural location, gender and socioeconomic class) might, if seen from a new perspective, become the basis for educational transformation.
Swimming upstream: the provision of inclusive care to older lesbian, gay and bisexual (LGB) adults in residential and nursing environments in Wales^FEB 2016^AGEING &amp; SOCIETY^This paper examines the ways in which older people's residential and nursing homes can constitute heteronormative environments - social spaces in which the same-sex attractions and desires of residents are disregarded in the provision of everyday care. The aim of this discussion is to examine the synergies and differences between older lesbian, gay and bisexual (LGB) adults' expectations for future care home provision and the expectations of care staff and managers in providing residential services to older people with diverse sexual backgrounds. We present qualitative evidence from research into the provision of care environments in Wales. In this paper, we present findings from two cohorts: first, from five focus groups with care and nursing staff and managers; and second, from 29 semi-structured interviews with older LGB adults (50-76 years) residing in urban and rural locations across Wales. We argue that residential care environments can constitute heterosexualised spaces in which LGB identities are neglected in comparison to the needs and preferences of other residents. To this extent, we discuss how care staff and managers can be more attentive and responsive to the sexual biographies of all residents and argue against the separation of care and sexual orientation in practice.
For an inclusive and sustainable city, a different property regime^2016^DIREITO E PRAXIS^The article presents a proposal to re-conceptualize urban property in the context of the new Political Constitution for Mexico City, that will be discussed and passed in January 2017. After a review of three sources (legal doctrines, social sciences approaches to property and Mexican law), the author proposes to bring into the urban context a provision that was originally included in the Constitution in 1917 for the regulation of natural resources in the rural world. According to such provision, the State has the power to regulate the use of "natural elements susceptible of appropriation" for the benefit of society at large. Urban space that can be developed is defined here as a natural resource, different from the land's surface, a distinction that will allow to capture for the public the value increments that are produced in the urban processes.
GRADE R TEACHERS' VIEWS ON THE IMPLEMENTATION OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION IN RURAL SCHOOLS OF LIMPOPO PROVINCE, SOUTH AFRICA^2016^EDULEARN16: 8TH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON EDUCATION AND NEW LEARNING TECHNOLOGIES^This qualitative study was designed to explore how a selected group of Grade R (Reception year) teachers view the implementation inclusive education rural schools of Limpopo, a province of South Africa. The aim was to come up with unique and innovative strategies for developing such teachers for inclusive early childhood development (ECD) teaching. A phenomenological research design was employed in order to obtain the views of teachers. Data were sourced from 50 female Grade R teachers, 10 in each of the five districts, through semi-structured interviews. The study found that, inadequate resources, inadequate training in inclusive education for Grade R teachers, and overcrowded classrooms were viewed as factors causing the decline in educational standards. The author of the article suggests unique and innovative ways of implementing inclusive education in rural schools. Future research might benefit from a large-scale study involving all Grade R school teachers in the Limpopo rural schools.
Inclusive Education Practices for a Culturally Responsive Teacher Education Program^2016^INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON INFORMATION SOCIETY (I-SOCIETY 2016)^The purpose of this article is to provide a reflective discussion, using a case study as a teaching and learning strategy to improve academic learner performance. Guided by the social constructivism paradigm and using critical race theory (CRT) as a theoretical framework that places race at the center of educational research and discourse, we provide conditions for the successful implementation of the case study as a teaching and learning strategy for culturally responsive, inclusive education that may improve academic learner performance for indigenous students. After receiving an Institute for Museum and Library Services (IMLS) Laura Bush 21st Century Librarian Program grant, one institution provided distributed, community-based instruction to rural areas and fostered a community of practice to support pre-service school library teachers. This article presents approaches and assessments based on the program that incorporated a culturally responsive pedagogy in its specialized curriculum and created information literacy resources to improve student success in racially diverse and economically disadvantaged northeast Oklahoma schools and communities. The article further reviews factors that influenced learning and teaching in this program. Significant contributions include the creation of a unique program that provides a framework for practicing professionals in K-12. Curriculum, resources, and information literacy tools are made available to help sustain educational efforts for those who serve in similar communities. The planning, design, development and distribution of digital format information literacy modules address education-based needs to enhance information literacy skills, to incorporate "faces of diversity" that help targeted viewers personally relate more positively to the learning experience, and to deliver current "standards based" training resources. Lesson plans and learning resources created during and after the program can continue to provide opportunities for cross-cultural dialogue between Indigenous and Non-Indigenous educators in shared study, mentoring, and faculty/teacher training.
A Psycho-pedagogic Approach for Inclusive Classes in Disadvantaged Rural Primary Schools in South Africa: Advancing Teaching Practices^JAN 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL SCIENCES^This paper focuses on pedagogic processes and dilemmas faced by teachers in inclusive classes with diverse learning barriers in South Africa. It also aimed at strengthening teaching practices and learning-support strategies (TPLSSs) which teachers use in inclusive classes (ICs) in disadvantaged, rural primary schools. There were 19 teachers, including inclusive classroom caregivers (ICCs) in 13 schools (n = 19, mean age = 45, males = 2, females = 17) who participated. A qualitative mode of inquiry was used together with a case-study approach as the research design. Data were thematically analyzed and revealed that learners experiencing barriers to learning (LEBTLs) were still marginalized and minimally-supported in the classroom context while teachers used unsuitable pedagogic approaches which were an indication of inadequate lesson planning. A pedagogic-inclusive approach was developed from the project and called the Triad Pedagogic Perspective (TPP) model.
AN OVERVIEW OF GRADE R LITERACY TEACHING AND LEARNING IN INCLUSIVE CLASSROOMS IN SOUTH AFRICA^2016^PER LINGUAM-A JOURNAL OF LANGUAGE LEARNING^Pre-school literacy teaching in Early Childhood Education (ECD) inclusive classrooms is crucial in preparing learners for the transition to formal literacy teaching and learning. This article describes a collaborative exploratory research project between a university in South Africa and one in China, in order to gain an overview of early literacy teaching and learning in the two countries. In the case of South Africa, the focus was on Grade R literacy teaching and learning. Teacher participants in three rural schools, three township schools and four inner city schools in Mpumalanga and Gauteng were purposively selected. Data were gathered by means of open-ended questions in a questionnaire, individual interviews with Heads of Departments (HOD) and classroom observations. Coding, categorising and identifying themes were manually conducted. Persistent challenges were identified of which limited resources, low socio-economic conditions, English as the language of learning and teaching (LoLT), inadequate teaching strategies used to implement the Curriculum Assessment Policy Statement (CAPS) and barriers to learning were highlighted. This overview of early literacy teaching and learning in South Africa served as a precursor for the second phase of the project between the two countries.
Towards inclusive and resilient regional labour markets: challenges for research and policy^2016^INVESTIGACIONES REGIONALES-JOURNAL OF REGIONAL RESEARCH^Unemployment and inactivity remain among the largest social and economic problems in society, especially in the context of structural developments, such as sectorial shifts in employment structures and globalization, coupled with robotization and automation, that question future job growth. These employment-related issues vary by region, and between urban and rural areas, due to differences in economic structures and location factors, and in the quantity and quality of the labour force which is to an extent related to aging and processes of spatial sorting. Science and policy, particularly where related to economics and geography, are developing alongside two perspectives that dominate labour market research: the economic investment perspective and the social compensation and activation perspective. This paper discusses specific challenges facing research and policy and offers three recommendations that aim to stimulate inclusiveness in regional labour markets: the necessity of a place-based approach, the need for fundamental changes concerning the concept of labour and enhancing effective regional governance.
Reforming Watershed Management Institutions for Inclusive and Sustainable Growth: Role of Institutional Interaction and Participative Decision Making^JAN 2016^IIM KOZHIKODE SOCIETY &amp; MANAGEMENT REVIEW^The rainfed areas of rural India often lack the services of able water management institutions. Thus, management of water in such areas is not a stand-alone activity but is significant for the overall development of the area, which also takes into account natural resource management, productivity enhancement and livelihood supporting activities. This is commonly referred to as watershed development (WSD). These WSD programmes are run on a massive scale and have been dovetailed with the Mahatma Gandhi National Rural Employment Guarantee Act (MGNREGA). But, even after massive investment, these programmes or the institutions did not generate effective performance. There is an urgent need of good institutional arrangement that reduces transaction costs and favours co-operative solutions. In this context, the literature on new institutional economics identifies good interaction as one of the most important features of effective institutions. This article uses new institutional economics, theories of governance, management and organizational design to develop a conceptual framework for understanding the role of institutional interaction and participative decision making in generating enhanced performance and sustainable outcome. Conceptually, the demand for interaction depends upon generic and specific drivers, and the supply of good interaction would come through structures, processes and governance features of institutions and also through consideration of different rationalities (e.g., technical and social). This article involved an exploratory research followed by an in-depth survey of 30 local watershed institutions in three districts of Andhra Pradesh. The findings indicate that the quantity of interaction alone is not sufficient in generating effective institutional performance. Quality of institutional interaction based on various rationalities is equally important. The study may help in designing the institutions involved in WSD in a better way for inclusive and sustainable outcomes.
A Breakthrough in the Development of Inclusive Finance in China^2016^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 23RD INTERNATIONAL BUSINESS ANNUAL CONFERENCE (2016), BKS ONE AND TWO^Inclusive Finance has been China's national strategic planning. China has made gratifying achievements in enhancing financial inclusion, which promotes the development of inclusive finance. However, rural economy, small and medium enterprises and low-income people are still suffering from a strong fmancial exclusion. It is very necessary to study the main problems facing the development of Inclusive Finance in China. Combined with the typical inclusive financial development experience in the world, there is a common conflict in the development of Inclusive Finance. Yet facing the problems and solutions each country has different point of view. According to the Chinese performance in the main inclusive financial indicators in the world, it is pointed out that the lack of market participants in the credit are the main problems in the development of the Inclusive Financial in China, and in light of that some key points of credit system construction are put forward.
The Role of Inclusive and Exclusive Victim Consciousness in Predicting Intergroup Attitudes: Findings from Rwanda, Burundi, and DRC^OCT 2015^POLITICAL PSYCHOLOGY^The present research examined the differential relationship between distinct construals of collective victimhoodspecifically, inclusive and exclusive victim consciousnessand intergroup attitudes in the context and aftermath of mass violence. Three surveys in Rwanda (N=842), Burundi (N=1,074), and Eastern DRC (N=1,609) provided empirical support for the hypothesis that while exclusive victim consciousness predicts negative intergroup attitudes, inclusive victim consciousness is associated with positive, prosocial intergroup attitudes. These findings were significant when controlling for age, gender, urban/rural residence, education, personal victimization, and ingroup superiority. Additionally, exclusive victim consciousness mediated the effects of ingroup superiority on negative intergroup attitudes. These findings have important theoretical implications for research on collective victimhood as well as practical implications for intergroup relations in regions emerging from violent conflict.
Cities, Territories, and Inclusive Growth: Unraveling Urban-Rural Linkages in Chile, Colombia, and Mexico^SEP 2015^WORLD DEVELOPMENT^We explore the effects of the growing urbanization of rural areas in Chile, Colombia, and Mexico and investigate whether the presence of small- and medium-sized cities within rural urban territories enhances economic growth and reduces poverty and income inequality compared to deep-rural and metropolitan territories. For Chile and Colombia, our results suggest that these urban centers can make a greater contribution to the rate of economic growth and poverty reduction in rural urban territories compared to deep-rural ones, but in some cases with a rise in income inequality. The mechanisms through which urban centers affect the dynamics of territorial development are country-specific. (C) 2015 Published by Elsevier Ltd.
Children from the Dalit community in rural Nepal: a challenge to inclusive education^JUL 3 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Based on empirical research carried out in public secondary schools in the western part of Nepal, this article examines how Dalit children experience secondary-level education. Their experiences are explored using in-depth interviews with Dalit children, their parents and teachers. The findings reveal that Dalit children's inclusion is affected by a range of interconnected school and community factors. The paper argues that these complexities represent a major challenge for efforts to promote inclusive education. Therefore, inclusion in education should not be viewed as being only about what happens within the school gates, since it is equally important to address barriers within the community.
ECONOMIC GROWTH AND RURAL TRANSFORMATION IN EASTERN INDIA: STRATEGIES FOR INCLUSIVE GROWTH^JUL-SEP 2015^INDIAN JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS AND DEVELOPMENT^There is an emerging consensus that the well-being of rural households improve with the blending of farm activities with non-farm economic activities. The diversification of rural livelihood positively impacts the wellbeing of the rural households. Eastern states however remained laggard in rural transformation due to myriad of endogenous as well as exogenous factors. With uneven distribution of production assets, poor infrastructure and governance, low levels of literacy, skills, awareness and connectivity and limitations of alternative options for livelihood, the high prevalence of poverty in the region becomes the structural corollary. This paper delves into its multiple dimensions of rural transformation with focus on selected eastern states of India. Considering very small landholding of the farmers and thereby negligible employment elasticity to agricultural growth, creation of non-agricultural opportunities, diversification, and transformation of rural economy towards expanding rural non-farm employment are adjunct to the strategies of managing vulnerabilities associated to the region bringing meaningful structural change in the rural socio-economic conditions.
A Whole School Development Paradigm in Inclusive Education: A Case Study in the Vhembe and Umlazi Districts^JUL 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF EDUCATIONAL SCIENCES^The study focuses on inclusive education (IE) and concomitant challenges or special education needs experienced in two rural schools in the Vhembe district and five urban schools in Kwa-Zulu Natal. The learners who have "special educational needs" are those children with challenging behaviour, children with intellectual disabilities, those with learning disabilities, physical disabilities, sensory disabilities, autistic spectrum disorders and children with medical conditions. A modified LSEN (Learners with Special Educational Needs) questionnaire was given to two schools in Vhembe district and the data was analysed quantitatively. The LSEN questionnaire was further modified and used as interview questions which were conducted in five schools in KwaZulu-Natal (KZN). The data was analysed quantitatively and qualitatively for the Vhembe schools and the Umlazi respectively using a dual framework: the Eco-systemic perspective and Feuerstein theoretical framework. The results indicate that teachers are inadequately trained for IE. Infrastructure and teacher attitude exacerbate the implementation of IE at mainstream schools. Further government and parents are the keepers of IE policies and therefore must ensure schools adhere to these policies.
Inclusive education in schools in rural areas^JUL 2015^JOURNAL OF NEW APPROACHES IN EDUCATIONAL RESEARCH^Since Spain decided to embark on the development of inclusive schooling, studies have taken place to see if the inclusive principle is being developed satisfactorily. Inclusive schooling implies that all students, regardless of their particular characteristics, may be taught in ordinary schools, and in the majority of cases receive help in the classroom in which they have been integrated in order to cover any special educational needs. Our research aims to find out if schools situated in rural areas follow this principle and, once it has been put into practice, what strategies are being used. To this end, we designed a questionnaire addressed to Infant and Primary school teachers in the Sierra Sur area in the province of Jaen, in an agricultural context where most of the population live on olive picking and the cultivation of olive groves. Given the extension of the area, our research concentrated on schools situated in urban nuclei with a population of less than one thousand five hundred inhabitants. The results obtained demonstrate that rural areas do not take full advantage of the context they are in to favour inclusion processes and continue to develop proposals that are merely integrative.
Determining the competences of community based workers for disability-inclusive development in rural areas of South Africa, Botswana and Malawi^APR-JUN 2015^RURAL AND REMOTE HEALTH^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.985  </td>  <td>1.369</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Implementing the Three Block Model of Universal Design for Learning: effects on teachers' self-efficacy, stress, and job satisfaction in inclusive classrooms K-12^JAN 2 2015^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^Fifty-eight teachers of grades 1-12 in 10 schools located in two rural and three urban school divisions in Manitoba were involved in a study implementing the Three Block Model of Universal Design for Learning and exploring its outcomes for teachers and students. This article reports teachers' perceptions related to the outcomes of the implementation of the model for both students and themselves and gives voice to teachers working in challenging, diverse classrooms regarding the barriers they face to inclusive practice and what supports are needed. After implementing the model, teachers reported positive student outcomes in terms of reductions in challenging behaviour, improved student-to-student interactions, engagement, and learning. They also believed the model improved their practice and self-efficacy related to inclusive education, reduced their workload, and improved job satisfaction. However, teachers also articulated several barriers to its implementation, including the need for collaborative planning time, differentiated resources, professional learning communities, and public education.
A Stochastic Approach towards Inclusive Rural Development Using Demographic Data^2015^PROCEEDINGS 2015 IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON TECHNOLOGICAL INNOVATIONS IN ICT FOR AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT TIAR 2015^Technology has advanced immensely in India in the recent years but its advantage has not been wholly utilized by the rural parts of our country. Villages hold a diversified job environment where most jobs can be made highly profitable by establishing proper communication among various professions. Information awareness in cities is playing a major role in improving small scale businesses which is missing in villages. This can be achieved by using appropriate use of available technology in villages which will help us determine correlations in rural India. A demographic analysis using stochastic mechanisms focusing on specific aspects can be used to learn about villagers and target appropriate methods to improve their lifestyle by the application of technology. We attempt to extract the demographics (like age, gender, place, skill sets) of a person and find various overlaps of his/her job nature with other professionals in a specific geography. This analysis would give us insights on a lot of interrelations among the various professions which can be exploited to maximum extent so that we achieve higher levels of productivity. A stochastic approach on the demographic data can be used to achieve this and thereby we can expect an inclusive rural development. Since, there are high levels of uncertainty on a variety of parameters we go for a stochastic approach to carry out our analysis. If we take probability theory into consideration, a purely stochastic system is one which is randomly determined and also has a random probabilistic distribution. The pattern which is derived from this system can only be analyzed statistically but cannot be accurately predicted. The probabilistic patterns obtained finally would provide us insights of how rural development is being carried out in a village and what factors should we need to focus on a that village to ensure wholesome development.
Research on Feasibility of the Application of Inclusive Education Concept in the Teaching of Physical and Health Curriculum^2015^International Symposium 2015: Common Development of Sports and Modern Society^Inclusive Education, advocated by The United Nations Educational, Scientific and Cultural Organization (UNESCO), is a new idea and concept of international education, of which the essential idea is that schools shall accept all students and satisfy the diversified needs of students. The concept of Curriculum Standard for Physical and Health is to pay attention to individual differences and different needs so to ensure the benefit of every student. Centered with students' developments, Curriculum Standard for Physical and Health emphasizes the dominate role of students. The concept of Inclusive Education happens to be in conformity with the ideology of Curriculum Standard for Physical and Health. To reconstruct PE curriculum system in our nation with the ideology of Inclusive Education has certain theoretical and practical significances in improving educational fairness as well as the designing of PE curriculum, promoting growth and progressing of the vulnerable group, stimulating PE development in rural schools, full implementing of Curriculum Standard for Physical and Health and National Fitness Program, and strengthening students' physique.
Towards an ICT Framework for Providing Inclusive Learning Objects for Indigenous Learners^2015^EMERGING ISSUES IN SMART LEARNING^There is a lack of a suitable formal standardization for compiling culturally contextual learning materials, creating learning objects from this material, and delivering them to indigenous learners. Indigenous learners in this context may refer to any community that emphasizes ecological and rural associations, referred by many as a holistic way of thinking. Alternate pedagogical approaches based in indigenous thinking methodologies, indigenous world-views are required. A model that delivers a way in which to create learning objects from this epistemological perspective would provide great utility. A proposed model is rationalized and presented, using ontological/folksonomic and fuzzy-logic concepts. The innovativeness of this work lies in the ability of the framework to bridge the gap between western educational pedagogy and indigenous holistic thought. The solution aims to provide relevancy in the learning objects used by indigenous communities. Future research includes an empirical study involving a pilot implementation of the model in a controlled environment.
Inclusive Education in the Educational Project of MST^2015^COMUNICACOES^This paper aims at discussing some elements regarding inclusive education in the educational project of the Landless Workers' Movement (MST). The study comprises literature review and desk research. The theoretical framework is supported by researches and investigations about rural education, especially the latest production. For the analysis of MST's educational policies, documents produced and published by scholars and national leaders stand out. Partial results indicate that the Movement's perspectives towards school inclusion, in accordance with its political program, involve simultaneously and articulately the demands advocated and voiced also by other social movements. More specifically, with regard to school education, it appears that MST addresses broader issues, linked more directly to the category of social classes and other complex and important issues such as special education, inclusive education, gender relations and, in particular, the very question of rural education.
Rethinking Rural Road Infrastructure Delivery Case Study of a Green, Inclusive, and Cost-Effective Road Program in Nicaragua^2015^TRANSPORTATION RESEARCH RECORD^This paper presents a development case study on alternative thinking in rural road infrastructure delivery. The delivery advances the agendas of green growth, social inclusion, and cost-effectiveness. The empirical evidence presented in this case study focuses on 6 years of engagement in a specific road program the Fourth Roads Rehabilitation and Maintenance Project financed by the government of Nicaragua and the World Bank. "Green," in this case, refers to the use of road construction materials that are clean, durable, and friendly to the environment. The use of adoquines, also known as concrete cobblestones or pavers, has proved to be an economic and environmentally friendly paving alternative at the secondary and tertiary classification levels. "Inclusion" refers to the empowerment of all citizens to participate in and benefit from the development process and the removal of barriers against those who are often excluded. The community development approach presented in this paper is implemented by specially formed community development modules or modulos comunitarios de ado quinados (MCAs). The benefits of the MCAs include the provision of short-term employment opportunities, the building of technical and entrepreneurial skills, and the engendering of a sense of ownership in and responsibility for the roads. This paper presents the MCA model, as applied on a large scale and in a cost-effective way without compromising quality or the speed of completion. The model is presented as a best practice that could be emulated in similar development work. More importantly, the authors aim to encourage a debate and challenge the "business as usual" approach to the choice of surfacing and the modality of delivery of rural road infrastructure.
DEVELOPING A PSYCHO-PEDAGOGIC MODEL FOR INCLUSIVE CLASSES IN DISADVANTAGED-RURAL PRIMARY SCHOOLS IN SOUTH AFRICA^2015^INTED2015: 9TH INTERNATIONAL TECHNOLOGY, EDUCATION AND DEVELOPMENT CONFERENCE^This study was conducted in two education districts of the Eastern Cape, one of the most-disadvantaged provinces of South Africa. It focused on pedagogic processes and dilemmas faced by teachers in inclusive classes with diverse-learning barriers. It also aimed at strengthening teaching practices and learning support strategies (TPLSSs) teachers used in inclusive classes (ICs) in rural-disadvantaged primary schools. There were 19 teachers including inclusive classroom caregivers (ICCs) in 13 schools (n = 19, mean age = 45, males = 2, females = 17). A qualitative mode of inquiry was used and followed a case study approach as research design. Data were thematically analyzed and revealed that learners experiencing barriers to learning (LEBTLs) were still marginalized and minimally-supported in the classroom context while teachers used task-orientated pedagogic approach (TOP) which were inferior approaches and were indication of improper lesson planning. A pedagogic-inclusive approach was developed from the project and called Triad Pedagogic Perspective (TPP) model.
Research on the Development of Rural Ecological Culture Industry Depending on the Valve of Inclusive Growth - As a Case Study of Tuanjie Town in Kunming City^2014^2014 2ND INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE IN HUMANITIES, SOCIAL SCIENCES AND GLOBAL BUSINESS MANAGEMENT (ISSGBM 2014), VOL 30^There are 4 ethnic groups living in Tuanjie TownKunming city, Yi, Bai, Miao, and Han. It is a typical minority mountain agricultural township. Relying on its rich natural ecological resources, the development of rural ecological tourism is very good, which has formed a certain brand influence. How to combine the local natural resource and cultural resource, in order to realize the transformation from simple rural ecological tourism to the eco cultural tourism industry upgrading, has important significance for the study of inclusive growth of Yunnan and even western economic society in national regions.
A Comparison of the Effects of Direct Modeling and Video Modeling Provided by Peers to Students with Autism who are Attending in Rural Play Teaching in an Inclusive Setting^WIN 2013^KURAM VE UYGULAMADA EGITIM BILIMLERI^In the present research, the peers of children with autism at primary school level and in an inclusive environment were taught using direct modeling and video modeling education processes, and it was observed whether or not they could effectively and efficiently teach how to play games to their friends with autism. This study used adapted alternating treatments design from single subject designs. The research included 21 students from the first and second grades of primary education, 18 of whom participated as peer tutors with normal development, and 3 of whom participated as peer tutees with autism. The dependent variable of the research was the game learning skills determined through interviews with teachers for each sample. The independent variables were the implementation of direct modeling education and video modeling education by peers. The effectuality results of the study indicated that the participants played these games at 83-100% accuracy level and generalized it to different environments. In addition, the participants were observed to have the rules of games at 83-100% level one and three weeks after the completion of the implementation. Comparing the efficiency of the two education implementations, no significant difference was observed between direct modeling and video modeling education implementations in terms of the efficiency variable. The social validity findings of the research indicated the positive expressions of peer tutors regarding the study.
Interrogating inclusive growth: formal-informal duality, complementarity, conflict^NOV 2013^CAMBRIDGE JOURNAL OF ECONOMICS^I find through analyses of across-state, across-industry-over-state and pooled data (involving state and time) on the Indian economy that the behaviour of the urban informal/unorganised sector is explained by the modern formal/organised sector besides petty agriculture, but the vast rural informal sector is like surplus population, associated only with petty agriculture. I also show there could be interactions between the formal sector and modern agriculture. These empirical relations are analysed and theoretical departures from the literature are identified. I propose using a Structuralist-Kaleckian framework: with accumulation in the formal sector a large part of petty agriculture is modernised or converted to suit the needs of accumulation, and thereby we have a long-run drain of resources from petty agriculture and hence from informal sectors as well. However, even under such a resource drain, the urban informal sector may sustain or expand due to productivity advantages and due to pull from the formal sector, at the cost of its rural counterpart. In the short run when the formal sector and hence the urban informal sector expand or when the government promotes the urban or productive part of informal economy, a basic conflict between urban and rural informal sectors is exposed, given the generic agricultural supply constraint. Thus, the paradigms of inclusive growth and development management are questioned.
Developing inclusive practice: teacher perceptions of opportunities and constraints in the Republic of Ireland^OCT 1 2013^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF INCLUSIVE EDUCATION^There has been a significant policy shift from parallel systems of special and mainstream education in the Republic of Ireland towards provision underpinned by enabling legislation with a presumption for inclusion. The role of teachers in establishing inclusive learning environments is critical and it is generally accepted that inclusive practice relies to a large extent on teacher knowledge, skills, understanding, capacity and attitudes. This exploratory study aimed to gather information on teachers' attitudes about inclusion, and perceived constraints in creating inclusive learning environments. A range of schools from urban, semi-urban, provincial and rural backgrounds were included and data were collected using semi-structured interviews (n=24) including all principals, class teachers and support staff in the participating schools. Teachers recognised the challenge of responding appropriately to diversity within schools and are generally supportive of the principle of inclusion. However, there are clear concerns around their individual capacity and the capacity of their schools to develop inclusive learning environments. A positive school ethos was a significant factor in ensuring inclusive practice. International research indicates that the complex mix of positive teacher beliefs combined with fears and perceived inadequacies is quite common in the evolution of practice towards inclusive learning environments.
Rural Women and Climate Change: A Gender-inclusive Perspective^JUN 1 2013^AUSTRALIAN SOCIAL WORK^This paper reports on a small-scale research study that explores the impact of climate change on rural women. Qualitative data were collected through interviews with 7 women, who came from a regional centre and were either employed by women's services or who had activist roles within the community pertaining to women's services. Outcomes of the study identified a range of areas of impact, including increased hardship for rural women, implications of household roles, and subsequent organisational responsibilities. A high level of concern, particularly for the vulnerability of women in crisis, was identified among participants. We contend that the effects of climate change are becoming increasingly relevant to the social work profession and that specific groups such as women are at risk of further disadvantage unless collective action is taken to circumvent the impact of climate change. Strategies for social work practice and policy initiatives are considered.
Research on Inclusive Responsibility of Rural Financial Institutions of Hunanprovince^2013^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2013 INTERNATIONAL ACADEMIC WORKSHOP ON SOCIAL SCIENCE (IAW-SC 2013)^None
Inclusive Economic Development Programs and Consumers' Access to Credit in Emerging Market Economies: The Public Policy Role of Marketing in Rural Bank Programs in Ghana^2013^JOURNAL OF PUBLIC POLICY &amp; MARKETING^The mobilization of rural consumers' potential savings to generate credit for inclusive lending to the rural/urban poor consumers in emerging market countries presents a strategic challenge for policy makers. Large-scale credit aggregation can only be achieved by the use of modern banks. However, rural consumers may resist the use of banks as objects of nonlocal origin. The authors rely on the classic theory of demand aggregation advantage to critically analyze the public policy framework underpinning rural banking for the attainment of inclusive economic development goals of bottom-of-the-pyramid countries. An empirical test of the framework in Ghana's rural banking programs shows that demand aggregation advantage predicts consumer satisfaction with the inclusive lending practices of banking institutions among existing clients but not new clients. The study suggests that the public policy framework for promoting compliance with inclusive lending goals of rural banking programs in Ghana does not adequately consider rural consumers' interpretation of demand aggregation activities.
Diversified Courseware Technology: A New Hope to Enhance the Educational Achievement of Students with and without Special Needs in the Inclusive Classroom^2013^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 2013 IEEE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE IN MOOC, INNOVATION AND TECHNOLOGY IN EDUCATION (MITE)^None
'The Rotten Banana' fires back: The story of a Danish discourse of inclusive rurality in the making^OCT 2012^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^The popularity of a particular term the Rotten Banana has paralleled the one-sided centralisation of public services since the Danish Municipal Reform of 2007. The Rotten Banana denotes peripheral Denmark, which takes a geographically curved form that resembles a banana, and it symbolises the belief that rural areas are backward and (too) costly. This article shows how the negative connotations of rural areas have come to outweigh the positive ones and to legitimise liberal visions of the 'sustainable' welfare state. Whereas previous studies on the perceptions of rural dwellers have focused on the discourses of rurality that produce rural outsiders, this article builds on the work of de Certeau and of Laclau and Mouffe. Based on both quantitative and qualitative data, the study shows how, in Denmark, negative connotations and centralisation have together spurred a new and political mobilisation in many parts of the 'banana'. Through skilful 'consumption', rural dwellers have adapted the alienating liberalist 'logic of equivalence' to their own use and produced a 'logic of difference', thus challenging the predominant political discourse of rurality. As a result, the Danish Liberal government was forced to introduce a new and more inclusive rural policy in September of 2010 and grant rural dwellers a political voice in parliament. (C) 2012 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Towards Inclusive Social Citizenship? Rethinking China's Social Security in the Trend towards Urban-Rural Harmonisation^OCT 2012^JOURNAL OF SOCIAL POLICY^Urban-rural harmonisation has risen to prominence in recent social security reform in China. This article offers an account of the changing welfare institutions and social citizenship configurations unfolded by this particular policy approach. As social activism gained substantial weight as part of the regional developmental strategies of local governments, harmonisation efforts have led to a boundary shift of social citizenship largely defined by the within-without criterion rather than the urban-rural divide. In places where urban-rural harmonisation takes hold, the pivotal criterion for claiming social benefits is the possession of local resident status, regardless of whether this status is urban or rural. The heterogeneity of regional social security developments resulting from social decentralisation also calls attention to the 'variable geometry' of institutional change, i.e. various social policy domains manifest diverse degrees of institutional dynamics towards harmonisation. In this light, urban-rural harmonisation is likely to trigger competitive solidarity in terms of regional competition and emulation in economic development and social provision, leading to regional disparities that will shape the future contours of social policy and social citizenship in China.
BUILDING INCLUSIVE MARKETS IN RURAL BANGLADESH: HOW INTERMEDIARIES WORK INSTITUTIONAL VOIDS^AUG 2012^ACADEMY OF MANAGEMENT JOURNAL^Much effort goes into building markets as a tool for economic and social development; those pursuing or promoting market building, however, often overlook that in too many places social exclusion and poverty prevent many, especially women, from participating in and accessing markets. Building on data from rural Bangladesh and analyzing the work of a prominent intermediary organization, we uncover institutional voids as the source of market exclusion and identify two sets of activities redefining market architecture and legitimating new actors as critical for building inclusive markets. We expose voids as analytical spaces and illustrate how they result from conflict and contradiction among institutional bits and pieces from local political, community, and religious spheres. Our findings put forward a perspective on market building that highlights the on-the-ground dynamics and attends to the institutions at play, to their consequences, and to a more diverse set of inhabitants of institutions.
Innovative initiatives supporting inclusive innovation in India: Social business incubation and micro venture capital^MAY 2012^TECHNOLOGICAL FORECASTING AND SOCIAL CHANGE^In India inclusive innovation through social entrepreneurs is currently booming. However, these entrepreneurs suffer from a lack of finance since the bank system as well as the microfinance sector are unwilling or unable to finance them. However, pioneering finance initiatives have been emerging recently to bridge this gap. This paper discusses these emerging alternative financing initiatives which are forming an innovation eco-system of support for inclusive innovation and social entrepreneurship. It highlights two instruments in particular that are used in conventional innovation support: business incubation and venture capital. Two case studies are undertaken in order to provide evidence on how such instruments can operate with a 'dual bottom line in supporting inclusive innovation and social entrepreneurship. (C) 2011 Published by Elsevier Inc.
Within and between the old and the new: Teachers becoming inclusive practitioners^MAR 2012^PERSPECTIVES IN EDUCATION^This paper explores how 20 African teachers in rural KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa, construct their identities in the light of inclusive education, and how they negotiate the tensions and contradictions emerging from the process of becoming inclusive practitioners. Central to this discussion is the understanding that teachers' identities are socially constructed and that radical transformation requires teachers to draw on their transformative capacity and develop an alternative sense of themselves, not only as teachers but also as individuals. A qualitative approach using personal narratives is used to better comprehend the context-specific experiences of these teachers and draw on their authentic voices. What emerges from the study is evidence of the simultaneous existence of both the powerful influence of historic roots of exclusion, which discourage teachers from becoming inclusive practitioners, and some fruits of inclusion, where teachers' attitudes and practices are beginning to embrace inclusion. Findings clearly show a lack of homogeneity in participants' responses to inclusion, highlighting instead the diversity which exists within and between individual African teachers in rural contexts.
Indigenous Knowledge and ICT: An interdisciplinary approach to culturally inclusive education^2012^2012 IEEE FOURTH INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON TECHNOLOGY FOR EDUCATION (T4E)^Indigenous knowledge is the basis for many remote, rural, and marginalized communities in society and as such, is an important component in the educational development of members within these communities. Due to many reasons, including colonization, a lack of understanding by hegemonic societies, and disparate knowledge systems (for example, orally based), there is a risk of this knowledge disappearing completely from many communities. Current literature in this realm is reviewed in this paper, with a focus on how ICT may aid in the gathering, storage, retrieval and inclusion of cultural knowledge in education. From this, some issues and gaps associated with current approaches are identified and an initial interdisciplinary model is proposed to help address these issues.
eReadiness and eGovernment With Respect To Citizens' Participation and Involvement: Towards a Citizens' Inclusive eReadiness Assessment Model^2012^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 12TH EUROPEAN CONFERENCE ON EGOVERNMENT, VOLS 1 AND 2^The advancements in the ICT and internet technologies challenge governments to engage in the electronic transformation of public services and information provision to citizens. The capability to reach citizens in the physical world via eGovernment platform and render a citizen-centric public sector has increasingly become vital. Thus, spending more resources to promote and ensure that all members of society are included in the entire spectrum of information society and more actively access government online is a critical aspect in establishing a successful eGovernment project. Hence, involving and engaging the citizens at the initial stage of eGovernment process starting with the eReadiness assessment is a high priority to ensure eGovernment reaches all the citizens regardless of geographic dispensations, economic, social and political status, age, language, or access to the Internet. People with low income, women, youth, disabled, disadvantaged and those living in rural areas should systematically benefits from newer technologies. Therefore, when pursuing eGovernment, it is imperative to conduct a comprehensive eReadiness assessment with a greater focus on direct citizens' participation and involvement, as citizens are primarily a key player for eGovernment projects success and mostly the key main constituents for whom the eGovernment projects are undertaken by governments. Although many eReadiness tools have been developed by various agencies and individual researchers, these tools fall short of addressing citizens stakeholders participation and involvement as a critical component of the eReadiness equation. This paper therefore looks at how eReadiness has been defined over the years, presents and discusses the eReadiness and eGovernment interlinked relationship, reviews the existing eReadiness tools and applies the case study to present eReadiness model incorporating the citizens' engagement, participation and involvement dimension.
The Empirical Research on the Financial Support of Livelihood Improvement Program in Rural Areas in the Perspective of Inclusive Growth - An Analysis Based on the Financial Distribution in the Rural Area in Yantai^2012^CONTEMPORARY INNOVATION AND DEVELOPMENT IN STATISTICAL SCIENCE^Inclusive growth asks for equal opportunities and the adequate financial support in assuring and improving the livelihood in rural areas. At present, the "exclusive growth" is prevailing in the programs in Yantai. The rural finance excludes the foreign funding which leads to the unfair distribution of financial resources between urban and rural areas. The lack of financial service contributes to the slow progress in income increasing and the lagging in economy. Therefore, to promote the construction of rural people's livelihood, it is necessary to enhance the allocation of financial resources in rural areas in Yantai and carry out the financial GSP, introducing the financial resources effectively to the rural livelihood.
Inclusive masculinities of university soccer players in the American Midwest^2011^GENDER AND EDUCATION^Male teamsport athletes have traditionally been described as some of the most homophobic and femphobic men in North American culture. However, in this ethnographic research of an education-based soccer team at a small Catholic university in a rural part of Middle America, I use inclusive masculinity theory to highlight that a softer version of masculinity is in operation. I use participant observation and 22 in-depth interviews to show that these men are gay friendly, that they avoid fights, and that they use reciprocal disclosure and homosocial tactility to emotionally bond. Although the type of masculinity the men on this team exhibit retains some orthodox behaviours, it is nonetheless far removed from the traditional model of hegemonic masculinity commonly attributed to teamsport athletes found in American institutes of sport and education.
Microfinance, a Tool for Sustainable Development and Nurturing Inclusive Growth in the Indian Economy^2011^STRATEGIES AND INNOVATIONS FOR SUSTAINABLE ORGANIZATIONS^None
Inclusive Adaptation: Linking Participatory Learning and Knowledge Management to Urban Resilience^2011^RESILIENT CITIES: CITIES AND ADAPTATION TO CLIMATE CHANGE - PROCEEDINGS OF THE GLOBAL FORUM 2010^None
Measuring Accessibility for Inclusive Development: A Census Based Index^AUG 2010^SOCIAL INDICATORS RESEARCH^State is often involved in the challenging process of judicious allocation and apportioning of resources for an inclusive growth through creating infrastructure and ensuring accessibility- the "ability of the people to reach and engage in opportunities and activities". The issue at the heart of the debate concerns with the "opportunities" available in a geographic area and the inhabitants' use of those opportunities in terms of their "behaviour". The extant literature suggests that the dominant component of the accessibility is mobility infrastructure. The present paper argues that the impact of the human development and the information infrastructure should also be considered. This paper uses the Indian census data of 2001 and develops the methodology for creating an accessibility index for a geographic unit. The paper also discusses the use of the accessibility index (AI) as a tool for evaluating the efficacy of a public policy initiative towards decreasing the exclusion of geographic units. Validation of the tool is done using the patient inflow data at a large charitable hospital in Central India and household level employment data from National Rural Employment Guarantee Scheme (NREGS).
Long-term Outcomes of Services in Inclusive and Self-Contained Settings for Siblings with Comparable Significant Disabilities^MAR 2010^EDUCATION AND TRAINING IN AUTISM AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES^A major goal of special education services is to prepare graduates for productive and rewarding lives as adults in the community. Follow-up studies, however, consistently have indicated very poor post-school Outcomes for special education graduates. Wide there has been a wealth of research related to the effectiveness of services in inclusive general education settings for students of school age, few studies have investigated the impact of inclusive educational services on long-term outcomes for students with significant disabilities. The purpose of this study was to describe how two brothers with similar diagnoses involving significant disabilities and who had a 10-year age difference functioned in their natural settings as young adults after receiving services in the same rural one-building district. The older brother received special education services in self-contained settings throughout his school career, while the younger brother received special education services in inclusive general education settings. Qualitative data were collected through records, interviews, and field notes of observations. Findings suggest that the brother who received special education services in the school's inclusive general education settings achieved more positive long-term, outcomes. Implications are discussed for future research and provision of educational services.
Indigenous-inclusive citizenship: the city and social housing in Canada, New Zealand, and Australia^FEB 2010^ENVIRONMENT AND PLANNING A^Indigenous peoples in Canada, New Zealand, and Australia are highly urbanised. In spite of this, urban Indigenous communities have a difficult time giving effect to self-determining autonomy in comparison with their rural, remote, and reserve counterpart communities. The place of authentic Indigeneity in the public perception has remained outside of urban areas. All three countries have had social housing initiatives that aim to even out life-chances among citizens. How Indigeneity features in the housing sector varies from country to country. Through an examination of social housing developments from the 1930s to the present, we develop knowledge of how the place of authentic Indigeneity has changed over time and has been linked to the creation of Indigenous-inclusive citizenship in the city. While the Canadian experience continues to pair self-government with common social housing goals, New Zealand never really linked self-government with common social citizenship in the housing sector; Australia did for a time, but it is regressing quickly.
Using cultural resources to build an inclusive environment for children with severe communication disabilities: a case study from Botswana^2010^CHILDRENS GEOGRAPHIES^This paper describes the first cycle of an action research project addressing severe communication disabilities in context. Aspects of selected African cultures are being explored as resources in supporting inclusive environments for children with severe communication disabilities. The specific cycle documented here was completed in rural Botswana. This single case study is representative of several, similar cases where collaborative problem-solving with primary caregivers of children with severe communication disabilities (resulting from Cerebral Palsy) overcame the limitations of 'conventional' western communication interventions for these children. Culturally specific non-verbal communication and contextual elements of Setswana culture were identified, enabling the communicative participation of young children with severe communication disabilities in their specific social and cultural geography. Implications are indicated for clinical practice, service delivery in communication interventions and general community based rehabilitation programmes. Research implications include the need for more participative methodologies in developing contexts and the need to address communicative participation across disciplines.
Looking North and South: Ideals and realities of inclusive environmental governance^JAN 2010^GEOFORUM^This paper addresses the dynamics of real processes of inclusive environmental governance by looking at the decision-maker/expert/lay person interplay. Specifically, we present a comparative ethnographic study that leads to a critical examination of Marteen Hajer's concept of technological citizenship and its role in normative models of so-called inclusive environmental governance. First, we present the Bio-natur project of MST (Movimento Sem Terra/Landless People's Movement), the largest rural movement in Latin America. The project explicitly attempts to include lay/traditional knowledge into the processes of defining and protecting a regulatory space for "Creole seeds". Second, we describe the formally open and inclusive environmental management of polluted sediments during harbour dredging in Norway. In both cases the actors are confronted with difficult problems bound by contradictory constraints of the institutional and cultural contexts. In complex relationships, trust, dependency, responsibility and opposition, encompass the decision-maker/expert/lay interplay. Embedded in these contexts, it is not always clear that non-experts want full autonomy and responsibility. in complex relationships, trust, dependency, responsibility and opposition, encompass the decision-maker/expert/lay person interplay. The results suggest that ideals, if instantiated, are reshaped within concrete contexts of action. Participatory ideals such as "technological citizenship", inclusiveness, transparency and accountability need not be relativised, but they would better be expressed as regulative norms for practice rather than ideals from which an acontextual model or structure may be deduced. (C) 2009 Elsevier Ltd. All rights reserved.
Conceptualizing inclusive development: with applications to rural infrastructure and development assistance^2010^JOURNAL OF THE ASIA PACIFIC ECONOMY^This paper undertakes three tasks. The first and major task is the definition of inclusive development, in particular distinguishing it from growth, pro-poor growth and inclusive growth and differentiating these from each other. The paper then proceeds to apply this definition to specific issues focusing on rural infrastructure. The second task is to discuss the relationship between rural infrastructure and inclusive development. The third and final task is to draw out the implications of the recent literature on development assistance and its effectiveness, for donor support of rural infrastructure with the objective of inclusive development.
Inclusive growth and inclusive development: a review and synthesis of Asian Development Bank literature^2010^JOURNAL OF THE ASIA PACIFIC ECONOMY^The Asian Development Bank (ADB) has relatively few but well-founded and relevant studies, reports and publications on inclusive growth, inclusive development, or inclusive social development. This paper seeks to summarize the knowledge products obtained from existing ADB studies, statements and initiatives. It draws from the research and analytic work undertaken in the recent years by ADB's Economics and Research Department, the East Asia Regional Department and the Operations Evaluation Department, and other sources. One of the findings is that while there is no agreed and common definition of inclusive growth or inclusive development, the term is understood to refer to 'growth coupled with equal opportunities', and consisting of economic, social and institutional dimensions. Among the major recommendations of the ADB literature are that efforts to achieve inclusive growth and inclusive development should involve a combination of mutually reinforcing measures including: (1) promoting efficient and sustainable economic growth, (2) ensuring a level political playing field and (3) strengthening capacities and providing for social safety nets.
Is LEADER Elitist or Inclusive? Composition of Danish LAG Boards in the 2007-2013 Rural Development and Fisheries Programmes^JAN 2010^SOCIOLOGIA RURALIS^The literature on local action groups offers various reflections on whether the LEADER initiative is elitist or inclusive. As one of seven key concepts behind the LEADER method, the bottom-up concept spurs an expectation that LEADER is more able to involve the average citizen than other programmes. Until now, however, only scarce information on the composition of the LEADER boards has been available to tell us if this is really so at the decision-making level. A survey from 2008 examining the composition of the 55 local action groups established in the 2007-2013 Danish Rural Development and Fisheries Programmes shows that most of the board members are extremely well-educated older men who hold many other posts in society. This lopsided representation is discussed for its problems and potentials from two opposing theoretical angles: from a perspective of post-liberal theories of inclusive democracy and the relative autonomy of elites and sub-elites.
Program of All-Inclusive Care (PACE): Past, Present, and Future^MAR 2009^JOURNAL OF THE AMERICAN MEDICAL DIRECTORS ASSOCIATION^From modest beginnings in 1973 to over 60 programs nationwide, the PACE concept has proven the value of integrated, interdisciplinary-based care for frail older adults. The evolution of PACE and its regulatory and reimbursement model have changed over time, but the principals of care have remained unchanged. Nationally PACE programs are dealing with some of the same challenges they had 30 years ago and yet PACE programs continue to expand and provide care to an ever wider distribution of populations. The looming issue of ever-growing health care expenditures represents another opportunity for PACE to demonstrate its value while providing a level of quality beyond what could normally be provided by typical Medicare and Medicaid payments for similar conditions and patient characteristics. The future for PACE includes a number of possibilities including flexibility in financing and reimbursement, design changes to work with community-based physicians, potential eligibility adjustments, and growth of rural PACE. The PACE model has clearly demonstrated that in a debilitated, frail population in whom health care expenses would be expect to be high, a combination of team care, managed health care services, and care coordination can lead to both improved health outcomes and reduced expenses over time. (J Am Med Dir Assoc 2009; 10: 155-160)
A conceptual model of inclusive technology for information access by the rural sector^2007^UNIVERSAL ACCESS IN HUMAN COMPUTER INTERACTION: COPING WITH DIVERSITY, PT 1^In recent years, a growing number of projects seek to address the disparity in opportunities available to people in rural versus urban areas through Information and Communication Technologies. When introducing such technologies, there are a number of recognised barriers to their use and acceptance specific to rural areas. We define an 'inclusive technology' as a technology which overcomes the barriers in using technology that are inherent within a community in order to increase the available opportunities. We propose a conceptual model and a set of heuristic measurements for evaluating the 'inclusiveness' of a technology with respect to a given community, and illustrate our model by applying it to an actual real-world project. With this model we hope to achieve a better understanding of the problem, and develop a systematic process and framework for designing and evaluating technologies designed to overcome these disparities.
Jobs in the bush: Global industries and inclusive rural development^DEC 2006^SOCIAL POLICY &amp; ADMINISTRATION^How do rural communities manage the challenge of local governance and community capacity-building, given the policy choices of central government (both state and national) in favour of global resource-development industries? Central government policy choices expose rural communities to the vagaries of the global economy, even as the Australian government's stated intent vis-a-vis rural Australia is the exact opposite: to encourage locally driven economic and community sustainability. Rural development policy in Australia often has the effect of denying the very outcomes it hopes to achieve. On the one hand, government policies encourage rural communities to be independent, to build 'social capital', and to add value to their local produce; on the other hand, macroeconomic policies change the contexts within which these communities function, creating a tension which is difficult to reconcile. In the case of the Western District of Victoria, an established agricultural and pastoral region, the cycles of economic activity have been disrupted in recent years by new and exciting global industries whose trajectories sit largely outside local control. This paper questions whether governments have a systemic view of the impact of these competing demands on rural communities, and calls for a more informed, whole-of-government policy-making for the development of Australia's rural regions.
Use of an inclusive-partnership strategy in urban areas of Orissa, India, to increase compliance in a mass drug administration for the control of lymphatic filariasis^OCT 2006^ANNALS OF TROPICAL MEDICINE AND PARASITOLOGY^In India, the programme to eliminate lymphatic filariasis, which is largely based on mass administrations of diethylcarbamazine, has, in terms of coverage and compliance, been generally much less successful in urban areas than in rural communities. An innovative strategy to make the programme more effective in urban settings, largely based on an inclusive partnership and community participation, has recently been developed. An evaluation of the strategy's implementation in Orissa, which employed both quantitative and qualitative methods of data collection, revealed significantly higher coverage and compliance in an urban area where the strategy had been implemented than in a similar urban area where there had been no such intervention. Application of this strategy in other urban settings in general, and in small towns in particular, is recommended in India.
Atencion primaria^2006-Jan^Atencion primaria^None
Needed: A more inclusive research paradigm to learn about the health needs of rural women^SEP-OCT 2005^WOMENS HEALTH ISSUES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  1.957  </td>  <td>2.478</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Inclusive development and decent work for all^2004^INTERNATIONAL LABOUR REVIEW^Globalization, the author argues, reproduces between central and peripheral countries the same perverse "concentrating and excluding" pattern of growth as that observed within countries, benefiting a few insiders and leaving many outsiders behind. Based on a historical review of successive conceptualizations of development, his case for "inclusiveness" is a plea for correcting this asymmetrical process by striking a better balance between economic efficiency, decent work and environmental protection. Given the unruliness of the globalization process, national-level policies must be relied upon to bring the excluded into the economic mainstream, notably by helping informal-sector workers make the transition to formal entrepreneurship.
Eden Project, a living theatre of people and plants - Inclusive approaches to public communication and involvement^2004^PROCEEDINGS OF THE INTERNATIONAL CONFERENCE ON URBAN HORTICULTURE^Eden Project is a 'global garden' set in a large crater in Cornwall, the site of a disused china clay quarry. Eden tells the story of people's dependence on plants through a blend of science and theatre. It is pioneering new approaches and techniques in communicating some of the most complex ideas of our age in ways that are appreciated by non-specialists. Eden is evolving innovative links between disciplines and partnering scientists with artists, teachers, marketing specialists and others to inspire new ways of working and develop innovative approaches to public education and communication. The Sensory Trust is working with Eden to create techniques for effective inclusion of social groups that are normally excluded from environmental debates and decision-making. Interpretation is approached in a genuine spirit of experimentation, exploring new ideas and approaches and looking at how people are best engaged and motivated. Working with a range of local and international artists and designers is intended to evoke passions and interest as a platform for information delivery. A multi-layered approach to learning uses technology without becoming a slave to it. The results are pioneering, and it is certain that not all will be successful, but they will be like nothing seen before.
Teachers' implementation of gender-inclusive instructional strategies in single-sex and mixed-sex science classrooms^SEP 2002^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SCIENCE EDUCATION^Debate continues over the benefits, or otherwise, of single-sex classes in science and mathematics, particularly for the performance of girls. Previous research and analyses of the circumstances surrounding the implementation of single-sex classes warn that the success of the strategy requires due consideration of the nature of the instructional environment for both boys and girls, together with appropriate support for the teachers involved. This article reports the circumstances under which teachers were able to implement gender-inclusive strategies in single-sex science classes in coeducational high schools and documents some of the difficulties faced. The study was part of the Single-Sex Education Pilot Project (SSEPP) in ten high schools in rural and urban Western Australia. Qualitative and quantitative data were gathered during the project from teachers, students and classroom observations. Overall, it was apparent that single-sex grouping created environments in which teachers could implement gender-inclusive science instructional strategies more readily and effectively than in mixed-sex settings. Teachers were able to address some of the apparent shortcomings of the students' previous education (specifically, the poor written and oral communication of boys and the limited experience of girls with 'hands-on' activities and open-ended problem solving). Further, in same-sex classrooms, sexual harassment which inhibited girls' learning was eliminated. The extent to which teachers were successful in implementing gender-inclusive instructional strategies, however, depended upon their prior commitment to the SSEPP as a whole, and upon the support or obstacles encountered from a variety of sources, including parents, the community, students, and non-SSEPP teachers.
Housing in rural America: Building affordable and inclusive communities^WIN 2001^JOURNAL OF THE AMERICAN PLANNING ASSOCIATION^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.719  </td>  <td>3.431</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Housing in Rural America: Building affordable and inclusive communities^OCT 2000^JOURNAL OF RURAL STUDIES^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  3.301  </td>  <td>3.883</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Aidscaptions^1997-Jun^Aidscaptions^None
Inclusive view of religion - A rural discourse in Uttar Pradesh^JUN 8 1996^ECONOMIC AND POLITICAL WEEKLY^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  0.085  </td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  1999  </th>  </tr> </table> 
What would 'inclusive journalism' have felt like for the pig?^APR 1 2019^JOURNAL OF APPLIED JOURNALISM &amp; MEDIA STUDIES^The idea of the inclusive society as a policy instrument is based on equality of opportunities and the equal capacity of members, irrespective of differences such as gender and filth. Operating within society, the idea of inclusive journalism follows this model, including the anthropocentric practices that exclude the living conditions and concerns of most non-human animals. This article argues that for journalism to be truly inclusive the anthropocentric nature of both society and the media must be exposed, and our social practices extended beyond the species divide. The article begins by illustrating the common journalistic practices of reporting on farmed animals, before exploring the new practices of Animal Journalism and, within scholarship, the field of Critical Media and Animal Studies. The article then turns to political theory before suggesting that Donaldson and Kymlickas concept of positive relational rights can be placed at the centre of a non-anthropocentric and inclusive journalism practice.
Plantations are everywhere! between infrastructural violence and inclusive development^NOV 2018^GEOFORUM^This paper discusses Tania Murray Li's article After the Land Grab: Infrastructural Violence and Indonesia's Oil Palm Zone, placing it in the wider debates about global land grabbing and inclusive development.
Seaweed farming, property rights, and inclusive development in coastal areas^DEC 1 2017^OCEAN &amp; COASTAL MANAGEMENT^<span class="FR_label">  Impact Factor  <table cellspacing="0" cellpadding="0" border="0" class="Impact_Factor_table"> <tr> <td>  2.595  </td>  <td>3.043</td>  </tr> <tr> <th>  2018  </th>  <th>5 year</th>  </tr> </table> 
Evolutionary targeting for inclusive development^MAY 2016^JOURNAL OF EVOLUTIONARY ECONOMICS^Many studies articulate a theoretical conceptual change-that is, a change from neo-classical economics and "Picking Winners" policy frameworks to a systemic-evolutionary targeting framework. Within such an intellectual context, this paper attempts to expand the evolutionary targeting framework to facilitate the process of inclusive industrial development. We present a unitary industrial development trajectory which is used as a narrative to articulate the evolutionary paths of Taiwan and Malaysia in making their respective sectoral changes (from informal to formal, and then to high technology sectors) endogenous. Building on both cases, we elucidate how the organization of subsistence farming contributes to development, and hence paves the way for new industrial takeoff. In this regard, the targeting programs that focus on the Schumpeterian segment are improved upon to offer support for (re)organization of the informal sector. This study, therefore, proposes a new analytical grid theorizing the current observations in inclusive development studies. It thus explicitly acknowledges the importance of transforming the informal sector to achieve inclusive development.
Investigation on the effective remediation of quinoline at solid/solution interface using modified agricultural waste: an inclusive study^APR 2016^INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF ENVIRONMENTAL SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^This research work explores the potential of modified agricultural waste for the sorption of quinoline from aqueous media. A quinoline removal efficiency of around 97 % and sorption capacities of similar to 20 (batch) and similar to 35 mg g(-1) (fixed-bed) were achieved. Pseudo-second-order kinetics and Temkin isotherm best represented the equilibrium sorption data. The sorption of quinoline is exothermic and spontaneous in nature with a slight increase in the system entropy. The quinoline sorption mechanism is controlled by H-bonding, p-p dispersive interactions, boundary layer, and intraparticle diffusion. Microwave-chemical integrated regeneration technique retrieves the sorption capacity of the exhausted sorbent with 99.15, 97.64, and 95.55 % of the original, in three sorption-regeneration cycles. Energy recovery (19.365 MJ kg(-1)) from the quinoline-loaded sorbent and the potential utilization of left-over ash materials enhanced the prospective of the sorbent for the remediation of pollutants for a clean and green environment.
Urban Agriculture as a Socially Inclusive and Sustainable Post-Growth Urban Regeneration Strategy^2013^PROCEEDINGS OF THE 49TH ISOCARP CONGRESS: FRONTIERS OF PLANNING - EVOLVING AND DECLINING MODELS OF PLANNING PRACTICE^The experience of "New Roots Community Farm" within the distressed neighborhood of City Heights in San Diego shows how the "Urban Agriculture" approach can provide new integrated strategies for urban regeneration matching social inclusion and physical-economic redevelopment.
Refining the definition of sustainable agriculture: An inclusive perspective from Malaysian vegetable sector^SEP-DEC 2012^MAEJO INTERNATIONAL JOURNAL OF SCIENCE AND TECHNOLOGY^Skepticism about the longevity of conventional agriculture has resulted in the quest for sustainable agriculture. Like many developing countries, a homogenous definition of the term 'sustainable agriculture' is yet to be developed in Malaysia. To fill this gap, using an inclusive perspective, this study posits a refined definition of 'sustainable agriculture' for Malaysia. Cognizant of relevant past studies, which were built on rather narrow viewpoints, this study integrates qualitative insights from selected up-stream stakeholders in Malaysian vegetable sector. The structured results suggest that sustainable agriculture can be defined as the process by which an integrative balanced agricultural system is realised through a dynamic set of practices that are (1) environmentally enhancing, (2) resource optimal, (3) economically viable, (4) socially justifiable and (5) functionally feasible over time. Though derived from Malaysia, this definition can be adapted to fit local nuances in other countries and sectoral emphases in agriculture. With these five inter-related operational attributes, which are capable of enhancement and/or modification periodically, this flexible definition can progressively provide potential direction towards academic understanding and development of agricultural sustainability.
Inclusive neoliberalism? Perspectives from Eastern Caribbean farmers^JAN 2011^PROGRESS IN DEVELOPMENT STUDIES^Banana farming in the Eastern Caribbean has gone from riches to rags since the 1990s, as the region's economic and social mainstay has severely contracted. This article reports on interviews conducted at the grassroots level with about 150 current or former banana farmers in Dominica and St. Lucia, and at the administrative level with numerous government and banana sector officials and other stakeholders. The interviews sought to answer two interrelated questions: (a) How have farmers experienced and responded to this severe contraction in the banana export industry? and (b) To what extent does current development policy support farmers' economic needs? Indeed, many of the stated goals of the current development paradigm, referred to as 'inclusive neoliberalism', align with the farmers' stated needs. We seek to understand the extent to which this development policy manifests itself at the grassroots level in the form of support that small farmers can actually use to help sell their products. Our interviews document multiple ways that banana farmers have been hurt by changes in international trade policy. The interviews also reveal a considerable gap between the stated desires and development policy priorities of farmers, on the one hand, and the impacts of development policy at the grassroots level, on the other. We conclude with suggestions on how to bridge the gap between inclusive neoliberal development policy and the needs of small farmers, who for decades have been the social and economic bedrock of Eastern Caribbean societies.
New Zealand's inclusive science-based system for setting animal welfare standards^OCT 2008^APPLIED ANIMAL BEHAVIOUR SCIENCE^Inclusiveness and science were, and are, essential contributors to the development and operation of New Zealand's current system for managing animal welfare at a national level. The involvement of individuals and groups with diverse interests, having aligned, complementary or opposing views, is considered to be a most important part of this process. Participants include animal behaviour, production, welfare and wildlife scientists, animal welfare advocates, educators, ethicists, veterinarians, primary industry stakeholders, regulators, lay people and others. The Outcome, after 25 years of activity, has been an integrated and comprehensive animal welfare management infrastructure. Legislative and regulatory initiatives established a national advisory committee and related animal ethics committee system for managing the scientific use of animals, as well as a similar national advisory committee for dealing with welfare matters relevant to all other animal uses in New Zealand. The responsible use of animals in science is critically evaluated by a cooperative Australian and New Zealand council, and, within New Zealand, two animal welfare consultative and liaison groups with diverse membership, one including politicians, have enhanced communication about wider animal-related matters. Building on substantial prior experience in animal-based sciences, marked increases in research, scholarly and educational activities in animal behaviour, health and welfare sciences were fostered through the establishment of dedicated research groups and centres, leadership positions and tertiary-level courses, supported by institutional, governmental, industry-related and other funding. The quality, depth and breadth of the research and scholarship so generated, and extensive mutually beneficial interactions internationally have provided, and provide a secure foundation for formulating animal welfare policies and framing credible animal welfare standards that are applied nationally. (C) 2008 Elsevier B.V. All rights reserved.
